Batman - The Movie Review. But this for my kids and it was the most boring movie I have ever watched.The shows are more entertaining to watch then the movie
Case Study of County Politics. This film tells a story about LaSalle Parish in Louisiana (and by extension the rest of America). Sheriff Darryl is shown handling the rigors of his job. Oddly, he carries no pistol - a symbol of lacking something? A truck overturns on a curve, and spills its load of shoes. The poor people show up to carry off their free shoes, recalling that scene in Charles Dickens "Tale of Two Cities". Then a dead body is found, and this scandal should be censored, says the political boss and judge. Sheriff Darryl is visited by an exotic dancer who reports her husband is missing (after dancing at a private club). The rest of the film tells how the murder was solved.The language and contents of this film would have been banned prior to the 1990s. While "realistic" about the lost souls it portrays, it seems to have no redeeming social values. Yes, it gives a view to politics and personalities not usually seen in films, and which can educate the viewers. The film does not mention the corporations (like Big Oil) that dominated the politics of Louisiana, and other states. We see how the Twin-Party System meets at the top to accomplish its missions. Like in a small county, the heads of the opposing parties meet to divide the spoils. In this film the Governor loses an election. Was he too clean? So a new Administration takes office, and life goes on unchanged. There are some winners and loser, but that's the way the ball bounces. Blaming a small businessman who has a claim against the county seems too cynical.
no teeth to this one. Maybe I was just expecting something like Jaws but I didn't think this movie that great. I watched it twice now only because I kept falling asleep the first time. The script is very weak and thus so is the story, the  acting is flat. Most of the shark sequences are in my opinion taken from  existing documentaries (I have seen photographs of at least one scene), you  can tell that they are cut into the movie and the parts that where done for  the movie are very poorly done. Don't waste your money, if you want to  watch it, rent it, don't buy it
Direct to video potboiler re-tread that never should have been made. This direct to video "sequel" is actually more of a re-tread of the original 1998 guilty pleasure erotic thriller/film noir potboiler, and another of the countless, and pointless, direct to video sequels to come from Sony/Comlumbia/Tri-Star as of late (Cruel Intentions 2 & 3, Starship Troopers 2, shall I go on?).  Wild Things 2 focuses around a rich girl (Susan Ward) whose stepfather mysteriously dies, and the only thing standing in her way of inheritance is her high school rival (Son of the Beach's hot Leila Arcieri) who claims to be the man's true, biological daughter.  Naturally, just like in the original, there are plot twists aplenty, as learned by an insurance investigator (Isiah Washington, giving a somewhat inspired performance), and naturally, there are double crosses, murders, and a redux of the first film's threesome, only it's not as erotic as the original's.  Wild Things 2 isn't just a cardboard copy of the original with none of it's good points, it's a solid waste of film that even fans of the original film will hate.  Is it worth seeing?  Depends how much you liked the first Wild Things, but for the rest of us, just watch the original and forget this ever happened
Cant watch. I downloaded this program and it was garbled and video as if played in slow motion.  This is the first of two downloads that didn't play.  I know it was not my computer because I did download three that played ok
Avoid this bootleg. This DVD is a poor quality bootleg. The real U.S. title of this film is "Master Killer", but the original title is "36th Chamber of Shaolin". A company called Celestial owns the worldwide copyright on ALL Shaw Brothers movies. Their digitally remastered DVD has been available for a couple of years, and puts this bootleg to shame. That catch is that you must purchase it from a Hong Kong based web site. Amazon is not allowed to sell it, so they have listed this bootleg. Find a Hong Kong based web site and purchase the official DVD
BO-ring!!!!. Possibly one of the worst movies ever made, Bo and John Derek managed to massacre the Tarzan legend while wreaking cinematic havoc with this unbelievably bad waste of celluloid. Where to begin....the lousy script, the poopy cinematography, the atrocious acting....I can't think of enough adjectives to describe how putrid this actually is. As for erotic - forget it. Jane should have boffed the ape instead. Jane and papa head through the jungle, delayed by her repeated falls into the river. Despite the time period, when women were supposed to be modest, Jane doesn't seem to know what underwear is. Yeesh. I can't believe people actually paid to see this tripe. If you must watch it, rent it and save some $. You'll be glad you di
GARBAGE. This movie was really a waste of money. the writing the directin are all very bad. it is also very low budget which i thought would increase the realness but i was wrong safe your money and keep searchin
Not happy. This is only a portion of this episode.  It cuts off in the middle of a sentence
Do the right thing...avoid this movie. I would not go so far as to say this movie is terrible. I would say it is self-important, immature, obvious, and overwhelmingly one-sided.  It seems Spike Lee does not believe there are any white people alive who are not either stupid, racist, phony, or downright evil.  I had a bad feeling about this movie as it started off with 4 1/2 minutes of a sleazy looking woman having a seizure accompanied by bad music. Then 4 minutes of an inane morning dj spouting a string of unconnected meaningless words.  Lee had his moments, but it was pretty much a 2-hour music video.Spike Lee doesn't mess with fantasy, only with reality and his reality is black and white. It is infact fantasy, and pure propaganda
What about the missing episodes. Why should one buy this series? What about the missing episodes? Are they going to be added later, or this is it? I cannot believe this. Would you buy a bicycle with a missing wheel? Or a keyboard without the C and R keys? I'd like Amazon to explain its customers what it plans to do..
Missing episodes. This series is being sold with missing episodes, like many others here in Unbox. Do they think their customers are so dumb? Would you buy a DVD series with a missing DVD? What sense does this make? What a disappointment this service is..
Same Thing. The Dane Cook episode is the same one that it on his "Harmful If Swallowed" c.d. The c.d. also has the uncensored version of this routine that is over 1 hour long. The one star rating is not based on the content. It is based upon Amazon not sharing this fact with customers
The end of a great show begins. THE TRANSFORMERS gets my vote as the worst movie of the 1980's.  It pains me to say this for I am a fan of the series.  It was a travesty to see Optimus Prime (the greatest of the Transformers) fall in battle and pass on the Matrix of Leadership to a successor (Rodimus Prime) who proved incapable of leadership.  Galvatron was a pathetic reincarnation of Megatron--he lacked the malevolent cunning of Megatron and behaved like a raving lunatic.  Why would a Decepticon warrior follow him into battle?  As for the new generations of Autobots and Decepticons introduced in the movie, they were forgettable.It amuses me that "fans" are raving about the movie now yet they did not pay to see the movie when it was released twenty years ago.  THE TRANSFORMERS failed at the box office and I am glad it did.  As a fan, I was insulted.  Perhaps these other "fans" have allowed nostalgia to blind them to the ugly truth of this outrage.
Boring to watch. The actors spend too much time just staring at each other without speaking. The story is too unbelievable too. It was a waste of my money to buy it.
Cant watch. I downloaded this program and it was garbled and video as if played in slow motion.  This is the first of two downloads that didn't play.  I know it was not my computer because I did download three that played ok
Read the book. For the times this movie was made, the acting is good. I would love to see this same story done in more modern times where I believe the acting would be less in the dramatic style and seem more real to life. If you've read the book, this movie cuts out so much of what I loved in the book. I wish not only that it would be done in modern times but I can see it being done in a trilogy style to capture all the interaction of characters and the essence of the story would be more complete. If you have to choose between the book and the movie, choose the book
TERRIBLY MADE. I have no idea why I saw this movie in the first place, perhaps it was because The Jungle Book is a fascinating story. However I was realy dissapointed not only is the film boring but it is very silly(in a stupid way).The action scenes were terrible. I recommend this movie to 6 year olds who dont care about the quality of movies.
Easy Come Easy Go should be for boats fans. If you got Elvis Presley and Dodie Marshall and put them in the same film you will have Easy Come Easy Go, an Elvis Presley that people who like boats or sailing or both will love. But anybody that hates boats or sailing and is an Elvis Presley fan will be un-happy. And Elvis' leading lady in this film is Dodie Marshall which I guess is a re-make of a film with the same name came out in 1947. And this is one of final films that Elvis sings the same song with somebody else, and the song is Yoga Is As Yoga Goes. He sings that with Elsa Lanchester who plays a not very nice yoga teacher. If you are an Elvis Presley fan, then buy or rent Jailhouse Rock on video or dvd
BIg Zach!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!  www.bigzach.com. The only seen that i like is where he had Crap all over the walls of the bathroom and Bob Saget went crazy yelling
Bad Device. I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service
A lot of green light and not much else. Rule number one if you're making a Stephen King movie, especially if it's a TV movie; make it scary or don't make it at all!  THE TOMMYKNOCKERS fails to do this miserably!  For most of the film, you're watching a lot of green light and a lot of silly inventions.  Granted, that's all in the book, but it written chillingly by King in a way only he can do it.  There are some exciting alien moments at the end, but by then it's too late.  You've just spent three hours watching a bad knock off of an X-FILES episode.On the plus side, I had no problem watching the infamous Traci Lords act like like a total slut!  Bless her
What's up with that?. I wish I had read the other reviews first.  Though the quality of the episode and the video are top notch, the episode cuts off after 22 minutes.  Obviously, I already know the ending of "The Black Death", but I still wanted to see the full show
What about the missing episodes. Why should one buy this series? What about the missing episodes? Are they going to be added later, or this is it? I cannot believe this. Would you buy a bicycle with a missing wheel? Or a keyboard without the C and R keys? I'd like Amazon to explain its customers what it plans to do..
It certainly doesn't age well. I have wanted to see this movie since it came out in 1981 when I was first becoming interested in 60s radicalism (I was 10 at the time) and now I really wish that I had seen it then and got that particular mania out of my system.Despite great acting by actors that had yet to be established (ironically Kevin Kline's future wife, Phoebe Cates, would be in Fast Times at Ridgement High - that other movie with a cast of well known actors that the casting director somehow managed to find before they were famous) the overall script is just a tedious mess of characters acting badly. They are either guilty about selling out or they are trying to live the pissed off radical stereotype (one that wears very thin after your 20th birthday) and Meg Tilly is just there to say some of the funniest strange lines (it's like she was auditioning for the part of River on Firefly 20 years too early). I won't deny that it's cool seeing Jeff Goldblum playing creepy and Kevin Kline fighting it otu with Jeff Daniels, but the storyline feels dated.Last, the special features are pretty weak. The trailer is badly done. The "making of" featurette has Lawrence Kasdan saying the exact same things he says on the liner notes. And the extra scenes don't even show the Kevin Costner scenes that they filmed and edited out (which is a shame since everyone goes on about how his character was the bright spot and the center of the group, but we never get the sense that he's anything but a corpse. Of course, halfway through the movie I started to wish that Kasdan would have just done a movie abotu the Costner character with his friends as minor players - but then again when Kasdan and Costner did team up they produced the painfully dull Wyatt Earp.)So this is an OK movie, but it's not great. It doesn't deserve the respect it gets. I'm sure there are better movies abotu college friends reuniting and/or The 60s. There have to be. Anyhow, watch it if you have the burning desire but don't pay full price
Not Happy. I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?
Mini screen version of big screen musical. I absolutely love Oklahoma - one of my all-time favorites! Too bad the display is reduced to a thin 6" wide ribbon, leaving 2/3 of the screen blank. I'd really like to see product descriptions indicate the viewing size, or lack thereof! There's no way I'd purchase a mini-screen marvel if I knew better
UnBox video not yet working. Will not play once video was downloaded. I get the error message:  "can not play file, please try again later. error# 0x80040273" I made the exlusive give me call me back feature but the UnBox department was already closed, I was told the UnBox Saturday and Sunday 6-5 hours. I have to say I am impressed with the Call back feature. I downloaded the Unbox Beta now and am recieving email assistance to try to resolve the problem. Thanks Amazon UnBox! I will Update again - Feb. 10,200
Very Poor - except for Rory Block's performance. I agree with most of the other reviewers that this is a very weak production with lots of pretentious talk and some pretty poor musical performances which are heavily cut to make more room for chatter. However the couple of minutes where Rory Block sings &quot;If I had Possession Over Judgement Day&quot; are worth the entire price of this DVD. Don't buy the tape 'cos you'll have to sit through so much stuff you won't make it, but on the DVD you can go straight to Rory Block and never watch the rest
Kids found it boring. If you're trying to instill an appreciation for classical music -- and I can't imagine any other reason to show Peter and the Wolf to kids -- don't buy this version.  The DVD does have background music from the symphony, but the musical aspect is NOT EVEN MENTIONED.  The true test is in its appeal: 3-year-old boy, 5-year-old boy, 9-year-old girl ... all found it boring
Inferior sequel. I loved Mortal Kombat,and I thought the sequel would carry on the great Kombat legacy.I was heartily dissapointed when I saw annihilation.Brian Johnson was cool as Khan,but some of the special effects were so fake I had to laugh.Robin Shou returns as Liu Kang,the savior of Earth.After killing Shang Tsung,the group heads on home when all of a sudden,the Emperor busts up the party and sends his minions down.There,Khan makes his first appearance,along with his abnormal,yet awesome soldiers.Johnny Cage is killed,and Rayden(now played by James Remar)fights Khan,winning but sacrificing Johnny Cage.Now,Earth has seven days before it's destroyed.What I didn't like about this movie was appearances by people who had died in the first film,like Scorpion and Sub-zero.Who heard of Sub-Zero having a brother.Another thing that got me was how Liu Kang's fighting got worse since the first film.He was losing every battle,except the end,and even then he wasl osing.Do not get this film if you want to avoid dissapointment
Not good... Just rented this dvd and was quite surprised.  Normally, I'm a big George Clooney and Matt Damon fan.  However, in this film, their talents were underutilized and did not make up for the poor script, editing, and direction which made this film quite dull to watch.While the idea behind the movie is good, it could have been more entertaing, dramatic, or suspensful.  As another reviewer remarked, I was quite tempted to shut it off after 45 minutes and watch something else.  But, I did suffer through to the end, where the film just sort of ends and leaves viewers hanging..
For Joe Dallesandro fans only. If you are looking for a good story and character development, this movie dissapoints. The story is rather thin and slow with more focus on Joe's good looks. A irritatating aspect of the DVD was white flashes occuring at  innapropriate moments during the movie
Rip Off. Like many of the other reviewers I feel cheated.  Anything contoversial was left out.  As a dumb suburban honkey myself, I demand the reissue of this dvd with "Kill the White People".  What good are all those funny sketches if SNL doesn't have the balls to put them on dvd?I also didn't read any reviews as I assumed I was getting the same product that was put on vhs years ago.  Instead I got scammed.  What's even worse is the "bonus scene" is the Opie Cunningham interview which was already on the original vhs.  Please explain how this is a bonus.I was furious when the movie ended.  The least they can do is put out a part 2.  I thought I was buying the Cadillac of comedy.  Instead I got the Ford Pinto of crap
What Were They Thinking?. Man, I don't know what the other reviewers of this movie were smoking, but it should be illegal!  This is, first off, a terrible DVD: 4:3 (full screen) format, with a dark, muddy picture.  Worse, the plot is typical, predictable, and poorly written.  Other than looking for glimpses of Teri Hatcher's body, sitting through this fiasco is a total bore.  I was also surprised at how bad Teri's acting was in this movie, since I've seen her do much better in things she was in previous to this.  That is probably the fault of the director, Erik Anjou, a third-rate director (at best!) who has done a total of two movies and one documentary.  Gee, I wonder why he isn't in more demand (NOT!)!I can enjoy "B" movies, and bad movies, but this one is just so totally non-involving that it is not even good enough to laugh at.  I can't imagine that this mess was released on DVD for any reason other than to cash in on Teri Hatcher's current popularity, and to suck the cash out of people who are anxious to see a younger (29 year-old) Teri Hatcher nude.Rent this, if you must, but, wow, there is no reason anyone should want to buy a movie this bad
Dont get "Fiji" final week ... Dont dwnld " Survivor, "Thunderstorms & Sacrifice" ". Its my fault for not reading the whole thing. you would think that the last episode would be the finale , but NO, its just a 10 minute recap going to the finale 4. I didnt even get a full 45 minute episode. No finale. I got rippped off. $1.99 dwnld not well spent. Dont bother dwnldng any episode of fiji if you dont know the ending. Because they dont have that episode, not even the reunion show
Painful. From the cover, this movie looked like a fun mixture of Cruel Intentions and Metropolitan. No such luck. I think the biggest problem in this movie was the script-- the writing was so bad that it was actually painful to listen to the dialogue. Though there are some normally fine actors in this cast, it would have been impossible to triumph over the poor script, and the cast as a whole seemed strangely void of emotion, except for a few moments of melodrama. I found myself hating even the characters we were supposed to sympathize with. Delilah, who is supposed to be the "fun, crazy" outsider, simply disgusted me with her actions at the movie's central party. Even the art direction in this movie was strange-- many pivotal scenes in the movie were shot from very far away. The strangeness of this movie is not intentional, it's just lack of skill. Stay away
LA FEMME FONDA. The gutsy performance of Bridget Fonda is the only saving grace of this ultra-violent, nihilistic remake of the French hit LA FEMME NIKITA.  Director John Badham manages to keep the action tense and suspenseful, but the writers expect a lot from viewers.  How can one truly identify and/or empathize with Fonda's character?  She's really a cold-blooded killer, with little grace or worth.  Even after her Pygmalion like transformation, she is still the same ruthless woman, only we are now supposed to sympathize with her and wish her well?  This reviewer can't do that.  Gabriel Byrne struggles gamely with his likewise unlikeable character; Dermot Mulroney only manages to look goofy in his puppydog idolization of Fonda; and poor Anne Bancroft tries to be the cold, but caring, mentor.  It's to Fonda's credit that she manages to at least get us in her corner, guiltily or not
Mixed feelings. I have very mixed feeling about this tape.  When I bought it, I did not realize it was for new mothers.  I have Cindy's two previous workouts and love them both, so I purchased this without question.  Here are some random thoughts:--I enjoyed the different length workouts.  You don't always have 45 minutes to workout, even if you aren't a parent.--These workouts are lead by Kathy Kaehler, not by Cindy like her other tapes.  I found Kathy uninspiring and uninteresting.  Cindy does not seem as familiar with this workout as she is with the Radu ones.  She is more "window dressing" in this video.--The amount of repetitions for the movements varies greatly, which I found very annoying.--The warm-up and cool-down are very, very short, even on the 40 minute Workout "C".--The music will put you to sleep.  I suggest hitting the "mute" button on your TV and listening to your own music.If you are a new mother or beginner, this is a good tape to ease you into a workout routine.  However, I believe you will quickly outgrow it.
NL  BOMB !!!!!. I just purchased this film and viewed it.  It is the BIGGEST WASTE OF MONEY !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!Buyer beware !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!I Love National Lampoon, but this was not a hit.
Jet, what were you doing in this?. Jet Li as a contrac killer? Come on! The reason why this movie isn't that famous is because it pretty much sucks. It's just a shootem up bang bang type of movie. No realy kung fu here
A Waste of Time. I think this is the same version of 'Animal Farm' I saw that completely changed the ending of the book.  This version actually makes a happy ending out of the story!  A complete waste of time, and ruined the uncomprimising messages of the book.  Read the book.
Warning Incomplete Episode!!!. The episodes in this series have an average running time of 50 minutes. This one happens to be only 18 minutes. This mean sthat the file abruptly stops right in the middle. Even though it only cost me $2 I still got jipped.  Let's hope Amazon can iron out these kinds of problems before they get this service farther underway. Be careful enough to sheck the running times to be sure they seem accurate before you buy them
Beware of Unbox!!!. Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for
Buyer Beware - Not What's Advertised. Don't know why my first note hasn't appeared, so I'll briefly restate. the claim-to-fame of this film is it's avant-garde, push-the-envelope sexuality. Amazon describes this film as "Unrated", but that's not what nearly all of these listings are selling. These are the new "R" Rated version that is MASSIVELY redacted. In fact, all of what makes this film famous has been reduced to some brief nudity. Even though the box continues to bill it as "The sexiest movie ever made." On top of that, despite an English only cover, my VHS purchase was subtitled in SPANISH. The seller has offered an adjustment. He didn't know. But Amazon needs to drop the 'Unrated' description, as that implies the original. Those still interested might look for something like a 'director's cut'. I still haven't found one. Sorry if this is a duplicate of previous post
the worst vampires movie. Is a bad sequel and have a poor quality of special effects
All lies, an attack on america... For what purpose these lies about the life of this man? Are the liberal film makers racists who don't believe that there is a good black man to depict on film so they have to lie? If someone wanted to write fiction about a badass black fighter on the cusp of super stardom who is framed for a murder then be my guest. Hurricane carter is not and was not that man.Facts:In the movie denzel washington is shown in military garb with more medals on his cheat than colin powell. They want to drive home the point that here was a man who served his country and is now about to be screwed by it. Fact is carter was kicked out of the army after being court mashalled 4 times!In a title fight scence with an italian american fighter named giodello carter is depictied as beating this man pillar to post only to be screwed out of the decision he so richly deserved. Fact, giardello deserved to win that fight according to the overwhelming number of experts who have viewed it then and now on tape. The depitction is another lie.Another lie is this notion put forth in the movie that hurricane was on the verge of getting that title before mean white bigots framed him for this murder. Fact is that carter's boxing career was going down hill and he had only won 8 of his last 15 fights. As carter's boxing career failed he became more militant in his political views and hated white people. While in prison he was diagnosed to be psychotic. Yeah a psychotic racist is the model for black america. Shame.Norman jewison must not think much of black folks to make a movie of lies like this. Denzel washington should be ashamed he participated in such trash. Those who produced this trash bet that the average public would be gullible enough to believe these lies with no attempt at knowing the truth and hollywood didn't care; they just like the message. Looking at these reviews i have to say they made a good bet. America bashing and race baiting is alive and well, earning oscars and making for big box office. A shame.
Why the Charge. Curious as to why Amazon would charge for this content when CBS offers it for free on the official Survivor Website.  Yeah, at the CBS site you have sit through 4 commercials, but it is worth it to not have to download any extra programs
Creaky. Charles Laughton plays the rotund monarch in a role that was highly praised. But it's lumbering and creaky, with heavy-handed theatrics, typical of the early talky era. I found watching this picture very heavy going
Cant watch. I downloaded this program and it was garbled and video as if played in slow motion.  This is the first of two downloads that didn't play.  I know it was not my computer because I did download three that played ok
Good production, but absolutely pointless. I should say first that this should be a good movie, at least on paper.  John Hurt and Richard Burton turn in solid performances, and everything about the production -- set design, costumes, etc. -- looks just as it should.  But there is something lacking in this adaptation that makes it pale compared to the book.Orwell's _Nineteen Eighty-Four_ was, largely, _about_ reading and writing, and the power they give to people.  As such, it is a thrilling novel, and a great pleasure to read.  Seeing John Hurt writing in Winston Smith's diary doesn't quite cut it for me; the essential spirit is lost in the translation to film.Beyond this, there are also some more mundane elements of the plot and characters that were cut to fit the screening time.  What I missed most was Smith's growing frustration with Julia being "only a revolutionary from the waist down" and his schoolboyish admiration (affection, really) for O'Brien.The only real highlight of the movie is the constant voiceovers coming from the telescreens regarding the progress of the war and the rooting out of traitors.  Orwell's vision is captured perfectly here, and the woman who read the "news" voiceovers gets the tone exactly right.All in all, the movie is nowhere nearly as compelling as the book, and isn't really worth the trouble.  In the time it takes you to procure and watch the movie, you could be halfway through the book
Warning Incomplete Episode!!!. The episodes in this series have an average running time of 50 minutes. This one happens to be only 18 minutes. This mean sthat the file abruptly stops right in the middle. Even though it only cost me $2 I still got jipped.  Let's hope Amazon can iron out these kinds of problems before they get this service farther underway. Be careful enough to sheck the running times to be sure they seem accurate before you buy them
Did not work. The ones that are posted twice do not work. If they are posted once, you can try to download it, but it might not work. The video only worked for about a minute. Shame, since I really like this show and I wanted Amazon Unbox to be cool. The one cent CSI works, go download tha
OH...THE PAIN.  THE PAIN OF IT ALL... Mortal Kombat: Annihilation is one of those films that is so bad that it actually HURTS to watch it.From the nearly complete recast of almost all of the characters (odd, considering that in interviews after the first movie, all of them said they'd want/ be willing to come back for a sequel), to the horrible (even by 1997 standards) CG effects, to the cliched fight scenes (gee...two women in a mud pit.  I bet it took them all night to come up with that one), virtually everything that could have gone wrong with this movie DID go wrong with this movie.Loosely based on the story of the Mortal Kombat 3 video game (and set immediately after the first movie, which, while not great, looks like Citizen Kane compared to this stinkburger), the movie set about the lofty goal of depicting Shao Khan (played by Brian Thompson, the alien bounty hunter from The X-Files) and his army (shown in most scenes as a small band of extras.  Oooh...scary.) as they attempt to take over Earth by merging it with the alternate dimension known as Outworld.  This merging of realms will result in the destruction of humanity.With only a week to do anything about it, Lord Raiden (played by James Remar, replacing the, and I can't believe I'm saying this, much better Christopher Lambert in the role) once again enlists the help of Liu Kang (Robin Shou), Sonia Blade (Sandra Hess), and Princess Kitana (Talisa Soto), along with help from a select few other characters from the video games' crowded lineup, to prevent this from happening.The story in and of itself is not necessarily bad.  However, given the film's obviously low budget the weak screenplay, the loss of most of the excellent cast from the first film, and most jarringly, direction even more inept than that of Paul W.S. Anderson, it quickly becomes clear that they set their sights too high, only to have practically everything come crashing down.The only saving grace of this film is its killer soundtrack, featuring an updated version of the theme created for the first movie, as well as music by KMFDM, Megadeth, Rammstein, Juno Reactor, and others.If ever you're looking to punish yourself for something, then by all means watch this movie.  However, if you actually like yourself and want to remain on good terms with yourself, you will avoid this movie like the plague.  Believe me, you'll thank yourself later.
Robert Altman at his weirdest. This film is evocative of the quirky, madcap Robert Altman at his best and worst.  We got it because we have a Bud Cort fan in the family, and just to see him makes it worth it.  But the story is strange, resolution less than satisfying.  If you're really a big Altman or Cort fan, then you must see it.  Just be aware that THIS IS NOT A WESTERN!  (I had it confused with John Wayne's &quot;Rooster Cogburn&quot; and the Dennis Weaver's &quot;McCloud&quot; and kept waiting for it to start, thinking I was seeing more previews.)  The storyline combines an oddball who lives in unauthorized apartment in the basement of the Astrodome who is trying to fly, with a murder mystery and detective story.  This is one of Shelly Duvall's early roles -- don't miss her upside-down false eyelashes
Avoid if you like Vampire Movies, and if you want to see good acting. There are very few movies that I haven't finished watching.  This now goes on the short list.  Luckily I didn't rent this one and instead was excited to see it on TiVo, that is until after 30+ minutes in I was hoping a vampire would kill me.This film while it has an R rating and there is a reason why, even the toned down TV version was extremely graphic, from pulling out someone's tongue, watching a vampires head blow up and catch fire in the sun to blood spray.  There isn't anything wrong with a good horror movie but graphic violence to fill time (so you don't have to have actors say anything) seems a bit of a waste.The premise of a rag tag bunch of vampire hunters joining forces to defeat evil could have been a great movie.  But, the low budget, director chosen and filming of this movie won't make it a classic on anyone's list.In addition the movie was WAY OVERACTED.  I don't know if everyone was trying to make the film better or what but the overacting made it to the point that it made the acting look horrible.  It got to the point I no longer cared who won a battle.As I said this is one of less than a dozen movies I have been looking forward to seeing that I couldn't even finish.Gets 1 star cause I can't give it less
Cant watch. I downloaded this program and it was garbled and video as if played in slow motion.  This is the first of two downloads that didn't play.  I know it was not my computer because I did download three that played ok
Not very good. I love sci fi and hate this movie.  When I mean I love sci fi, I will accept plot flaws to a good premise or special effects.  This movie, has no plot and no premise.  The special affects are good, but not enough to call the movie even remotely enjoyable.  Complete dissapointment. my 2 cents
... horrid movie. i can't believe how disappointed i am in this anime. i had heard so much about it and how it is a story that is at the same time most touching and sad. but it's not. the little girl annoyed me so much. i just can't stand spoilt kids like that and seita probably would not have died if it had not been for her. omg she just annoyed me so much throughout the whole movie. can't stop ranting yeah... for those who haven't seen it, you might like it like everybody seems to but... i would not recommend it at al
Over Acting for Beginners. More bad acting and false passion than any human can stand. If you can empathise with any of these characters see a doctor
calling this the worst horror movie is kind. this is movie is A NICE BIG PILE OF WARM DOO DOO.THERE NOTHING ENTERTAINING ABOUT THIS FILM HORRIBLE ACTING AND SERIOUS OVER ACTING ARE JUST THE BEGINNING TO THIS MESS.NO STORY TO BE FOUND SUPER BAD SPECIAL FX .I MEAN U CAN SEE RAW MEAT TOSS ABOUT AND THE NEW GUINEA ZOMBIES LOOK LIKE BROTHERS AND SISTERS U FIND IN COMPTON CALIFORNIA.AND ADDING STOCK FOOTAGE IS PLAN LAZY.I DON'T KNOW IF THE PERSON WHO DIRECTED THIS STILL ALIVE IF HE IS HE SHOULD BE MADE TO WORK AT MCDONALD'S MAKING FRIES FOR LIF
This is really stupid!. This has to be Stephen King's worst work adapted. This adaptation is even worse than Needful Things. Children Of The Corn (I am talking about the original and not the crappy sequels) was miles abouve better than this garbage. Just a stupid movie adapted from a lame book. Just plain trash
What about the missing episodes. Why should one buy this series? What about the missing episodes? Are they going to be added later, or this is it? I cannot believe this. Would you buy a bicycle with a missing wheel? Or a keyboard without the C and R keys? I'd like Amazon to explain its customers what it plans to do..
Horrid Film. This is still to this day one of the most aweful films i ever saw. I took a girl ona  date for this movie and wow, what a mistake. The movie has no real plot and just gets worse as you watch it more.
no title. What a disappointment!  I remember Siskel and Ebert raving over this romantic comedy.  Romantic, maybe, but comedy - never.  Very predictable plot from beginning to end.  And Rosie Perez was truly offensive.  A few times I couldn't understand what she was saying.  There is no way I could buy that she and Cage's character were attracted to each other.  Maybe critics liked this movie because it had no sex, violence, or rough language.  Although Cage does get shot in one hold-up scene.  It was just that you knew what was going to happen every step of the way.  I am beginning to Like Cage more and more as he ages. [ spoiler] I was really disappointed at the end to find out that the real people whom this story is based on were always happily married to their original partners.  Either they shouldn't have changed it so much or they shouldn't have let us know about the real story it was based on.[end of spoiler]  But Fonda and Cage were very engaging together
Friday the 13th, Part V - A New Beginning. Friday the 13th, Part V - A New Beginning is the worst in the series so far and that is saying allot. The acting is much worst then in prior movies. The script is awfull like on a police academy parts 4 and onwards level and that is nothing short of terrible. The special effects looked cheap even for the time the movie was made and the budget is like nothing close to the first couple of movie. The music is outrageously bad and is probably some of the worst 80's music I have ever heard. I love the 80's hairdoes, the tacky cheap looking clothes, and the make up is atrocious.The dialogue is so bad that one wonders if it is a highschool project gone awry. The killing scenes are also kind of lame and they seem to have run out of ideas. The movie is only 92 minutes long but it sure feels it is like at least twice as long and the plot makes no sense at all. This is a movie that has no redeeming qualities and should be avoided at all costs
Not Totally Faithful to the book!!. First of all I love the chistmas box the book. I have read it and re-read it. I also liked the other 2 books in the series. But i was dissapointed with this movie. I am not saying that its a bad movie but i think that it took most of what was special and magical and left it out. And also the book didn't take place in the 90's it took place in the 1940's. The acting was average nothing else. the only one to live up to the charater in the book was ms. O'toole as keri. I hope they someday make a more faithful movie also they changed little things that they had no reason to change. richard owned a formal wear co. not a ski company, and they didn't move from seattle
Thumbs way down. Oh did this one stink.  Convoluted and confusing, the buildup to the conclusion was positively endless.  I didn't laugh once
Same Thing. The Dane Cook episode is the same one that it on his "Harmful If Swallowed" c.d. The c.d. also has the uncensored version of this routine that is over 1 hour long. The one star rating is not based on the content. It is based upon Amazon not sharing this fact with customers
Lowenstinks. This film was dreadful.  Streisand is absolutely unlikeable.  To enjoy this film, you would need to buy into the romance between Streisand and Nolte and I just can't see how that is possible.  I couldn't believe it when I found out how critically acclaimed this film was.  Along with The English Patient, this is one of the worst 'critically acclaimed' films I have ever had the displeasure of viewing
Why the Charge. Curious as to why Amazon would charge for this content when CBS offers it for free on the official Survivor Website.  Yeah, at the CBS site you have sit through 4 commercials, but it is worth it to not have to download any extra programs
Lack of talent ruins a movie that could have been good. Battlefield Earth is an adaptation of the book by L. Ron Hubbard.While the book was a rather interesting story about humans, led by Jonnie Goodboy Tyler, taking back Earth from the Psychlos, the film has turned the story into a string of badly filmed action sequences, with silly camera angles and awful editing. The Psychlos already have human workers before capturing Jonnie. This change in the story serves no purpose but makes the story even more messy. The film then focuses on some of the story elements in the book, but leaves most of it out, including the entire last half.Considering this was a dream project for John Travolta, it's strange that he would let the book be made into such a bad movie, especially such a silly one. While the book was not without flaws, it was actually pretty good, but the movie is for the most part more or less incompetently made. The director, writers and editors all did a bad job. It does have some entertainment value though, which keeps me from giving it the lowest rating.
Dissappointing. I wasn't expecting Disney, but I was less than thrilled by this feature.  I'm assuming there's a genera of animation produced in the mid 70's that took the whole 'stoner' heavy metal thing and ran with it.  Many many long drawn out scenes with rock music and psychedelic colors that did nothing for the story.I am an animation junkie and will watch anything and everything, but I couldn't get through this whole film
My advice, watch 'Get Shorty' instead. The problem with this film is I read the book.  I was disappointed simply because `Be Cool' is an obvious showcase for the musical talent.  The overly long dance sequence with John Travolta and Uma Thurman is a prime example.  Somewhere the bulk of the story was lost--and there are some very--very good characters appearing in the film that would've been more intersing if somebody would've said, "HEY, don't forget the book!"  But being true to the original source is not Hollywood's strong suit.  "Be Cool" provides some popular music, some known faces, but without John Travolta, the movie would never have been made.A few laughs are provided.  A couple ironic scenes show up, but there's too little to sustain a full-length feature.  Basically, the project is a disservice to everyone involved.  Some of the characters are so thin--face it--poor Christina Milian as Linda Moon, is reduced to being a voice that sways when she sings--a clich.  The Rock does the best he can but again, `He's a gay bodyguard;' he's the  brunt of insulting jokes offered up by a Raji, his boss [Vince Vaughn], who, in the book, is far more sinister--but in the film he's an idiot.Of course Chili is Chili. Travolta does a very nice job, and Chili's obviously the smartest guy in the room.  Uma Thruman's performance is, well, not funny--not serious, not intense--not much-- at best, she made me shrug.  I do like what Harvey Keitel did with Nick Carr, but there's just not enough, and all the negatives reflect completely on the director.  Enough said there.My advice, watch `Get Shorty'again, or read `Be Cool.'
Be Warned. I love this film.  It's epic storytelling on a grand scale and timeless viewing.  I was thrilled to see it being released on DVD , UNFORTUNATELY it seems there was little if any restoration on the print used.  I have only viewed sections of the film so far but EVERY frame I have seen has surface dirt or scratches.  In one section there are long scratches down the entire side of the picture.  I was so looking forward to seeing something close to a pristine print which is what a film of this calibre deserves.  I'd have given 5 stars if it had, so the minus three is for the appaling print .  One of  the worst I've ever seen
Not Happy. I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?
Only mildly interesting, and no "classic". I saw this at the library and brought it home, thinking it might be interesting to watch. I very rarely watch films made after the 1950's, but this one looked as if it could be enjoyable. It ended up being only mildly enjoyable, and a bit boring. I felt that within all the time it ran, we didn't really get a good understanding of the inner being of the main characters; seemed to remain in shallow waters all along. The film was sort of good...pretty photography,and for the most part it seemed like the costumes, hair, way of speaking, etc. were accurate for the time period (so often such movies are so obviously modern people dressed up and pretending to be from way back when) but something just wasn't quite right, and it is hard to know exactly what it was. I was surprised and disappointed that there was quite a long scene with male nudity which to me was quite unnecessary and inappropriate. I think the whole swim scene could have been done effectively without showing full nudity. I am grateful the women in the film remained properly clothed. So I would not recommend this film for families with young  children, because of the nudity.
Same Thing. The Dane Cook episode is the same one that it on his "Harmful If Swallowed" c.d. The c.d. also has the uncensored version of this routine that is over 1 hour long. The one star rating is not based on the content. It is based upon Amazon not sharing this fact with customers
Wonderful program, but flawed files... Okay, so to catch up on this exciting new series, I decided to try this revolutionary downloading program - Amazon Unbox!  I selected the first 10 episodes and hit Purchase.  Minutes later, I was watching the first episode, it came quickly, sounded great, and looked wonderful... however the second one was missing a few minutes at the end.  Forgiveable, until... whole episodes starting arriving incomplete or had missing video, making it incredibly frustrating and disappointing.But, this IS a good concept... unfortunately, Amazon has yet to verify all their own files for both audio and picture quality!  So, until the issue is fixed and paying customers recieve completed files or refunds... DO NOT try and download Season 1, Episodes 2, 4, 5, 6, and 7!!!  1, 3, 8, 9, and 10 were the only ones that were 100% complete for me
The boring movie!. This was just a boring movie...can't understand the otherreview's saying it's good. Wouldn't reccomend it
Kronos - the ravager of worlds. A lonely traveler is out in the dessert (looks like the same place that many great sci-fi movies were made) in his 50's pickup when he spots a strange light. Meanwhile back at the laboratory an unusual meteor is being tracked on its way to earth. What do they have in common?The Dr. Leslie Gaskell (Jeff Morrow) suspects that there is some nefarious plot from outer space. They could be right.  But can he prove it?This movie is missing the front-end dialog familiar with the classics of the era. They just used the word Kronos because they must have thought it sounded nifty like the giant, this of course is misleading as it makes you think it has something to do with time. There is a love interest between Gaskell (Jeff Morrow) and Vera Hunter (Barbara Lawrence). A fun side interest was looking at al the fancy scientific equipment circa 50's concept. The menacing device is hockey may have had too small of a budget.
Negative 5 stars!. Because there were so many great reviews for this movie, I decided to go out and rent this film and watch it.  I was bored to death watching this film, and whats with the words "what's wrong" kept being said over and over again every time someone opened the medicine cabinet in a computer generated voice?  Those words and that voice really annoyed me!  Why does this place have not one person with hair?  Now, I'm not trying to be raciest here, but what's with a black girl and guy dancing totally nude on t.v., well  I can only say that the girl was totally nude since they only showed the guys chest and up.  What's with that guy who kept stalking one guy by saying that he wanted to be his new roomate?  Was he supposed to be gay?  I guess this film is way to so called "artsy" for me.  What I know is that this film is boring, and when it comes to ending, you don't know what happends to the guy at the end.  The film just kind of fades out after he stands on top of that cone stairway.  This film makes the movie The Village exciting to watch.  I wish that I could give my money back
Nothing to write home about. The review on the cover of the DVD reads "A snappy, sexy thriller..." I must disagree. This was the most unsexy, and unthrilling movie I've seen in a long time. In my opinion Ashley Judd doses not fit this roll, it's almost comedic.Twisted is poorly written and losely held to gether by okay acting. Seems the actors were doing the best they could with what they had. I have no doubt the producers and director felt the story had potential but they failed to realize that with this production.The film's ending holds an interesting twist but too many lose ends are left to the viewers imagination. My vote? Just okay, nothing to write home about
AMAZON SUCKS. I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!
Forget it. What this film has is an interesting premise and storyline but unfortunatley it becomes to silly and ridicoulos and the car chase scenes didn't help either. Bruce Willis plays the part of a psychologist that while on vacation visits a friend of his Bob Moore who is also a psychologist and is later murdered and the chief suspect is in his therapy group, Bob is determined to find the killer and is also helped by a detective. There is also a young atractive woman played by Jane March who gets involved with Bruce willis's character Dr. Bill Capa, the films only intresting thing is the therapy group itself which has some odd characters otherwise the film was a lame attempt of being a thriller. Now I'm not a big fan of Bruce Willis but I have seen much better films with him in it than this including Die hard trilogy, last man standing and the sixth sense
Beware of Unbox!!!. Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for
just ok. i'v seen a multitude of documentaries, both low and high budget, and although i found the story interesting i felt this film was not up the hype it was given.  worth seeing, but not worth owning
Let's Bore Film Fans to Death. I tried this one based on other submitted reviews and was sorely disappointed. Where were the scares? A little trippy, it hints at being a countercultural horror film: Easy Rider on Vampire Island.  Interior monologue from our heroine, Jessica, reflects her insecurities about what her friends will think of her, but offer no insights into her mental illness. This is the film's one and only device. And the filmmakers have no idea what to do with it.  BORING
imho:  Dumb movie... After seeing some of the other Amazon reviews of this movie, and the fact that Jason Swartzman was in it (after having seen him for the first time in "Rushmore" - a wonderful film), I had to purchase a copy of this DVD for myself to view.  It's got a wonderful cast of fine actors, but I found this movie really dumb.  One critic on the DVD box claimed this was "Laugh Out Loud Funny."  Really?  What movie was he watching?  I strained a chuckle here and there, but that was about it for me.  The Lily Tomlin & Dustin Hoffman characters were particularly annoying as was the script.  I know this was supposed to be a satiristic movie, but I didn't find much to snicker about.
I Didn't Like This Movie!. I watched this movie called Water and I hated it and thought it was terrible and BORING and it just wasn't funny at all. I like Michael Caine but I thought his talents were wasted in this movie! The only good things about this movie are the beautiful Carribean Island location and the reggae music which is one of my favorite kinds of music but the plot doesn't do justice to the location and music
Unwatchable. Character studies of dysfunctional families is a fairly common comedy device.  However, in most such efforts, there are enough likable traits to counterbalance the unlikeable ones.  We found no redeeming qualities in any of the major characters.  Even the bride (who is supposed to carry the film) seemed fake and unlikeable.  We watched about 20 minutes of this DVD and ditched it in favor of something else.  For a much better "quirky family" movie, wait for "The Family Stone" to come out on DVD
Vulgar and disgusting. Saw this one on television.Vincent van Gogh was misfortunate in life and certainly crazy. The artist who portrays him does his job very well.The scenery is breathtaking.However the nudity  in the film is vulgar. The chaeracters are hard to identify with. Some of the scenes are disgusting.Not going to see this one again
DVD PUT IT ON DVD. I DONT WONT TO DOWNLOAD IT I WONT IT ALL ON DVD THIS IS WASTE MONE
The Big Letdown... Believe me guys, I am a fanatic of Classic Outer Limits, I remember when my Mother would not allow my brother and I to watch because we couldn't sleep later that night...anyway, the story was very original, but it just crumpled to nothing, it started with a bang, but why would a man with a beautiful wife do that to himself, and he did it all for nothing, I mean it's like the writers got tired of writing because the second half was very disappointing, and the ending...please, a waste of human life.
Great Movie - HORRIBLE DVD. The move is one of my favorite sci-fi films but this is the worst job of trasferring to DVD that I have seen. There are no special features and NO CHAPTER STOPS, this is as if they copied a video tape to a DVD. I could accecpt it being full frame but if I had known that it was this cheap a transfer I would not have purchased it
Poor. Terrible, all around bad movie. Don't waste your time
Did not work. The ones that are posted twice do not work. If they are posted once, you can try to download it, but it might not work. The video only worked for about a minute. Shame, since I really like this show and I wanted Amazon Unbox to be cool. The one cent CSI works, go download tha
My name is George "Hen". How adorable this film is.  John Lithgow is brilliant.  I love the scene when he is throwing all the McDonalds hamburgers at the beast.  Catch of the day!  This movie means something to John.  His name is John "Lith", his name is John "Lith."  I wonder if Johns little babie son ever acted again hahaha.
Not a movie about sharks, a movie about poop. This movie is the story of a man, Mark Desantis, who is killed.  Mark's laptop is harpooned and then he is eaten by sharks.  His friend, Shark Expertman, suspects foul play.  So he and Mark's sister go on a shark filled adventure to the bottom of the fishing grounds of some local tribesmen.  The tribesmen didn't harpoon Mark's laptop though so the heroic duo look elsewhere.  Then they find bad scientist.  He is bad, or is he?  But he is bad, because the whole movie is bad so are all the actors.  The shark footage is good, but because it is literally ripped from past &quot;Shark Weeks&quot; it was really familiar.  As a final note, the last shot of a shark clearly shows a fishing line stuck in it's mouth.  This line has nothing to do with &quot;Shark Attack&quot; but probably had something to do with the Discovery Channel episode it was initially filmed for.  This movie should be shark attacked.  Poop
Cant watch. I downloaded this program and it was garbled and video as if played in slow motion.  This is the first of two downloads that didn't play.  I know it was not my computer because I did download three that played ok
Disappointing. My friend has a minor talking role in this, so I downloaded it to see my friend, and because I admire some of De Palma's past work. The film displayed plenty of talent in all areas except script. I lost interest by the halfway point, and watched through the end only because of my personal connection. Plot resolution was implausible, even if it's based on fact. Characters fell apart
Terrible. This was an awful movie. I kept waiting for it to get better and then the credits started to roll. I was hoping for something along the lines of "Crouching Tiger Hidden Dragon" or "House of Flying Daggers" but this movie does not even compare. Instead it comes off as a cheap knock off of one of these great Chinese movies.The worst part about this movie is the visual effects. It tries to emulate the effects of the two movies I listed above, but it looks like it was done on a $5 budget, making it nearly unwatchable. I am ashamed that I sat through this movie when I could have spent my time doing something that I would have enjoyed more, like giving the cat a bath
Boring... I found the humor to be somewhat arid.  I had trouble staying awake.Not recommended while driving
The devil made this movie. I made my girlfriend a deal: I'll watch The Devil Wears Prada with you if you watch Kung Fu Hustle with me. We watched Kung Fu Hustle first and she enjoyed it, although she fell asleep near the end. The next day we watched this. I found it unbearable to even sit through the first half hour. Wow, what a horrible movie in every way. The over-the-top cuteness, the dumbed down script and generic characters - all awful.Despite their supposed intentions, it seems to me that movies like this are actually really demeaning to women. I know it's supposed to be a "chick flick" but how I don't see how most women don't find this movie completely insulting and condescending.Aside from all that, this film uses the same old trick of finding a hot chick and dressing her up in a sweater to make her "ugly." And "fat." Oh, and I'm sure everyone who works at a fashion magazine making $40k a year is a ridiculously hot model.I know I didn't finish the movie, but I find it hard to believe anything that happens in the second half could possibly forgive the first half. Although my girlfriend did say that even though she agreed with me on almost everything I said about the movie, part of her didn't really mind watching it. Must be something a man will never understand.P.S. At least Meryl Streep was goo
The recording was very bad. The play itself was good, but the quality of video and sound was very bad all through the DVD.The sound quality near the end of play was too bad with irregular flattering in sound and video or intermittend drop out of sound.
How much did they spend on this garbage? Worst  Levinson film I've seen since  "Envy". I actually wish they had given us director commentary on this disc because I would have listened to a little of it just to see what Barry Levinson was thimking and I would cross my fingers and hope he would blame the whole thing on a really bad drug trip. Take a look at the man's filmography and tell me if you think this absolute disgrace belongs there. Worse, he wasn't alone, SOMEONE ELSE liked the idea enough to co-write it. Everyone else can blame a large paycheck, but Levinson actually came up with the idea. This is one of the most beautiful terrible films I ever seen, if they took one tenth of the imagination they put into the set and toy designs and invested it into the screenplay they might have had a movie
Chop! Chop!. (What do Holly Hunter and Burt Reynolds have in common?)Just another flick about a gal who falls for an abuser, this time with the gimicks of a waterlogged piano and exotic New Zealand Maori.The tribe had it right, though, ignore these two losers and stick with the trees
Yuck Yuck. What was I thinking when i put this movie on my rental list, I couldn't even begin to tell you.  I guess from watching the previews, I expected something a touch different.  But what I go was the typical 'teen' movie.  You guys know what i'm talking about: they make someone over to get even, they get jealous, someone falls in 'love', now they want revenge.  The only thing diffent was the reason for the revenge.There was more to high school than the cheerleaders, the ball players and all their drama.  I don't want the cheerleaders and ball players to be offended because I had some great friends that either was a cheerleader or a ball player.  (LOL Ok maybe just the ball players).  But for the MOVIE MAKERS: be creative, come with something new.  Maybe it's me growing up, but these teen movies are getting 'tired' with their same ol' routines.
Same Thing. The Dane Cook episode is the same one that it on his "Harmful If Swallowed" c.d. The c.d. also has the uncensored version of this routine that is over 1 hour long. The one star rating is not based on the content. It is based upon Amazon not sharing this fact with customers
Believe it or not... it's terrible. The year: 1965. The cast: Peter Sellers. Peter O'Toole. Woody Allen. Ursula Andress. The soundtrack: Burt Bacharach. Tom Jones. Dionne Warwick. Manfred Mann. The movie: Believe it or not -- terrible. Really... as in unwatchable (other than the relatively entertaining animated opening credits.) Painfully unfunny slapstick routines, actors seemingly reading their lines off of cue cards, and no plot to speak of. Not even fun to watch for 60's camp value like The Party or Casino Royale... I had to turn it off at about the halfway mark.Grade: IncompleteSafest bet: Get the soundtrack, skip the movie...
Nick Cage in a bad role. Nicky Cage was not very good in this cinematic decomplishment, as he turns  in a horrible acting job in this dull and boring movi
an exercise in film making; not a film; 2/10. Roman Polanski, whom I'm none too big a fan, is quoted as saying "People like Truffaut, Lelouch and Godard are like little kids playing at being revolutionaries."  And I think that quote sums up Shoot the Piano Player fairly well, it's an exercise in film, using new ideas & concepts, such as the scene where we don't follow Charlie but instead follow the woman leaving the apartment room, but in the end is a vapid, hollow piece of art; like a Norman Rockwell painting, or the work of Andy Warhol.Upon initial release the film was torn apart by the general public & critics alike, but now some 50 years later it's considered a landmark film, one of the most, if not the, most important of the French new wave, a movement cited as being the biggest influence on the American cinema of the late 60's and early 70's.  But, simply because it was influential doesn't necessarily stamp it's place as flawless.Everything about the film is fantastic; the acting, the music, the cinematography, and yes, the radical ideas Truffaut used are inspiring, but it's not enough to save a film that is utterly meaningless.The thing about the French New Wave's effect of American cinema is that American film makers took their ideas & added a layer of depth to them; they were more than just "oh, let's try this weird shot, it'll  be experimental"The movement, on numerous occasions, has been compared to jazz, which I can understand but don't agree with; with jazz, yes there's a free flowing improvisation, but there's something there than just pretty pictures & ideas that would be considered absurd by the standard audience's mind.A fantastic example of a scenario where the influence was greater than the original is John Cassavettes, whose Killing of a Chinese Bookie has the feel of a French New Wave film, but is also a fantastic work of art
A disappointment. I bought this movie because I thought it would be like the movie version of Louis L'Amour's "Conagher". Unfortunately, it is a far cry from that movie. The Quick and the Dead was too predictable, the dialog was stilted and unrealistic, and the characters...well, they were too much "in character" and not believable. I am curious how faithful the script was to the book. If the movie is as faithful to the book as "Conagher" was, then I apologize to the movie makers and will hold a grudge with Mr. L'Amour instead
Why the Charge. Curious as to why Amazon would charge for this content when CBS offers it for free on the official Survivor Website.  Yeah, at the CBS site you have sit through 4 commercials, but it is worth it to not have to download any extra programs
Awful!. I rented this movie from Netflix recently, expecting a wonderfully campy, cheesy horror film. WRONG. Its just an hour and a half of boring film.The plot is lacking, the characters are annoying, especially Duane.Its simply a ridiculous film
not entertaining. First let me say that i am a composer and die hard musician. i just watched this movie to learn what i could about this supposed genius, and i could barely keep from turning it off, actually, i did turn it off. quite unattractive really. turns out Beethoven was an insane jerk and his lifestlye was not intersting to me at all. he may have been a great musician, but that is not really the focus of this movie. in fact, there is no focus in this movie, except that he was a jerk.If you want to watch a great movie about a great man, I suggest the "The Endurance". Enrest Shackleton will make you want to punch people like this Beethoven character.  It will blow you away.
awful. Painfully bad.  I want my money back.Listen to Bob's albums, but stay far away from this movie.  So many great actors, but the story is nonsense.  The characters are just a random assortment of stereotypes.  Unnatural dialogue.  Poorly lit.  Poorly directed.  Poorly edited.And Bob couldn't act his way out of a paper bag.  Stone-faced, frail, semi-catatonic; completely devoid of charisma.  It's his vanity project, but he comes off looking ridiculous.  Even his musical performances are only so-so.The movie was shot entirely inside a Hollywood studio (except for a few 2nd unit shots of downtown LA), making it look fake and crowded.A case in point: Jeff Bridges and John Goodman.  Amazing together in The Big Lebowski.  Both appear here as flat, irritating, one-dimensional characters.It's a bummer, man
Even Steve thinks this film sucks. After doing this film Steve Martin quit doing movies for a while and even turned down scripts written for him so if your a huge fan you may enjoy it, but Roxanne, LA Story, and Bowfinger are some of Steve's best works.
Not what I hoped for. I'm a big fan of Colin Firth and I was disappointed of this movie, I felt sleep, wish I never do on an average good movie, I do not recommended if you've seen Bridget Jones diaries, not even close..
Beware of Unbox!!!. Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for
Dreadful, Dull, Disappointing. I didn't care for this version at all. I thought there was no chemistry between the two leads, and there should be at least some smoldering of repressed emotions. The story was so abbreviated so as to seem just a conventional, brief story of thwarted love--the character development, especially of Jane, was missing in action. No heartbreak, no horror, no sense of Jane's virtue, tough interior and self-reliance, which helped her overcome so many of life's obstacles. Not even much atmospheric scenery. This Mr. Rochester, played by the usually-excellent Ciaran Hines, is utterly forgettable, weak, and miscast. He doesnt have to be handsome, but he does have to be powerful, passionate, sexy, and seething. After all, he keeps a mad wife locked in the attic and he tries to keep that secret while almost commiting bigamy.Instead, try the Timothy Dalton version which is excellent though now a little low-budget looking,  or the 2007 even sexier and faster-paced version with Toby Stevens and Ruth Wilson, which is outstanding and the best yet. It moves right along, and yet it keeps all the story essentials.
No memorable quote available. Half-hearted adaptation of Ernest Haycox novel is weak.  Scott is good as Owen; Knox is equally good as the baddie, but the film is missing movement.  If there were ever a Razzie award at the time, it would have to go to the  title song
Beware of Unbox!!!. Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for
Cant watch. I downloaded this program and it was garbled and video as if played in slow motion.  This is the first of two downloads that didn't play.  I know it was not my computer because I did download three that played ok
Full screen = no sale. I wont buy this title until they release the original WIDESCREEN version
It was entertaining... But had one of the  worst endings ever...what happened anyway? My husband and I had to rewind the movie 3xs and still could not decide if the two people on board were alive or ghosts?  For example, the sailor on the boat looking at the yacht didn't see the woman, who was clearly standing up looking around.  And her baby was crying miserably...the movie depicted her as a doting mother whom runs when her baby cries yet, she wasn't interested at all in comforting the child, instead, she was looking at the man whom she supposedly saved, which didn't make any sort of sense?  These types of questions CHEAT the viewers, because we end up walking away from the movie disappointed because there was no clear understanding of what happened in the end...its like ordering a piece of cake, and not being allowed to eat it...which sucks!  Ohh, by the way, four out of the six actors should find new careers
Poor. Terrible, all around bad movie. Don't waste your time
One step above truly hideous. I am a Jane Austen fan. I love Pride and Prejudice and there are three very good to marvelous adaptations of that great novel. However, Mansfield Park is Jane Austen's most complex and serious novel, and on the whole it is my favorite. Fanny Price is the most difficult of the Jane Austen heroines, not the wittiest or most beautiful, but the one who knows the difference between right and wrong. She is mentored by her uncle, the righteous and honorable [and I don't use the terms loosely] Sir Thomas Bertram. Somehow, the adaptation of this great novel has twisted Sir Thomas into a sadistic, sexual pervert. Moreover, Fanny is constantly babbling to us in Jane Austen quips that are not part of this novel. They simply missed the point of the book.The acting is okay. The settings are okay. The directing is sad. But the sense of disappointment and betrayal by perverting the essential theme of the book has left a very sour taste
Should have been made in America. This film was very confusing and boring.  The dark tone of the scenery was depressing - hard to follow, I really think this should have been either colorful for an audience of children or more graphic for an adult audience.  It's almost like the director wasen't sure which audience he wanted to please and doing so didn't please either one.  Skip it
Missing episodes. This series is being sold with missing episodes, like many others here in Unbox. Do they think their customers are so dumb? Would you buy a DVD series with a missing DVD? What sense does this make? What a disappointment this service is..
Bad Device. I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service
Bad Device. I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service
Just not gripping. Admittedly the film is clever and the acting is good and it has it's moments of entertainment, BUT overall it's long and pretty boring.  It seems it would have been better suited as a play, which apparently it was originally.  I had just finished re-reading Romeo and Juliet when I rented this, thinking I was still in a Shakespeare mood, but this didn't do it for me.  I suppose if I had just finished reading or watching Hamlet, it would have been better.  My favorite parts are Oldman's silent scientific discoveries, completely amusing.  Couldn't wait for the movie to end, honestly
For Lana Clarkson fans only. An incredibly bad film, whose only redeeming feature is Lana Clarkson, in (and out of) some skimpy outfits.  She's completely gorgeous, but even she can't save a disaster of a film.  Buy Deathstalker instead
What a waste. Betty's voice is still strong and beautiful but arrangements of most beloved songs are simply horrible.If you prefer traditional versions this concert is not for you.The quality of image and sound is very good.Can be recommended only to hardcore fans
Travesty. An accessible story with all the elements of a Great American Novel was somehow transformed into a perverse, worst of the worst ABC Afterschool Specials. If you had not read the book, you would be unable to follow what was happening. Some of the worst directing and editing I have seen in a long time. The original Evil Dead, with all its flaws, is a better put together film than this one. This movie is flat-out painful to watch. You get no justifications whatsoever as to why the characters behave as they do. It all seems so random. Read the book. If you see this movie in a rental store, just move along, please, nothing to see here
boring....... i only liked it when pinnochio talked. that was funny, but the rest of the movie was discusting. Some of the scens were very sick (not the blood, but other things). There was no blood hardly, and i could have made it alot better. I espected a good film but it was ... and i would never see it again
Can you say fast-forward?. A failed spoof on Sci-Fi genre luckily, this is a movie about how to make movies. It is designed to teach you how to keep your actresses from losing their heads, or from losing any other appendages.The movie's main thrust seems to be concentrated on upper torso frontal extensions (several pair). While observing this movie, I learned about the fast forward button. And suggest you do the same.
Nick Cage in a bad role. Nicky Cage was not very good in this cinematic decomplishment, as he turns  in a horrible acting job in this dull and boring movi
"Pheelyp es a weeynie". This is a ho-hum buddy picture about a bunch of guys driving aimlessly around the west for "one last fandango" before they get drafted. Most of their time is spent ragging on one guy, "pheelyp," to the point where one wonders why he is friends with the other three. The peril of Vietnam hangs in the background while these dopes carry on with their fake Texas accents. Passable popcorn fun if you've got nothing better to do.
Attempts To Be Provokative, Turns Out Ultra-Violent Gore. The ideas behind 15 minutes aren't bad at all. Take one Robert DeNiro, put him in New York, mix him with some American-dream hunting Eastern Europeans on a killing spree, and try to provoke some emotions, and have a sly dig at the American justice system. Lets see...nothing happened...only repulse.If, like everyone else, you plan on watching this film because DeNiro is in it, you will be dissapointed. He puts in a tired performance, almost as if he knows the film is a load of B.S. The attempt to be hard-hitting goes horribly wrong, instead it's just repulsive over the top violence, and its pointless...naked prostitute gets hacked to pieces, why? There are ways to create provoking films with such violence but they have to have meaning, such as 8mm (the horrible subject of snuff movies, hard-hitting meaningfull film), 15 minutes is far from meaningfull. We all know there are some deranged psychopaths out there doing just that, but when converting it to a film, it needs a deeper meaning, otherwise it turns into melodramatic Hollywood [...].If you like brain-dead gore and violence, lack of plot and cringing melodrama. Go ahead
Definitely not recommended. I'm afraid that the reviewers who didn't like this movie understood it all too well.  At times it promises real drama and tension, but never delivers.  There are too many character twists with no basis.  And the ending really does make the viewer feel cheated.  This is a really poor attempt at making a movie
The cover and the title make you think you're in for more than this movie delivers. As fans of 'Starship Troopers' know, the very name 'Starship Troopers' implies a galaxy-sweeping epic with lots of violence, gore, heroism, humor, drama and tons of big-budget special effects.This one is limited to one location, his lots of gore but  little in the humor, drama and big-budget special effects department.One has to wonder at the thought processes in Hollywood. 'Starship Troopers' was a big success. Sure, it was expensive, but it is also a regular staple on cable TV and it continues to sell well (#2500 or so on Amazon in DVD sells as of today - which isn't bad for a 10 year old movie).One would think that a Starship Troopers 2 would have been in the works for a long time - perhaps a final push to the bug home system. Instead, according to the director's commentary track, the special effects director of the original Starship Troopers came up with this simple, low-budget plot that he wanted to direct.  Somehow sold it to the powers-that-be at Sony and they backed it, provided that he slash his already bare bones budget even more.So, what do you get when you give Starship Troopers 2 a budget that is only 5% (yes - five percent!) the size of the original movie? A bad movie full of special effects tricks that you are most likely to see in 50s sci-fi cult classics. The movie's premise changes from being a war epic to being a haunted castle movie, a premise that the producers and director freely admit to on the director's track. They also admit to it being a "B movie" and that it was intentionally filmed to go straight to DVD. Some reviewers have made comments about it being a poorly-lit movie. That was also intentional - poor lighting means that the movie's special effects can be of lesser quality. Unfortunately, one of Tippett's other compensations for a low budget is to add more blood to every scene in the last half of the movie. It gets silly after a while, rather than dramatic.The movie is derivative of several other movies and TV shows including:-Star Trek: TNG. Remember the plot that Picard uncovered in which aliens were physically inserting themselves into the brains of high-ranking members of Star Fleet? Well, I hate to write a spoiler, but...X-Files. Same as a aboveAliens - there's a scene that just steals from the one in which the Paul Reiser character drops an alien into Ripley's sleeping quarters.Alien - the dark sets with a creepy monster about.John Carpenter's 'The Thing' - the premise of being an outpost cut off from the rest of humanity while an alien takes people over one by one. The scene where the General is chased into the base steals from the one in which the dog in 'The Thing' is chased to the Antarctic research lab by the helicopter.Brenda Strong comes to this movie as a familiar face, but not as the same character. Her character in the original Troopers was a fleet captain who died a horrible death. In this one she is an army sergeant. No one is quite sure why they felt the need to have a face from the first mivie but she does a good job and on the director's track they credit her with making this movie shoot a positive experience on a lot of levels. That makes it all the more bizarre that her name is not listed on the cover of the DVD or on the back cover credits. Too bad - her character was just about the closest thing that I found to believable in the whole movie.I give this two stars rather than one because I found the director's/producer's track to be quite fascinating. Maybe it should only be watched with that track playing.I give this one a D-. It fails to deliver on the promise of the original in so many ways
Do the Twisted. I think when many say they knew after 15 minutes who the killer was, they're actually saying they guessed who the killer was and just happened to be right.Think about this for a moment: What was the motive? That was something I never figured out. The killer didn't have a motive. That's what threw me off. But I guess some would say a crazed killer doesn't need a motive. But come on! Even the deranged killer in 7even had a reason for killing. Even Norman Bates had a reason for killing.It could be the reason was explained but I just missed it because the movie was so terrible. I don't know. I really don't want to have to watch the whole movie again to figure it out.I know if you have a lot of high profile actors in secondary roles, one of them is the killer for sure; but you're thrown off by the fact that you have Andy Garcia, D.W. Moffett, and Sam L. Jackson. So all 3 are fair game
This is Horrible. I love the Avatar and I was so thrilled that amazon allows people to download it except the only problem is I've been trying for the past days and darn it all, it's not working!!! It's not as if I'm downloading it for free. I am willing to pay and yet it just wouldn't go through!!! I think it's better to just buy the dvds...I think it's absolutely horrible to tease customers like that..
Poorly Written Script Sends This One Into The Tank. Private investigator and former police detective Jack Ramsey (Michael Harris) is enjoying an affair with the local district attorney's wife, but when she is strangled not long after he has departed following a session of amorous activity, Ramsey is pegged as the primary suspect due to "clues" obviously planted at the murder scene in order to incriminate him, and additionally because of a zealous detective (Matt McCoy) who has personal persons for disliking the former policeman.  As Ramsey tries to clear his name, the sister (Carrie-Anne Moss) of the deceased shows up, and soon she and Jack begin their own affair that is complicated by subsequent homicides and by Jack's former police partner, performed by Brion James, ostensibly, despite private devils, the sole individual Ramsey can trust as additional evidence mounts against him despite entry of other suspects.  Harris, a charismatic player who has created excellent roles, can do but little with a script that defeats as well the rest of the cast, hindered by a wandering plot that is clichd and predictable from the film's opening while, despite helpful cutting, there remains an obligatory slow motion love scene, as well as embarrassing emoting from McCoy, Moss and James that is made unduly prominent because of faltering direction.
What's up with that?. I wish I had read the other reviews first.  Though the quality of the episode and the video are top notch, the episode cuts off after 22 minutes.  Obviously, I already know the ending of "The Black Death", but I still wanted to see the full show
Michael Moore is an idiot. This was a ridiculous documentary. I watched with an open mind, and after it was finished I was so irritated because he showed such a one sided biased view, it was ridiculous. Being that it is a Michael Moore movie I should have expected this but I tried to view it openly. Let me warn you now, don't waste 2 hours or 20 dollars
Only a few more laughs. By the time I came to this movie, I had already gotten there first three. Up in Smoke was fantastic, Next Movie was great, Nice Dreams was good, this was was pretty poor. They get pretty desparate at some points here, and they constantly repeat chracters we've seen already.The Low points are when they attempt to impersonate two homosexuals (badly), the astronaut which is Cheech miming for 3 minutes of in space, and then pretentds to jerk off at the end. Also, when they got to "Harry Palms" masterbating Champion, that was about as low and unfunny as you could get, just awful. All the points in the stand-up go on about a minute too long, including the fake nightclub. The people laughing at Cheech doing a redneck, had to have been payed actors.There are some good points... not that many though. Maybe the wrestling scene, and some of the scene with Chong recording with a videocamera in the hotel room. They don't seem to do much in this. I wanted something different, which is what I got, but I didn't think it would be this horrible. These guys can do better.
Regional issues. Unless I missed it, it was unclear that the video download only worked in certain regions so I ended up wasting my money.
Hahaha!!!. Well, what can I say? I'm usually not very picky about "seamonster"-movies (especially when there's a shark involved). And though it didn't surprise me, "Red Water" (hm..!), whatever you do don't believe the cover of the dvd. That shark (!) looks frightening, and looks to be a Great White. The shark in this movie however is a Bull Shark, and very "plastic" in a non-Hollywood-sence.There is plenty of shark in "Red Water", some reviewers here mean that you hardly see the shark, but that's not the problem. The problem is that you see the shark TOO many times, and as mentioned; it's not much to look at! The effects (?) are something between Jaws 3 & 4, and that explains a lot if you are familiar with those. The acting is what you'd expect from a b-movie, ok at its' best, the script is paperthin -but it could've been more "watchable" if "more story, less shark".I doubt that I will watch "Red Water" again. B-movies like "Anacondas" and "Lake Placid", well, at least the effects are somewhat believable.I didn't expect much, but got less...
Warning Incomplete Episode!!!. The episodes in this series have an average running time of 50 minutes. This one happens to be only 18 minutes. This mean sthat the file abruptly stops right in the middle. Even though it only cost me $2 I still got jipped.  Let's hope Amazon can iron out these kinds of problems before they get this service farther underway. Be careful enough to sheck the running times to be sure they seem accurate before you buy them
Horrible. DO NOT WATCH THIS GARBAGE! This is the worst movie I have ever seen. I'm honestly upset with the other reviewers here for misleading me so badly. This film is so bad, with so many problems I don't know where to even begin. I can only hope that someone on the verge of watching this changes their mind after reading this review. If I saved one person from buying/watching this disaster, then I have done my job. At the very least buy it from the used bin, that's where mine will be
the worst vampires movie. Is a bad sequel and have a poor quality of special effects
Amateurish rubbish. This complete waste of 90 minutes is probably the strongest contender ever for a lone-star movie.  With cringingly awful acting, laughable special effects (the ridiculous head in a bucket is a real guffaw moment), appalling dubbed dialogue, cheesy music, inconsistent and confusing plot and no tension or atmosphere, The Grim Reaper is a total disaster.Don't waste your money on this turkey.
Paris when it stinks. I'm a fan of Audrey Hepburn and this movie relys heavily - too heavily on her charm.  And unfortunately, it is some of her worst acting work, posey, sing-song, and superficial.  Now, if you've read her bio, and know what was going on with her and Holden, that could explain it, but still, this film is very static.Like most Heburn films, a highlight is her clothes, her style, her self.  This film self-consciously relys on this when the script itself could simply have been better.  There are some very fun cameos by big performers that raise moments here.  This film would have benefited greatly by a better comic actress in the lead.  Jayne Mansfield could have been a hoot in this, Thelma Ritter too, in a very different way, somebody with less style and more off beat snap, crackle, and pop.  (Thelma Ritter and William Holden paired in a romantic comedy... I'm all ready laughing!)Before I hit this too harshly, this film was intended to be a trifle, the kind of movie that has bright colors and light plot for a hot summer day that sizzles.  For that, it is adequate.The remake, ALEX AND EMMA suffers very much from the same problems.  They actually improved the script, and gave the leading lady room to make some very wacky choices, but both films seem to have suffered from "settling for a star" when a less mainstream, more zany actress was needed.  OK, this doesn't stink...it has Audrey, but it certainly doesn't sizzle
Cant watch. I downloaded this program and it was garbled and video as if played in slow motion.  This is the first of two downloads that didn't play.  I know it was not my computer because I did download three that played ok
What about the missing episodes. Why should one buy this series? What about the missing episodes? Are they going to be added later, or this is it? I cannot believe this. Would you buy a bicycle with a missing wheel? Or a keyboard without the C and R keys? I'd like Amazon to explain its customers what it plans to do..
"A Promise is a Promise". It Could Happen to You was a bit of a disappointment, considering the makeup of the cast: Nicolas Cage, Bridget Fonda, and Rosie Perez among others.The movie brings to the screen the story of a policeman who after winning 4 million dollars on the NY state lotto, decides to share half of it with a waitress he met the previous day.The acting is surprisingly (!) below average, the dialogues are way below average, while the plot is not bad at all.Nicolas Cage's character is too naive and too slow, and that was just sad/pitiful!Bridget Fonda was unexpectedly plain and bland.Rosie Perez's character was overly exaggerated to the point that it got tiring AND annoying very early on.As for Wendell Pierce and Stanley Tucci this film does not seem to be their thing; they don't seem to belong.  Subsequently, they are not convincing in their roles at all.Finally, somebody shoot the "Narrator," PLEASE!Though the potential for a great movie was definitely there it fails to take off.  A shame really...  No masterpiece here.If Nicolas Cage is what you had in mind, check out the AMAZING movies City of Angels and/or The Family Man.
Unbelievable crap!. This movie could've been something, had they gotten some real actors, a script and a director. Well, they didn't, and this movie is an embarassment to mankind
what horrific garbage!. while i was watching this movie i thought to myself, "am i going to die?  have i gone to horrible movie hell?"  you see i was trapped in a theater.  it's like being tortured by some horrible nightmare but you can't leave cause B actors are pretending they can act just because they're fat.  the in crowd gives you that feeling like when it's grossly bright outside and it's a sunday afternoon and you're in a car and you've been sitting for 6 hours and you feel sweaty and there'a a football game playing on the am radio and you want to escape.  in conclusion, this movie turns me into melting snow.  but i suppose there are worse movies-- (see my review on gummo)
don't even bother!. Okay, I was excited to see this movie.  I read a few non fiction books on the dot.com bust and thought I knew a thing or two, but when I watched this movie focus on petty relationships and nothing more, I found myself wondering what planet these film makers were from.  I mean, WHO cares about these people's relationships??  NOT ANYONE WHO IS WATCHING THIS MOVIE!  We care about why and how businesses succeed and fail.  This movie sucked
Same Thing. The Dane Cook episode is the same one that it on his "Harmful If Swallowed" c.d. The c.d. also has the uncensored version of this routine that is over 1 hour long. The one star rating is not based on the content. It is based upon Amazon not sharing this fact with customers
Heartburn is the least of the ills caused by this movie. A slow, loggy movie about a philandering husband (everyone was guessing this was Watergate reporter Carl Bernstein in the Nora Ephron novel on which the movie is based; he was Ephron's husband). Jack Nicholson plays the husband and Meryl Streep the wife, and both are uncharacteristically bland. There is hardly anything to the story: they marry, she gets pregnant, he gets restless and wanders. We finish watching knowing and caring as little about all this as when we started. Very dull
WARNING: Wrong Episode!. This item is supposedly titled "UFOs: The First Encounters." It is, however, an episode about reincarnation. It is incorrectly labeled. DO NOT PURCHASE unless you are looking for an episode on reincarnation
No information, no pictures. The film shows no action, except a disgusting performance of cutting apart a dead body, and you ask yourself, in what relation to the subject of the film this stands. (Sorry, forgot the 3-second-sceen of a naked young man) Just the head of 17-year-old lads, who wonder why they got infected, when they work as prostitute,  explaning in detail what they are to do in this job and where you can find them in Prag. (Like advertising) You are provided with not the least background information about their education, why they left their home town, why they have no normal job. I would wonder what politics think and do  about the youth in the new EC-country, what young people get told about the danger of deceases at school, and what other chances they have in life
Unforgettable (Unfortunately). This movie survives in my memory for over 40 years as one of the most boring stupid excuses for a comedy ever made.  I use it as a benchmark to compare all other really bad comedies.  They are either worse than this one (rare) or better than this one. As an example: Buffalo '66 is worse.  If you watch both in the same day, you will surely die
Don't do it!. This is not the Seagal of the early nineties. Something has happened to him and it's not good. He's gained weight, does not move like before, and is hard to understand. The technical process is terrible. I will never buy another Seagal (I have 14 of the old ones) again and I think Amazon should seriously consider taking this off their site.
There's a reason why the director was assassinated. I'm a firm believer in freedom of speech, but honestly this movie was disgusting without any redeeming qualities. The product description listed above is completely misleading. It's basically a movie in which the abusers abuse and degrade their victims, and then at the end they slowly torture them to death. Pretty much the worst movie I have ever seen
Be leary of all these excellent reviews. This movie is a Shakespeare play. The dialog is impossible to understand for MUCH of this movie. Anyone who says that they understand everything these actors are saying must be lying. No one speaks this way now and it is very hard to follow. I wish I had known that it was Shakespeare before I bought it, but for some reason I didn't. The movie is also like a play but in a movie format. This might not be to everyone's liking. Just be cautious of all these rave reviews. People here claiming this review as not helpful are the ones pretending like they understand every word of a Shakespeare play. I would just like to continuously pause the dvd and ask them what the actors just said and let them fumble over themselves trying to explain
The book was great and the movie wasn't, period. Do yourself a favor and read the book and dont even look at this movie
DONT'T GET IT!. This is the worst of them all, not all that funny and no weed jokes, it's a waste of time and money, get the others and start laughing your ass off
Don't Let Rob Schneider Steal More Money. I guess we can thank the global population for making Rob Schneider a  leading actor by continually buying tickets to that Deuce Bigalow fiasco.  I could only sit through about thirty minutes of that before my head started to hurt and my eyes started to burn.I guess I have sheer boredom or desperation to thank for actually watching this abysmal feature about a thief who finds a magical earring, which transforms him into a blonde teenager overnight.  This body transforming-opposite sex switcharoo has been done time and time again, but not this badly.If the dwarf size Schneider makes you laugh because he looks like he's been on a narcotics binge for months on end, you might like this film.  I can cut the guy some slack because the script is so horrible that it would be hard for Lawrence Olivier to be convincing.The majority of scenes intended to make you laugh are physical bits that aren't remotely funny.  Girls having pillow fights where Schneider overpowers them and sends them flying through the air with each blow (literally), the standard overweight character that dances sexy even though it's the most vile thing you've ever seen.  Schneider falling down bleachers, smashing his face against every seat, a cross dressing eight-year-old boy...Adam Sandler has been stealing money for years because this same movie going public has made him a superstar.  He makes a cameo, talks so low you can't understand a word he's saying and wears quite possibly the worst wardrobe ever assembled by a costume designer.Two things make this film at least worth watching if you're as mind numbingly bored and desperate as I was last night:  1)  Whoever the Foley Artist was for this film should never work again.  Pillows making contact, Schneider falling down, rear end slapping..it's all the same sound.  It's exactly like someone stood on a third story balcony and dropped a suitcase full of bowling balls onto the street below.  (2) Anna Faris...I can't decide whether I think she's really cute or if she's just a Plain Jane with large eyes...but when I'M thinking she's pretty cute, she's nice to look at.
Just not gripping. Admittedly the film is clever and the acting is good and it has it's moments of entertainment, BUT overall it's long and pretty boring.  It seems it would have been better suited as a play, which apparently it was originally.  I had just finished re-reading Romeo and Juliet when I rented this, thinking I was still in a Shakespeare mood, but this didn't do it for me.  I suppose if I had just finished reading or watching Hamlet, it would have been better.  My favorite parts are Oldman's silent scientific discoveries, completely amusing.  Couldn't wait for the movie to end, honestly
Please not another season of this!. Ok so I have always thought Courteney Cox should not be allowed on screen due to lack of acting talent and this show just proves it. It really is the most boring show Ive seen in a long time. If you thought she was bad in scream...and friends..dont watch this...there are other actors in this show who do redeem it somewhat but could never save it. Hopefully this show will be scraped
U won't care for this one. Sat down and saw this one on televion.Only good service was that now I know buying the DVD would be a waste of money.What was actually achieved by the British is portrayed as an American achievement. Slanders the U-boat men portraying them as heartless marauders. Other than allied Propoganda pieces, There are no incidents of U-boats machinegunning people in lifeboats.The movie itself I have little respect. Basicly Plotless and  unrealistic. Action scenes unbelievable. Characters Two Dimensional.This film Awful.
Edited Version. This version is eleven minutes shorter than the orginal version based on the information printed on the DVD and listed in the IMDb.  I saw this film a long time ago and was looking forward to seeing it again, but was amazed at how much they had cut out of the movie.  The DVD packaging does not state that it is an edited version nor does the information provided by Amazon.  They made it a totaly different movie with the editing that was done.  I do not recommend this version to anyone.  The orginal movie deserves better than this chop job
Very boring. The plot to this movie or so called sequal is horrible.  I rented this movie expecting something good and I end up falling asleep.  I actually had to watch it several times just to find out what really happened.  Don't even buy it, it is a waist of your money
HORRIBLE!. i went to see this movie when it first came out, and i nearly fell asleep watching it. THIS MOVIE IS NOT WORTH WATCHING. it's so fake, & it's easy to tell whats going to happen next
Did I watch the same movie???. Ok.. I read the other reviews for this movie and I am a little confused.  Was it the same movie?  The martial arts were "ok" in this, but nothing I havent seen done better before.  The story-line  was.. ummm. well, nevermind.Oh and did I mention the film doesnt end????  I mean I didnt really care but it still sucked to cut the story line half way though.I really wantedto like this movie... but the only good thing I can say is that some of the sub-titles are hilarious
Hands down the worst of the series (that has to do with Michael). Yup, definately the worst Halloween movie. Come on, Michael on a reality show? Ha! What the f**k does that have to do with the series? Not only that, but the plot is completely pointless, the acting sucks, and Dr. Loomis and Jamie are nowhere to be found in the movie! Not only that, but the movie relies way too much on gore to be scary, and therefore comes off as pretentious. Don't get me wrong, I LOVE gore in movies, horror or not, but any knowledgable Halloween fan knows that the Halloween movies were always scary without the gore. Along with Halloween 3 (which actually had nothing to do with Michael), Halloween: Resurrection reigns as the worst movie of the series. There are a many more problems with the movie than the ones I listed, but I'm tired of typing, so I'll let other reviewers explain why it's so bad. Bottom line, watch ANY Halloween movie other than this or Halloween 3
What's up with that?. I wish I had read the other reviews first.  Though the quality of the episode and the video are top notch, the episode cuts off after 22 minutes.  Obviously, I already know the ending of "The Black Death", but I still wanted to see the full show
don't even bother!. Okay, I was excited to see this movie.  I read a few non fiction books on the dot.com bust and thought I knew a thing or two, but when I watched this movie focus on petty relationships and nothing more, I found myself wondering what planet these film makers were from.  I mean, WHO cares about these people's relationships??  NOT ANYONE WHO IS WATCHING THIS MOVIE!  We care about why and how businesses succeed and fail.  This movie sucked
Survivor Rip Off. I have bought 2 seasons of Survivor on unbox and both of them are not complete. Very dissapointing. Guatemala  episode 11 is from a completely different season and it is missing the last 2 episodes and the reunion show. Just leaves you hanging. Exile Island is missing the final episode it just goes from the competition between Danielle and Cirie for a spot in the final 3 to the live reunion show
Not Happy. I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?
Uncle Buck with John Candy. This movie was not entertaining at all, bad script, etc
What's up with that?. I wish I had read the other reviews first.  Though the quality of the episode and the video are top notch, the episode cuts off after 22 minutes.  Obviously, I already know the ending of "The Black Death", but I still wanted to see the full show
WARNING: Wrong Episode!. This item is supposedly titled "UFOs: The First Encounters." It is, however, an episode about reincarnation. It is incorrectly labeled. DO NOT PURCHASE unless you are looking for an episode on reincarnation
Ultimately Pretty Pointless. The only thing that kept me watching this movie was to see if there was going to be a Twilight Zone-type ending that tied it all together.Remember the Zone where five wildly-different people (a clown, a cowboy, a ballerina, etc.) are trapped in a round room and, when they finally escape, you find out that they're just dolls in a trash can?  It was a lame Zone, but I thought of that watching this movie as Kelly Lynch wanted to stay inside that abandoned desert house--and wondered if that house was going to be a place between Life and Death.  That Kelly might have been hovering between the two in that room and that her new "husband" was Satan.  Or an angel.  Something really off-the-wall.But it didn't happen.  It's pretty much a straight-forward story of dysfunctional low-lifes trying to figure out their messy lives--without telling us very much about themselves.  The acting is very good and Kelly Lynch looks great naked (even with bandages on her wrists and wearing a dirty hosptial gown for the whole movie), but the story gets lost in the desert.And what the heck happened to that baby that shows up for a couple of scenes and then disappears?That's what I was wondering about for the rest of the movie but nothing more is said
Mud. Slow,dull and done on the "cheap"....stick with "Zulu" and read your history book's ....far more entertaining
Annoying Lear. I didn't enjoy the film.  I also didn't enjoy the original play by Shakespeare.  King Lear is one of my least favorite Shakespeare plays.  I don't consider it particularly creative to remake a play that has already been done, and to add nothing of value to the original.  You can set it wherever you like, in medieval Japan or on the Moon, what's the difference.  It's King Lear, a downer of a play, there's nothing great about Ran just as there's nothing great about Lear, and it takes up three hours of your time.A moron named Lear, or Hidetoro, or whatever his name is, relinquishes power in his kingdom and turns the power over to his oldest son.  The youngest son warns him that it is a bad idea because the sons will be disloyal to their father.  He is right, of course, and Hidetoro Lear gets treated shabbily.  He's wanted dead or dead.In this treatment of the annoying plot, he loses his mind.  He has a faithful follower or two.  They overact.  There is nobody to root for in this depressing and ridiculously overrated downer of a play.  Lear Hidetoro is an absolute jerk.  Am I supposed to care what happens to him?  Why?  Because he used to be a powerful king, and a cruel one?  You may as well cry over Saddam Hussein.Look at this movie with fresh eyes.  Look at Shakespeare's King Lear with fresh eyes.  This stuff simply is not very entertaining, and is not very good.  The hell with King Lear.  He's an annoyance
The Postman is a very seriously boring movie. The Postman is a very seriously boring movie with terrible story line. One of the most conspicuous flops of its decade and there is good reason for it. I had to write this review when I saw that there were several people actually rating this movie at 5 stars. Seriously guys you forgot to take your pills this morning and your friends will the white coats will be visiting later to check on you, until then please refrain from using your PC as we are in danger of obliteration of good taste
"You're going down Burnhead" ???. I have to say that I was not familiar with any Darkman comics, or had had any other contact with the character apart from this movie so I cannot compare the character to other sources. Therefore, coming from someone that did not "know" Darkman prior to the film I have to say that the movie was quite a disappointment!There are the obvious comic book characteristics that one finds in these types of movies, like the Shadow, Batman etc, which is interesting.Nevertheless, Darkman was quite a disappointment considering the make-up of the cast: Liam Neeson, Larry Drake, and Frances McDormand among others.  It is the story of a scientist who falls victim to a group of gangsters resulting in his horrendous disfigurement.  In an effort to exact revenge, he makes use of his latest invention in order to appear like his targets/victims....In short, the acting and the plot are average (nothing great), while the dialogues are way below average.  The movie falls into the action/adventure/horror type of category.The characters are, overall, bland and just plain uninteresting (e.g. Rick Anderson played by the "fool," Ted Raimi, from the Xena series).Though the potential for a good movie was definitely there it fails to take off.  A shame really...In a nutshell, it's not a movie you would want to add to your collection, but it might provide for an evening's entertainment, and that's about it.No masterpiece here... 2 Stars
Why the Charge. Curious as to why Amazon would charge for this content when CBS offers it for free on the official Survivor Website.  Yeah, at the CBS site you have sit through 4 commercials, but it is worth it to not have to download any extra programs
Forsake your dearly departed or you'll be sorry. B Grade movie, really poor script.Bulk of movie is boring, superficial, stereotypical.Real purpose of movie is Baptist condemnation of the supernatural.Story line.The wife of a couple deeply in love dies in a boating accident during a beachhouse visit. The husband feels a deep loss for two years during which he is frequently visited by the ghost of the wife.On the second anniversary of the accident relatives and friends gather at the beachhouse and push the husband to come to grips with his grief and refocus his energy to move on with his life.Overtones.The leading man is depicted as unstable, self-centered, reckless, irresponsible, and fantasy-prone.before and during the two year period. When revealed to the those assembled, the spirit contact with his wife is universally condemned. His "giving up the ghost" is seen as a great relief and the first sign of maturity he has displayed in his life.The daughter has dream sequence with the mother in which the mother coaxes her into a head-on crash with a car.leaving her frightened and distraught.Media Messages.The film illustrates the creation and reinforcement of a cultural taboo.1. Spirit contact is dangerous, selfish, and emotionally unhealthy.2. The personal grieving journey of another should be co-opted by peers.3. Condemnation is the only acceptable response to spirit contact. There should be no expression of curiosity or investigation like "What did she look like?" "What kinds of things did she say?"4. Messages from loved ones in dreams should not be trusted.In short the movie creates a set of automatic responses all of which mitigate against a common sense acceptance and appreciation of the value of spirit contact with loved ones..In life our conduct is about building bonds of love and trust with those around us. In passing over these ties endure and can be building blocks for a link to the beyond. When William Blake's brother passed, he appeared and taught the skill engraving thus providing humanity for centuries thereafter with icons known to all.Many near-death experiencers have wisely learned that they must keep their wisdom to themselves. The inner teachings are sacred and must not be diluted and defiled by small minds. The same is true for after-death communications largely because of media images that create a cultural storyline like that in this film
Three Fugitives,83hours til dawn and alias. Iam not at all happy that i could not watch this product the three fugitives and 83 hours til dawn and am unable to buy this product in Australia. I think it suck that dvds have region departments and can only be watched in some countries People should be able to buy a product and be able to watch it. The sooner a dvd comes out that is able to be watched in all countries the better.
It watched it on fast forward!. Except for two cuties: William Zabka and Dana Ashbrook! Especially Dana who constantly having a hard-on
Free to Be You and Me - As Long As You Are Like Me. I rented this on a whim and it brought back a lot of memories from my 1970s days in elementary school.  This video made its rounds in the public schools.  The songs are catchy and the film quality is good.But make no mistake, this is propaganda aimed at children.  I will not be showing it to my kids.Despite the freewheeling title, the message is that girls will find happiness only if they mimic boys.Case in point:  Atalanta, a princess, finds happiness when she competes with men in a footrace and when she rejects marriage so she can travel the world (on her father's horse).  She also designs and fabricates rocketships in her spare time.Juxtapose that story with another cartoon where a femine girl in a pink dress and curls is devoured by tigers when she follows the custom of "ladies first."  The tigers abide her request and throw her into a boiling cauldron.  The narrator advises us that the boiling girl makes a very tasty meal.Our "hosts", infant puppets voiced by Mel Brooks and Marlo Thomas, are revolting.  There should be a law against using Mel Brooks' voice for a baby.  Apparently, I repressed memories of these creatures, but seeing them again brought back the horror.  Needless to say, I fast forwarded through the disturbing puppetry.Overall, this DVD is fun for thirtysomethings but should be kept away from children
Krull is dull. For starters, one witnesses what appears to be a large clump of 2x4's floating out in space, followed by a series of apparent environmental stock-footage with likewise accompanying music.Krull is an action-adventure fantasy circling around a pentagram-like weapon which is the only instrument that can battle "The Beast", who presides over an army of dark warriors called "Slayers", and a dematerializing black fortress which is never stationed in one place twice.After his kingdom is overturned, a prince turned king by the death of his father sets out to find his kidnapped bride with the council of a wise man named "Ynyr", which sets him on a trek to find the spiked boomerang {a veritable 'shiroken'} and The Black Fortress. Along the way, he gathers a small army of common thieves, a fumbling "sorcerer", a decrepit 'seer' with his boy-servant, and a cyclopse.For an action-adventure, this film contains much too much unecessary dialogue, extensive travelling scenes, and a lot of climbing. Since the battle in the first twenty-minutes or so, the film remains rather slow until the last half hour, wherein 'Prince Colwyn' {who looks like Barry Gibb} and shoddy troupe penetrate the fortress and do battle with The Beast, after predictably dispatching a large number of mis-aiming 'slayers'.In the end, 'Princess Lyssa' is rescued from the clutches of the wonderfully demonic monster, and they re-commence with their previously interrupted wedding by exchanging vows as well as a flame derived from water.The typical 'good' vs. 'evil' scenario exists here, most commonly displayed in the conclusion wherein in conjunction with the penta-blades, this 'flame of love' overcomes the 'blasts of hatred' emitted from the Beast monster.This film seems to concentrate on more of a children's faerie-tale type of story, rather than a more mature version of the genre, and could very well have been animated. I suppose it may be more appreciated by Lord of The Rings / D&D -type of fans, yet with the exception of the impressive flying weapon and giant Beast creature, as far as fantasy-action-adventure, the film is unfortunately, a rather rudimentary presentation. This is one of those films that could have been better with such a great premise and villain, but disappointingly does not live up to its full potential
UnBox video not yet working. Will not play once video was downloaded. I get the error message:  "can not play file, please try again later. error# 0x80040273" I made the exlusive give me call me back feature but the UnBox department was already closed, I was told the UnBox Saturday and Sunday 6-5 hours. I have to say I am impressed with the Call back feature. I downloaded the Unbox Beta now and am recieving email assistance to try to resolve the problem. Thanks Amazon UnBox! I will Update again - Feb. 10,200
Regarding the HD DVD. Have not yet seen the movie!This was one of the films I ordered for my very first HD order. Also included in the order were King Kong, Mission Impossible 1~3, The Good Shephard & Children of Men.Of these, only KK and MI 1~3 played on my new Xbox360 HD DVD player.The other three discs could not play!I started looking into this on the net and found that this was some sort of interface problems with the Xbox 360, although I only found this problem relating to The Good Shephard and Children of Men specifically and no instances of this problem occuring with A Scanner Darkly during my search on the net, it could be that I was just unlucky and got a defective copy of this HD DVD. I have read that there will be update release from MS to correct this problem through Xbox Live, but I'm not sure this will fix the problem.  If you've got the Xbox 360 HD DVD player, be warned this may not work on your player.  Anyone else having this problem, I would certainly like to know
I just didn't get it. This movie seemed to vacillate between funny ha ha office bullsh*t and then really freaky stuff that made me cringe and want to retch. I don't like that; going back and forth and not knowing what they "want" from me. And I REALLY didn't 'get' the ending. I didn't buy the romance. The only thing I enjoyed about this whole movie was Kevin Spacey; that's it. Just skip through the rest of the crap
I just didn't get it. This movie seemed to vacillate between funny ha ha office bullsh*t and then really freaky stuff that made me cringe and want to retch. I don't like that; going back and forth and not knowing what they "want" from me. And I REALLY didn't 'get' the ending. I didn't buy the romance. The only thing I enjoyed about this whole movie was Kevin Spacey; that's it. Just skip through the rest of the crap
Very Irreverant remake of a Disney Icon. I am appalled at the greed that Disney must have to milk out a classic like "The Absent Minded Professer". I found this to be one of the worst if not the worst remake of any movie. I found the plot to be too embelished as it made for the relationship between the characters played by Robin Williams and Marsha Gay-Hayden to be one of where it either tried to remake the safe and easy happy ending that's throughout all Disney movies, or it showed to be one where the parties had to wear their hearts out on their sleeves. I also feel that with the Character of "Flubber" it was a waste of time considering I don't remember any merchandising from the character. They should've stayed with the bouncing rubber balls from the original. I also feel that with the promotion of the Flubber substance that it was all shallow, and commericial as where in the original it was going to be put to good use in the military, and here it was to make a buck. I feel that there are some movies that are best to just be left in original state, and not be remade, and this is one of them.
It's so stupid... ...but not funny. I don't even know how Cheech and Chong fans could like this movie, because this movie is really different from "Up in Smoke" or their other movies. In "Up in Smoke" there was at least some direction to the movie, but in this movie most of it is composed of lame comedy gimmicks that were entirely not funny unless you are high off your ass or have an I.Q. less than 20. They don't even smoke in this movie! The closest thing they do to drugs is eat some marijuana leaves... how stupid do they think we are? Stay away from this one
Politically correct retelling ruins the message. Although it looks the same as the HG Wells story and the 1960 movie, this bastardization of the source material turns a frightening story about man's nature into a mildly fun sci-fi outing. Alexander's motivation for building the Time Machine is entirely different, and what he learns 80,000 years in the future could have been deduced by a more probing scientific mind (that is, if it was used to dealing with less than scientific cinematic time-travel paradoxes).So the first half of the movie wreaks havoc on the source material and pales in comparison with the fabulous creativity of the George Pal version. We don't even find out anything about what we are about to see!But things get worse is in the distant future. Although the writing tries to dance around the fact -- they have de-fanged the harsh reality of the Eloi and softened the horriffic underpinnings of their naivete. Instead of unknowing sheep, they are new-agey world-culture pluralists. The dichotomization of the human race really makes little sense. And there is no Rod Taylor running about castigating the apathy of his hosts.The only reason why I give the film two stars is because it is one of the only genuine sci-fi films in years, and I found some of the special FX (the moon) and Jeremy Irons, cheesy as they may have been, fun
Bow wow. I can't understand the good reviews given by others to this movie. Frankly, I thought it was a dog.Not to say that it had no redeeming features - the friendship between the young girl and the lawn man was endearing, if improbable. And the girl herself was a real sweetie, and a good actress - perfect for the part. In fact, the acting all around was admirable.But the script! Yikes! Not a single character in the whole movie - with the partial exceptions of the two protagonists - had any motivation for anything they did. People acting awkward or mean (in fact, just about everyone in the movie other than said two was mean), or spiteful, or stupid, for no reason at all!It seems as though somehow, the movie could have been good, but didn't make it. Call it almost watchable.I came away from Lawn Dogs (Yawn Dogs?) feeling not at all enriched. Puzzled, perhaps, at why anyone would make such a movie. Well, there was that admirable, unlikely friendship. But that was all.Pass this one by
Dont get "Fiji" final week ... Dont dwnld " Survivor, "Thunderstorms & Sacrifice" ". Its my fault for not reading the whole thing. you would think that the last episode would be the finale , but NO, its just a 10 minute recap going to the finale 4. I didnt even get a full 45 minute episode. No finale. I got rippped off. $1.99 dwnld not well spent. Dont bother dwnldng any episode of fiji if you dont know the ending. Because they dont have that episode, not even the reunion show
Terrible. Do not waste your money purchasing this movie. Wait until it shows on TV, if you're unlucky enough to see it. The music for the story was inappropriate and totally threw off the entire story. Instead of following the story my husband and I kept concentrating on the terrible music. Dont waste your money
Sex shouldn't be boring. Two moderately decent-looking white people who apparently aren't very good at sex go at it in this movie. If that's your thing, why not just rent a bad softcore porn film and be done with it? At least then you won't have to listen to the cornball pseudo-artistic dialogue in this film. What a crock. They could at least have cast a fine young sista like Rosario Dawson or Gabrielle Union to make this movie moan and squeal! This movie makes sex seem boring
Poor support. This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet
ehhh, so-so. it's a so-so film with Rourke in the IRA. Some good stuff. Look for Anthony(Stewart Head) as Rupert(note: Anthony Stewart Head portraits another Rupert...Rupert Giles on the TV show Buffy The Vampire Slayer)so, now you know. but this one is so-so like I sai
Missing episodes. This series is being sold with missing episodes, like many others here in Unbox. Do they think their customers are so dumb? Would you buy a DVD series with a missing DVD? What sense does this make? What a disappointment this service is..
Not bad, but... this in an uninspired telling of a transparent political fable.  Good enough to watch once
The king of sleeze-Jing Wong forgets that he had Jet Li starring in this movie. Jing Wong truly sinks to a new low with this movie.  Jet has one oustanding action sequence but other than that, he just isn't used.Jacky Cheung is the star of this movie and plays an actor who absolutely never uses stunt doubles.  It became apparent within 5 minutes that this movie was made to make fun of Jackie Chan.  Of course it didn't have to be so obvious but Jing Wong just keeps driving it into your head that he does his own stunts.  So if you are familiar with Jing then you know this isn't going to be a tribute to Jackie.  Oh no, it is a punch to the throat through the movie screen.  Jet Li plays Cheung's bodyguard and ends up doing the a stunt for him.  After setting up his stupid Jackie Chan character, Jing tries to do a remake of Die Hard.  Remember how you never knew what Bruce Willis was going to do and it was always surprising?  Well Jing makes about the worst movie possible from here on.  Instead of being clever, he makes Jet just keep storming in on the hostages and then flee.  At one point he takes a helicopter up and starts shooting right into the buiding at the main bad guy with all of the hostages standing around.  After the helicopter crashes into the side of the building it doesn't blow up, it just destroys everything on that floor.  So other than one outstanding action sequence between Jet Li and Ben Lam(guy with sunglasses), this movie is a complete waste of time.  Even Billy Chow couldn't save this one.  Of course it would help if Wong Jing was smart enough to capitalize on the success of Billy Chow and Jet Li in 'Fist of Legend', but instead we don't get to see them fight and get to look at Billy Chow in a thong.  Yeah, that it just what I am looking for.The Universal Laser and Video company version is OK but the imbedded subtitles are sometimes hard to read.  There is a version of this released by Dimension Video(grrrr)that has been retitled Meltdown and has been shortened by 10 minutes and also has gotten a horrible new soundtrack including English dubbing and rap music replacing what was in the original.  Doesn't matter which one you get because the Chinese version isn't really any better since it is not a good movie to begin with.
Great Acting but a bad story line. Mario Van Peebles, Patsy Kensit, and Paula Marshall are all talented individuals whose talent went to waste in this film.  The storyline of crime busting werewolves was really dumb.  The main werewolf itself looked  like a joke in comparison to the werewolf in &quot;An American Werewolf in  London&quot;
Like All Gossip: A Lot of Talk About Nothing!. A very boring and stupid film about college freshmen with a kindergarten maturity level. The movie is horribly slow to get to the point and is riddled with nonsense dialogue: I've heard better lines in 'Fast Times At Richmond High' thank you.Altogether a very forgettable film that has a lot of talk about nothing. Don't believe the great reviews about this film: the film might appeal to the 14-17 year-old crowds fantasizing about how 'cool' college life might be with all the 'cool' people and 'parties.' If you're not in that category, skip this boring film and save both your time and your money.
Star Trek:  City on the Edge of Forever. My favorite show of the Trek series but there's no way I'd buy another individual program from Amazon.  It will ONLY play on their downloaded player ...won't burn to DVD so can't play it on my television.  Don't bother buying this ...just go for the Trek collection on DVD
Dont get "Fiji" final week ... Dont dwnld " Survivor, "Thunderstorms & Sacrifice" ". Its my fault for not reading the whole thing. you would think that the last episode would be the finale , but NO, its just a 10 minute recap going to the finale 4. I didnt even get a full 45 minute episode. No finale. I got rippped off. $1.99 dwnld not well spent. Dont bother dwnldng any episode of fiji if you dont know the ending. Because they dont have that episode, not even the reunion show
Stupid Boring Gross!!. This movie is stupid beyond words. I watched a half hour of it and COULD NOT watch any more I was so lost and BORED. Makes no sense, talks about creepy gross and disgusting things, is boring and stupid!! Don't waste time on this dull as dust film
Typical rom-com for genre/bullock/affleck fans only. If you've seen one you've seen them all. Uptight guy by chance meets quirky girl, she brings him out of his shell.Well, I bought this for like two dollars, and maybe it was worth it. I watch it like once a year. No special features on DVD worth mentioning.Ben Affleck is getting married, he has to fly down to the south from NY for the wedding. But things keep getting in his way. Forces of Nature. Also, he keeps running into, and can't seem to get away from, some weird chick (Bullock). Are these signs? Should he stop being so uptight, and go with this free-spirited chick? Or should he be an adult and get married and accept his Vanilla lifestyle?The acting in this movie is "meh", meaning Sandra has the same personality that she has in every movie; and Affleck sucks, as usual. The other small parts are well done, for the most part.The script is formulaic, and the cinematography at times is interesting. It's just another rom-com where the whacky girl brings the uptight guy out of his shell. The movie opens with a stripper scene, no nudity. There is also a pot-smoking scene in this movie. There is also a scene where Affleck strips at a gay bar. Just thought I'd throw that in, in case you're considering buying this for your teen daughter or something, and that kind of thing bothers you.You only need to buy this is you are a rom-com fanatic, or a big fan of either Affleck or Bullock. Otherwise this is completely forgettable.
I've been cheated by Amazon. It really sucks, tried to download but it's not able to be viewed in pc's outsided the united states. Crikey.I'll have to wait for reruns to watch it on the telly.Whatta shame amazon dot com. Let's send a CSI to yer headquarters
hysterical, and then, just bad, mostly. i cannot, with good conscience recommend this movie.please, look at it! it's awful!drew barrymore, in her sad "poison ivy" stage, is a wretched performer.  there are pothole plothole's all over the place.  and it's itchy to watch the scene with her real mother, jaid barrymore.  were they attempting reconcilliation through a b-movie?oh! and the guy from adventures in babysitting, father of the bride & a few episodes of friends is in it, fumbling around too. where is that guy?there's a tough broad friend, a spooky house & at one point SPOILER: drew splits in half all oogy and walks around like some really skinny anatomy horror movie thingy.hey! now it sounds kind of good again
Well photographed, beautiful locations. But ultimately unsatisfying. The acting is extremely average. The plot is very underplayed; in fact, too underplayed. Even the erotic aspect of the movie loses its charm early on. I dunno. I don't think Anais Nin would've approved of this adoption of her work
Dead and Bloated. My SECOND review, as my first did not get printed (AS USUAL).  Anyway, I'll try to make this short and sweet.  I usually try and give credits to directors, producers, writers, and actors in most of my movie reviews; however, I'm going to make an exception here.  I've read other reviews that have called this gigantic turd "hilarious", "Night of the Living Dead + money + color", "wonderful for gorehounds", etc., etc., etc.  All I can say is it must not take much to please you people.This is, WITHOUT A DOUBT, the WORST excuse for a movie I've ever seen.  (My most humble apologies to Tobe Hooper and "Mortuary").  The whiners of horror movies are always moaning and groaning, "why don't critics take horror movies more seriously?".  Well, Einstein, here's a glowing example.  This is nothing but grade D trash:  horrible effects, horrible acting, horrible writing, horrible directing.  You name it; it's NOT in there.  This movie's most FEEBLE attempts at humor come off as just that:  feeble.  I bought this, together with "Dead and Breakfast", and I can't begin to tell you which one is worse.So, here's a little advice from me:  go check out a book at the library, buy a book, go to a REAL movie, have your hair done, have a manicure--do ANYTHING but waste your time on this gag-fest (for all the WRONG reasons) of a movie.  Another one that I would give ZERO stars to, if I could.
stick with original. Why American production make HK movies look so cheap? First of all, they cut off so much scene, second of all ruin it by making look act so dumb by English Dubb. ALWAYS stick with ORIGINAL LICENSED HK RELEASE. Be careful with cheap imports, boots, and bulls though
Not my cup of tea. I bought this DVD based on reviews here on Amazon. I won't fault others for thier position, it's just a matter of personal taste. For me this was a big disapointment. The story leaves a lot to be desired. The character Walker (Lee Marvin) gets away with a lot of crimes he shouldn't have. The direction seemed to be a practice in doing something different, but it failed. I'm sorry I bought this DVD
plot holes. The first half hour of this 90 minute movie is actually quite good.  In fact, it is enthralling and has an interesting twist in that we don't know the real fact behind whether a young woman was violated by her boyfriend while unconscious.  According to the rumor (the rumor being a school experiment conducted by three roommates) she was, however, but we the audience don't know that.  However, the young woman is quick to think she has been raped.  Why there is no attempt at a physical exam, is unexplained, especially since the young woman involved has the reputation of being a professional virgin, however it turns out she isn't, so that's why the movie lasts longer than 30 minutes.  Fortunately, we're not dealing with unwanted pregnancies, either, so this doesn't turn into a soap opera.  However, we do have the dreamboat "hero" who dreams up the rumor about her being raped, and who exhibits unlikeable traits throughout. But that's true of the three leads - the roommates are all unlikeable, being insufferably full of themselves.  The last half of the film, 'dreamboat' takes the turn as lead character, and it's his story we're following, whereas his female roommate had the first half of the film, and basically it's her introduction to the audience of all the characters. Turns out 'dreamboat' and the young woman victim have a history together; which means issues they have to work out, and everyone else (in a way, the entire student body and its faculty and local law enforcement) is sucked into their story and mutual thirst for truth, though the characters don't have the same truth in mind - it's about vengeance; not justice.  And vengeance when it's not the comic book variety, isn't fun for an audience, it's just distasteful.  In other words, the man and woman should have been shut up together in a room so they could have worked it out for themselves, and left the rest of us alone.  So from a brilliant first half-hour - and btw how does the roommate penniless art student have the dollars for all that tech equipment? - we degenerate into a constantly weaving pattern of lies and deceptions that seems more pointless than clever.  There is merely too much story, so it becomes ridiculous.  A basically good premise is ruined.  If you are a fan of any of the stars involved, it might be worth viewing, if only once, but the film as a whole will probably leave a vile taste in your mouth.  Perhaps that's the ultimate message on a film about the dangers of spreading GOSSIP, or in this case deliberate lies, is that what goes around comes around, and also it will leave you feeling sick to your stomach.  I almost recommend you watch the first 30-45 min then quit midway, but anyone will watch all the way thru at least once, just to be sure where this is headed
Fun Family Movie. The movie is fine, but...............There is no mention in the description that this is a widescreen format. I use full screen. When I contacted amazon to find if it was available in full screen, the response was send it back if you don't want it. I kept it, but was not happy with customer service
not even good. When I purchased devils rejects this movie came free. I watched it and hated it.Its about a sick individual who is on the internet trying to get women to come over for "a party" when they do he torchers them, with hooks piercings, the whole nine yards. After he is cought he is put into a mental institution. When he comes back as a nice guy the town people still want him dead. He gets beat up so slowly he tries to take on some of the town people 1 by 1. Now he then goes back for the girl that escaped and well doesnt live because her father kills him. Its not a good movie at all
Amateur Effort By A Budding Genius. A good dozen years before his spectacular films of the late 70's and mid 80's Allen got his name on the directorial map w/ this piece of fluff.  You gotta start somewhere.  Tiger Lily is more of a dry run for his later, real comedies than an original film in its own right.  Allen's early work does tend to be stand up material thinly disguised as film.  Many of the jokes are funny but the one note premise wears thin quick.  A must for Allen enthusiasts and people who like quirky cultish so-bad-they're-fun movies
Here we go again. I gave this movie 1 star because it is not a true documentary.  It falls more along the same fodder as "Spinal Tap".  It is missing a counter point from GM.  One could argue that Roger had chances to talk with Moore, but choose not to.  One the other hand, Rogers missing interview is what gave the movie such an emotional hold.  I believe that Moore counted on not being granted air time at GM for the production of this film.  An interview would have killed the tone.Watch the nightly news NOW.  Last night, March 22nd 2006, GM offered a one time buy out to some of it's employees.  The news reported that GM cannot afford to maintain its relationship with the UAW (Just like what caused the Flint situation in the film).  This same thing happened in the late 1980's and brought forth this extremely biased movie.  This film is entertaining in a strange way, but should not be considered to be the absolute truth.  Watch it with a grain of salt.For what it's worth,Under close examination,Careful consideration andKeen intellect, you will see a undercover messageYou might need to examine closely the content.Outwardly, things are not what they seemUntil you look more closely.Many times the basic concept isMisread in the dialogOnce you see this, andOpen your mind to it,Rational thought willEmerge
Not Happy. I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?
The Itsy Bitsy Problem. By the time you see the ending, you'll already be wishing that you hadn't watched this movie
Same Thing. The Dane Cook episode is the same one that it on his "Harmful If Swallowed" c.d. The c.d. also has the uncensored version of this routine that is over 1 hour long. The one star rating is not based on the content. It is based upon Amazon not sharing this fact with customers
AMAZON SUCKS. I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!
Poor support. This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet
Brilliant Actings, Predictable Story!. I've seen ethan hawk's best performance ever in this movie. it was great. Wiona ryder and other actors were great too but it was not even a memorable movie. it has a predictable sipmle story that made no sense at least for me. maybe I'm not right but in my opinion, this movie does not worth to buy. does not even worth to rent. but gh the movie itself does not worth anything but it's soundtrack issome channels may show it occasionally. It's worth to be watch once at TV!By the way, I forgot to mention that this movie has a great CD soundtrack, really great. worth to buy
This is Travolta's 'Passion of the Christ'. Imagine someone combining the scripts for Zardoz and Independence Day and letting a troupe of inebriated special education students control the acting and directing....then you would have Battlefield Earth.It is so bad it actually has some entertainment value which elevates it to two stars.You become mesmerized as you sit back and consider that this is the end result of John Travolta putting his heart and soul into a project.Just awful. If Battlefield Earth and Pluto Nash were humans they would deserve to be executed
What about the missing episodes. Why should one buy this series? What about the missing episodes? Are they going to be added later, or this is it? I cannot believe this. Would you buy a bicycle with a missing wheel? Or a keyboard without the C and R keys? I'd like Amazon to explain its customers what it plans to do..
So Bad, It's Not Even Good. People were talking about this movie as if it were the next Silence Of The Lambs.  There are several reasons why this is not so.1. The Dumbest Cop In The World:  This character never calls for backup, and is too slow to think of the most obvious clues.  At the end, he even throws down his gun to have a fist fight.  He'd never survive on the Sopranos.2. It's sooooooo 1998.  This movie assumes you know nothing about the internet.3. It tries to be cool by combining BDSM, body modification, and rituals, but in the end it just makes all these things look bad.4. It's inconsistent.  The Dee Snider character "retires" all his piercings for a few years, and then suddenly they're all back in the next scene.5. It's unrealistic.  Where the heck did Snider get that second dungeon from in just a day?6. I won't even get into the gaping plot holes.The acting, pretty bad.  The dumbest cop in the world character has just one mood:  Grumpy.  Amy Smart is totally wasted in this movie.  Snider's pretty good though.  Actually he's really good.Really, bottom line:  You have only two reasons to buy this movie.1. You are easily entertained and you have no problem with plot holes so big you can drive a Twisted Sister tour bus through them with room to spare.2. You're a Snider fan and you must own this.If you belong to one of those two groups, go for it.  For Sister fans, they'll enjoy how the movie roughly follows the plot of the song Captain Howdy/Street Justice.You've been warned!
Not Happy. I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?
Bloody No Good..... This movie is by far the worse of the Urban Legends movies. This is another movie I purchased without renting it first. Had I rented it first, I would not have bought this movie even though I did save money by buying it previously viewed. A group of high school friends start talking about the legend of Bloody Mary. Chanting her name will make her rise from the dead! Oh Boy. The whole movie boils down to the fact that Mary was murdered many years ago and her body put away where no one would ever find it. When Mary comes back to life, she seeks revenge on fellow classmates and kills them off. Not a good horror movie. No gore, no suspense. I would definetly recommend anyone rent this movie before buying it
Pretty Woman Meets Toxic Tort. Even though I would agree that "Erin Brockovich" is an entertaining movie, Julia Roberts performance in it is no more Oscar-worthy than was her performance of a prostitute in "Pretty Woman."  I am second to no one in enjoying a good "David and Goliath" story, but this movie has such shaky roots in reality, it is more of a tall tale, than the "true" story of a historic class action suit that, I would imagine, left more unhappy plaintiffs, than it did satisfied ones.  However, as the movie title implies, this is indeed Erin Brockovich's story, in the same way that the "Xena" character is the main attraction in "Xena: Warrior Princess" (though it should be noted that Xena's wardrobe is considerably more modest than that of the Erin Brockovich character).Erin Brockovich is a vain, brassy, boorish, single mother of three young children, with no marketable work skills, a transparently opportunistic manner, who dresses very much the same way as the prostitute character Roberts played in "Pretty Woman" (prior to Richard Gere's character taking her on the infamous Rodeo Drive shopping spree).  The movie's beginning finds Erin unemployed and pursuing a personal injury lawsuit in connection with an automobile accident; her lawsuit is lost, primarily thanks to her own disastrous testimony (swearing, cursing and shrieking from the witness stand) while being questioned by opposing counsel.   Unbelievably, Erin parlays the failed lawsuit into a job at her attorney's (played by Albert Finney) firm, mainly by pushing her way into the office and ensconcing herself at a desk.   Later, while handling the paperwork for a run-of-the-mill, pro bono, real estate sale, Erin discovers the file contains the seller's medical records, that, for reasons she (correctly) does not understand, seem to be of particular interest to the buyer, the mega utility company, Pacific Gas and Electric.  Erin independently embarks on her own personal investigation of the case and discovers that PG&E had (for decades) negligently contaminated the ground water (surrounding one of their power plants in/near Hinkley, CA on the edge of the Mojave Desert) with toxic, hexavalent chromium.  This discovery leads to the queen mother of all class-action lawsuits (at least in terms of the award), in which hundreds of Hinkley residents sue PG&E (by and through the representation of Erin's boss) in a toxic tort action that eventually nets a 330 million dollar settlement for the plaintiffs.Roberts gives a photogenic, if not especially gifted, performance in her role as Erin. The movie contains a plethora of flattering shots of Roberts (literally gushing out skin-tight, low-cut, bustier-inspired "work clothes" that would never be permissible attire for any employee of a law firm on this planet) as she engages in warm and fuzzy discourses with the unsuspecting and unsophisticated Hinkley residents. While there is much to be said for Erin's apparent drive and tenacity as she pursues the plaintiffs in the suit, she is not an especially likeable character; rather, she is rude, verbally abusive and only conciliatory and kind when and if it serves her interests.Albert Finney is considerably more appealing and believable as Ed Masry, the aged and  weary attorney who is Erin's boss.  The bantering that occurs between the two is generally amusing; unfortunately thanks to the inept direction and camera work, the focus for these scenes seems to be more on Roberts (strutting about in short leather skirts and noisy, five-inched-heeled mules) than on the sometimes-interesting personality dynamics that seemingly exists between the two characters.  Aaron Eckhart plays the affable, gentle biker and next-door-neighbor, George, who becomes Erin's boyfriend-by-convenience.  The "convenience" factor is totally one-sided and for Erin's benefit exclusively; she  unabashedly uses George for free, live-in childcare, thereby giving her the necessary freedom to assist Masry as they put together the historic case.  Erin eventually winds up receiving a staggering two million dollar "bonus" check  (from Masry) when the tort action case settles; contrastingly, George gets a "thanks" for his nanny services from Erin and his walking papers.The plaintiffs in the case are an assortment of simple individuals with unpretentious outlooks on life, who have been dealt a dirty hand by the utility giant.  Though the Hinkley residents are sympathetically portrayed, make no mistake-this movie is about Erin Brockovich (indeed, I do not think there is a single scene in which the chacracter is not present) and less about the brave struggles with life-threatening, generation-spanning illnesses that the real-life plaintiffs were forced to face, due to the toxicity in their water source.  Erin Brockovich is presented to the viewing audience (in typical Hollywood fashion) as a sort of heroine; but in fairness it would seem more accurate to say that she was a woman who indiscriminately used people, walked on others when necessary and seized opportunity after opportunity until she eventually struck it lucky and got rich.  Is the movie entertaining-absolutely.   Inspiring- not even slightly.
Short but good nude scene, disappointing movie. Well if you want to see Angelina Jolie young and naked in a short one time scene this is the movie to buy, if you don't then leave the movie alone it's just another teen rebelion movie
Cant watch. I downloaded this program and it was garbled and video as if played in slow motion.  This is the first of two downloads that didn't play.  I know it was not my computer because I did download three that played ok
One of the worst zombie flicks ever. I'm addicted to bad movies. Really bad movies. Ones that make you laugh at its pure inadequacy and the ones that are so cheesy that you can't help but be entertained. Then there are ones that are so bad you would have to be a masochist to sit throughout the entire duration of it. Ed Wood's "Bride of the Monster," "Burial Ground," and "Manos: Hands of Fate," are three classic horrible movies that I have had the dishonor of seeing and will never forget the pain and boredom that I felt while suffering through the viewing of them. "Hell of the Living Dead" is definitely one terrible zombie flick that certainly and positively belongs among the worst movies ever made. First of all, it basically covers all of the zombie cliches ever created throughout the history of zombie movies. Jungle savages, mad scientists, a little gore, a little blood, extremely fake looking special effects, a random soldier dancing in a green tutu, top hat, and cane, and really really bad zombie make up makes this movie well worth watching. Also, I can't understand why this movie is on the video nasties list. "I Spit on your Grave" and "The Last House on the Left" are much more disturbing than this movie. In any case, you should check this movie out if you want something to make you fall asleep quickly or if you are a true masochist and desire great amounts of suffering and pain
What's up with that?. I wish I had read the other reviews first.  Though the quality of the episode and the video are top notch, the episode cuts off after 22 minutes.  Obviously, I already know the ending of "The Black Death", but I still wanted to see the full show
Where. Is. The. DVD. I'm going nuts here... I might be in a slightly foul mood on account of my having just returned from a shopping experience which resulted in my receiving a parking ticket, but...I used to watch KB's Hamlet on a fairly regular basis. Whether is was on cable or VHS, I found I could never get enough.I signed the petition. I'm one of those people who's written letters in the hopes they'll actually make a difference.That said, WHERE IS THE FRIKKIN' DVD? I mean, has anybody else noticed that KB's Hamlet has already missed the DVD boat? While the world is moving toward HD-DVD, we *still* have yet to see a sign of the stupid thing. I haven't owned a VCR since back before Amazon even really existed, or was, at least, widely known (I was an early adopter of DVD).Now, years later - *years* after the first time I inquired about this release, I still can't believe it isn't out.Reality check, people: Forbidden Planet, fine movie though it may have been (and in context of this discussion as, beneath its sci-fi exterior, one can find an interesting retelling of The Tempest), it's gone from film (decades before I was born) to VHS/Beta/?, to DVD, and now to HD-DVD.Why is it that a film like Forbidden frikkin' Planet gets pushed up through the years and transferred over and over again to the latest medium when *the* finest version of Hamlet ever produced for the screen has been left behind?What's going on? Is KB being held at gunpoint by Mel Gibson's handlers? Is there blackmail involved? Did KB contract George Lucas to add a bunch of CGI ewoks to each scene? 'Cause I can't figure out, for the life of me, why we haven't seen this stupid thing yet.Was it that hard to commit it to VHS? It seems to me that it was readily and easily done.So what's the deal with DVD? Is the money just not good enough, Mr. Branagh? I realize that your talents lie in theater rather than finances, but 100% of zero is zero.It makes me wonder, then... is it some artistic issue? When transferred to the higher fidelity formats of DVD and HD-DVD, are there imperfections present that were undetectable when the film was out in VHS format?Can we see more clearly how Charleton Heston's weird teeth have yellowed and browned over the years and formed into this strange rolling dental pattern greatly in need of modern dentistry (my dentist could set those teeth painlessly over a four month period without the use of orthodontics)?For years, I've wondered about this. College came and went. I've moved to three different continents. My own career has gone from peon to Mr. Importantpants, and yet *we are still without even a DVD version of Hamlet*.Yes, I realize there's a 4:3 version of the film available for digitital download, but please don't make me any more uppity than I already am.I want the film, and I want it in its full glory, with proper aspect ratio, and preferably on HD-DVD so I can see it in all its glory (which would be especially nice considering the 70mm film used to record this sucker).I hate to give what is easily the best film version of Hamlet ever produced (and, no, this point is not open to argument - it's not an opinion, but, rather, a scientifically proven fact) one star, but given that the man and his peeps have had over a *decade* to get the job done, I think it's really just about time to see it hitting store shelves.If it *is* hitting shelves, by the by, I apologize for the rant, but I'm tired of waiting.I want to see this movie on a disc before I die.Widescreen.Preferably HD.I don't care about the bonus materials - you can keep 'em if *that's* what's taking so long.But just get some dummy college intern to do the transfer and throw together a DVD menu.If it can be done for Forbidden Planet, then it can be done for Hamlet.I have spoken.And I am awesome
No need to Suicide. I get the story line but 5 grown women need to suicide!?  The one dare to have a boyfriend and not go home for the night.  Why would that kind of free sprite would kill herself!?!?  It is not matching the character
The Tommyknockers got ahold of this movie... ...and put their own little spin on it!Going to split this into 2 reviews, one based on it from the book, the other just based on the movie in general.  The book "The Tommyknockers" is set in the town of Haven, Maine, where strange thing's start to happen to the townspeople after Bobbie Anderson find's a large, mysterious object in the woods behind her farm.  Curious, she starts digging it up, and with each shovel full of removed dirt, open's up a terrifying and life-altering experience for all those involved.1)  The movie based on the Stephen King Novel:  2 starsI watched the movie after reading the book (my own personal rule) and though at time's felt like they were true to the book, was often left going "huh?" at the changes that were implemented.  Certain thing's are left out, while replaced by hollywood's cheap imagination.  The missing teeth as well as the batteries and inventions running off them never really hit home, and though the book had a multitude of characters who had important part's of the story, we see some simply vanish and never make it to the mini-series.  Perhaps the Tommyknockers got to them first! Since it was a miniseries and ran over 2 hours, there was no reason to chop and hack this thing up and replace it with alternate scenarios and a different ending.  I was disappointed to see how Hilly was found, as well as the fate of Gard and the ship, and Marge's ultimate destiny comes out differently as well.2)  The movie in general, without comparing it to the book: 3 starsMargie Helgenberger and Jimmy Smit's do a very good part cast as Bobbie and Gard.  The overall pace of the mini-series roll's along well, and the production and directing is okay.  The sound is good and set's the mysterious mood that the town of Haven is faced with.  Disappearing people, mysterious inventions run off batteries, and a mob like atmosphere are all displayed as we wait to see who the tommyknockers are, and what exactly they want with the townspeople of Haven.  An excellent cast overall considering the many various character's that had to be portrayed in the story
Great Play, But Look At The Editing. Into The Woods is one of my Sondheim favorites.  Having seen the PBS presentation of this, I am thoroughly dismayed at how poorly this DVD is edited.  Rather than allowing one to be engaged by the staging and character interaction, this DVD uses pan and scan to isolate characters and provide sometimes inappropriate close-ups.  This especially detracts from what one wishes to see in a play; the staging.  By forcing the viewer's perspective, this version does a disservice to a very fine play that investigates our relationships with each other through fairy tales and their aftermath.I am hoping that somebody releases a version that does not presume to edit out the director's vision
WTF Happened?. This is not about Riverdance.This is about what this disc did to murder it.I popped it in, expecting to seemy favorite dance scenes (while conveiniently skipping the singing), when all of a sudden I'm at the finale.  All I could say was "WTF?!", "WTH?!", or words to that effect.This "SuperBit" edition cuts out half -- HALF -- of the scenes this performance had to offer, including (but certainly notlimited to) Riverdance and Trading Taps.Not only that, but (unless the "high def" only works for high-end TVs) the video quality is equal to my old VHS copy.I sincerely hope this problem only occurs on my copy, but I suggest to get a refund webpage ready, because the atrocious product I received royally screws this great perform up the ---
a waste. If you have any respect for the blues legend, don't buy this, don't even rent it. The very few decent tribute performances do not make up for the lack of content in this DVD. Pointless interviews and speeches make for annoying filler, when all we really want is the music. Especially disappointing is the performance by Weir/Wasserman. They rattle off a an aimless and depthless &quot;Walkin' Blues&quot; You can't help but feel that Wasserman would rather be somewhere else. Most irritating is the claim that this so-called conference &quot;found&quot; a &quot;very rare&quot; film clip of the man himself. It is presented to a lecture-hall audience, to which Robert Johnson's son was a part. When asked by the speaker if the man playing guitar was indeed Robert Johnson, he said clearly:&quot;No.&quot; &quot;Ummm...are you sure?&quot;  &quot;YES!&quot; &quot;Oh...well, so it may not be him, but is certainly LOOKS like him...&quot; Why was this even included here? If it's NOT footage of Robert Johnson, then why didn't it wind up on the cutting room floor? Bleah
Sucks. That's all you need to know. It is terrible. Bad. Boring. I could hardly finish it
Did we see the same movie??. Okay, the script is not the most imaginative I've ever seen, but I like the actors (especially Ben's best man) so I was friendly with this movie for the most part.  I didn't even mind the obvious holes in the plot, such as...why do these characters not have credit cards or cell phones? Or at least, why don't they use them?  Oh no, much more plausible that Ben will have to strip dance in a gay bar for $150 to buy a car to drive to NC.  I didn't even mind the fact that the whole "We're married and my husband's a doctor." charade was so predictable. Oh Gee, he's pretending to be a doctor and he's on a tour bus with a bunch of elderly people. D'ya think someone might have a heart attack and "Dr. Holmes" might have to step up?  And uh, they're pretending to be married and Oh! surprise there's the best man and maid of honor! D'ya think they're gonna get busted?What killed it for me was that ridiculous ending.  It was obviously supposed to be a surprise (and it was) but there seemed to be no other reason for it than to pull a fast one on the audience.  I felt cheated. I spent the entire movie getting emotionally involved with the relationship between Sarah and Ben, and I really cared about how they would handle things with the fiance and Sarah's little boy and all that.  I cheerfully became disengaged from the relationship between Ben and Bridget, I totally believed neither one of them was ready to get married or right for each other.  The film spent an inordinate amount of time showing me they're not right for each other and that this wedding was not meant to happen.  RIGHT UP TO THE LAST MOMENT, we think he's breaking it off with Bridget. Instead, what the heck let's just go ahead and get married after all.Huh?  He left Sarah sitting out there waiting for him in a HURRICANE!!! after making her promise that she would still be there when he got back.  This man obviously doesn't have a clue what he wants in life, and I'm expected to believe they lived happily ever after?Not only that, but what does it teach us about taking this commitment seriously?  It teaches us that if our instinct is telling us "don't do it!" and our genitals are yearning for someone else and even Mother Nature seems to be working hard to prevent this marriage, aw heck go on ahead and do it anyway.  It's just marriage. It's romantic! You could get lucky and live happily ever after!It's been my experience, when things aren't feeling just right as you approach that wedding, turn and run. The last thing you should do is close your eyes, grab your balls and take the leap
Makes No Sense. If I could give this movie less than 1 star, I would.The central character, Ryan, played by Jason Scott Lee (by the way, what happened to the Muscles from Brussels?), is a loser. Why? Because HE SAVES ADOLF HITLER'S LIFE!!! And how does he do this? By killing the leading lady.Gee, great script guys.Also, the thing makes no sense. People are obliterated from history, and Ryan knows about it! Hello, if they were removed from history, he would have no memory of them. Duh!If there was such a thing as a 'Time Cop', they would outlaw people wasting 2hrs watching this ridiculous movie!
BOOORIIIIIING!!!!!. I WANT THE TWO HOURS OF MY LIFE BACK!After all the talk about what a cult classic this film is! What a waste of time! Maybe this movie was a novelty to American moviegoers in 1973. That time is past (even then, the "robots attack people" concept was hardly new). Now this is just a boring B movie with bad acting and anticlimactic action. This film is only good for academic or nostalgic purposes. Unless you are doing a research paper on American Sci-fi cinema, or you are in your 40s and enjoyed this movie as a kid, or you just like boring anticlimactic B movies, AVOID THIS DULL PIECE OF DRIVEL.I FEEL CHEATED!
You have to download Amazon software into your PC... I am never happy when a purchase requires that you install the company's software.  The vid is encrypted so that you need Amazon's player to view it.  Blah.  You're better off buying the DVD for $20 with all the episodes so at least you can watch the DVD somewhere other than your own computer.
kind of aimless. I found this movie somewhat entertaining, although the intertwining stories were a mixed bag of annoying and fun. Unfortunately the fact that the stories each receive only limited attention, and the story changes from one focus to another storyline entirely just as things start to seem interesting, makes this film a bit frayed and taxing to the patience. Nevertheless, the film is about a whole host of young people, dressed up and heading for a party (ostensibly Martha Plimpton's party), but they never quite make it there. Plimpton, someone I never really cared for, is actually rather funny in this role, and in fact hilarious when she misses her own party (and her idol, Elvis Costello). Christina Ricci and Gaby Hoffman are both quite funny; Courtney Love, Paul Rudd and Janeane Garofalo are also quite a trio. Overall this is light comedy; nothing special but still worth the effort.
WHAT?!?!?!?. Okay, my wife and I just watched this yesterday and I have to say I'm shocked to see all the good reviews.  I was almost in tears I was so bored.  It was like a really bad 'made-for-TV' movie!  I swear if it weren't for the chemistry between Bette Midler and Dennis Farina it would have been a complete waste of time...At least they were funny and natural and believable.  Their daughter, played by Paula Marshall was terrible.  The whole story was ruined by horrid acting (the two leads aside) and crappy dialog.  When we saw the movie at the library we were excited for the plot (about a divorced couple played by Midler and Farina who hate each other rekindling their passion for each other and starting up an affair during their daughters wedding) seemed like it would be funny and enjoyable.  Boy were we wrong.  This has got to be one of the worst movies I've ever seen.  Don't waste your time
Where's the Maharishi when you need him?. I thought, since this was a Criterion Collection flick, that it was gonna be a psychedelic, spaced-out trip through India with heavy Ravi Shankar music, incense, and flower children with bells and long hair trying to "find themselves". It was about as far away from that as anyone could get, but it was WEIRD nonetheless. Basically, it's the story of a bunch of rich white people living in India on some sort of plantation, far from the everyday realities of India itself in their luxurious palace. When I found out the plot I was immediately turned off, because I hate movies about rich white people, especially when they slum around in foreign countries ripping off the local economy through some sort of corporate pseudo-slave labor arrangement, sitting back on their plantations acting all sophisticated in white linen clothing.So anyway, the movie centers on this one white chick, Harriet, and SHE IS UGLY. Good grief, can she peel the paint off a wall. Anyhow, she's living on this plantation with her ritzy family and her one very bizarre younger brother who likes to play with his lizard or something. All of a sudden, some rich white heart-throb guy named Captain John shows up and suddenly Harriet GETS IT, her first crush, and she discovers something besides bad poetry and horses. She first visits him while he is at her neighbor's house, which strikes me as a weird sort of sexual harem because the neighbor's wife died and ever since then the neighbor apparently has the hots for a pre-pubescent Indian girl. (Ah, the elegance of foreign lands, where there are no child exploitation laws.)Anyway, Captain John is an American, a sleazy bohemian type that looks like a cross between Harry Chapin and Eraserhead. He smokes cigarettes in a very sexual manner while galavanting around town in Tommy Bahama clothing. Harriet invites him to a party at their ritzy family house (called "the big house", go figure) and after she flirts with him non-stop, he decides to go for Harriet's SISTER, Valerie, who looks like an impish Meryl Streep with a bad nose job. So, jilted by Captain John for her own sister, Harriet decides to stalk him all over the stereotypical "Indian Village" where we see all sorts of truly Indian things like cobra-charming and a marketplace where you can buy tapestries made by children enslaved in sweatshops all over India. What I noticed at this point is that Captain John looks about 30, and Harriet's like 15, but even though he's fascinated with her in a quasi-sexual way, he plays hard-to-get. In a sad development, Harriet says "I have decided to conquer him", and attempts to seduce him by reading her bad poetry, which seems to amuse him, like, "wow, I've got a 15 year-old rich white chick who thinks I'm the man". But the best part is that Valerie, who we've come to totally despise for being the Ego Princess From Hell, steals Harriet's diary and reads it aloud to Captain John (which, of course contains bad love poetry about him). So the two sisters get in an ALL OUT BRAWL right in front of this guy, and he intervenes to cop a feel with both of them while "breaking it up". Harriet then storms off, which causes Captain John to think Valerie is a bitch for reading the diary. So Valerie then "plays" with him by throwing a toy at him, which causes him to tear his hamstring, and he limps off in a hilarious scene, vowing never to hang out with her again.At this point, the movie turns really, really STRANGE. Suffice to say a THIRD girl gets involved, and good ol' Captain John starts spreading himself a little too thin, keeping 3 juvenile girls hanging as he tries to figure out which one to pop first. However, tragedy strikes as Valerie & Harriet's brother (the one with the lizard fetish) gets a little too close to a pet cobra. The sad outcome gives everyone a big wake-up-call, and everyone gets real moody. The final outcome is an anti-climactic scene where Harriet resumes her poetry-writing in a funk about failing to seduce a 30-year-old.This flick wouldn't be so bad if it weren't for the archaic screenplay, atrocious acting (even for 1950), and dull character development. I mean, it tries hard to be really "Indian", but it's about as Indian as a trip to The Bombay Company or Pier 1. Most annoyingly, the movie itself would be no more than a half-hour in length if it weren't padded with very bizarre National Geographic-style narrations about Indian culture, complete with some British voice-over chick that makes it seem like a 3rd grade social studies filmstrip. (At times I was waiting for the little "beep" to indicate where I needed to advance the frame.) The footage of India is swell, in its weird early-Technicolor restored glory, but after you get over that, the whole package strikes me as really contrived. I think of all the truly wonderful films that could stand the Criterion treatment and it makes me wonder how they arrive at the decision to bother with crap like this
Disappointing. This movie's plot deals with a no-good wannabe rock star (Jack Black, wildly overacting as usual) suddenly and by mistake taking the job of substitute teacher at a posh school (right, things like this happen all the time), and using it to teach rock music to his students (who are around 9). Most of the music is from the early 70s, so probably not even the children's parents were born when this music was made. I think the rock of that era is wildly overrated by people who happened to be in their teens at that time (it reminds me of another poor movie, Velvet Goldmine, where glam rock, a marginal movement if there was one, was treated as a major artistic achievement, a la par with Oscar Wilde!). And shouldn't each generation choose the music it wishes to be represented with?
[2.5]--How can I not forget this movie, it so desperately needs a makeover.. ..and being that this movie is close to twenty years old makes it possible. The book passed through several hands as a film property and eventually ended up in those of Wes Craven. His name was most certainly at the forefront of horror directors. The result: ugly stereotypes, anorexic socio-political allegory, scant scares, and Bill Pullman - that's "The Serpent and the Rainbow" in a nutshell. Based on Wade Davis' novel, Wes Craven's lame documentary-flavored horror story follows anthropologist Dennis Alan (Pullman) as he searches revolutionary Haiti for a mystery drug that reportedly raises the dead. With the help of a local psychiatric institution doctor (Mona Lisa's Cathy Tyson), Alan undergoes a crash coarse in the island's history, discovering a culture where 110 percent of the population practices voodoo, including an evil political leader (Zakes Mokae) who's using zombifying white powder as a means of silencing opponents. Imagery of people being buried alive is the film's calling card, and Craven handles his suffocating coffin-encased dream sequences with sufficient skill. Yet in every other respect, the film is either offensive or incompetent, from the sight of blacks behaving like superstitious witch doctors or the dance floor-gyrating possessed, to Pullman's unbearably overwrought performance as the altruistic Alan, to the persistently aggravating narration, which wants to function as helpful connective tissue between scenes but instead only provides a wealth of superfluous information that neither complements nor amplifies the already dull, pointless action.I have seen this movie twice in my life and if its one thing "Serpent And The Rainbow" is, it's stylish. Filmed in my homeland, the movie is loaded with colorful scenery. There's tons of unforgettable religious imagery (due in no small part to the colorful nature of voodoo) as well as lots of great scenes in Haitian graveyards that stick in the brain. There's also tons of Craven-style shots (the nightmare sequences reminded me immensely of Cravens previous works) as well as some bits that came out rather nicely (the shot of a man inside the coffin being lowered into the ground). Performances are decent, especially Zakes Mokae, who plays Peytraud with subtly psychotic menace. Pullman is as wooden as ever (how does this guy keep his job?) delivering lines right from that invisible teleprompter hanging about six inches from his nose.I also question the "based on a true story" factor: people tearing their own head off and tossing them isn't true to life. Hollywood, at times, loves to pick on voodoo given its "minority" status among the faiths and treat it a bit backwards. In reality Voodoo is not based on evil premises as is often portrayed, but instead has it's foundation in Catholicism. The Spirits that are such cornerstones of Voodoo are, in effect, angels with God and Jesus reigning supreme over all. And, there is a dark side. It is the dark side where the elements of control over others and evil show themselves, and this dark world of evil Voodoo is indeed scary. The trouble is, when making a movie with Voodoo elements it takes time and effort to explain the reality of the practice...and it is much easier to just rely on the frightening stereotypes instead. But in this film Craven explores voodoo on a rather scientific level. Although many of the events depicted are still mystic, they are always rational, and if they actually venture into the realms of the supernatural, Craven makes sure the viewer understands that voodoo has also very much to do with mental states and hallucinations inseparably embedded in the Haitian culture. This movie could have been so much better if Craven would have learned that the scariest things often have nothing to do with special effects but the root of all. Recommending this film probably wouldn't be very wise in my part but reading the book is highly beneficial.
AMAZON SUCKS. I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!
This is a comedy?. Seriously, I didn't even think that this was a comedy until I came here and saw people saying "it wasn't funny."  I got it as part of a boxed set of Cary Grant films (purchased here), and it's the only dud of the lot.There was one scene that, I will grant you, was light and entertaining.  Not laugh out loud, but funny enough (I won't spoil it by saying which one).  Aside from that, the film struck me as a rather unbelievable farce about infidelity.Most of all, you could almost feel the very talented cast trying to keep this elephant airborne.  Grant and Simmons, in particular, are strong - but their efforts are ultimately squandered.  Bob Mitchum is OK, but generally miscast, and Kerr's beauty and talent are basically wasted.  No amount of acting would allow you to believe that anyone could act as impetuously and stupidly as she does here.  She goes from happily married to tramp in about 5 minutes, for no discernible reason.Overall acting: C (Grant/Simmons: B)Directing: FWriting: D-I understand that this film caters more to English tastes, and that's fine, but I found it most un-satisfying
Don't buy this title!!. This title is the bootleg title for a film called the The Ratings Game. I'm no sure why Amazon is selling this on their web site.The quality of this DVD is terrible, I was suspicious when I got it. The DVD caseand the DVD itself look like they were home made.Having said all this, knockoff or not this is a bad film with a lot of big names in it.It's like they were trying to make something campy and failed big time. I expected more of Danny DeVito.
Spinal Tap goes folk... 'A Mighty Wind' seems to be 'This is Spinal Tap' done in a folk medium. Unfortunately, the gags and cliches in this film seem to be lifted, as another reviewer stated, from most of Christopher Guest's previous efforts. To put it mildly, halfway through the film I was half-asleep and wishing a dwarf would crush Stonehenge
'RiverDance' makes me wanna DROWN in a river!. I remember this being a big deal to many a housebound old geezer a few years back. After being forced to watch it by a former friend of mine-- who hadn't quite reached "housebound old geezer" status, but was approaching it-- I gradually realized the REAL reason most of my ancestors hopped the boat from Ireland to the shining shores of the United States (that whole "potato famine" thing was just a cover story). I also see this presentation as a reinforcement of the stereotype about Irish folks bein' alcoholics, 'cuz I was hankerin' for a few nips of my fave hard lemonade about halfway into the show to help dull the pain that arose from the sheer boredom I was experiencing. I won't even go into my inexplicable hankering for Lucky Charms cereal...Now don't get me wrong; I'm aware that Michael Flatley and his troupe likely put in endless hours of practice and conditioning in order to do all of the dance numbers just right and all that nonsense. I just don't dig the kinda dances they do; they're neither exciting nor entertaining to me. It also didn't help that, when RiverDance toured the area I lived in, Flatley got PO'd by the local big venue's promoters for some reason, and proclaimed he'd never bring any of his shows to my neck of the woods ever again. Needless to say, when I heard this bit o' news I said to myself, "Thank God"...`Lat
Kevin Coughlan is spot on!. I'd write a review for this sewage, but Kevin did it so perfectly that I'd be wasting my time. The only decent one of these bunch of horrible adaptations was Silent Hill, and even that one lacked the greatness of the video game. And now, there's a Spyhunter movie coming out? WTF is next? Prince of Persia (...please don't do that one, I was only kidding!)?Get the video games for the real thing
AMAZON SUCKS. I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!
Same Thing. The Dane Cook episode is the same one that it on his "Harmful If Swallowed" c.d. The c.d. also has the uncensored version of this routine that is over 1 hour long. The one star rating is not based on the content. It is based upon Amazon not sharing this fact with customers
Van Damme fans only... I struggle with this movie. I'm a die-hard fan of Jean-Claude Van Damme, so part of me really likes this movie. But the other part knows that this is a very subpar direct-to-video with a slow script, uninteresting characters, and horrendously bad acting (save for JCVD himself). Having said this, I can honestly reccomend it to fans of Van Damme. They will certainly have a good time watching the muscles from Brussles kick the tar out of some low-life hicks while drinking with his Indian buddy and pickin' up chicks. If this appeals to you, there shouldn't be any reason why you wouldn't like "Desert Heat." If even one of this doesn't sound good, stay far away
Stupidity. I've never given one star to any type of produce before, but the stupidity of this DVD and its fans are shocking.So revealing!  So true!  If you didn't know fast food was unhealthy, give me a break.  If you think this is realistic, give me a break."Supersize Me" is a piece of propaganda meant to turn people away from eating McDonalds food.  The film documents Morgan Spurlock embarking on a perilous quest to eat three meals of McDonalds per day.  This diet has rules too.  Whenever he is asked if he wants a meal to be Super-Sized, he must do it.  He also much try each item on the menu at least once.  He is only allowed to consume items that are in fact on the menu.  The thing is though, if he is really trying to make a valid point, why does he order the Double Quarter Pounder with Cheese meal twice within the first seven days?  This is questionable, because not only is this the most fatty item on the menu, it also made him vomit the first time that he ate it all.  The thing is though, millions of people (some skinner than Spurlock) have this meal and do not throw up.  Why him?  His wife is a vegan chef and he is used to having no meat in his diet.  So why would he choose the biggest item on the menu TWICE in the first week?  There are many, many other items that he couldn't possibly been able to cover.  Not only that, he almost gets no exercise during the month of this experiment, saying that the average American gets little exercise.  His laziness seems to be an exaggeration.  There is some merit to the movie, showing people how unhealthy McDonalds is, but everyone knows that.  They just don't care.  For Spurlock to in any way (even the subtlest of ways) to support the idiots who sue the fast food chains because they became obese, is ludicrous.It should be mentioned that Wendy's regular hamburger is a quarter pounder, while McDonalds regular burger is 1/10th of a pound.  Also, Wendy's goes up to a triple quarter pounder, something McDonalds has never done.  Burger King introduced the triple cheese burger and QUADROUPLE cheese burger, something McDonalds has never done.  It seems that McDonalds is picked as a scapegoat because it is the most popular.  This movie may have been more credible if it examined the dangers of fast food as a whole, but just to go up against the one corporation is stupid.  If the movie didn't suggest that the corporation doesn't care about it's customers, I wouldn't have a problem, but it does.  Too much of anything, especially food, is bad for someone.  If anyone needed a movie to tell them that fast food is unhealthy, they clearly are seeing the world through a filter.1/1
Not good... Just rented this dvd and was quite surprised.  Normally, I'm a big George Clooney and Matt Damon fan.  However, in this film, their talents were underutilized and did not make up for the poor script, editing, and direction which made this film quite dull to watch.While the idea behind the movie is good, it could have been more entertaing, dramatic, or suspensful.  As another reviewer remarked, I was quite tempted to shut it off after 45 minutes and watch something else.  But, I did suffer through to the end, where the film just sort of ends and leaves viewers hanging..
Really bad. This movie was SO AWFUL.  What a waste of money.  I love Johnny Depp... but this is SOOO bad.  It is overplayed, to the point where it's just dumb.  It was really boring as well, with no plot.  Really REALLY bad acting, and overplayed
Very Dissapointed!. I was very disappointed with this film.  It definitely had a more "art house" feel to it than I was expecting - and like happens with many art house films Sebastiane is light on plot and character development and heavy on scenery shots, bad string music and slow motion nude shots (but, alas, not even erotic ones).The real story of Sebastiane is a fascinating one.  How does such a man transform into the much beloved St. Sebastiane of the Catholic church?   Well, don't expect this movie to tell you.  There is, as mentioned above, no character development.  We are given an off-handed explanation that Sebastiane's faith (Christianity) was the cause of his eventual execution - but any scenes of faith are oddly intertwined with a lot of Roman flavored philosophical ideas - references to Roman gods and so forth.  Very un-Catholic.  So while we know that it was Sebastiane's faith that lead to his execution, this "plot line" is really dulled down, to the point that there is no plot.The other men on the island are nothing more than pretty bodies to look at, their characters do not get developed at all.  (the interaction/conflict between Sebastiane and the Roman guard could have been so much more interesting and potent if Jarman had fleshed out that character a little more)Also, disappointing was that the eroticism of this film falls miserably flat.  Now I realize that I am a female and this is a gay movie, but I would like to think that I am as aroused by sexy, nude men as much as any gay man would be.  Well, I was not aroused.   There are plenty of shots of nude men, but the way that Jarman shot the film is so stylized and stiff, that it takes all the eroticism out of it.  I watched a slow motion scene of two nude men splashing in the surf and all I could think was "gay men are actually turned on by this??!"Well this straight woman was bored about half-way through the movie.  So my advice is don't buy this movie for it's story line or it's erotic value - there is none of either.
ZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZ. Me and a female friend went and watched this one in the theater. I ... was ... bored ... out ... of ... my ... skull. After about a half hour my friend, who tends to be more "progressive" than I, actually suggested we leave. It was the first time either of us have ever left while the movie was playing. Ever!Perhaps I'm biased. However I highly recommend that no one get this movie. The only reason I can think that anyone would give it a good rating is because of its political slant. I tend to lean to the right, but even I was entertained by V For Vendetta, despite it being blatant liberal propaganda. If you are going to pontificate about how we conservatives are evil, at least make it interesting
EMMA PEEL WHERE ARE YOU WHEN WE NEED YOU?. AFTER VIEWING THE AVENGERS WITH EMMA PEEL, WHICH I DO EVERY EVENING AFTER THE DREADFUL NEWS, ENJOYING REPEATS AND REPEATS AS WELL, WITH RELUCTANCE I PLAYED THE HOSPITAL DVD.I THOUGHT IT WAS TERRIBLE. THE DIAGOGUE IDIOTIC.I COULD NOT HELP BUT LAUGH WHEN SCOTT ATTACKED DIANA.  EMMA PEEL WOULD HAVE THROWN HIM ACROSS THE ROOM.I HAD TO PLAY A FEW EPISODES OF EMMA PEEL IN THE AVENGERS SERIES TO CLEANSE ME OF THIS DISAPPOINTING AND TERRIBLE HOSPITAL DVD.THE LOVELY DIANA RIGG IS A GREAT ACTRESS AND AN EXTREMELY INTELLIGENT WOMAN, AND I WAS SADDENED THAT DIANA AFTER ALL THOSE WONDERFUL AND EXCITING AVENGERS COLLECTION, WITH HER UNRIVALED BEAUTY AND POSSESSING THE MOST BEAUTIFUL VOICE AND ABLE TO DO HER  OWN STUNTS TOOK ON THIS DISMAL ROLE IN THE HOSPITAL DVD.I SEE THAT THIS DVD WAS DATED 1971, THIS WAS ONLY 4 YEARS AFTER HER LAST AVENGER EPISODES DATED 1967.  IN HOSPITAL, I BELIEVE SHE WAS 33 YEARS OLD.OH WELL, I WILL CLEANSE MYSELF OF THIS HOSPITAL DVD AND DEVOTE AN EVENINGR TO A FEW EPISODES OF THE AVENGERS WITH THE LOVELY DIANA RIGG AS EMMA PEEL.FINALL, JOHN STEED WOULD HAVE BEEN SHOCKED TO SEE HOW EMMA REACTED TO GEORGE SCOTT THE DOCTOR. CAN YOU IMAGDINE IF JOHN STEED APPEARED IN THE HOSPITAL DVD TO COLLECT DIANA RIGG AND RIDE OFF INTO THE SUNSET AS THEY DO AFTER AN AVENGER EPISODE.PERHAPS THEY WILL ISSUE HOSPITAL 11, AND BRINGR IN JOHN STEED AND A FEW OTHER GREAT ACTORS OF THAT SERIES.ROBERT LYONSRENO, NEVAD
Picturesque DVD's make nice beverage coasters.... This is one creative way in which to recoup some of the loss incurred by buying this nightmare. If you are one of the unfortunate who rent this waste of time(like I was) recommend that your local video store make one empty space on their shelves and toss this loser. This 71 minute "experience", which feels more like 100 Days of Viewing Hell, is nothing more then a montage of artsy, disjoined, surreal scenes. It quickly becomes boring after the first 5 minutes, tedious after 10 minutes, and downright irritating at around 15 minutes. I actually made the mistake of suffering through to the end, hoping that something magical would happen to make everything half-way understandable. This film could only appeal to the rare, artistically elite, filmgoer who finds anything as superficial as character development or cumbersome as plot layout simply uninspiring
Very disappointing. I didn't have high expectations for this movie, yet it still managed to completely disappoint me.  I adore Robin Williams, and his performance was the best part of the movie.  But the script was abysmal and Sara, played by Marcia Gay Harden, was a completely one dimensional character.  The antics of the sidekick robot and the "flubber" itself were just plain embarrasing to watch.  Too bad, because the idea is great - but frankly, the original was pretty bad too. They really could have done so much with this story either the first OR the second time around
Great Acting but a bad story line. Mario Van Peebles, Patsy Kensit, and Paula Marshall are all talented individuals whose talent went to waste in this film.  The storyline of crime busting werewolves was really dumb.  The main werewolf itself looked  like a joke in comparison to the werewolf in &quot;An American Werewolf in  London&quot;
Same Thing. The Dane Cook episode is the same one that it on his "Harmful If Swallowed" c.d. The c.d. also has the uncensored version of this routine that is over 1 hour long. The one star rating is not based on the content. It is based upon Amazon not sharing this fact with customers
Beware of Unbox!!!. Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for
Eh...I've Seen Worse. If you want a review of the plot itself, complete with spoilers, feel free to read the other reviews.My biggest beef with this movie is the fact that any suspension of disbelief is utterly killed, again and again, due to the fact that the script writers and director couldn't keep the story straight.There is a homage to Asimov with the shipboard computer telling one of the crew that it can not let a human come to harm. That would have been fabulous if it had actually been adhered to in any other part of the film. There are a handful of these screw ups that kills any chance of the story being credible.That said, it was a bit enjoyable. The cast did a fantastic job with what they were actually given. If the writers would have spent more time developing the characters than finding ways to get them naked, maybe I would have cared what happened to them.The dimensional jump effect was quite novel and was the one thing in this movie that made me say, "Oooh, cool".Good premise, good effects, good acting, but poor writing killed any chance at this being a good film
waste of money. Dont purchase episode 5 of season 2, it's 7 minutes long and you dont get any of the Charlie Murphy Prince story.  WTF!!!  Can someone fix this and refund or offer the entire episode for re-download!!!
Poor support. This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet
Whiny Slackers Poke Reality With Stick - Reality Bites Back. Reality Bites seemed fresh when it was first released, giving voice to a generation - with the unfortunately derogative soubriquet of "X" - that was overeducated, underemployed, plagued by the flashy, trashy commercialism of MTV, and stunningly superficial in its wholehearted embrace of pop culture and rejection of serious moral or philosophical discourse it might have stumbled across in college.It was a good start because transitioning from the idyllic and unreal world of college to the crass, cruel arena of materialism can be tough, providing limitless opportunities for challenge and personal growth - the very stuff of real movies.  Instead we have a swan dive into a Pizza Hut commercial held together by a plot so shop-worn it would have been considered exhausted in 1930.Winona Ryder is winning as Lelaina, but one can only imagine the SATs of football players at a college where she is valedictorian.  Her "documentary" is appallingly narcissistic, reflecting the characteristic Gen X notion that - "if it's about me, it's art, and it's important."  Ethan Hawke does an excellent job as Troy, the very archetype of self-satisfied, supercilious entitlement.  We are expected to root for him, but it's hard to refrain from hoping he gets hit by a bus.Stiller, who directed - a talented fellow almost impossible to look at - plays Michael, the "anti-Troy."  Smooth, successful, and very much plugged into the contemporary franchising of Gen X culture - if culture is the right word - he's an executive at an MTV-ish corporation.  That he improves Lelaina's preposterous "documentary," rather than destroying its alleged artistic integrity, is the film's dirty little secret.Viewers surprised by who wins Lelaina's hand will also be stunned to learn that professional wrestling is fixed and Liberace was gay.  Indeed, when you strip away the thin veneer of pop culture references this is really a very traditional movie.  Janeane Garofalo is outstanding as always, and John Mahoney shines as the TV morning chat show host who looks sweet and avuncular on camera but is in fact, a bastard.  His performance says more about the likelihood of finding anything even remotely resembling reality in film - or on TV - than the rest of this film put together.In fact, reality is great, this picture would have benefited from some
Cant watch. I downloaded this program and it was garbled and video as if played in slow motion.  This is the first of two downloads that didn't play.  I know it was not my computer because I did download three that played ok
Cult classic...please, a waste of my childhood. i actually saw this movie when i was 7 and it freaked me out abit, but i mean the brother was basically a blob with a face and the story was as bad as the acting. The ending was garbage and it had nothing to offer in todays world.Dont even rent this, i dont even know why you are considering the film.I only give it a 2 star rating because t managed to scare a seven year old and i havent forgot how dumb the film was since.
For die hard Kutcher fans only. The movie starts off very slowly, with childhood episodes from Ashton Kutcher's character.  It's at least 1/2 an hour before we see the adult Kutcher, although he does appear at the very beginning for a brief scene.  The premise is good, and it has some good momentum in the middle, which is why I gave it two stars.  The shifting situations of his life and the lives of his friends are interesting and well done, but the overall story line is very weak, and the ending is dreadful and not supported by most of the rest of the story.  Also, the movie has too many tongue-in-cheek references to Kutcher's real life circumstances -- such as the reference to "tighty-whities."  They distract from the story, and make the movie more of a vanity vehicle -- which is too bad -- If you are not a Kutcher convert and are just looking for a movie, skip this one
Missing episodes. This series is being sold with missing episodes, like many others here in Unbox. Do they think their customers are so dumb? Would you buy a DVD series with a missing DVD? What sense does this make? What a disappointment this service is..
Doesn't do Justice to the book. An average movie with average performances. Glosses over many of the details in the book and ignores the role of many important characters. It wont appeal much to the general audience and neither will it satisfy the people who have already read the book.
I'll be there... but not for long. There's a reason why they talk about the "Voice of an Angel" -- it's because Charlotte Church certainly doesn't have the acting presence of one. Her acting debut "I'll Be There" is proof enough -- only the presence of its star got this tepid little drama into theatres, where it rapidly dropped out of sight. Rightly so.Seventeen years ago, Paul Kerr (Craig Ferguson) of the Love Rats had a fling with a groupie at a concert. Fast forward to the present: Kerr discovers that unknown to him, his ex Rebecca (Jemma Redgrave) gave birth to a daughter, Olivia (Charlotte Church), who is now a well-adjusted paper girl.The problem is, Olivia has been kept a secret from her dad. Rebecca is embittered, but Kerr wants to get to know his daughter, and similarly Olivia wants to get to know her father. Music seems to be the thing that will bring the angel-voiced girl and the burned-out rocker together, but Rebecca doesn't want her child to follow in her father's footsteps."I'll Be There" was hyped months in advance as being inspired by the life of actress Liv Tyler, who, despite being only in her twenties, has had an immensely interesting life. Well, maybe someday she WILL get a biopic, because "I'll Be There" is only similar in one way: It involves a rock star and his daughter. Otherwise, it is boring in about every way that Tyler's life is interesting.With a forgettable script, not much humor and a goofy premise, the movie doesn't have a lot going for it -- it reads like a disgruntled teenager's absurdist fantasy, scripted for Church to act out. And not a terribly interesting teenager, either. It gets increasingly ridiculous when Olivia decides to pursue music to bond with Daddy Dearest; it's an obvious ploy to show off Church's vocal skills.The best that can be said of Church's performance is that at times she looks sweet. As for acting talent, she is bland at best, but she does perform some good songs, and her voice is as pretty as ever. Just watch the songs and fast-forward her actual scenes. Redgrave does as good a job as she can, and Ferguson wrings some pathos from his performance as an aging rocker. His is the only memorable role in the film, and it's a shame that the movie didn't focus on him rather than the dull Miss Church.Miss Church appears to have chosen a role that glorifies her in the middle of an atrocious film -- also known as the Britney Spears approach. "I'll Be There," but I promise I'll get out as soon as I can
Avoid this drivel at all costs. if amazon allowed zero stars, this would get it. absolutely awful.
Star Trek:  City on the Edge of Forever. My favorite show of the Trek series but there's no way I'd buy another individual program from Amazon.  It will ONLY play on their downloaded player ...won't burn to DVD so can't play it on my television.  Don't bother buying this ...just go for the Trek collection on DVD
BLAH, BLAH, BLAH... this has got to be the WORST film I've ever seen. its not sad. Its not funny, jest over blow mellow dramatic garbage. I don't have any sympathy toward nick in this movie, because he does give you anything to work with or want to keep him. the actor is the worst of all. i cant tell if he's sad in some seens, or angry or jest retarded. I've seen some sad movies but this one jest sucks, I guess its aimed at a different time of homosexuals instead of the present. it probably worked better back in 96'. but this movie is SO SO SO BAD. its embarrassing. do not rent it or buy it or view it on television.NOTE'S: THIS FILM HAD  SOME GREAT TALENTA song from Olivia Newton Jon, and (one of my most personal favorites) Mila AND my favorite comedians Margaret Cho. She's to good but...why this film, she (and Mila ) are to good for some want to be tearjerker movie like this.
Dont get "Fiji" final week ... Dont dwnld " Survivor, "Thunderstorms & Sacrifice" ". Its my fault for not reading the whole thing. you would think that the last episode would be the finale , but NO, its just a 10 minute recap going to the finale 4. I didnt even get a full 45 minute episode. No finale. I got rippped off. $1.99 dwnld not well spent. Dont bother dwnldng any episode of fiji if you dont know the ending. Because they dont have that episode, not even the reunion show
Star Trek:  City on the Edge of Forever. My favorite show of the Trek series but there's no way I'd buy another individual program from Amazon.  It will ONLY play on their downloaded player ...won't burn to DVD so can't play it on my television.  Don't bother buying this ...just go for the Trek collection on DVD
This is Horrible. I love the Avatar and I was so thrilled that amazon allows people to download it except the only problem is I've been trying for the past days and darn it all, it's not working!!! It's not as if I'm downloading it for free. I am willing to pay and yet it just wouldn't go through!!! I think it's better to just buy the dvds...I think it's absolutely horrible to tease customers like that..
bias media on media bias. starts off with an interesting premise about media influence and politcal power but turns into bush bashing anti-corperate rant.the problem with the media is bias, the problem with this film is the same bias
Wake up!!!. I agree, where is the DVD? $200 for a soon to be obsolete format?? Get real!!!! This is an excellent mini-series on the worse medium
"I can't see ya, but I know you're here.  I can feel it.". The story of Wim Wenders' "Wings of Desire" is told through images and thoughts.  Abandon all expectations of seeing anything resembling a conventional film before watching it.Two angels glide through the streets of Berlin surveying its inhabitants.  Cassiel (Otto Sander) embraces his role as witness but Damiel (Bruno Ganz) wants to break free of his ethereal existence.  He is willing to cast aside his immortality in order to experience the simple joys of everyday life.  The primary catalyst for his desire to change is his attraction to trapeze artist Marion (Solveig Dommartin)."Wings of Desire" does not quite work.  It stumbles not because it is too pretentious or too ponderous.  Rather, it stumbles because it is just too abstract.   Relying on imagery and monologues to tell a story makes for an interesting lesson in unconventional filmmaking, but it also leads to frustration and annoyance to anyone conditioned to more traditional narratives.  "Wings of Desire" deserves a lot of credit for its innovative approach toward its material and its beautiful dream-like visuals.  Yet, it is a film that unfortunately will not appeal much to the mainstream viewer.
It may sound Ugly,but this is Good AND Bad-. I would have to agree with both the positive AND negative comments about this version of Mozart's Die Zauberflote. All the technical and production comments are accurate enough,but also,(and more importantly),1)This opera is written in German and I'm a big believer in performing great operatic works not only in their entirety,but also in their original language, 2)AND most importantly for myself,the opera is intended to be a comedy;yes,but a BLACK COMEDY! This production turns it into a FARCE,(which is why children probably love it so much).If the kiddies saw this opera as intended,(regardless of choice of language),they would probably go running and screaming to dive under their beds and shake! The evil Queen really IS EVIL! More like in Disney's 'Sleeping Beauty' than say, Jareth in 'The Labyrinth',(as a reference only). I think one is able to get a little more comfortable with Bergman's Queen than Mozart intended. 'Nough said
sum of all stars? zero!. Maybe no one noticed but towards the end of the movie when the Russian President and Jack Ryan are talking to each other through the computer, repeat is spelled "reapeat".  On top of that, the acting was horrible...this movie didn't take itself seriously enough.  Ben Affleck sucked as much as he did in this movie as he did in Pearl Harbor
Would give 0 stars if I could. The Unbox video version of this film for Tivo is useless. Only after purchasing it did I discover that this film can only be downloaded to a Tivo a certain number of times in a certain time period. For more than the cost of the DVD, I'm restricted in when, where and how I can watch this movie. Nothing like being treated like a criminal by the movie studios.I will not purchase another Tivo Unbox film.
Bad Jet, Bad!!. I know this was one of Jet Li's earlier films based on the clothing, music, and hairstyles of the characters in the movie, and Jet Li looked much younger. Anyway I was quite disappointed, I am glad Jet's movies have gotten better because this one was........my mouth hung open through most of it. Asians complain about being stereotyped in other people's movies, but there were stereotypes about everyone in this movie and I know I am just rambling on but,,,,,my goodnes........It was pretty bad. I gave it just one extra start just because it was Jet!!
What's the point?. Play this movie at 2x speed with the subtitle turned on and you won't miss a thing. It has minimum dialog (the main female character being mute) and is painfully slow.The DVD cover photo is misleading--This is not a beautiful movie. The characters are unattractive and the cinematography monotonous.The people who say "noone goes to the movies to have a bad time or to learn anything" were proven wrong by the success of United 93, which is not enjoyable but riveting. The Isle, unfortunately, is neither entertaining nor educational. I am not a prude and appreciate a good erotic thriller, but the only thing I'm left with after watching this one is revulsion. Those who gave this movie 5 stars are describing the emperor's clothes.
A perfect film of GB Shaw. When one watches a George Bernard Shaw play, one does not expect three-dimensional characters with social roles and inner lives.  As the author puts it in a pompous forward to this film, 'Major Barbara' is a 'PARABLE' (his capitals), and the preaching never lets up.  The title character (Wendy Hiller) is the daughter of a millionaire arms manufacturer (Robert Morley); she is a zealous Salvation Army officer, trying to convert the destitute of London with enthusiasm, sympathy and 'a bribe of bread'.  She is seen one afternoon in mid-proselysation by Adolphus Cusins (Rex Harrison), an impoverished Classics scholar who determines to marry her.  The stage is set for a typical Shavian problem play - you might subtitle the piece 'The Soul of Man Under Capitalism', with the religious fanatic and the urbane industrialist doing battle for the souls of the English working and middle classes.  Barbara is tested by drama; Undershaft fights back with mind-numbing spectacle - capitalism's genius is that it absorbs all opposition.  The loser is the audience.  'Barbara' is one of Shaw's less intolerable plays, with the odd funny line (all snatched by Marie Lohr as Barbara's aristocratic mother) peeping through the flat epigrams, laborious dailogues and general sterile clever-cleverness.  The wonderful cast - Hiller saintly and sexy in military uniform; Harrison hysterically smart-*r*ed; Morley unflappably Machiavellian and Mephistophelean - do what they can, but they are playing Ideas, not Characters, and their attempts to blow life into cardboard only results in soggy paper.  It's never nice being aggressively lectured to, and Shaw's grinding dialectic becomes less agreeable on the big screen - his use of old dramatic forms for non-dramatic purposes stops everything dead (although you can see how filming an ironic play about the armanents industry might have seemed radical during World War 2).  The works isn't improved by Pascal's hapless filming (what can he do?), his style as clunky and grey as Shaw's sub-Wildean wit.  There are some major talents behind the scenes, including David Lean as editor and William Walton as composer
name of this movie should have been  named  GEE" ZEERA. when i bought movie thought i would see more than one arab biased anti american news media......
Not for normal people. I thought my 2 and 4 year old sons could learn a few things about table manners by watching this video.  It turns out that this video is only about eating in extremely formal situations.  It tells which of your 5 forks to use first and how sorbet is used to cleanse your pallet between courses. Good if you are eating with the president, not good for the average family who would like to improve kids' manners
Why the Charge. Curious as to why Amazon would charge for this content when CBS offers it for free on the official Survivor Website.  Yeah, at the CBS site you have sit through 4 commercials, but it is worth it to not have to download any extra programs
Why the Charge. Curious as to why Amazon would charge for this content when CBS offers it for free on the official Survivor Website.  Yeah, at the CBS site you have sit through 4 commercials, but it is worth it to not have to download any extra programs
possibly Jamie Lee's worst. Every once in a while someone comes up with a movie and makes the terrible assumption that as long as they put a well known actor/actress in it that everything will turn out good. Blue Steel is one of those movies. Jamie Lee Curtis plays a rookie cop who is being held responsible for civilian casualties (or should I say murders) which she did not commit. Sounds like an interesting plot, right? It would be had the script not been so poorly written. The supporting actors give such a bland/typical performance that not even Jamie Lee could have saved the dialogue. Aside from the acting, the film does not give the action packed performance that it promises. Some scenes are quite dull and as you are watching you wonder half way through the movie when the cop (Jamie Lee) is going to finally kill the psychopath whose been after her. So why do I give Blue Steel an extra star? Well, I'll just say that if you are a fan of Jamie Lee Curtis you might want to watch this if it comes on television. Just don't pay over $3 to rent it and certainly don't buy it
Huh?. I can't figure out which was worse - the acting, the dialogue, the direction or the plot.  I rented the movie thinking...."OK, a post WW2 spy thriller with Nazi intrigue starring Michael Caine and directed by John F.  How could it be anything but spine-tingling?".Jeesh, what a mistake.Believe or not, Caine is capable of giving a bad performance.  And this was it.  He just seems lost in this train wreck.  However, he was Olivier compared the rest of the cast.  Veronica Tennant shows why her career lasted months!  All the others were caricatures of stereotypes (that Orchestra Conductor better be slinging hash somewhere now, because acting was not his forte).And the dialogue!  Caine is supposed to be a "foreign born American citizen".  He, of course, has as thick an English accent as in every other movie, indicating he was brought up on the Isle.  When Veronica Tennant tells him "the umbrella is in the boot", she has to explain that boot means trunk in England!  Gawd, are we all idiots?!?The plot?!?  Don't even get me started...  It's absolutely asinine.  Our bumbling everyman is caught up in some meandering travelogue which is supposed to pass for international high-stakes intrigue.  What a snorefest.What were they thinking?Nah, they weren't.  Pass on this one folks
Beware of Unbox!!!. Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for
What's up with that?. I wish I had read the other reviews first.  Though the quality of the episode and the video are top notch, the episode cuts off after 22 minutes.  Obviously, I already know the ending of "The Black Death", but I still wanted to see the full show
No need to Suicide. I get the story line but 5 grown women need to suicide!?  The one dare to have a boyfriend and not go home for the night.  Why would that kind of free sprite would kill herself!?!?  It is not matching the character
The Book is Better. I watched this on Masterpiece Theater and was intrigued enough with the family story to buy the book.  The characters and the historical context are much better developed in the book and you don't have to listen to that extraordinarily whiny, droning music.
To bad... Not my cup a tea. Poor sound and average picture. Just for Excalibur freaks...?!
&quot;Sounds like a bad action movie.&quot;. The plot for this movie is actually quite good, a microbiochemical weapon accidently created and released on the world is captured and is being brought back from Russia, but the Russians are trying to recapture it and release it on the major cities of the world and it is up to our &quot;hero&quot; to stop them before it happens. What ruins this great movie is the very bad acting. When asked if he knew about Agent Red, Dolph's character said it best, &quot;Sounds like a bad action movie,&quot; and it is. From LT. Christian being seriously out of uniform to the underlying &quot;love story&quot;, this movie just reeks. The only good thing I saw in this movie was Randolph Mantooth. His small part made up for the movie in my opinion. So unless you're a big Mantooth fan, this movie is a waste of money
Awful. Shambles of an erotic thriller the sex scenes are virtually non existent and the story line is terrible i was very dissapointed with my purchase and encourage all to avoid this film
Buy the other version -- the Tai Seng release. I would like to give this version 5 stars, i love the movie, but this is the Dimension release which only offers an English language dub. If that's OK by you, then this is the cheaper version, but if you are a purist like me, you'll want the Cantonese/Mandarin version with English subtitles
Cant watch. I downloaded this program and it was garbled and video as if played in slow motion.  This is the first of two downloads that didn't play.  I know it was not my computer because I did download three that played ok
I've been cheated by Amazon. It really sucks, tried to download but it's not able to be viewed in pc's outsided the united states. Crikey.I'll have to wait for reruns to watch it on the telly.Whatta shame amazon dot com. Let's send a CSI to yer headquarters
SUCKS!. Unless you enjoy movies that are not funny, not scary, and have the worst actors this side of rodeo clowns, DO NOT WATCH this series of horrible flicks.  Putrid!  Not even "so-bad-it's-funny". Absolutely the worst films in the history of mankind!  Heed my warning!  SUCKS!!
waggy mcwaggster. Man! this movie is soooooo boring. I literally slept through this movie. If I die not having watched it again ill be happy.   i dont even know what its about cuz i watched it when i was like 5 yrs. old, but i dont care cuz just thinkin bout it makes me wanna cr
You have to download Amazon software into your PC... I am never happy when a purchase requires that you install the company's software.  The vid is encrypted so that you need Amazon's player to view it.  Blah.  You're better off buying the DVD for $20 with all the episodes so at least you can watch the DVD somewhere other than your own computer.
Don't waste your money on this one. Talentless people and garbage music  torture you in this turkey-in no time flat,you'll be driven to pure insanity as you run screaming "MAKE IT STOP!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!" out into the yard.Do not spend money on this product unless you want to wind up beating your head against the wall and babbling nonsense
Exploitation Versus Art--Ingmar Bergman's Oscar Winner and Wes Craven's Shocker Tell The Same Tale. There is an interesting comparison to be made between Ingmar Bergman's classic "The Virgin Spring" and the grisly exploitation shocker it inspired, "Last House on the Left" by Wes Craven.  They share identical plots, feature graphic rape scenes, and before it's all over turn average men into murderers.  And yet one is considered to be a bona fide classic and 1961's Oscar-winning Best Foreign Film--and the other appreciated only in underground circles, but largely reviled as cheap gruesome exploitation.So just how different are they?  Not as different as you might imagine--but as different as art and exploitation."The Virgin Spring" is easily one of Bergman's most accessible films.  Telling a simple story in a straightforward fashion, he exposes a frankness and brutality people weren't accustomed to seeing.  A young girl venturing through the woods encounters two men and a boy.  Though they initially seem helpful, their actions quickly become violent.  After a graphic (for the time) rape, the girl is murdered.  Later, the wrongdoers happen upon the girl's home and seek shelter from her family--both groups unaware of who the other is.  Suspicions start to arise and vengeance is sought.It is a powerful tale of love, loss and the depths people can be driven into--where they become unable to stop themselves from betraying their faith and moral code, where savagery and rage take over.  Bergman's film benefits greatly from a stellar lead performance by Max von Sydow as the father.  Real conflict and raw emotion burn up the screen.  Add the beautiful cinematography and haunting score and it's a winning combination.  But what endures in the story of "The Virgin Spring" is how strong a component faith becomes--when there is nothing left to believe in, can you still believe?  A classic in every sense, "The Virgin Spring" still has the power to shock but there's something very redemptive about the film."Last House on the Left," however, is probably more notorious than acclaimed.  The plot, as I've said, is identical.  Coming 12 years later, in 1972, Wes Craven was at the beginning of his career and sought to retell this tale.  It is a shocker, and the scenes of rape and murder clearly foreshadow the "torture cinema" of today.  It is brutal, uncompromising and graphic--and the film was championed in the underground horror market.Working with a small budget, the film lacks the artistry of "The Virgin Spring."  While it still packs a visceral punch and has the power to shock--what it lacks is depth and subtlety.  The characters aren't particularly drawn out so their actions don't have the emotional resonance of the earlier film.  Without contemplating faith and moral choices, what we're left with is straightforward revenge.  And the film, ultimately, has no redemption--no uplift.  It's violence for the sake of violence.  It remains a historically significant precursor and influence on other shock films without being a particularly good movie in it's own right.And therein lies the difference between art and exploitation.   KGHarris, 11/06
the Worst Action movie I've ever seen. I guess success turned around for Sam Raimi in 2002 & 2004 with the two Spider-Man films, but first he created this "V" like character in this garage of a movie, I liked "V for Vendetta" but not this "Darkman" if want to see a badly burned viligante in a mask see "V for Vendetta" don't see "Darkman
Bad Acting...Hot Stars. I must admit that I am a guy and that I bought this movie before seeing it. I was not shocked with the horrible acting, but was surprised with the hot stars. This movie had both hot guys and girls. The actor that caught my eye was Steven Albrecht "Freddy", he is so hot. We get see him completely nude showing off his hot body.  He did a great job in his breif scene. Josh Edwards "Trian" was okay to look at too. As for the actress...Venesa Taylor is also hot
Tom Hanks is great!  That said, read on. I personally feel Tom Hanks is a really fantastic actor.  With the exception of this particular movie, I've enjoyed every movie I've ever seen him in.  I don't understand what went wrong with The Ladykillers, perhaps it was the director, the editor, the script . . . I don't know, but this movie was so awful I couldn't sit through it.  I purchased a copy of it just knowing I'd absolutely love it because Tom Hanks was in it but I ended up pawning it off on some unsuspecting co-worker
AMAZON SUCKS. I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!
Would've given it nil stars if I could've... Dated, derivative, self-indulgent & unintelligent.  This is truly bottom of the range stuff.  The acting, directing, soundtrack and script are all dire.  None of the characters are even remotely sympathetic, in fact I was hoping they'd die slowly and painfully.  I note that Billy Bob Thornton was both star and a scriptwriter - methinks his true nature is revealed in the script and the part he chose - an arrogant, amoral, misogynistic, self-important coward (with zero sense of humour).  Don't waste your time watching this drivel, it will leave you with a bad taste in your mouth that no amount of tequila can erase.
Excellent performance VERY POOR VIDEO EDIT!!!!!!. As other have stated, the performance is excellent.  My wife and I watched this in vegas and thoroughly enjoyed the show.  With that said, my review is for the extremely poor job the video editor did. They used some kind of filter on many of the shots.  They change camera angles 50 times in 1 minute to the point that is unbearable and painful to watch.  You do not get to see the dancers perform any full steps because the angle switches before they finish it.  Additionally they use these slow motion segments that totally ruin the moment and create the unsynchronized dance with the music.I have to sell my copy because I get nauseas watching it.  I hope they re-make this DVD.  I think my 7-year old daughter could do a better job editing...and we could use the additional revenue stream...
This DVD really sucks even thow im a big survivor foan. this dvd really sucked becuse there wernt any chalanges and they showed all the votes and when he was reding the votes they skiped to the last vote plus somany intervuies with the castaways. I hope the Complete first season has challanges and all that kind of stuff
Can I get a &quot;what the?!&quot;. Let me explain the situation.  We have here young orphan kids who roller blade around trying to bring down a corporation with the help of a glowing ball.  Sound familiar?  Probably not.  I would say that nothing in the galaxy compares to the sheer stupidity of such a concept.  Recomendation?  I have none.  I have decided that slamming one's head into a brick wall would be more logical then this film
Not what I expected. This movie lacked the luster I expect from Robert Duvall. It was an endless journey into boredom, at least for me
Cant watch. I downloaded this program and it was garbled and video as if played in slow motion.  This is the first of two downloads that didn't play.  I know it was not my computer because I did download three that played ok
1 on 1 Training. We all know that Tamilee has that body.  Didn't expect her to be the only body in the video.  I am more for a group atmosphere.  So in that regard, I pass on this video.  Maybe next time Tami...
Where. Is. The. DVD. I'm going nuts here... I might be in a slightly foul mood on account of my having just returned from a shopping experience which resulted in my receiving a parking ticket, but...I used to watch KB's Hamlet on a fairly regular basis. Whether is was on cable or VHS, I found I could never get enough.I signed the petition. I'm one of those people who's written letters in the hopes they'll actually make a difference.That said, WHERE IS THE FRIKKIN' DVD? I mean, has anybody else noticed that KB's Hamlet has already missed the DVD boat? While the world is moving toward HD-DVD, we *still* have yet to see a sign of the stupid thing. I haven't owned a VCR since back before Amazon even really existed, or was, at least, widely known (I was an early adopter of DVD).Now, years later - *years* after the first time I inquired about this release, I still can't believe it isn't out.Reality check, people: Forbidden Planet, fine movie though it may have been (and in context of this discussion as, beneath its sci-fi exterior, one can find an interesting retelling of The Tempest), it's gone from film (decades before I was born) to VHS/Beta/?, to DVD, and now to HD-DVD.Why is it that a film like Forbidden frikkin' Planet gets pushed up through the years and transferred over and over again to the latest medium when *the* finest version of Hamlet ever produced for the screen has been left behind?What's going on? Is KB being held at gunpoint by Mel Gibson's handlers? Is there blackmail involved? Did KB contract George Lucas to add a bunch of CGI ewoks to each scene? 'Cause I can't figure out, for the life of me, why we haven't seen this stupid thing yet.Was it that hard to commit it to VHS? It seems to me that it was readily and easily done.So what's the deal with DVD? Is the money just not good enough, Mr. Branagh? I realize that your talents lie in theater rather than finances, but 100% of zero is zero.It makes me wonder, then... is it some artistic issue? When transferred to the higher fidelity formats of DVD and HD-DVD, are there imperfections present that were undetectable when the film was out in VHS format?Can we see more clearly how Charleton Heston's weird teeth have yellowed and browned over the years and formed into this strange rolling dental pattern greatly in need of modern dentistry (my dentist could set those teeth painlessly over a four month period without the use of orthodontics)?For years, I've wondered about this. College came and went. I've moved to three different continents. My own career has gone from peon to Mr. Importantpants, and yet *we are still without even a DVD version of Hamlet*.Yes, I realize there's a 4:3 version of the film available for digitital download, but please don't make me any more uppity than I already am.I want the film, and I want it in its full glory, with proper aspect ratio, and preferably on HD-DVD so I can see it in all its glory (which would be especially nice considering the 70mm film used to record this sucker).I hate to give what is easily the best film version of Hamlet ever produced (and, no, this point is not open to argument - it's not an opinion, but, rather, a scientifically proven fact) one star, but given that the man and his peeps have had over a *decade* to get the job done, I think it's really just about time to see it hitting store shelves.If it *is* hitting shelves, by the by, I apologize for the rant, but I'm tired of waiting.I want to see this movie on a disc before I die.Widescreen.Preferably HD.I don't care about the bonus materials - you can keep 'em if *that's* what's taking so long.But just get some dummy college intern to do the transfer and throw together a DVD menu.If it can be done for Forbidden Planet, then it can be done for Hamlet.I have spoken.And I am awesome
Favorite ALICE, Lackluster DVD. This is my favorite production of the ALICE books.  I love the sets, songs, and casting. It's also very British, which I think adds another great element to the mix.However, skip this DVD edition.  I got it, excited to see ALICE'S ADVENTURES IN WONDERLAND in widescreen and, perhaps a better print than what's previously been available.No such luck.The DVD appears to be struck from the same crappy VHS version that's been out there for ages.  Faded colors. Pan-and-scan. In this age of DVD, quality like this is such a shame
Not brave enough. An English Teacher's review.  To my fellow educators:I have just finished spending the better part of an afternoon watching all three film versions of "Treasure Island."  I've seen the version with Charlton Heston, the one with Jack Palance and the 1950 Disney version.It is my unpleasant duty to report that a proper film of "Treasure Island" has apparently not yet been made, as all three were so abysmally bad that I was unable to finish them.What no director has yet come close to capturing, is the relentless grandeur with which the book itself unfolds, and the simple directness of Stevenson's 19th century morality tale.  Without exception, all three of these films seem to flounder in a sea of confusion about what this book should actually be; and none of them seem to have even the tiniest jot of the kind of vision displayed by classic illustrators such as Wythe.Again and again with each film, someone seems to have made the decision that the story exactly as told by Stevenson apparently wouldn't be interesting enough or exciting enough for the big screen.  What I really want to know is if any of these directors actually READ the book, or had a personal relationship with it?  I find it hard to believe that they did, since the films all give the impression of slapdash commercialism or outright confusion about what the book actually is.Jim Hawkins is living quietly with his parents in a seaside inn, when the Captain shows up with his sea chest and a mysterious fear of "a seafaring man with one leg."  The Captain should be tall, mysterious, powerful and terrifying.  In two of these films, he seems to be played by short wrinkled winos; and in the third by some middle-aged guy who is apparently married to the lighting director's sister.  It only gets worse from there.The tragedy of the Captain is that he is still physically vigorous and imposing at the start of the book - but Stevenson is bringing a doom to him that will shatter even the English oak of his adamant constitution - the combined forces of rum, terror and stroke.The Captain's fate - to fall dead of a "thundering apoplexy" on the floor of the inn, forshadows the essential purpose of Stevenson's novel - to illustrate that a life of bloodthirsty avarice and short-sighted greed leads only to an ignominious death.  In the guise of a boy's adventure story, Stevenson pursues this deeper moral with a terrible purpose and with great dignity and power.  His pirate characters are not comic or lighthearted.  They are not caricatures.  They are not the wax mannequins of a Disney ride; they are real men with fears and desires and second thoughts; even with regrets.  They do not dance or traipse merrily through this story - they grimace and battle through it, gritting their teeth against the death, (from violence, sickness, treachery or rum,) that is always staring them in their faces.  Jim Hawkins' innocence and youth is the perfect foil for the pirates' hard-bitten cynicism and gold-lust.  It is no accident that, despite the courage and resourcefulness of the cabin party, (led by Captain Smollett,) it is still only Jim Hawkins' youthful optimism and curious spirit that ultimately saves them from "death at the hands of the pirates."  Stevenson is alluding to the biblical command to "be like the little children in order to be saved."To tell this story properly, it must be told absolutely straight, and with the same committed earnestness with which Stevenson tells it.  None of these films is that brave.To make a film that is faithful to Stevenson's moral, the director will need more courage and simplicity of purpose than we find in all three of these films combined.  Those of us who love and understand the novel for what it is must continue to hope for a film that does it justice.
Not good... Just rented this dvd and was quite surprised.  Normally, I'm a big George Clooney and Matt Damon fan.  However, in this film, their talents were underutilized and did not make up for the poor script, editing, and direction which made this film quite dull to watch.While the idea behind the movie is good, it could have been more entertaing, dramatic, or suspensful.  As another reviewer remarked, I was quite tempted to shut it off after 45 minutes and watch something else.  But, I did suffer through to the end, where the film just sort of ends and leaves viewers hanging..
Anno Hideki at his most severe. Dont get me wrong, this was a great movie. between the mad low res camera, and the disgusting sexual situations, it suceeds in what it sets out to do: Disgust you. For at least two hours after I watched it I felt literally sick to my stomach, and even now I find it hard to to sleep as I think about it. It was similar to the feelings I got from watching the end of evangelion, however this was more powerfull, and felt less like a glimpse into anno's mind, and more like a plunge into darkness
Not as titled. I bought this in the expectation that it would cover the People of the "New World" as they existed before Columbus.  Instead, it was basically a recap of the cruelty of the Europeans to the native populations viewed through the standards and sensibilities of today. I read 'Bury My Heary at Wounded Knee' and 'The Chronicle of the American Indian's Complaint' 30 odd years ago and being part Cherokee there was nothing new in the DVDs.  Correction, there were many new things, most of which didn't happen.  A good example is the DVD version of the conquering of the Aztec (Actually they were called Mexica but the DVD got that wrong as well).  Read 'Conquest' by Hugh Thomas for the best book on the subject
BLAH, BLAH, BLAH... this has got to be the WORST film I've ever seen. its not sad. Its not funny, jest over blow mellow dramatic garbage. I don't have any sympathy toward nick in this movie, because he does give you anything to work with or want to keep him. the actor is the worst of all. i cant tell if he's sad in some seens, or angry or jest retarded. I've seen some sad movies but this one jest sucks, I guess its aimed at a different time of homosexuals instead of the present. it probably worked better back in 96'. but this movie is SO SO SO BAD. its embarrassing. do not rent it or buy it or view it on television.NOTE'S: THIS FILM HAD  SOME GREAT TALENTA song from Olivia Newton Jon, and (one of my most personal favorites) Mila AND my favorite comedians Margaret Cho. She's to good but...why this film, she (and Mila ) are to good for some want to be tearjerker movie like this.
UnBox video not yet working. Will not play once video was downloaded. I get the error message:  "can not play file, please try again later. error# 0x80040273" I made the exlusive give me call me back feature but the UnBox department was already closed, I was told the UnBox Saturday and Sunday 6-5 hours. I have to say I am impressed with the Call back feature. I downloaded the Unbox Beta now and am recieving email assistance to try to resolve the problem. Thanks Amazon UnBox! I will Update again - Feb. 10,200
Lousy lousy lousy. Contentwise, I won't toss darts OR roses. This is genre stuff. You either like it or you don't. My beef is with the technical quality. It is execrable. (1) It is NOT in widescreen (Cinemascope), which it ought to be for a biblical spectacular. There is simply no excuse for cranking out a full-screen treatment in a DVD issued in the year 2000. (2) The so-called "digital remastering" must be kitchen-table grade, because the shapes are fuzzy, colors oversaturated, visuals mushy. This DVD should be withdrawn from the market and a new widescreen version substituted. I get better quality from my VHS of this movie than the DVD I purchased. Lousy lousy lousy, as I said.
Cant watch. I downloaded this program and it was garbled and video as if played in slow motion.  This is the first of two downloads that didn't play.  I know it was not my computer because I did download three that played ok
THERE'S NOTHING WRONG WITH THE DAVIS BABY, BUT THERE'S SOMETHING WITH THE FILM ITSELF. Although I knew this movie might not fit my expectations, I still ordered all three parts in a box from British amazon, much because of its cult status among horror fans. Actually I wanted to watch this since I was a boy. And I was right as well as many reviewers (I mean about expectations) - "It's Alive" appeared to be rather boring and not scary at all. The only pluses I saw in it are great work by John P. Ryan (I always adored him) and that nostalgic feeling I got while watching. And by nostalgic I mean the epoch of 70s itself shown in the film, and the way movie was shot. Nowdays we used to see monsters from the first minutes on screen, and in "It's Alive" we get to see the evil baby just closer to the end.Anyway I think the film lacks some brutality and real horror, maybe they'll come up with something more infernal in the sequel which is being planned, as I heard.But in general "It's Alive" is quite OK for a low budget movie that doesn't claim to be a masterpiece of horror genre. Buy it if you like old cheesy horror films, especially those which became legends a long time ago.
Star Trek:  City on the Edge of Forever. My favorite show of the Trek series but there's no way I'd buy another individual program from Amazon.  It will ONLY play on their downloaded player ...won't burn to DVD so can't play it on my television.  Don't bother buying this ...just go for the Trek collection on DVD
I don't know. I've watched this film about 4 times.  I don't really know what it's about.  I should go out, buy a copy, and watch it about 10 more times.The story starts off with a expedition into a jungle in search of an old relic.  It ends with a finding of a greater one.  In between there's a blur.I think I'm going to buy it.  That's all
Lost Credability, QUICKLY!!. I admit, I haven't finished this book.  A friend recommended it to me as I have been having problems with insomnia.  I was interested in reading a book about women's health issues and this one sounded intriguing UNTIL she started in with her tarot cards, interest in astrology and angels.  Granted, I am not a firm believer in just "the hard facts" but its really hard to believe anything this woman writes after it is clear that common sense isn't alternative enough for her!
Poor support. This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet
Disappointed. This will only please the most ardent vampire fans.  Why?  It's exceedinly poorly written.  I figured when I watched it it would either be a decent movie or so bad that it wouldn't matter.  Sadly it was neither.  Don't get me wrong, it was bad, but in all of the wrong ways.  For example the writing, plot dialog, character development is basically not there...well they are they're just about as interesting as chalk.  Unfortunately the acting's not bad.  This results in what must be the worst kind of bad movie.  You can't laugh at the bad dialog because it isn't bad enough, it's just flat.  And you can't laugh at the poor acting because for the most part it's acceptable.  It's got gore and blood, but it isn't the least bit scary.  In general my accessment is it is bad in the most painfully mediocre and forgetable way.if you want sexy evil wait for the remake of Amityville Horror to be released.  Ryan Reynolds may not play a vampire, but that movie had more development in it's credits than this had in it's entirety
Interesting. When I saw the first &quot;It's Alive&quot; movie in the theatre when I was 17, it scared me so bad I couldn't sleep alone for 3 nights. Funny, when I saw it the other night, I could not figure out what scared me. It is such a funny movie. The cinematography is extremely bad, but I guess it was good for 1976 or whenever it first came out. This movie is not as good as the first and I'm going to watch the third tonight. I'm expecting it to be equally bad
Do not watch this film. This film is laughably bad. The entire plot is completely unrealistic and it is difficult to have any sympathy for the cruel murderer who is central to the plot, who is not only a murderer but also totally retarded, missing numerous opportunities to escape and make life easier for himself and the saps who for some random reason have taken it upon themselves to look after him. This film is an absolute waste of time, but feel free to watch it if you feel like wasting 107 minutes of your life
Survivor Rip Off. I have bought 2 seasons of Survivor on unbox and both of them are not complete. Very dissapointing. Guatemala  episode 11 is from a completely different season and it is missing the last 2 episodes and the reunion show. Just leaves you hanging. Exile Island is missing the final episode it just goes from the competition between Danielle and Cirie for a spot in the final 3 to the live reunion show
Aghghhhhh, this is awful!. This has got to be one of the worst films I've ever seen. The characters are pointless and one-dimensional. The guy is a jerk and inspires no sympathy. They have sudden fights over apparently nothing. In fact, there is no cause-and-effect in this movie at all! Things just happen randomly for no apparent reason. There's no real story. The takes are boring; most scenes hum along endlessly making for quite boring viewing. The violent ending wasn't even believable! Instead of inspiring any kind of shock or sympathy, I was left just thinking "what the...???" Really, really pointless all around
Cheeze-Corn... I remember seeing CHILDREN OF THE CORN right after reading Stephen King's short story version in his classic book, Night Shift. I was excited because King's story was such good scary fun. Well, I watched the movie and was amazed at how awful it was. While the short story had a building atmosphere of dread and horror, the movie had an atmosphere of pure cheeze. King's story was short (like 10-20 pages) and sweet, w/ sinister children and a mysterious god / monster in the cornfields. The movie has a town full of annoying brats and a cheap beasty that caused much eye-rolling and laughter. The running time is 90 minutes, including about an hour's worth of padding. COTC would have made an excellent addition to one of King's anthology movies like CREEPSHOW. As it stands, it's bloated and pretty boring. Of course, Linda Hamilton is in it, which is why I gave it an extra star...
Cant watch. I downloaded this program and it was garbled and video as if played in slow motion.  This is the first of two downloads that didn't play.  I know it was not my computer because I did download three that played ok
Why the Charge. Curious as to why Amazon would charge for this content when CBS offers it for free on the official Survivor Website.  Yeah, at the CBS site you have sit through 4 commercials, but it is worth it to not have to download any extra programs
Four Noble Truths Dragging On and On. Don't get it wrong -- I like the ideas and spirit of Buddhism. It is a religion, and yet it is not insistent on belief. My own view of it is that what people do is much more important than anything they believe -- but will be shaped by what they believe, at least in part.One of the things I like about a religion is when it emphasizes doing good. I like it even more when the religion does not call upon people to have faith in something; faith in the good outcome of good works and good attitudes is enough for me.But I found myself struggling with one clear, inexorable truth: This set of DVD's was not well put together. Normally, a tape or writing of the Dalai Lama is most interesting to hear or read. But this seems to stem from some educational conference where what is being done is one of the most republican of all ventures, preaching to the believers. It is partly marred by the need for translation. That would be very appropriate at an educational seminar. Unless you are in the mood to go back to school again, I would recommend anything else taped or written by or about the Dalai Lama.Recently, I have done little to suffer more than listen to and stop the world while hearing these two DVD's about the existence and cause and end of suffering. Yes, the intelligence and good spirit of the Dalai Lama is clear in the DVD's, but if the presentation is wrong, even a William Buckley would seem boring. In these days of cheap electronics, for instance, I would recommend hiring a videographer who has access to good lighting and audio control and is able to cut and paste a little.In the context of these DVD's, Buddhism would almost seem to be as dogmatic about these Four Truths -- all related to suffering and it's cures -- as some others are about the Holy Trinity. As a somewhat non-religious admirer of Buddhism, I am able to stand back and say clearly, buy something else, anything, about, by, or regarding the philosophy or religion.At the same time, I must state that I would be more nervous and clearly on the receiving end of more knee-jerk criticism for my critique where I disecting the views of some other famous religious figures, whose followers would be so likely to have "faith" that not only would the criticisms fly by deaf ears, but the shouts would be geared to drown out even so slight a criticism as to say that a set of tapes or discs is boring.Trusting that I will not lose my head over this, it would seem to easy to be critical. To the contrary, it is a hard thing to do, as I am an admirer of most everything that I think the Dalai Lama stands for. I would only pray -- if you will -- that next time there's a seminar like this, they pay more attention to detail in the production.
Unbelievable. I hated this movie. It was unrealistic and unbelievable. Also, Julia Roberts is a horrible actress and more than slightly resembles an opossum.
Don't even bother watching this movie. This movie is not at all for a hard core horror movie fan.There was was way too much waiting around for something to happen butnothin ever did...
What's up with that?. I wish I had read the other reviews first.  Though the quality of the episode and the video are top notch, the episode cuts off after 22 minutes.  Obviously, I already know the ending of "The Black Death", but I still wanted to see the full show
Extremely Biased Film Portrays Strikers As "Angels". I love how this movie portrays the striking coal miners and their wives as innocent angels while the scabs are called "gun thugs" who just open fire on innocently peaceful protesters with machine guns.The film-maker spends 99% of the film with the strikers and doesn't try too hard to get the opinions of the scabs and mining company workers.After all, scabs are people who do the work that the miners do not want to do themselves. The work has to be done anyway.The mining company in this film not only gave its employees wages but also housed all of them too. Of course the wages and housing conditions are lousy but HOUSING EMPLOYEES IS NOT AN EMPLOYER'S JOB!Any sane person (or anyone who has seen a major strike in person) finds it hard to believe that the scabs are the sole instigators during strikes and that the strikers are the pure victims. Scabs are just trying to go to work and support their families too but are violently harassed by strikers who can do the same work but choose not to. If the work is good enough for the scabs, then why isn't it good enough for the strikers?Strikers also use more than just words to taunt scabs. They use sticks, clubs and occasionally guns or knives to hurt scabs whom they believe are taking their jobs away from them. In this film, when the scabs defend themselves for the right to go into work without getting hurt or killed by the hot-tempered strikers, it is the scabs who are always portrayed as the "gun thugs" and "evil" while the  strikers are always seen being saint-like, perfectly behaved and unjustly discriminated against.Why else are police officers on the scene of most major strikes? To protect the strikers? Hell no. They are there to protect the scabs who are trying to go into work but are subjected to constant harassment by the strikers.This film even has the token black striker, who happens to get along with all of the white striker folks. But guess who uses the "n-word" in this movie toward a black person? You guessed it...an evil scab.I wonder if this film would have shown the strikers' reaction to a black scab if there was one. Probably not.Bottom line: If you are pro-union and believe scabs are the scum of the Earth and that strikers can do no wrong, then "Harlan County, U.S.A." is the movie for you.
"2" STARS FOR THE "DVD" AND NOT THE MOVIE... I just purchased the 2 disc, special edition of this movie, and here's my problem(s):First off, I don't speak Italian, so my only options are to watch the film with the English dub, or with the Italian dub with the English subtitles, but here's the problem; the English dub is out of sync with the film, sometimes being only slightly so, but other times being very noticeable and distracting (i.e. during loud sound effects, such as a chair being knocked over, or someone knocking loudly on a door).And so my other option is the Italian bud with the English subs, but here's the problem with this, the English subs are missing during the scene where Peggy is reading the diary (about 30+ minutes into the movie).Now, I had noticed missing subs during the first part of the film, but these where usually during background conversations, or occasionally a line would be missing from someone's speech, but could usually be figured out, and these where only slightly annoying, but the missing subs for the diary entry is inexcusable (and is also missing from the other subs as well) as this is an important bit of info to the plot of the story.Also, when you set up the audio option, from the main menu, there's no problem, but I found that if you use the audio button on your DVD remote, the Italian option gives you the French soundtrack and the French gives you the Italian one. It's nothing serious, but it's an annoyance all the same.So, does anyone else notice these problems, or did I just end up with a bum disc
Good idea...poor acting. As much as I would like to recommend this movie, I have to admit it is not one of the best movies of Jesus life. It does follow the text of Matthew's gospel essentially word for word, which is, at times, a useful tool.That said, the acting is mediocre. Bruce Marchiano as Jesus is a flop. He just doesn't pull it off convincingly. I often teach a class where I show people clips from different Jesus movies. Marchiano's poor acting often evokes laughter in the group.If you what the best Jesus movie ever done, nothing beats Zeffirelli's TV mini-series Jesus of Nazareth.The two other parts to this series, Acts and John, are done very well.
THE most BORING movie EVER!!!. This is what happens when you buy movies that Amazon recommends; I consider my EXTREME boredom with this movie my PUNISHMENT for letting them recommend a movie for me to buy.  Don't let the fantastic cast lure you; this movie is BORING!True, it is realistic in the sense that conversations among friends -- more often than not -- don't necessarily go anywhere, and oftentimes the texture of a movie is -- not in the conversations themselves -- but in the relationships that become evident within those conversations, but nevertheless DO NOT WASTE YOUR MONEY on this movie.Did I mention that it was BORING
Lover's Lane......another horrible wannabe slasher movie to add to the pile. Lover's Lane....another no brainer slasher movie straight to video and its really horrible. Lover's Lane is the hot spot to where you wanna go to make out but 15 years ago some people were murdered up at that joint and 15 years later, some relatives of the people who were murdered up there (always is) Are tormented in the present but the "Hook Man" from the Urban Legend. Pretty much a snoozer with bad acting (who calls this acting good?). How many screaming teenaged girls have we seen in movies? It only works if the movie is good and this is not a good movie. The plot twists and turns arent even that great....idiotic writing. Starring: Riley Smith (Radio, 8 Legged Freaks), Erin J. Dean (Lolita, A Pig's Tale), Suzanne Bouchard (Joyful Partaking), Sarah Lancaster (Four Kings, Dr. Vegas), Diedre Kilgore (Good Luck, The Falls), Billy O'Sullivan (A Change Of Heart, Rites), Matt Reidy (Hit and Run, Carried Away) and Anna Faris (Scary Movie 1-4, Just Friends) in one of her earlier movies. Nothing can save this from being thrown over a cliff....it's ridiculous
The worst movie ever made, bar none. This is without question the worst movie ever made. It makes "Plan 9 from Outer Space" look like "2001". Roger Ebert must be a genius. No one could "accidentally" make a movie this bad. I guess it's a comedy - that is if you find the contents of a toilet funny
The title of this movie should've been. &quot;Clubs and Raves and The Young People Who Go To Them--Oh Yeah And The Old Genius Farts That Pioneered The Music They Dance To&quot;. BUY - MY - COPY - PLEASE!!!!  I expected this film to play like a Keyboard Magazine interview with the artists; detailing their influences, their gear and how they create their sounds. There's a lot of DJs standing behind turntables bobbing their heads, mere snippets of the new techno bands like Prodigy, only a passing mention of Kraftwerk and no mention at all of the Art of Noise. I was disappointed. If you want the real story of Techno check out History of Rock and Roll: Episode 10 - The Perfect Beat call me: therealpeperl@yahoo.co
An Awful Adaptation. The costumes were great....but this movie did no justice to the novel.  "Cousin Bette" the novel is excellent , "Cousin Bette" the movie, is dreadful.  I understand some changes are necessary when a novel is adapted into a movie, but these changes were awful and they took something very important (the Baroness) away from the story...If you haven't read the novel, you will probably find this movie to be decent.  If you have read the novel, be prepared to be very disappointed
Really bad Italian cheese. This is the worse cannibal film I have ever seen, the film was just terrible with some laughable and very bad acting and the film was not disturbing as some reviewers said it was just bottom of the barrel entertainment and they recycle the same scenes from other older and better cannibal films, you'll probably know the scenes once they come on cause its obvious from the way that they were cut the cannibals look different in each scene. A woman named Shiela is looking for her sister who has dissapeared in the jungles of New Guinea and there are suspicions that she might have joined a cult or weird sect that is away from civilization, the woman hires herself a guide and heads of into the jungle only to find some cannibals and a demented cult led by Jonas who has controlled these people into thinking that they're in a better place. There is alot of sex, blood and gore in this film but it seems to be lacking a plot and a brain, if you liked Cannibal ferox and Cannibal holocaust or any other Italian gore films then you might be interested in this but be warned cause the film is absolutely horrendous and was nothing compared to the other two that I have mentioned
huh?. My wife and I looked at eachother with one eyebrow raised basically saying "huh?"  The only reason I gave this movie 2 stars is because a couple of the stories were actually interesting, however, they just didn't go anywhere and I was left disappointed.  There was no apparent purpose or meaning to this movie.If you are wondering whether or not to watch this movie, please pass this one by
A big DUD --- avoid this one like the plague!. Women-in-prison films are supposed to be erotic!  That means they're supposed to have AT LEAST ONE of the three following things (and preferably MORE than one):1)  An evil lesbian warden who enjoys the bodies of her pretty prisoner-playthings, turning at least one of them into her beautiful nude sex slave.2)  Evil lesbian guards who occasionally strip the girls naked before whipping/spanking them, and later take them into their own quarters for their private pleasures, especially late at night.3)  Tough, lesbian inmates, who prey on the younger, most beautiful newcomers, often in the shower, but also in their beds at night.Well, this particular video HAS NONE OF THESE THINGS!  There are NO LESBIANS in this prison!  There are only gay male guards and a boring old man as the warden.  The women are certainly pretty enough and their outfits revealing enough, but as a women-in-prison flick THIS ONE SUCKS!!!  IT'S NOT EROTIC!!!  NOT RECOMMENDED!!!
The movie-a gem! The Razor release-a shame! ERA release-Excellent. Watching the Razor release (which I bought to save a few dollars) elevated my blood pressure due to the careless way this rare gem of a movie was treated. Let alone that the terrible translation made me miss the meaning all too many times.Fortunately I was able to find the much-praised version released by ERA of Taiwan from a seller here on Amazon, and it sure did justice both to the film and to the dialog-sheer perfection.
Watch Das Boot instead. I just finished watching Das Boot.  To even draw comparisons between these two movies is absolutely ridiculous.  Where Das Boot is a gripping human tale of the tragedy of war, U-571 is just more Hollywood tripe.If you just want 'splosions and escapism, I guess U-571 does the trick.If you want a realistic sub movie that will haunt you for many nights to come, go with Das Boot
Not Widescreen. I didn't even open this copy of Gothic.  As soon as I realized it wasn't letterboxed I immediately returned it.  I've seen the movie before - I love Ken Russell, but I wont' watch it if isn't in letterbox
sean patrick flannery i love him.... BUT. So there i was surfing the net... listening to suicide kings in the background.... thinking... okay so i just won the Young Indian Jones trading card set... what ELSE should i get that has sean patrick flannery in it! A HA!  here we go... a movie with BRITNEY MURPHY as well- SCORE! Well... i was sadly sadly... very disturbed that i paid this much money for a movie that sucked this badly.... if you like quirky black comedies... this movie is for you... but not for me! Sean patrick flannery drives around with his wifes skeleton... britney murphy causes her fiance to kill himself because she doesn't want to marry him.... it all just sucked...  sean though... is still of course sexy sexy! and so is brtney murphy- but i think she looks better as a thin blond.. than a baby fat brunette...
Bad Device. I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service
He was fired from GM for calling off and showing up late. what a joke...people believe the stupidest things...do some research and you will see that this is a joke.  I hated it
Poor support. This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet
contrived, implausible crime drama. "Four Brothers" is yet another nail in the coffin of John Singleton's increasingly moribund moviemaking career.  The director - who burst upon the scene in 1991 with the vibrant and gritty "Boyz n the Hood" - has here mounted a film so burdened by implausibility and contrivance that it makes one wonder if the once-promising filmmaker will ever be able to get back on track again.  The story, reeking of artificiality, features Mark Wahlberg, Tyrese Gibson, Andre Benjamin and Garrett Hedlund as four troubled young men raised by the same foster mother.  When she is killed in a convenience store robbery, the quartet launches into action, seeking revenge against the perpetrators and becoming slowly convinced, through their investigation in the neighborhood, that the killing might not have been as random in nature as they had been initially led to believe.The main weakness of this film is that it gives us virtually no reason to care about any of the characters.  By not showing us any scenes between the boys and their foster mother (except for one embarrassingly bad Thanksgiving dinner fantasy sequence that looks as if it were conceived by a first-year film student), we are forced to take their relationship totally on faith, rendering the boys' thirst for revenge arbitrary at worst and academic at best.The acting is uniformly flat, with the characters little more than wafer-thin stereotypes, and even the action scenes come across as surprisingly mundane and second-rate given the Singleton pedigree in this area.  The boys' running around from venue to venue in their Detroit neighborhood, brandishing guns in full view of the populace and screaming for information about their mother's killer, is ludicrous on the face of it and often reduces the film to the level of cheap low comedy burlesque.With nary a single moment that rings believable or true, "Four Brothers" is by-the-book filmmaking from a director who has proven that he has the wherewithal and talent to do so much more.
Not as bad as I expected, but not great either. WARNING: MOVIE SPOILER BELOW!!!I confess that my primary reason for buying a copy of this film, is grounded in recent history. I was around in the early 80s, when L. Ron Hubbard and his Scientologists were going full-bore with the logistics of making the book into a movie (the hero depicted on the original edition of the paperback looked like Chuck Norris, or so I thought), when all of a sudden Hubbard died, and the whole project apparently fell apart. Back then, I was close to 20 years old and I was curious about whatever it was that these Scientologists were turned on to that was supposed to help improve a person's quality of life... then I read about Larry Wollersheim's 1985 lawsuit. You can figure the rest out for yourself.Anyhow, oh, yeah, the movie... the storyline is your basic alien invasion number, i.e., the Invaders arrived to make life miserable for the poor humans (in this film, the aliens look a lot like the Klingons from Star Trek), until your typical dashing young male hero organizes a band of his fellow humans to rise up and tell the Invaders to get off of our planet. Pretty simple and straightforward, but hey, there are other films MUCH worse than Battlefield Earth, and they've taught me that if you have good enough special effects, even the lamest sci-fi storylines can work!The thing that stood out about this film, though, was its reliance on everyday talk and contemporary cliches for much of its dialogue, and as a result, it came across as rather corny... a film to be recommended for its comedy value, rather than for things like epic space battle scenes. Also, the "bad guy" aliens use some sort of psychic power to interfere with the minds of their human subjects, in order to keep them from organizing revolts... I must say, trying to depict mind-manipulation effects on film does pretty much the same thing to the movie as varnish stripper does when applied to a CD---it turns it into a confusing, incomprehensible mess! A couple of times, the picture would break up into a concentric blur, and I'd wonder what the heck was supposed to be going on.How the makers of this film ever talked a great studio like Warner to help them film it, is something which will forever remain a mystery to me. I remember just before this picture opened, a group of Scientologists were trying to hype it: "oh, watch---this film is going to be bigger than Star Wars and Gone With the Wind combined!" You can guess what happened when those staggeringly huge box office numbers never materialized... can you say "oops"
Could've been so good... OK, this obscure slasher seems promising... good premise, attractive and interesting cast with a few known names, decent budget and effects, a sense of humour and witty, bitchy dialogue. I mean, you'd think a horror flick about competing for cheerleader queen would be a can't miss, no?So where did Cheerleader Camp go astray? In two major areas... pacing and body count. Nothing ever really happens until the ending, and after all the build up, most of the murders occur offscreen! So, basically, there's no payoff. What a waste of a great set-up an an eager, game cast. Don't buy, rent
Watch this wartime L &amp; H comedy with a group of friends. Some comedies come to life with an audience. &quot;Air Raid Wardens&quot; is a real &quot;audience&quot; picture, with Stan and Ollie bumbling their way through air-raid duty, first-aid practice, and spy-catching. As usual  with Laurel &amp; Hardy, you can see the jokes coming. Audiences loved this  underrated film in '43. It's got some good scenes, but you'll either admire  or hate the &quot;sad&quot; episodes where the boys have to play it  straight
Poor support. This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet
Drama About Domestic Terrorists. This film starts with an event based on a true crime. A talk radio show host in Denver was killed by an American Nazi. (This event inspired the "Talk Radio" play and film.) This film continues with scenes from a small town in a farming region. No mention of their economic status; are they losing dollars and population, small businesses, etc. Instead we see a small group of white racists who abduct a black man to hunt and kill him! This seems too exaggerated to believe. Federal agents are aware of this but don't want to act yet. Their agent is sent back to get more information. There are groups like that in some sparsely settled areas. The film doesn't explain what created them. It shows how some politicians try to use them for votes and contributions. No real names, of course.The Federal agent meets to report to her higher ups. Then we see terrorists prepare to hold up a bank to raise money for their activities (based on real events). Most bank robberies are done by ordinary criminals who are not part of any group. (The FBI put an end to organized gangs that robbed banks in the 1940s.) This Federal agency doesn't interfere because they want more information on their aims (and their leaders). More terrorism is planned: dynamiting a courthouse, attacking a power station, etc. The terrorist plots here would keep this small group busy 24 hours a day! Kathy finds a secret list of "friends". This is quickly copied with a camera. The Federal agents need to know who this group will target so they can arrest them. Gary meets with the leader (who arrives in a helicopter!) And shows documents that say Kathy is a special investigator. Is Kathy being served up as a sacrifice? Gary and Kathy travel to Chicago, where an assassination is planned that will make Gary the fall guy. (Another Lee Harvey Oswald?) A second "lone gunman" shoots the politician in front of a building. Gary fails to shoot, and won't ever try this again.Costa-Gavras gained world fame with his 1969 film "Z". A few years later his film about rebels in South America was popular. His later films have seemed mediocre. A better story might not have tried to cover so many details and plots as this film does; better pacing could help. The threat from domestic terrorism still needs a good film (e.g., Timothy McVeigh). Those who gave this film a high rating must love the images more than the facts.A better film today would show the bad results from "NAFTA" and "Free Trade" in harming most Americans economically. But Hollywood would never allow a film about this "war on the middle class". The word `nafta' in Greek and Arabic refers to `petroleum'. NAFTA is a symbol for the policies designed for Big Oil. It is like George W. Bush calling his policy "Operation Iraqi Liberation".
D-TV... No, it's certainly not as good as the first one, but I did enjoy some of DEMONS 2. The beginning is cool enough, with the demon's resurrection and it's gaining access into Sally's apartment via the TV set. The tension and dread seem to build quite nicely. That is, right up to the scene where the kid-demon's chest pops open to reveal an idiotic, rubber demon puppet! Ugg! It reminded me of those stupid monsters in GHOULIES, HOBGOBLIN, or some other wretched '80s mess! The apartment building setting was interesting, but seemed to be mostly wasted on the few, precious bursts of action we actually get. I did like the weightlifter folks in the gym. They were hilarious and at least they put up a fight against the infernal invaders! The battle in the parking garage was ok too. Maybe I just expected D2 to be a bit more frightening and disturbing...
Will Denis Leary ever figure out he can't act... Well the title kind of says it all. Dull,ugly,boring men in a dull,ugly boring movie. Also the most unreallistic sexual pairing in the world. Stunningly beautiful Elizabeth Hurley with ugly, skinny, beaked nosed  Denis Leary.Steve Buscemi is comical as usual and adds the only bright spot to the film.
A note to subtitle/caption users. Given that this film stars a deaf actress and that I had seen this movie on Lifetime TV with captioning- I had no reason to suspect that the dvd would come WITHOUT CAPTIONS.  As a deaf viewer, I was severely disappointed in this product.  The film itself is good entertainment- but what's there to enjoy if you can't understand the dialogue
A respectable entry, but this franchise needs a creative transfusion. I might as well re-draft this review as only 0 of 2 people enjoyed the first draft.  That's wouldn't normally phase me, but I can do better for you in this case.I first saw a segment of ST-2 on cable and mistook it for an anemically budgeted direct-to-DVD release.  This ticked me off a bit because I'm a fan of Phil Tippett, who got his major feature film directorial shot on this movie.Having now got the DVD, I have unreeled it from the beginning and I find it loads more ambitious, intelligent and well rendered by director Tippett than I had given the producers credit for permitting.Tippett has been an innovator in the CGI field -- stop-motion, go-motion, and transitional model-to-CGI models manipulated so as to provide dynamic effects for an impressive array of digital creatures. Among those milestones are the perfectly convincing insect creatures in the first STARSHIP TROOPERS movie. The multitudes of individually rendered creatures in STARSHIP TROOPERS are spotlessly realistic.As a general rule, if a studio greenlights a movie sequel as a direct-to-DVD release, they intend to suffocate the production -- whether the franchise has been good, bad or mediocre in the market -- by simply failing to provide a generous -- or even a minimal budget -- to sustain life support in any recognizable way.  Trust me -- starve any sequel of support and money and you become a key factor in ruining even the best of franchises.STARSHIP TROOPERS (the first) was not a runaway commercial hit on first run, apparently, when compared to its $100 million cost.  But sci-fi buffs are a loyal film audience with eternal memories, and it is certain that this ambitious sci-fi production will continue to attract countless repeated viewings -- and income -- for the rest of the studios' and the filmmakers' natural lives.  Nobody loses on this one.  A sequel is hardly a big gamble if one invests long-term.Regardless of that, director Phil Tippett has not only done an impressive job of directing his first major film, he has also done a very smart job of producing a generous portion of images large in scope and convincing in power within his spare budget.Looking at the bug war scenes in the first act, you might easily not suspect there were any production restrictions at all.  Credit Mr. Tippett for that achievement.  In fact, there are moments that benefit from lessons learned in the first movie, which have added impact as a result.Now for a few notes:  I would have liked to see the bug culture and biology expanded in new, logical ways.  I would like to have seen bug life-cycle mechanics which did not rehash ground covered by other unrelated movies -- what has been done and re-done in sci-fi productions as far back as ALIEN.The creative possibilities for an intelligent multiped, exoskeleton, hive-bred civilization are unlimited.  There is no need at all for the writers or FX techs to resort to the over-used and tired gimmick of an alien climbing from one human's mouth to another human mouth, for example.Nor do we need yet another script in which we revisit the old familiar premise of films from INVASION OF THE BODY SNATCHERS to THE HIDDEN to THE THING that anyone can be inhabited by an alien and still appear normal.  It has been done to death.  Let's move on and discard that whole much copied process.I could tell you things about the way a crawdad captures and eats a minnow from the tail forward that would make your hair stand on end. There is plenty of fresh, untapped bug behavior to mine, and there is far too much writing talent involved with the STARSHIP TROOPERS series to need to use anything rehashed from any previous motion picture.Still in all, Phil Tippett's feature debut as director is more than competent and particularly surprising for his facility with the actors.  I look forward to his future development as a director.
No sir, didn't like it. I'm an animation fan, and when this came up recommended to me I was eager to check it out. While the animation was fine (although a tad creepy), I found the story off-putting. Its basically about a bunch of dysfunctional people on drugs in a depressing future where there are a lot of people doing drugs a.k.a substance "D."  I found  this film depressing and annoying. I particularly found the 'blur suit' to be distracting to watch. It almost gave me a headache.1 star. Did not like
Basic Incompetence By Everyone Across The Board!. This movie should be shown to classrooms of aspiring screenwriters and directors as an example of how not to be sucked into the Hollywood junk machine. The screenwriter of this movie obviously had some ideas about a coherent story that he wanted to tell about moral relativity and corrupt military officials. This film's story structure is mostly influenced by the classic film Rashomon. Well, so what happened? How did this ungracious disaster of a movie make it to the big screen? The biggest culprits are easily the movie stars, John Travolta and Samuel L. Jackson, using their bloated star egos to force the screenwriter to rework his material into something they ultimately found more suitable to their star personas. Disgusting! Travolta was supposed to be a bad guy and Jackson was supposed to bite the bullet, but no way would the two Hollywood jerks allow that!SPOILER ALERT: Who in their right mind was surprised by the ending? I knew Sam Jackson was in on it from the get go and soon enough he would grace us with his presence. Lo and behold, his bald head emerges at the end of the movie wearing a white outfit like an angel of some sort. I hate this movie, it's an insult to the audience! John McTiernan, ( Predator, Die Hard ), the director of Basic should be ashamed of such a lackluster effort on his part. But what could he do when faced with the two morons who played the leads! A sad joke of a movie, avoid it unless you just love junk
Hitler making speeches in a cave. When this movie began, I was sure I was in for something penetrating and deep.  As it went on, I felt that the movie was merely clever.  Within a few minutes of that, I was just plain bored.The premise -- Hitler, his colleagues, and a few random Nazis in a surreal, underground world akin to hell -- has potential.  But the movie becomes tedious for lack of any plot, or of any pretense of one.  The whole movie is given over to listening to Hitler make speeches about heroism, propaganda, and other abstract concepts.  For the sake of variety, his speechifying is occasionally interrupted by comments from Goebbels, Goering, Eva Braun, and others.Having Hitler talk with Sigmund Freud was evidently intended to be the cleverest stroke of all.  Freud, however, is portrayed as a bland, ordinary, TV-stereotype of a psychologist; the only way we know he's supposed to be Freud is the beard and the pince-nez.
Historical interpretaion at its worst. This film may possibly be the worst about this topic ever made. The performances are terrible. Particularly Lance Henrikson as Lincoln. He appears to be doing an impersonation of Gregory Peck playing Lincoln and a very bad one at that. The portrayal of Booth seems to come about from the makers of this film watching too many 90s serial killer shockers. I particaularly like the scene where Morrow is wearing granny sunglasses that make him look like a reject from Strawberry Alarm Clock. His portrayal of Booth as the crazed maniac is laughable. The sets however are very credible and appealing. Overall a terrible film. Avoid it unless you are in the mood for a good laugh
Unbelievable. I hated this movie. It was unrealistic and unbelievable. Also, Julia Roberts is a horrible actress and more than slightly resembles an opossum.
Avoid if you like Vampire Movies, and if you want to see good acting. There are very few movies that I haven't finished watching.  This now goes on the short list.  Luckily I didn't rent this one and instead was excited to see it on TiVo, that is until after 30+ minutes in I was hoping a vampire would kill me.This film while it has an R rating and there is a reason why, even the toned down TV version was extremely graphic, from pulling out someone's tongue, watching a vampires head blow up and catch fire in the sun to blood spray.  There isn't anything wrong with a good horror movie but graphic violence to fill time (so you don't have to have actors say anything) seems a bit of a waste.The premise of a rag tag bunch of vampire hunters joining forces to defeat evil could have been a great movie.  But, the low budget, director chosen and filming of this movie won't make it a classic on anyone's list.In addition the movie was WAY OVERACTED.  I don't know if everyone was trying to make the film better or what but the overacting made it to the point that it made the acting look horrible.  It got to the point I no longer cared who won a battle.As I said this is one of less than a dozen movies I have been looking forward to seeing that I couldn't even finish.Gets 1 star cause I can't give it less
The creators need to be shot!. Yeah, that is extreme, but my goodness.  Based on the original spy kids, the kid in me was excited about another movie with 3D glasses~~ Whooooo!  Well, let me tell you, I have seen some bad movies, but this was worse than anything I have ever seen.  There was just nothing there.  I won't go into the "plot" because others have already done it.  I think that if you are 11 years old and excited about watching a 3D film you may like this, but anyone older will be wondering "what is this crap that I am watching?"  In order to give it a fair review, I watched the whole thing and it was just terrible.  Sylvester Stallone must really be hard up for roles because I can't believe that he starred in such crap.Bottom line, I think the creators placed too much of their focus on making a 3D movie.  Clearly, the plot and lines were an afterthought.  Clearly.  I have to give this movie an F-.  I will never watch it again and if I felt it would sell for more than a few pennies on Ebay, I would get rid of it.  I'll be putting this DVD in my DVD graveyard
Big Bad Mama II, not what you were looking for. If you were hoping for a skin flick, this is not it.  A couple of minutes of long shots of the young girls swimming topless and one real nice look at Julie McCullouh (...), in bed, is not enough too qualify.  The acting is awful.  Angie looks great for her age.  Still not enough
Beware of Unbox!!!. Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for
The nadir of Corman's shining collection. Peter Lorre's ,"The Black Cat",is charmingly done.Yet,the other two are stinkers.I'm a Corman fan,but this was boring and silly to watch.I think they had a good idea ,bringing the trilogy it to the big screen.But,this version and interpretation of Poe's masterpieces didn't translate well at all.So ,beware of the dog
Awful.............. but for Teri Hatcher. Teri Hatcher fans can perhaps get some value for money.  But for her, and her ample body on ample display, this movie is just not worth the time.  Terrible direction, awful story, miserable music!!
I don't know. I've watched this film about 4 times.  I don't really know what it's about.  I should go out, buy a copy, and watch it about 10 more times.The story starts off with a expedition into a jungle in search of an old relic.  It ends with a finding of a greater one.  In between there's a blur.I think I'm going to buy it.  That's all
Some Magical Moments in MGM Mishmash. For those who grew up watching Gene Kelly's "Singin' in the Rain" and "On the Town," the MGM mishmash of "Anchors Aweigh" (1945) will prove a disappointment. Nevertheless, there are some magical moments. The film's highlight is Gene's breakthrough dance with Jerry the Mouse -- a stunning fusion of animation and live-action. Along the way, Frank Sinatra sings a few memorable numbers amid the Technicolor splendor. However, you must keep your finger on the fast-forward button to encounter these gems. Running 140 minutes, it's obvious that the editor fell asleep at the Moviola. Though directed by the usually reliable George Sidney, one wishes Kelly had more creative control over this unwieldy project. "Anchors Aweigh" should be viewed as a warm-up to the far-superior "On the Town."
so-so. I never cared much for the soundtrack aside from a few tracks. this Film was wack the Acting,Directing. but the Story Line was cool. in fact if someone knew how to put this together with a stronger Cast this Film would have been interesting.this Film flip flopped Time Periods&it hurt it's cause.I will give Prince Props though for being a Black Film Director back at a time when it was really rare&truth be told in 2004 it ain't that much better on a whole
Big name cast adds up to unfocussed dud. The worst movie of this genre. Incredible does describe this movie- incredibly bad! This movie doesn't know what it wants to be. At times one can see attempts to recreate and milk the genuine rage and drama of "Mississippi Burning" or the anger and impunity of "Ghosts of Mississippi", or a hybrid of those and bits and pieces of other movies of this genre. At other times it looks like its just trying to draw from the sex appeal and cheesy interaction of 2 of its main actors, Matthew McConaughey and Sandra Bullock. As a result this movie picks up the rear in that genre's list of movies for lack of originality, and the scattered hodge podge statements it tries to make. Some of my favorite actors are wasted, either by being given cliched dialogue, over acting, or being put there merely for their brand name with no script to support their presence. If this script is considered a great adaptation of a great book, then I have no interest in reading the book. I'm sure the idea and the premise looked good on paper. But the direction doesn't guide the story with any coherence or identity of its own.  Bullock is mere cheesecake and is unbelievable in her role, proving she's only worthy of b-grade "Miss Congeniality" type crud.  McConaughey over acts so much (as can be said for Keifer Sutherland and others) that it can be said he balances out the under acting of Patrick McGoohan, Kevin Spacey and Donald Sutherland. Samuel L. Jackson should be ashamed of himself of not only his worst performance ever, but also easily his worst choice of movies to participate in.  Even the extras in this movie are horrible. Enough can't be said about the terrible direction in this movie, equating elongated facial shots with drama to a fault, making Sergio Leone westerns look much more authentic by comparison. This is not "a powerful film." It's a powerful attempt at using a big name cast, a brand name book and a capable director to use material that they know would easily jerk the emotions of its audience, and in doing that they resort to all the cliches of this genre scattering the story line in so many directions, culminating in an over the top, pleading hunk of cheese summation scene by McConaughey that wouldn't hold water in any real court of justice. Maybe people claim greatness to this movie out of guilt, or because they haven't seen quality comparisons and classics like "Mississippis Burning," that has both a great script and fabulous acting. I don't know. All I know is it tugs from so many hokey directions it takes the final scene to remind everyone how it started. Among the top of my most over rated movies
Disappointing - Would Love to See a Good Remake. This movie took most of the great songs from the stage play and dumped them.  For a theater lover this is heartbreaking.  What a disappointing story.  If a movie can be faithful to the theater version then this one is a class-A adulterer.  Even the ending was changed and not for the better.  The dubbing for the two leading ladies was also disappointing.  A pretty face is not enough
Great Acting but unbelievable story line. This movie has such wonderful reviews from both professional critics and Amazon customers that I was expecting great things. While I agree the acting (especially the girls playing Christy and Ariel) is excellent the story is just too implausible and I got that impression from the minute we see the family crossing from Canada to the US (yes they are Irish but for some reason they have to sneak in to the US from Canada). Anyway why on earth would an apparently intelligent couple enter the US with their two kids illegally, without jobs or much money to settle in the most expensive city in the country?  I know the dad is an actor but couldn't he have settled the family in one of the less expensive boroughs and taken the subway in to Manhattan? The mom is a teacher but can't find a job but no wonder if they are in the country illegally. Yet there is money for private school, fixing up the dump of an apartment, an expensive camcorder, betting the rent money on an ET doll etc.  I can't imagine any parents moving in to an apartment building known as the "drug house" with two young girls and then letting the girls wander about as they please.  Mind you the parents are a couple supposedly almost crippled by the guilt they feel over a third child - a son - that has recently died.  I kept expecting someone to call Social Services.   And the medical situations with both Frankie and the mom and new baby are not well thought out or researched. The symbolism between Mateo, the new baby and Frankie is very heavy handed. Though the film is told through the oldest daughter's eyes  because of several scenes and elements the movie is not suited at all to children.  And there are also several scenes that are really not connected with the oldest daughter at all.   Maybe if I had taken it more as a fable I would have "gotten" this movie more but I was expecting a straight forward drama and was disappointed.
A lot of green light and not much else. Rule number one if you're making a Stephen King movie, especially if it's a TV movie; make it scary or don't make it at all!  THE TOMMYKNOCKERS fails to do this miserably!  For most of the film, you're watching a lot of green light and a lot of silly inventions.  Granted, that's all in the book, but it written chillingly by King in a way only he can do it.  There are some exciting alien moments at the end, but by then it's too late.  You've just spent three hours watching a bad knock off of an X-FILES episode.On the plus side, I had no problem watching the infamous Traci Lords act like like a total slut!  Bless her
Pure garbage. I hate this movie! Because it protrays 17-year-old girls in such a negative light. I'm almost 17 years old and I felt disgusted that adults think that all teenagers do is smoke and do drugs and drink when they really don't.In real life, teenage girls don't do that kind of stuff. I think Hollywood producers should make movies about girls following their dreams and finding themselves rather than they do drugs and overdose and die. It's so disgusting that the media presents teenagers like this to the public and then adults think that's what young girls are like. I don't think I have ever seen a movie about a seventeen-year-old girl like this ever. It's the worst movie I've ever seen in my whole entire life and I shouldn't have seen it to begin with. I'm sorry I wasted my time watching this piece of crap. I love Sandra Bullock, I think she's a cool woman and an great actress, but this piece of trash is too horrible for words. It's sick! Don't watch this at all!!!!!!!
&quot;Is theah a convick in that theah closet?&quot;. Strange stuff--Duvall rants, gibbers, and fires a shotgun into an empty closet. Haas watches, listens, and smiles a lot. The great James Earl Jones wanders in, scratches his beard and mutters to himself, and walks out again. If this sounds like your kind of thing, jump right in. But nobody's ever going to claim this is Horton Foote's finest hour
Even my thirteen year old nephew found this idiotic... ...and you know when a young man in full testosterone blow finds a film with a hottie like Milla in it to be an incomprehensible waste of time that it REALLY must be a stinker.Not even worth renting, we saw this upchuck as a first run at Austin's legendary Alamo Drafthouse and walked out wondering why we had bothered.I'd spare you that, if I could.
Both Stars are for D'Onofrio. I too bought this on VHS for Vincent D'Onofrio.  My only negative comment about his performance is that there's not enough of it!  I'll say right here and now that I'm not a big fan of Smits or Scacchi, and D'Onofrio overpowers them every time he's on screen.  It's a beautiful story, and I can see why director Gillian Armstrong was attracted to it - it is a love story with a bit of real-life depth (rather than those soapy ones where the ridiculous problems are created by the characters for lack of imagination - Julia Roberts films, anyone?).  That being said, the two lead roles needed to be played by stronger actors, and ones that could keep up with D'Onofrio vivacity.  Worth a look for fans
AMAZON SUCKS. I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!
Jason Takes Your Money. As a general rule, any film with a large number of Roman numerals behind it is going to suck, and the eighth outing of the F-13 franchise, JASON TAKES MANHATTAN, obeys this rule to a fanatical degree. This movie is terrible, an utter embarrassment, and is noteworthy only as a study in corporate greed and marketing deception.By the fourth installment of the series, the ironically titled FINAL CHAPTER, this formulaic slasher franchise was as exhausted as an old, blood-soaked boot. Jason Voorhees had outlived his usefulness and it was time for his rotted a*s to hang up the gaolie mask and retire. But the movie industry is an industry first, and when THE FINAL CHAPTER turned unexpectedly into a cash cow the studio execs at Paramount continued to flog their exhausted serial killer into progidies of meaningless violence. THE FINAL CHAPTER was followed by three more absolutely asinine sequels, which saw Jason improve the Crystal Lake gene pool by slaughtering legions of pot-smoking teenage dimwits. By this time P-mount was beginning to get embarrassed by their deformed, kill-crazy stepchild, yet the lure of an easy payday drew them on.I still remember seeing the preview for this flick in a movie theater back in 1989. The audience ate it up. We actually believed that the producers had decided to tweak the exhausted series by loosing Jason in a place where he would probably feel right at home: the Big Apple. One could only imagine the bloody shennanigans Crystal Lake's least popular citizen could embark upon in New Yawk City! People were laughing out loud as they imagined him loose in the City of Lights. He could slay obnoxious Volcanoites! Teach rude cab drivers the errors of their ways! Annihilate the snotty salespeople at Tiffanys! Cut down on panhandlers! Convince grafitti artists to stay out of dark alleys! Run for mayor! We sixteen year olds LOVED the idea.There was just one problem. The gang at Paramount had no intention of delivering on their promise. The ad campaign, like the title of the movie, was a fraud, and the only thing that got "taken" in this film was the money of a lot of bloodthirsty teenage dupes.First of all, the first 60 minutes of this 90-odd minute movie are not set in Manhattan, but  in Crystal Lake and then on a ship called the Lazarus (get it?) which is conveying the usual cargo of teenage acting-skool dropout slasher fodder on a graduation cruise to New York. Jason, accidentally revived from the depths of the Lake by a jolt of electricity, stows on board the ship and proceeds to ch-ch-ch, ha-ha-ha his way through the doltish grads and the suspiciously small crew until the survivors are pursuaded to take a rowboat to Manhattan Island. Unfortunately "Manhattan Island", with the exception of a couple of second-unit establishing shots, is largely an unimaginative-looking soundstage on the Paramount lot populated by Central Casting New Yawkers, including the usual mixed-race mugger team and an Irish cop who says things like, "Well, ye seem loike foine peeple, so I'll not be arresting ye."There is not a single scary moment in the whole film, and there are not even any particularly interesting kills. Kane Hodder's plodding, rotting, thoroughly over-rated Jason looks almost bored, as if he signed onto the cruise by accident, and then got talked into doing his mass murder shtick by the ship's entertainment director. To make up for the lack of any kind of suspense, the writers threw in a lot of gratuitous pleading for mercy from the female characters, and added nice little moments like a ship's crewmember talking warmly about his baby son right before Jason runs a harpoon through his body. Classy stuff, but really, everything about the movie is stupid, from the crazy deckhand who mumbles prophetically that the voyage is doomed (shades of Crazy Ralph), to the annoyingly cute little dog who has more acting talent than most of the victims. Hell, the climax of the film features a chase through the New York sewers, which, we are told, flood with radioactive toxic waste every midnight. (Does Rudy Guilani know about this?)I realize having expectations for a Jason movie is silly, but even by the cellar-low standards of the franchise, this flick is a ripoff, a fraud, a dreadful fake, utterly stupid, appallingly bad, useless, terrible, and horrible. ZERO STARS.
Quaint Comedy Could Have Been Better. Most L &amp; H fans know that the boys made a long series of MGM/FOX pictures which reflected the big studio &quot;assembly line&quot; film-making approach and the wartime atmosphere. Students of film comedy  understand how the &quot;traditional&quot; Stan &amp; Ollie would be  somewhat suppressed in that regard. However, it's very sad to watch a  decent premise with great performers go COMPLETELY to waste, as it does in  AAW - the presence of Edgar Kennedy should lift th proceedings; instead it  reinforces the melancholia. I found the drunken scene most distasteful.  Still, L &amp; H followers might want to place it somewhere on their video  carousel for an occasional peep into what could have been
And now you see how our state was suckered into the oil biz. I came upon this film while browsing my university library. My curiosity was picqued, since my home state is rarely discussed beyond such topics as drinking (Mardi Gras) and eating (Cajun food).This film reminds me of a line from an explanatory plaque in Jean Lafitte National Park. Looking out over a marsh (through which runs a large gas pipeline), the panel details all the restoration efforts sponsored by ExxonMobil, Shell-Texaco, et al., all of whom have refineries in or around the wetlands. If they're cleaning anything, it's their own mess. And what methods are they using? "Bio-restorative detonations," I believe, was the term used. Are those "life-giving bombs"?Back to the film, funded as propaganda by Standard Oil Co. when local sentiment was turning against the company. I'll pass over how many times the innocently befuddled Cajuns smile broadly at the blessed Oil Rig plopped in their marsh, and the way the young boy is given the Disney-nature-film treatment, as amusingly naive as Lobo the Wolf or Henry the Mountain Burro. No, just watch this film and catch a glimpse of the prosperity once promised to our humble state. And then visit the beautiful scenery of Norco, LA, in the middle of the famed Cancer Alley
I've been cheated by Amazon. It really sucks, tried to download but it's not able to be viewed in pc's outsided the united states. Crikey.I'll have to wait for reruns to watch it on the telly.Whatta shame amazon dot com. Let's send a CSI to yer headquarters
Pretty Woman Meets Toxic Tort. Even though I would agree that "Erin Brockovich" is an entertaining movie, Julia Roberts performance in it is no more Oscar-worthy than was her performance of a prostitute in "Pretty Woman."  I am second to no one in enjoying a good "David and Goliath" story, but this movie has such shaky roots in reality, it is more of a tall tale, than the "true" story of a historic class action suit that, I would imagine, left more unhappy plaintiffs, than it did satisfied ones.  However, as the movie title implies, this is indeed Erin Brockovich's story, in the same way that the "Xena" character is the main attraction in "Xena: Warrior Princess" (though it should be noted that Xena's wardrobe is considerably more modest than that of the Erin Brockovich character).Erin Brockovich is a vain, brassy, boorish, single mother of three young children, with no marketable work skills, a transparently opportunistic manner, who dresses very much the same way as the prostitute character Roberts played in "Pretty Woman" (prior to Richard Gere's character taking her on the infamous Rodeo Drive shopping spree).  The movie's beginning finds Erin unemployed and pursuing a personal injury lawsuit in connection with an automobile accident; her lawsuit is lost, primarily thanks to her own disastrous testimony (swearing, cursing and shrieking from the witness stand) while being questioned by opposing counsel.   Unbelievably, Erin parlays the failed lawsuit into a job at her attorney's (played by Albert Finney) firm, mainly by pushing her way into the office and ensconcing herself at a desk.   Later, while handling the paperwork for a run-of-the-mill, pro bono, real estate sale, Erin discovers the file contains the seller's medical records, that, for reasons she (correctly) does not understand, seem to be of particular interest to the buyer, the mega utility company, Pacific Gas and Electric.  Erin independently embarks on her own personal investigation of the case and discovers that PG&E had (for decades) negligently contaminated the ground water (surrounding one of their power plants in/near Hinkley, CA on the edge of the Mojave Desert) with toxic, hexavalent chromium.  This discovery leads to the queen mother of all class-action lawsuits (at least in terms of the award), in which hundreds of Hinkley residents sue PG&E (by and through the representation of Erin's boss) in a toxic tort action that eventually nets a 330 million dollar settlement for the plaintiffs.Roberts gives a photogenic, if not especially gifted, performance in her role as Erin. The movie contains a plethora of flattering shots of Roberts (literally gushing out skin-tight, low-cut, bustier-inspired "work clothes" that would never be permissible attire for any employee of a law firm on this planet) as she engages in warm and fuzzy discourses with the unsuspecting and unsophisticated Hinkley residents. While there is much to be said for Erin's apparent drive and tenacity as she pursues the plaintiffs in the suit, she is not an especially likeable character; rather, she is rude, verbally abusive and only conciliatory and kind when and if it serves her interests.Albert Finney is considerably more appealing and believable as Ed Masry, the aged and  weary attorney who is Erin's boss.  The bantering that occurs between the two is generally amusing; unfortunately thanks to the inept direction and camera work, the focus for these scenes seems to be more on Roberts (strutting about in short leather skirts and noisy, five-inched-heeled mules) than on the sometimes-interesting personality dynamics that seemingly exists between the two characters.  Aaron Eckhart plays the affable, gentle biker and next-door-neighbor, George, who becomes Erin's boyfriend-by-convenience.  The "convenience" factor is totally one-sided and for Erin's benefit exclusively; she  unabashedly uses George for free, live-in childcare, thereby giving her the necessary freedom to assist Masry as they put together the historic case.  Erin eventually winds up receiving a staggering two million dollar "bonus" check  (from Masry) when the tort action case settles; contrastingly, George gets a "thanks" for his nanny services from Erin and his walking papers.The plaintiffs in the case are an assortment of simple individuals with unpretentious outlooks on life, who have been dealt a dirty hand by the utility giant.  Though the Hinkley residents are sympathetically portrayed, make no mistake-this movie is about Erin Brockovich (indeed, I do not think there is a single scene in which the chacracter is not present) and less about the brave struggles with life-threatening, generation-spanning illnesses that the real-life plaintiffs were forced to face, due to the toxicity in their water source.  Erin Brockovich is presented to the viewing audience (in typical Hollywood fashion) as a sort of heroine; but in fairness it would seem more accurate to say that she was a woman who indiscriminately used people, walked on others when necessary and seized opportunity after opportunity until she eventually struck it lucky and got rich.  Is the movie entertaining-absolutely.   Inspiring- not even slightly.
Great movie released by wrong company. I have the VHS tape of this movie &amp; will continue to own it while this Goodtimes version of this great movie is on the shelf.  I have not watched this movie for the fact that Goodtimes will screw up a good movie with bad quality picture, sound, &amp; all around basics.  The movie itself is great to watch with Weller &amp; Elliott in the action scenes &amp; the story is just all in your face.  The only problem is this movie was not released by MCA Home Video, if it had been you would have a great movie on DVD instead of this blurred &amp; muffled sound version
Bad Device. I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service
I've been cheated by Amazon. It really sucks, tried to download but it's not able to be viewed in pc's outsided the united states. Crikey.I'll have to wait for reruns to watch it on the telly.Whatta shame amazon dot com. Let's send a CSI to yer headquarters
Watch "The Bird with the Crystal Plummage" GIALLO instead. I waited ages to get this Fulci classic and now I wished I did not. It is probably Fulci's most confusing work to date and lacks all known production standards considering this is film #33 from him. I can buy GIALLO being a bit spaced out and highly far-fetched, but this one is just plain bad from start to finish, it is only really remembered for the infamous woman chain whipping sequence (chain whipping also appeared in "The Beyond"; Fulci loved cashing in on all this stuff), "Don't Torture a Duckling" is completely void of substance, mystery or crime and instead is replaced by everything that is camp about film making, from the obvious papermashy heads to the "shall I stand here and act now" type blemish on everyone's face, considering this is Fulci's 33rd film or thereabouts, it really looks like his first and it would be another 8 years before he made horror, I was expecting a somewhat smart GIALLO and got drawn out rubbish instead. Like I said - Watch "The Bird with the Crystal Plummage" GIALLO instead. It was made by Argento two years before this and is where you should be at instead. I would recommend that Argento 'primative slasher' over Fulci's cash crop schlock "Don't Torture a Duckling" any day of the week
Looks like a routine television program. I am amazed and mystified that most of the reviewers herein found the movie to be excellent!! As for me, I made it about thirty minutes into the film before turning it off in dismay. The fault in order of importance: poor screenplay, poor cinematography and poor performance by Pacino, who seems to be vying for the most over-the-top performance. The film was absurd in many ways from the outset: the pans from star to star lasting just short of giving the viewer any purpose for any of the fast camera pans. Close-up after close-up conveying no meaning, Pacino overacting like Jack Palance in one of his not-so-famous European pieces of tripe from the sixties and seventies, an utterly dumb plot with Pacino and company proving at the beginning that they are bumbling cops.First example, they chase the bad guy to a cabin which is on stilts or something like that; then, instead of staying on the ground below and smoking the bad guy out or something at least tactically sound, they storm the stairs and Pacino stands right in front of the door yelling "Police, you're under arrest."They kick in the front door and find that the culprit has escaped through an underground water source. Of course, Pacino follows and dives right into the underwater stream, having absolutely no idea where the guy is or if there are boobytraps of some sort.Cut to Pacino running around in nearly zero visibility fog, glimpsing the guy for a second or two before losing him in the fog. Stumbling around further, Pacino is obviously disoriented until a shot is fired at him from, we must assume, his quarry. Did the screen writer forget that Pacino's colleagues are also supposedly chasing the culprit, too?Inevitably and apparently not, because Pacino spots a figure in the fog and plugs him. As I watched this scene unfold, I became thoroughly disheartened when it becomes clear what I knew already, that Pacino has fired on and killed his partner. It was then that I decided that I had had enough.By the way, the European version, with Stellan Skarsgaard is infinitely superior. Don't waste your money or on-line rental queue on this Hollywood drivel. Ditto for the other Pacino junk I rented at the same time, The Recruit, which I could only stand for about a half hour too
Beware of Unbox!!!. Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for
Beware of Unbox!!!. Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for
Good book...bad movie. I LOVED the book and made the mistake of buying the movie without watching it first. This movie is boring and did no justice to the book
Not Happy. I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?
Don't waste your time. It only requires 2 words to describe the movie. "ABSOLUTE CRAP"
Amateurish. They were making sophisticated, quality films by 1961. This isn't one of them
"slice of life"?. I've seen the phrase "slice of life" used many times to describe this movie, which makes me wonder - whose life is this a slice of? Certainly not mine, and not most people's. The Anniversary Party is a slice of the lives of a group of people who are extremely vain, self-absorbed, jaded and rich beyond most people's wildest fits of imagination. Worse, there isn't much of a hint that the filmmakers were aware that most people, or at least most people who are fun to be around, don't act the way these characters do.Good films can be made about Hollywood - in "Mulholland Drive" it's kind of a dream world, both in the sense that it's hazy and ambiguous and in the sense that one of its characters dreams of being a bigger part of it; in "State and Main," the self-absorption of many of the characters is offered for our amusement. "The Anniversary Party" is presented as if most viewers will be sympathetic with the characters, but I can't imagine them elicting much sympathy from anyone who isn't also a bored rich prick. If this is truly a "slice of life" for the Hollywood set, it is no wonder that so many films produced in Hollywood are so cynical and shallow.
Mindless entertainment with digital rites management (DRM) issues. We rented this movie "unboxed" but found it was not young teen friendly and decided to wait till the next evening when the kids were in bed to watch it.Unboxed rental warning!When they say that you have 24 hours to watch it they mean it. We had less then 10 mins of the movie remaining when the 24 hours ran out and it was deleted right out from under us.It really should let you finish a movie if it is actively playing
Beautiful Boy, Pretentious Director. This picture is a mess of misused metaphors and confused imagery from start to finish.  I was left scratching my head wondering who these people are and why they behave the way they do. Forgive me for expecting the film to provide any answers.   First the good news - if you like beautiful boys, Ricardo Meneses as the twisted Sergio is one of the most gorgeous creatures to ever stand naked before a lens.   Despite the hopelessly confusing script, his acting (such as it is) is amazing, especially if you take into account his age (18) and experience (his first film). It's too bad he had to be "discovered" by a director who thinks nothing of making his audience beg for each scrap of insight, and pretentiously expects the viewer to read their own interpretation into whatever nonsense he sees fit to set up as his next scene. I wanted to give it the benefit of a doubt, so after sitting through one screening of this erotically charged but confused tangle of a movie, I sat through it again, this time with the directors commentary on. Cheating, I know, but after shelling out all that money for the DVD I was hoping to gain some idea of what the hell was going on. I emerged from watching it the second time half in love with the beautiful young actor Ricardo Meneses, but with only a fraction of the respect I had for the director, Joao Pedro Rodrigues, after my first screening. And that wasn't much.Sergio is a garbage collector for the city of Lisbon. He works a graveyard shift with an assortment of other oddballs, and in between collecting garbage he has a series of sexual escapades that seem impossibly jaded for one so young. While other boys his age are swimming or surfing, he's dressing up in a full-body suit of latex, having anonymous sex in men's rooms (including the most explicit act of fellatio I have ever seen in a non-pornographic movie) and exploring S & M adventures with any willing male he can find. Just so you know how kinky he is, in one scene he masturbates in the shower while strangling himself with the shower-massage cord. You really have to wonder where all this imagination comes from, until you realize that the writer-director has been harboring some pretty extreme sexual fantasies about his friendly neighborhood garbage men. Sergio has a female co-worker who is in love with him, but she's busy having sex with the foreman, and Sergio's only interest in her is to tease her sexually and then play cruel jokes on her.  He finally meets a man who doesn't succumb to his charms, because he's obviously straight. This was not the first or last thing in this film I didn't get; when I was that age, and almost as pretty as Sergio, I understood that some guys just couldn't be had, so I shrugged my shoulders and moved on.  Not our Sergio.  He takes obsession to unheard of heights, especially for an 18 year old.  He stalks the young swimmer, goes through his garbage, and steals his torn old swimsuit. Of course unrequited sexual obsession in films is not exactly new - remember Reflections In A Golden Eye? In that film, made in 1967 and still considered by many critics to be one of the ten worst bombs ever made, the male object of Marlon Brando's desire was almost as pretty as Ricardo Meneses, but that film had the advantage of a script that was at least coherent at times.  In one of the first of many explicit sexual encounters in O Fantasma, Sergio, while walking his dog, comes upon a policeman handcuffed and gagged in the backseat of a patrol car.  He proceeds to masturbate the cop to orgasm, leaving him tied up in the car and then running off to work, where he spends the rest of the night sniffing his hand and licking the residue.  I was hoping that the director's commentary would maybe explain how and why the cop is tied up in his own squad car, but his sole comment on the soundtrack is, "You don't understand in the film why the cop is handcuffed". Excuse me, Mr. Rodrigues, but I didn't understand it in the audience, either.Sergio's only tender scenes are when he takes care of the dog, a mascot of the sanitation workers.  In one scene, Sergio is busy cleaning the dog dishes and doghouse with a hose, when he turns and sees the foreman standing in the door.  He pushes past, their faces register some indications of conflict, and then the foreman shuts the door. The director's commentary on this action is, "The door closes, and you know what will happen, but you don't see it".  Uh, no, I'm afraid the relationship between Sergio and foreman is the least developed of all the underdeveloped relationships in this film, so what will happen next is anybody's guess. Not that I really cared; Sergio is the only character in the script whose personality is even partially explored, and all we ever really learn about him is that he's sexually compulsive and kinky to the max.  The picture goes on endlessly, with Sergio refusing to let go of his obsession for the young surfer / swimmer, until he has the most excruciatingly slow breakdown ever recorded in a movie.  At the same time, what little there is of coherence also breaks down.  The director's commentary infuriated me even more when toward the end, after spending most of the commentary praising the cooperation, beauty, talent and maturity of his young lead actor, he proclaims, "It is cruel to say it, but he wants to continue acting, and I think he will not act again. I will not use him in my next film...it's like his body has been used up". I haven't had the benefit of seeing anything else by Mr. Rodrigues, but if given the choice of viewing Mr. Rodrigues' next film or Ricardo Meneses next appearance I think I'd opt for the beautiful boy any day. After botching the attempted kidnapping of his beloved obsession, Sergio takes off to spend the balance of the film wordlessly running. The final scenes treat us to a guided tour of the sights, sounds (and by way of commentary) smells of a garbage dump. As Sergio wanders through the dump clutching a live rabbit he finds among the garbage ("I saw the rabbits there" says the director on the commentary, "so it's believable") the director, grasping for a final metaphor, remarks "He is like a cross between a bug and an insect" a comment that seems to me to be a cross between the idiotic and the insipid. He then ends this drivel after the slowest twenty minutes of film I've ever sat through by more or less telling us he didn't really know how to end it - like I hadn't figured that out a full ten minutes before the end credits started running. As Sergio continues to stumble on into the dawn before the final fadeout, the director says, "I could bring him back to the city, but that would not make much sense". The idea of a scene that might not make much sense didn't prevent him from filming the other 90 minutes of this drek - I dare say he should have gone for it.
Where is the Disco song "I LOVE THE NIGHTLIFE"??????. Not The Original Film. Doesn't have the original disco scene with "I like the night life" song. THEY COMPLETELY RUINED THE MOVIE
A Very Late Review of Riverdance (the Show). I'm not the sort to give things a bad review because it is 'cool and trendy'.  Way too old for that.  But I have to say that I am glad I checked this video out at the rental store before buying.Really it's quite bad.  Not that the dancing isn't phenomenal (Michael rules!), but it lacks soul.  Hubby and I like Celtic music --old "Shepherd's Hey" fans-- and we get to see Celtic dancing locally (though amateur) and we both found this video disappointing.The principal problem is the 'homogenization' of the singing.  It is sort of Celtic music for elevators.  The second problem is the Flamenco dancer.  Having seen a top rank group from Spain at Wolftrap, I have to say that this lady has got no 'attitude' and the music.... please, don't get me started.Two Stars.  Could have used a plot.  Could have used some 'edge' to both the singing and dancing.  Lots of people adore this video but if you are a fan of traditional Irish dance and song, you might want to rent first
disney,  why are you editing & censoring?. the complaints about this dvd release are all correct. great movie, low qaulity release. yet i'm surprised no one has mentioned the thing that angered me most, the self censorship. the bataan race scene where ustinov swaps the bataan for a bottle of beer. we're ok to witness a pirate being drunk, but a sports commentator saying a teenager is running with a bottle of beer is beyond appropriate?  what are the execs at disney thinking? if they need to put out a disclaimer by leonard maltin befor showing such "questionable" material as they did with many of the vault collection... fine, but stop chopping up the movies. our ten year old children are not buying these movies, many of us were actually alive to see the originals and no we're being ripped off. stop angering a loyal fan base with this ignorance. keep this in mind when you contemplate the inevitable release of a cleaned up widescreen version of this title
Dont get "Fiji" final week ... Dont dwnld " Survivor, "Thunderstorms & Sacrifice" ". Its my fault for not reading the whole thing. you would think that the last episode would be the finale , but NO, its just a 10 minute recap going to the finale 4. I didnt even get a full 45 minute episode. No finale. I got rippped off. $1.99 dwnld not well spent. Dont bother dwnldng any episode of fiji if you dont know the ending. Because they dont have that episode, not even the reunion show
A BOMB of a flick except for a few good gore effects. This sequel to a horror classic started out ok, but by the middle, none of it mattered anymore, I even got a bit tired of the well done gore effects because I had to sit through scenes of a severed [...] and rat duking it out! The original "ReAnimator" is a great flick to see if you want excellent and original gore effects as well as a creepy storyline, but this sequel just stinks
the name says it all. this movie is one of the 3 ~worst~ movies I've ever seen.these 98 minutes seemed more like 6 hours.and for chrissake - he's NOT an american
O.K. As a die-hard fan of Lenny who was born after his death, I must warn those that in this he strictly just goes over his court problems and doesn't do routines or bits
Great for the Zen Vision. At first I didn't realize that you have to use Amazon's software to load onto the Zen.  Once I figured that out (actually my husband figured that out) the show played perfectly and it was very easy to do.  I wasn't able to edit the stars.  If I could I would give this 5 stars.  If you have tried some other sites for the Zen, they are much more difficult to use. Amazon's Unbox is great for the Zen
Seriously Stupid. I love 70's horror movies like the exorcist and The Changeling.  This movie is so stupid, I turned it off half way through.  It's poorly acted and not in the charming way that so many older movies are either.  I would suggest renting it before you buy.  I just don't know what other reviewers saw in this.
DON'T  BOTHER!!!. I got this DVD for $1.99 and I still feel ripped off.  The quality of the movie was terrible, the story line was stupid, and the acting was just fair.  Do not waste your time on this poor movie.  Even though there are some stars in it in their younger days (Eloitt Gould, Michelle Piefer, David Caruso), it does not make up for the poor content of the movie.  Cheaply made---DON'T BOTHER!!
Complete Fiction. While there has never been a completely factual account of the life of Wyatt Earp ("Tombstone" comes the closest), this film is completely fictional. First, Wyatt isn't even married in this version, and he becomes enamored with a woman named Clementine; thus the title. Doc Holliday was a dentist, but in this film, he is a surgeon who operates on a wounded bargirl he loves.As a piece of Western Fiction, this film would be alright, but since it was decided to use the names Wyatt Earp, Doc Holliday and the OK Corral, the entire project is distracting. The only accurate facts in this film, are that there was a Wyatt Earp, a Doc Holliday and an OK Corral. If it wasn't for the excellent performances of Henry Fonda, and especially, Walter Brennen, I would have given this film one star
Predictable movie, gorgeous Holt McCallany!. I love Holt McCallany, so anything he has done will naturally catch my attention. He is the lead in this movie, which is pleasant enough to watch, despite not being particularly extraordinary.The story is simple and a bit predictable, but the acting is decent and if you are a Holt McCallany fan like I am, you will love him in this one, especially the way he looks: absolutely sexy!
TRULY THE WORST GARBO FILM EVER... Pauvre Greta...She is radiant in this disaster of a film; primarily because her love interest is Ramon Navarro - a gay Spanish actor, playing a straight Russian prince. It is very sad, laughable casting - like a gay Ricky Ricardo pretending he is a...I can't think of a Russian, straight counterpart to Clark Gable.Garbo tries hard. Barrymore tries harder. Adrian tries the hardest. To no avail. AVOID this film at all cost. An interesting plot line, filmed with calamitous results
so many gaps in the story. This movie is the story of a gay Cuban writer who eventually makes it to the U.S. to escape the persecution he's suffered in Cuba. And that's about all that can be inferred from this movie. There are large chunks that are spoken in a different language. But there are no English subtitles so you have no idea at all what's going on. This disrupts the already choppy flow of the movie so that it has almost no cohesiveness at all. Whatever the message of this movie is, whatever it's trying to convey, it's lost in the plotless story
Is this really what most "normal people" call erotic?. This is one of the most boring films I ever watched. There is nothing erotic in it. The whole story is perverted with a poor, innocent but very stupid woman submitting to the sadist fantasies of various "lovers" she is introduced. I put inverted comas in lovers because none of them have a single tender erotic moment with her, but instead they brutally beat her and rape her in the presence of others, who seem to be totally oblivious to the proceedings
Mindless Black Revenge Drama, Boring. Racist cop John Shaft (again the over rated Sam Jackson) thinks that he can break all the rules and beat up innocent people, blow up the streets of New York and shoot anyone he wants to, well, this movie is a bit of something absurd. The direction is terrible, the action sequences are cliched and the "black brother" message doesn't really make sense because it falls flat by endorsing to kill all "honkeys". I would avoid this mess unless of course you are someone who feels that violence is necessary against innocent civilians.....
jazzman. A very deplorable, highly offensive, insensitive, profane,and depressing piece of garbage.  The dialogue is jaw-dropping embarrassing and so horrible, you want to coveryour ears. Also, very pretentious and unrealistic.  Justwhat kind of people enjoy watching crap like this?  TheONLY positive thing I ever got from this film was thesoundtrack by Gato Barbieri, the great jazz saxophonist.I wanted to smack the s*** out of that wimp French boy-friend of Schneider's. Brando's not much of a man in thiseither. An artsy-fartsy work for the New York/LA filmschool crowd, I suppose.  Give me "Cool Hand Luke", thankyou.
Wrong Pictures!. Why, oh why do you advertise the 1979 version of Crime & Punishment with John Hurt, using the pictures from the 2002 version starring the sublime John Simm. I would download the 2002 version all day, everyday but the misleading pictures are really unfair. Either offer me the version I want, or get the pictures right
a putrid stinker of a film. This has to be one of the worst movies I've ever wasted my time watching! Don't dispose a precious cent on this movie unless you are a gigantic Drew Barrymore fan and you are merely viewing the movie for the raw sex scenes and constant,random nudity. The storyline could have worked, yet the movie is pathetically low budget, the acting is horrid and the movie falls desperately flat. It is impossible to like this movie unless you are obsessively in love with Drew Barrymore and you want to watch her at her lowest point. It's so bad that I had to come here to  vent about it online. The director was obviously a film school drop-out who offered the actors free cocaine and produces low budget porn.
UnBox video not yet working. Will not play once video was downloaded. I get the error message:  "can not play file, please try again later. error# 0x80040273" I made the exlusive give me call me back feature but the UnBox department was already closed, I was told the UnBox Saturday and Sunday 6-5 hours. I have to say I am impressed with the Call back feature. I downloaded the Unbox Beta now and am recieving email assistance to try to resolve the problem. Thanks Amazon UnBox! I will Update again - Feb. 10,200
Shark(from some other footage) Attack. Shark Attack is an interesting tale of deceit and stolen shark footage.  The movie features some computer harpooning police men and a crazy fisherman turned taxi driver.  The most interesting part is all the shark footage...  The best scene is after the bad guy/hotel owner is eaten, the shark clearly shown with a hook in it's mouth being pulled towards a boat.  This of course has nothing at all to do with the plot.  So where did this hook come from?  It was probably I was trying to stab in my eyes to stop the pain of this movie
Shark(from some other footage) Attack. Shark Attack is an interesting tale of deceit and stolen shark footage.  The movie features some computer harpooning police men and a crazy fisherman turned taxi driver.  The most interesting part is all the shark footage...  The best scene is after the bad guy/hotel owner is eaten, the shark clearly shown with a hook in it's mouth being pulled towards a boat.  This of course has nothing at all to do with the plot.  So where did this hook come from?  It was probably I was trying to stab in my eyes to stop the pain of this movie
WEAK PULSE. In spite of its intriguing premise, PULSE ultimately falls flat due to its slow pace and mediocre performances.  The story focuses on a mysterious lightning storm that somehow converts electrical energy into a self-serving, intelligent killer.  A little boy (Joey Lawrence) is visiting his father and new bride in California and he is convinced there are voices in the electricity.  Cliff DeYoung is lifeless in his role as dad; Roxanne Hart brings some conviction to her role as the new wife.  We're never really sure just what is going on and how electrical energy can also manage to lock doors, including a shower door and all the terror elements are so underplayed, they're never really all that threatening.
Forgettable Western!. This film has some good actors in it but the plot is pretty shaky and hard to follow at times.  It is not comparable to other great Westerns made during the sixties.  Eli Wallach is good but confusing--who and what is he after?   The color is good and it sounds like a Sergo Leone picure but it isn't.  What a shame!!!  It could have been made better--less comedy and more plot and of course --action and suspense!!!!  Buy or rent on your own if you dare----I wouldn't
"Why come you don't have a tattoo?. IdiocracyIt's fair to compare Mike Judge's Office Space to his latest film, Idiocracy, because both movies approach their subjects from a position of satire.  I argue that Office Space is far more successful due to a smarter script, a great cast, excellent soundtrack, and sympathetic characters.  While Office Space tells an intelligent and funny tale, Idiocracy is a morality comedy with one running joke - the world is getting dumber.  It's a boring, tired joke that doesn't get any funnier the more Judge tells it.  In the end, Idiocracy is professional wrestling for people with master's degrees.Before listing grievances, I should write that I generally agree with Judge's assessment of the United States and the world at large.  Instead of being used wisely to advance humanity, media has been engaged as a weapon to wage war against ideas and experimentation, and used to promote emotional conservation of the status quo.  Unthinking idiots who gather around the idiot box every evening are complicit in this downward spiral.I will also admit that I liked Judge's assertion that the average person today can make a difference, but that one must take a risk and lead.  The world, left to the idiots, will inevitably become worse.Finally, the movie has helped me to decide to cancel my cable television subscription tomorrow.  The only new shows I watch anymore are The Daily Show and The Colbert Report.  I don't watch all of the good and rare movies that air every night on TMC.  I watch re-runs of cartoon shows that I have seen a million times.  I don't read books often enough.  Instead, I spend too many nights watching terrible documentaries on the prison system.  I cannot continue this mindless existence.  I also cannot credit Idiocracy with all of my motivation to leave mainstream media - I've known that something had to change for a while now - but the movie made what I already knew more urgent, demanding immediate changes.You might wonder why I gave the film a low score if I found that it positively affected my life.  First and foremost, the movie is dumb and doesn't trust the viewer to "get it" without overwhelmingly heavy-handed sight gags and so-called dialogue.  This is utterly ironic, because the film is trying to teach the viewer to look more critically at the world, to question why intelligence, challenges, and knowledge are being shunted in favor of the cheapest, most melodramatic, and instant of gratifications.The most complete irony, however, is that the film does to its audience what it claims contemporary culture does to us now: It appeals to our emotions instead of our minds.  There's nothing intellectually engaging or thought-provoking about this film.  The movie consists entirely of fears you have already considered, and so the film's only function is to reinforce biases.Perhaps Judge is playing a joke on those who think this film is profound.  It wouldn't be the first time.  Beavis and Butthead ridiculed its audience WHILE they were watching it.  It was brilliant.  I have a feeling, though, that Judge simply misfired with Idiocracy
Worst movie I have ever seen. If it were possible to give this movie zero stars, i would have. Although it may have won an Academy Award and been considered great in it's day, it is now outdated and boring. Unless scenes of teenagers trying to have sex with anyone are interesting to you, then maybe you will find it interesting. When i say anyone, i do mean anyone. The main chracter, Sonny, who is a teenager sleeps with Ruth, wife of his footbal coach and the young girl, Jacy, sleeps with her mother's lover on a pool table. The film also attempts to bring up homosexuality but keeps it muted. You would think a movie called "The Last Picture Show" would be more about a picture show but it really has very little to do with the movie. There is some nudity which was huge for the time of it's release since it was practically unheard of. The film is also completely in black and white which was a choice of the director so the film could give a better feel of the time period, 1950's. This movie also gives a bad impression of those who live in the country, making them look like they are so bored of their desolate surroundings that they must seek sex with anyone who is willing. If this movie would have been made in present day, it would be your typical porn movie but since none of the sex scenes are actually shown they just show the faces and i guess that is what it allows it to be called an "award winning movie" and not a porn. Also if you think the movie was bad, try reading the book it was based off of, much worse
Insert pun with word "con" here... "Con Express" has lots of action in it, which is great because this hides the poor writing and uninteresting characters. Unfortunately, the action isn't enough, and in between stunt pieces and shoot-outs, the audience is tempted to doze off. City Heat Productions isn't really known for producing films of the highest quality, so usually I go easy on them. If this were a big-budget company producing this, I'd be inclined to pan it entirely. But I wasn't expecting much and got a little more than I bargained for. The action is, for the most part, pretty good but nothing competitive with your usual dumb action movie. Flanery and Vosloo are perfectly casted, but everyone else seems to stiff to add any more flow to the movie. Vosloo especially appears to be enjoying himself as an over-the-top bad guy hijacking a train containing deadly chemicals. The film moves fast and contains shades of better movies like Under Siege 2, Con Air, Spy Game, and Speed. If you liked those, you probably won't mind this one too much. Just go easy on it
Not good enough... This had so much more potential but bad writing and animation made it seem like a drag...just watch a rerun of the show instead of getting this.
The Firm. Great movie but CD not perfoming in the last few scenes.  It gets stuck or restarts itself.  Very frustrating and more frustrating to have to return new CD
attack of the (totally fake and unconvincing) sharks. how many modern day jaws rip-offs do there need to be. Well! Okay this film i would rank lower than 2 stars if it wasn't for the fat that i liked sharks and i want to be a marine biologist. The other reason was i think Casper Van Dien is good actor with a good career ahead of him. But this movie stunk. In no ways does it compare to jaws nor even Deep Blue Sea. I hated almost every moment of it. If you want to see a good shark movie rent or buy Deep Blue Sea. Or better yet just stick to jaws its still the best after all these years. Don't be fooled this is a waste of time and effort. This film needs some coupe de grace some spice but it gets none. ...
Like All Gossip: A Lot of Talk About Nothing!. A very boring and stupid film about college freshmen with a kindergarten maturity level. The movie is horribly slow to get to the point and is riddled with nonsense dialogue: I've heard better lines in 'Fast Times At Richmond High' thank you.Altogether a very forgettable film that has a lot of talk about nothing. Don't believe the great reviews about this film: the film might appeal to the 14-17 year-old crowds fantasizing about how 'cool' college life might be with all the 'cool' people and 'parties.' If you're not in that category, skip this boring film and save both your time and your money.
Beware of Unbox!!!. Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for
Where is the salsa?!?!?. So I bought this movie because some of the reviews said that the acting was terrible but the dancing was amazing.Well, anyone who thinks that the salsa dancing in this movie is amazing, awesome, good, or ok, has never actually SEEN salsa dancing!!I am a salsa dancer, and this movie was HORRIBLE!!!  I have seen amazing dancing, and good dancing.  This was TERRIBLE dancing!  And there was hardly any salsa!It was 80s dancing to salsa music!  That's IT.  The only time there was actually salsa dancing was when the main character was training with the club owner.  Other than that, it was just 80s dancing to salsa music.  That's it.If you want to see salsa dancing, I DEFINITELY DO NOT recommend this movie.If you want to see horrible acting, and old 80s dancing, then I recommend this movie...There was only one thing that I liked about this movie.  The appearances made by Tito Puente and Celia Cruz.  That was great to see, but not worth buying the movie for....Oh, and the story line?  What was it again????Yeah...I love movies, good ones and bad ones.But this one???  The WORST movie I have seen so far...To the best of my knowledge, there aren't actually any movies with really good salsa dancing.Hopefully, someday, there will be
Cant watch. I downloaded this program and it was garbled and video as if played in slow motion.  This is the first of two downloads that didn't play.  I know it was not my computer because I did download three that played ok
Horrible. I bought this as a gift for my nephew because I loved the book as a chid and vaguely remembered a wonderful treehouse in the movie.  I'm very glad I screened it first.  The female characters are practically subhuman in intelligence and the story presentation is slow, boring, and illogical.  I'm not very PC with old movies, but the sexism and animal abuse in this movie are way past my limits.  Choose one of the other Disney re-releases instead.  There are plenty of good ones to choose over this dog
Bad Device. I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service
Bad Device. I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service
gobbledygook & self-righteousness & pretentious twaddle make for a terrible movie. there is a certain new-fangled school of screenwriting that thinks that if you put a bunch of characters on screen and have them make no sense of one another but sound as if theyre being profound, then they ARE. the prime example of this in recent years is the abominable "crash", but at least that was (somewhat) assuaged by strong performances. this -- arguably the worst "mainstream" motion picture of 2005 -- is redeemed by nothing. an excruciatingly long 2 hours, and as much as i (usually) enjoy george clooney, i might never forgive him for this drek
Total Garbage. This pile of steaming crap is one of those message movies that comes across as pretentious, self-righteous nonsense.  There is a big difference between the quality of a movie and the message that it attempts to convey.  Powder may be trying to convey a lofty message, but I assure you that the presentation is laughable and just plain stupid.The only people that could possibly take this dog excrement seriously are those individuals that like to sit around and brood that nobody understands them.  A terrible, terrible, terrible movie
Classic French New Wave Film, Bad for General Audiences. I watched this film as part of my history studies in Post-War Europe and before everyone docks me because I gave it two stars, hear me out.  I'm no Godard fan so I may not be able to appreciate this film as a fan of The New Wave might.  I'm just your regular Joe Movie-Watcher.Masculin Feminin is about Paul, a 21-year-old French citizen that just retired from his 16 months in the Army.  Paul is a believer in Marxism and throughout the film promotes the Worker's Party while denouncing US involvement in Vietnam, the Du Gaulle government and most forms of Westernism such as condoms, psychadelic rock (many songs in Masculin Feminin have a style similar to The Kinks, Jefferson Airplane etc) and even Coca-Cola... yet Paul is often seen playing pinball and that mini-bowling game you see at an arcade.  Paul seems to be the pro-French identity kind of guy as he often eats cheese and drinks wine.  The preserver of the romanticized French culture.However, Paul's friends and interviewees (Paul works for the IFOP, the major French polling agency at the time) seem to not care about the change towards a quasi-American consumer state.  Paul's girlfriend Madelein is a rising pop-singer, her room mates are materialistic consumers, one who owns a car, and the people Paul interviews seem to only care about themselves.  This is very accurate in terms of how the 'baby-boom' generation of French youth began to rebel against the traditionalist governments in Europe.  Like the teens in the 1950s in the US, the teens began to form their own demographic.However, this is where my fascination ends.  Godard apparently never heard of music editing and film editing.  In many parts in the movie, Godard fixed the camera on one person's face in a portrait shot and kept it there for minutes at a time even though the scene was a 15-minute back and forth conversation.  The volume in the music went from very high to very low instantly in many parts during dialogue, making it very annoying if almost distracting to the audience.In a few parts when Paul was whistling, the recording of the whistling obviously overloaded the sound buffer as I heard static in the speakers.  I thought this was a volume problem on my end so I turned it down, nope... it was the sound editing.  This is just poor recording and editing.  Furthermore, the sound editors had this fascination with using the same gun-noise sound (which sounded more like a cartoon car noise) over and over and over again and in very unlikely times.Other times, ambiant noises would drown out the dialogue such as vehicles from outside a cafe or even drinking noises.  Sometimes the sound didn't kick in for up to five seconds into the scene.Because this is a French New Wave film, I won't attack how there is virtually no plot and has random scenes that are just plain silly.  However, I strongly recomend not getting this film if you're just in the general audience and not a New Wave fan.  Otherwise, you might like this New Wave classic but I'm no expert on the subject.  I was just extremely disapointed with the lazy filming, recording and editing.
Hollow. Terrible.  One Good Line Quoted Here. The characters are not appealing and the story is not interesting. An effort to watch. Make-up, dyed hair, costumes poorly done. One man's eyebrows, the suitor's, are altered like a woman's! No scenery or homes of interest, except a glance at the sailing ships in the harbor. Not a pleasant pace, without humor, without intrigue. A lesbian undertone in one scene.The only positive thing I can think of is this good line of Jane Austen, quoted. Fanny sums up in one sentence, why she will not marry him. Women who have spent hours within romance in uncertainty, will wish to sum up their certainty with Ms. Austen's line: "His sole interest is in being loved, not in loving". This line is an exception to a lifeless script.There, now you do not need to endure the painful movie. Here are two lines re-written by me: For the woman dealing with a trifling man: "No man suffers pains of love on the stage." For dealing with the infatuated man: "You have wounded yourself, but not with love."This movie should be re-made by someone sharing the ideals of Jane Austen. There is plenty to be mined from the novel to create a pleasant film, humorous, with singing, with interest. A movie can take the best of the book, in the spirit of the book, which this movie did not carry, and make a movie better than the book. This movie is bad any which way.Well-made period romance films are: "Pride & Prejudice 2005, 1996, & 1940", "Wives & Daughters", "North & South". Fairly made is "Under the Greenwood Tree". I rated "Persuasion" at 2-stars for the wooden acting; however "Persuasion" is 5-stars compared to this "Mansfield Park". "Persuasion" has attractive scenery, costumes, beautiful singing, and an uplifting plot; though of interest only to women, preferably who have already read the book.
Horrible. Hard as it is to do, this film manages to make Jet Li look very, very bad. I kept having Karate Kid flashbacks! The story is the same old, same old, American martial arts move cliches, fighting for honor and all...in a place that is obviously NOT Los Angeles. The real disappointment is that the martial artists( in come cases obviously just local students for God sake!) are sub par and the choreography suffers for it. The action sequences are slow and awkward. Pass on this one guys
senseless and absurd. sorry, can't finish this garbage movie. is this girl retarded  or what? watching her father been killed in cold blood and got no feeling or emotion at all. how and why the garbage collecting, turned cow feeder young guy, would then have turned into a cold blood stone cold killer? there's no enough logic and explanation why he would have turned into a psychopath. the girl didn't look a bit retarded but acted and behaved like one is also a not quite well developed character. the whole movie just looked too deadbeat and senseless. what? life was too boring then what? started becoming natural born killer? give me a break. bone chilling? you can always say that again, but won't make me care a bit more.
Really dumb Disney flick!. They chosen Robin Williams to be in a Disney movie and this movie turned out to be very corny. Special effects are dull though. If I were a kid I would probably like this movie but now that I'm 15 I think it's stupid. I think I saw it in theater when I was 8 and I don't remember much of it but I think it's not in stores anymore out to buy because people don't really care much about this movie anymore. I don't care about it either. I'm glad this movie is out of stock and it should be. It is very boring!
Missing episodes. This series is being sold with missing episodes, like many others here in Unbox. Do they think their customers are so dumb? Would you buy a DVD series with a missing DVD? What sense does this make? What a disappointment this service is..
tobe hooper's HUGE MISFIRE after "chainsaw" and "salam's lot". when given good stories tobe hooper can be a good director.to bad this one isn't a very good story.this mess came out at the heigth of the "slasher" movie frenzy. but not wanting to be just a slasher movie they try to give us a monster also. the theme of 4 kids who,now hold on here,think it would be fun to spend the night in the funhouse at a traveling carnival. before you can say "please kill me" the "thing" is picking them off one by one. with only 4 teens in the funhouse you would think maybe some fleshing out of the teens would happen, but no, they just go for the tease scares and even at 90 mins. this bore last to long
My advice, watch 'Get Shorty' instead. The problem with this film is I read the book.  I was disappointed simply because `Be Cool' is an obvious showcase for the musical talent.  The overly long dance sequence with John Travolta and Uma Thurman is a prime example.  Somewhere the bulk of the story was lost--and there are some very--very good characters appearing in the film that would've been more intersing if somebody would've said, "HEY, don't forget the book!"  But being true to the original source is not Hollywood's strong suit.  "Be Cool" provides some popular music, some known faces, but without John Travolta, the movie would never have been made.A few laughs are provided.  A couple ironic scenes show up, but there's too little to sustain a full-length feature.  Basically, the project is a disservice to everyone involved.  Some of the characters are so thin--face it--poor Christina Milian as Linda Moon, is reduced to being a voice that sways when she sings--a clich.  The Rock does the best he can but again, `He's a gay bodyguard;' he's the  brunt of insulting jokes offered up by a Raji, his boss [Vince Vaughn], who, in the book, is far more sinister--but in the film he's an idiot.Of course Chili is Chili. Travolta does a very nice job, and Chili's obviously the smartest guy in the room.  Uma Thruman's performance is, well, not funny--not serious, not intense--not much-- at best, she made me shrug.  I do like what Harvey Keitel did with Nick Carr, but there's just not enough, and all the negatives reflect completely on the director.  Enough said there.My advice, watch `Get Shorty'again, or read `Be Cool.'
So glad it was FREE!. I rented this movie because I registered my TIVO with Amazon and got the $15 credit.  I thought it might be a good opportunity to see some movies I wouldn't normally rent.  I watched the trailer on this, thought it looked like it might be amusing, and downloaded it.  Unfortunately, the only funny scene in the movie was in the trailer and I ended up falling asleep the first 30 minutes into it.  After I woke up, I thought maybe I hadn't given it a fair shot and went back to try it again.  I was right to fall asleep the first time through.  I don't usually rate movies - or anything for that matter, but felt compelled to share my opinion with anyone who was seriously considering spending money on this one.  Spend that $3.99 on a burger, or a good book...anything else but this
You Never Know Who They Really Are...But You Do... 'Clownhouse' is mainly associated with a sex scandal involving the director and the youngest boy actor. While hearing of Salva's conviction when 'Jeepers Creepers' came out, I never knew it had anything to do with this movie, nor had I ever heard of this in the first place. I actually stumbled upon this looking to see if there was a horror movie involving clowns besides 'It', and came across this weird little 'Halloween'-like suspense tale. While the sex scandal never once popped into my head (except when there was a pointless and gratuitous butt shot of the kid), I still didn't care for this too much, despite its pluses.Like 'Halloween', this film relies on suspense rather than gore to creep people out, but sadly, it didn't really get to me. If I was about 9 or so, this would've scared the hell out of me. I'm not saying I hated this; it was all right and had some geniune chills and some fantastic images, but because you see who the clowns are before they find the house and start terrorizing the children, it lost some effect for me. I would have liked it better if I had no idea what was going on, and it would've been a creepier experience.Horror movie fans should like this, even though I personally thought it would be better. The atmosphere is very, very creepy, and the clowns are actually pretty terrifying in their own way, but it just didn't do it for me. Rent it first
Poor support. This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet
I've been cheated by Amazon. It really sucks, tried to download but it's not able to be viewed in pc's outsided the united states. Crikey.I'll have to wait for reruns to watch it on the telly.Whatta shame amazon dot com. Let's send a CSI to yer headquarters
Why the Charge. Curious as to why Amazon would charge for this content when CBS offers it for free on the official Survivor Website.  Yeah, at the CBS site you have sit through 4 commercials, but it is worth it to not have to download any extra programs
Good for a frisbee. Don't waste your time with this, folks. This movie is BAD BAD BAD! Horrible acting, stupid story (Prince directed it himself, hey, he can't be good at everything) and outrageously ridiculous dialogue. But a few of the songs aren't bad (Mountains, Girls and Boys, Sometimes it Snows in April) and that's why I'm even giving it ONE star. This is a really dumb tale about Prince and Morris Day's valet Jerome Benton going to France where the former is a gigolo who falls in love. The one thing good I can say about this slop for the hogs is that it's better than the laxative-on-film "Graffiti Bridge."But if you want a very expensive frisbee or if you need a target for skeet-shooting, then go for it
Poor Quality. I'm not going to waste a bunch of my time or yours giving a personally oppinionated review of the movie plot. It's redundant and unnecessary, and whether someone likes the story or not is irrelavent. Only you can form an opinion of whether you like it or not by watching it yourself. Double that with the fact that most movies hardly ever line up with the book that's based on and well...My gripe is the transition from putting the movie in it's original format onto DVD was bad. The soundtrack is about 1/2 to 1 second off from the video part of film, therefore the voices don't sync up with the lip movement.
Didn't work. I downloaded the player and this episode as part of a promotion that gave a free episode. Not only did I get charged, but when I cancelled the download to contact about the charge - I was told I had to finish downloading before they could refund. Once it finished downloading, it didn't play anyway. I gave up.
Punisher and Friends. I feel they should have called this movie "Punisher and Friends". Yes, I loved how they had the punisher move into his new apartment and make friends with his quirky and lovable neighbors. He even joined them for dinner, but still remembered to keep a frown on his face(he's still hell bent on vengeance you see). It was also great how the villains were able to do battle with him by simply driving to his apartment, how convenient. But what truly made this movie legend was the deeply moving dramatic performances of Rebecca Romijn, especially that scene where she is attempting to portray an actress crying near the end of the movie. I love when I feel embarrassed for an actor when they are attempting to perform. And the Popsicle torture gag was simply delightful (wink,wink,nudge,nudge). You silly punisher, even though your life has been senselessly destroyed you still know how to play a good practical joke. I was so excited to see this movie, but I was simply orgasmic when I realized how much they had watered the story down and turned it into Punisher Lite
And now you see how our state was suckered into the oil biz. I came upon this film while browsing my university library. My curiosity was picqued, since my home state is rarely discussed beyond such topics as drinking (Mardi Gras) and eating (Cajun food).This film reminds me of a line from an explanatory plaque in Jean Lafitte National Park. Looking out over a marsh (through which runs a large gas pipeline), the panel details all the restoration efforts sponsored by ExxonMobil, Shell-Texaco, et al., all of whom have refineries in or around the wetlands. If they're cleaning anything, it's their own mess. And what methods are they using? "Bio-restorative detonations," I believe, was the term used. Are those "life-giving bombs"?Back to the film, funded as propaganda by Standard Oil Co. when local sentiment was turning against the company. I'll pass over how many times the innocently befuddled Cajuns smile broadly at the blessed Oil Rig plopped in their marsh, and the way the young boy is given the Disney-nature-film treatment, as amusingly naive as Lobo the Wolf or Henry the Mountain Burro. No, just watch this film and catch a glimpse of the prosperity once promised to our humble state. And then visit the beautiful scenery of Norco, LA, in the middle of the famed Cancer Alley
CAN'T RATE WHAT I CAN'T SEE!!. Brannagh's film version of Hamlet blows away every other version, as well as every other Shakespeare based film. It's an easy 5 stars.Now the DVD is a different matter.  Been hearing about and waiting for this for ages! Every lame-oh shlock film holywood cranks out shows up on DVD and usually big projects like this are milked for every $ they can get with fancy packaging and special editions.I was part of the project through which a small determined group of fans was able to bring the one season wonder "My So-Called Life" to DVD and there must be close to as large an audience for this.WHERE IS IT
will carrie wind up with zhivago or stalin?  oops, i must be mixing up my stories ... an insufferable view of life among a claque of ruskie girlfriends from the late 50s to the late 70s. nothing more than "sex & the city" transplanted to moscow in the khruschev and brezhnev eras -- if thats your cup of borscht, more power to you
Not Happy. I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?
waste of money. Dont purchase episode 5 of season 2, it's 7 minutes long and you dont get any of the Charlie Murphy Prince story.  WTF!!!  Can someone fix this and refund or offer the entire episode for re-download!!!
Drag On Inn!. The description of this dvd led me to expect a movie like "Musa" or "Warriors of Heaven and Earth"--I'd have even been happy with a movie comparable to "Crouching Tiger"--this movie isn't up to the standards of any of these movies though.  More of a farce than anything close to an "adventure"-the scenery is wasted with a lame plot that drags on and makes the movie seem about twice as long as it really is.  Perhaps if my own expectations had been lower--I wouldn't be so harsh on this movie--but compared to "Musa" or "Warriors of Heaven and Earth"--it's defintely sub standard. Different strokes--as they say--perhaps you'll enjoy this movie--I didn't!
Ed Wood eat your heart out. I love movies. I hate this one.Every melodramatic gimmick known to 1970s TV movies is packed in tight.My favorite one is when one of the kids gets free long enough to pick up the gun, but is just too emotional to shoot his captor. The captor is yelling "Shoot me! Come on!" But he just can't. He's too busy hamming up the whimpering. Like the damsel running from the slow-moving monster and then she breaks a heel. Wouldn't ya know!If you liked Mickey Rourke in "Diner" I suggest you don't spoil it for yourself
floozy & boozy jessica gets her golden boy. jessica lange won an oscar for this, proof positive that some years are so bereft of strong performances, they HAVE to give it to somebody. apart from that, this is a silly exercise in anti-government paranoia, with a wasted tommy lee jones and not much else.
Same Thing. The Dane Cook episode is the same one that it on his "Harmful If Swallowed" c.d. The c.d. also has the uncensored version of this routine that is over 1 hour long. The one star rating is not based on the content. It is based upon Amazon not sharing this fact with customers
GACCCCCCCCCCCCCK. Terrible movie, bottom lineI guess this 'could' be enjoyable for kids but anyone that was a fan of the Street Fighter video games will be revolted at this hideous piece of work.  I watched this with friends when we had a 'Bad Movie Night' and I suppose it has SOME merit when used for that purpose, but it was so poor I don't know if I could even watch it again for that reason.* NOT RECOMMENDE
Not worth $107. I purchased my version of El Hazard from a zShop for 19 bucks and I am SO glad that I did.That said, the first series is worth watching for two main reasons: overt lesbianism and Jinnai. The former is self-explanatory while the latter (Jinnai) is without a doubt the best character in the series (despite the fact that he is the antagonist). You can't say that any of the characters are very deep or well developed, but throughout the first series Jennai is by far the most satisfyingly fleshed-out character, as well as the most ammusing and true to his nature. This superiority is all the more appearant when he is contrasted with story's main character who is shallowly developed and in no way engaging.And this is what makes the second series (all four dismal episodes) so tragic: they nerfed Jinnai. He could never have been called a genius in the first series, but he was decidedly intelligent, cool, pragmatic, supremely self-confident and an effective leader (even though he was also manic and delusional). In El Hazard II, as if in response to the world recoiling at the sight of a humorous though competent villain, they have turned Jinnai into a slapstick-idiot persuing his increasingly nebulous ambition with foolish abandon.I suggest purchasing El Hazard through...alternate means,... watching the first series and discarding the second. Let's face it: even lesbian humor gets old when the writing sucks and the characters are empty
This is Horrible. I love the Avatar and I was so thrilled that amazon allows people to download it except the only problem is I've been trying for the past days and darn it all, it's not working!!! It's not as if I'm downloading it for free. I am willing to pay and yet it just wouldn't go through!!! I think it's better to just buy the dvds...I think it's absolutely horrible to tease customers like that..
What about the missing episodes. Why should one buy this series? What about the missing episodes? Are they going to be added later, or this is it? I cannot believe this. Would you buy a bicycle with a missing wheel? Or a keyboard without the C and R keys? I'd like Amazon to explain its customers what it plans to do..
Just Say No. This movie is no "Heathers."  It's not even "Mean Girls."  As hard as it tried to be witty, shocking, dark, and satirical, it just made me want to bang my head against a wall to make the pain of watching it stop.  Maybe I'm just too old for this drivel -- although I could watch "Clueless" and "The Craft" until my DVD player breaks -- but whatever entertainment value this movie was trying to push, I just didn't get it.  The movie wasn't funny (which is sad to say when one of my favorite comedic actresses, Carol Kane, couldn't even elicit a smile out of me), the plot was full of holes, and the writing seemed very rushed and contrived.  I wasn't expecting greatness when I watched Jawbreakers, but I was at least hoping for 1 1/2 hours of mindless entertainment.  Unfortunately, the "entertainment" piece was dropped and I was just left with "mindless.
HORRIBLE!. i went to see this movie when it first came out, and i nearly fell asleep watching it. THIS MOVIE IS NOT WORTH WATCHING. it's so fake, & it's easy to tell whats going to happen next
This movie is a clunker. Wasted talent.  None of the characters are believable in the roles they are portraying.  Some funny stuff.  Craig Ferguson can do better.  Charlotte Church should stick to singing as acting is not her forte.  Every thing in this movie seems forced and there is no chemistry between the characters
Poorly done mocumentary. 24-Hour Party People is a mocumentary at the lowest rung (if Best In Show was not enough) that tries at many times to be funny but is mostly in poor taste. The British scene in the 1980's was influential and at the height of the 2nd Brit wave, and Michael Winterbottom could have exposed the goings-on in a much better way.My main issue with this film was it's attempts at being funny in a hip-Britster fashion that falls flat constantly since the issues occurring are very serious. The dialogue is difficult to follow especially since most of it is meaningless anyway, and the film never really follows it's premise as much as it should: the rise of Factory. I did really enjoy the Joy Division segments, though, even if exploiting Ian Curtis's death was slightly in poor taste.Unless you're a fan of the Brit explosion of the post-punk era, and an extreme fan at that, I could not recommend this film. It's not even greatly educational for music lovers and at times very difficult to get into.
coming clean. Playboy asks why this movie hasn't become a cult classic.  I'll tell you.First of all, the painting on the cover does not look like the actual woman in the film.  One or two of the reviewers liked the way she looks.  Okay, to each his own, but don't be surprised if you find her unattractive.Second, the nudity.  No, she is NOT nude all the time.  Nor half the time.  Nor a fourth of the time.  Nor...  She's nude a few seconds now and then.  No more than any other movie.Third, the movie is only 79 minutes, and the first four of them are skippable.The movie is mostly a man fighting with a Neanderthal survivor.  Both behave more childishly than primitively.  You'll see more convincing behavior in Clan of the Cave Bear.There are NO explicit sex scenes.  Also, no effective sex scenes of any kind.  Even the fight scenes are disappointing.Oh, and did I mention that the dialogue is a joke?Bottom line: for almost every viewer, this movie will not be worth watching even once.
Chaplin Classic Deserves a Better DVD. Warner must have fell asleep at the wheel with its DVD reissue of Charlie Chaplin's "Monsieur Verdoux." The "remastered" print is dark, murky and virtually unwatchable. In fact, it's a strain on the eyes! The additional star is given only for the extras -- especially the excellent "Chaplin Today" documentary. This DVD should be taken off the market until Warner gets its act together.
Warning Incomplete Episode!!!. The episodes in this series have an average running time of 50 minutes. This one happens to be only 18 minutes. This mean sthat the file abruptly stops right in the middle. Even though it only cost me $2 I still got jipped.  Let's hope Amazon can iron out these kinds of problems before they get this service farther underway. Be careful enough to sheck the running times to be sure they seem accurate before you buy them
No good scenes in the whole movie. This movie doesn't have a single scene worth watching. Femalien 1 is in another league, don't waste your time on the sequel
Becomes Old Very Fast!. The first five minutes of the dvd was interesting; however, after that I found that I was forcing myself to watch it without a great deal of enjoyment
chopped and ruined. anyone who thinks this is a good transfer must be daft.  in addition as was mentioned earlier 11 minutes have been cut and as i remember the film they were some of the "best" scenes if you get my drift.  if you want to see the original film this is not it.  avoid at all costs
For song & dance fans only. "The Band Wagon" is one of the NY Times' "1000 Best Films Ever Made," and I've seen about 300 of them.  You may be a big fan of the traditional Hollywood musical, and if so, this is your kind of film.  Personally the list of such films I've enjoyed is quite short, and it doesn't include "The Band Wagon."  This makes me sad, having just enjoyed Fred & Ginger's 1936 classic "Swing Time" from the NY Times list.  However, where that film and Gene Kelly's "Singin' In the Rain" excel by sparkling between the song & dance numbers, "The Band Wagon" lags.  It's a shame, because there are a couple of brilliant moments here, the sparkling "Shoe Shine" dance on a set representing 42nd Street and a lovely number with Cyd Charisse to "Dancing In the Dark."  Other than that, and other than Jack Buchanan's comical turn as a Master Thespian, the whole thing just leaves me flat, especially the blah romance and idiotically cornball ending.  Give me "Fiddler On the Roof" or those named above any day over this
If You're a School Teacher and Thinking About Using This Film in Your Class, Please Read This First. Whether William Golding deserved Nobel Prize or not is still a debatable point, but it is true that he wrote one marvelous book, and its name is `Lord of the Flies.' But let's not talk about the differences between the book and the film for a while - because after all no one I am afraid can bring the multi-layered world of words onto the screen. Even those who loved the 1963 version would admit that. You can interpret the meaning of `Lord of the Flies' but who can really visualize it, or the imaginary conversations of Simon for that matter?The biggest problem of Harry Hook's new version is not the changes done to the film. The boys are American military school cadets, using dirty words frequently, but those parts didn't annoy me much. Real problem is something more essential to the film, which is storytelling. In short the 1990 film doesn't know what it wants to be. On the film's video cover you can read (and I quote) `this stunning adventure explores the deep dark corner of the human soul." Well, not exactly.For as adventure story it lacks pace; the film always feels rushed and often needs better editing. As allegory it needs more distinctive personalities for each character. The conflict between Ralph and Jack should be clearer, and Piggy's role should be more than that of a whining fat boy. And don't forget Simon, who sees things, it is true, but definitely not those things that the film actually shows us.It is a pity that the cinematography is so beautiful. It could have been a perfect backdrop against which dark allegorical survival story would develop, opposite of optimistic tales of Jules Verne's adventure stories. By watching this film you can follow the story of the book, but find no tension or thought-provoking words in it.Balthazar Getty's feature film debut. And Lewis M. Allen, one of the producers of the film, had also produced Peter Brook version in 1963
Controversy, not quality. It was probably brave to make any sort of a film out of Rudi van Danzig's book. Doubtless the controversial part of the subject matter of this film, an 11/12 year old boy part-willingly seduced by a 19 year-old soldier, was the reason that it was awarded the Best Film and Audience Prize at Turin in 1993. It cannot have been for any artistic merit or general craft competence. When Jeroen and his mother emerge from their flat we are expected to believe that this is Amsterdam after more than 4 years of Nazi occupation and deprivation. The flats and street are in immaculately good condition. The children being packed off to Friesland so that rest of their families shan't starve are pictures of good health. Was the budget for this film so pathetically low that the producers could not drive around The Netherlands coastline to find a village for the arrival of the Canadian liberators where there weren't bollards on the footpaths to stop people parking cars there? Doubtless McDonald's was just around the corner. I laughed. I thought of Monty Python.As to the main topic of the film, the relationship between the soldier and the boy, do not expect this to remain totally from the child's perspective as it is in the book; there are trite lines of self-explanation from the soldier. The book quite believably develops the relationship between the child and the man, the film doesn't. Since the film is only 92 minutes long perhaps the answer is a censor's sharp scissors, not an example of the film-makers' overall artistic failure. Or perhaps they just hadn't got enough money for enough scenes.The small, redeeeming part of the film is the depiction of the devoutly Protestant people of this ultra-provincial part of The Netherlands; I believed this representation. In this the film shares it's small success with another poor film set in an extreme end of a maritime country, which relies on sex to get people to watch it, "Breaking The Waves".Do not expect this film to bear more than a passing resemblance to van Dantzig's book. Do not expect to see a work of art. Don't waste your money on this DVD; instead, if you haven't done so already, buy the book
A new beginning of an end. I thought I'd be nice in giving film two stars even though it pretty much deserves none at all. I wasn't old enough at the time, but I'm sure fans were slightly bemused at the re-emergence of Friday the 13th.  Tommy, now a teenager (and a bloody old one at that) is residing at the local mental institution still traumatised by the terror of Jason and also the death of his mother.  Tommy is plagued by dreams and nightmares convinced that Jason is back from the dead.  And it seems he may be right, when a series of murders begins. But who could it possibly be THIS time. Jason is dead, isn't he?It's up to Tommy to fight his demons once again and get to the bottom of things before he himself becomes the victim of Jason Voorhees?Friday the 13th Part 5 is a perfect example of how sequels in horror can ruin what went before.  The body count in this is ridiculously high and the gore itself leaves a lot to be desired.  Was it really necessary? Is too much, too much?The only ounce of credibility in this film is Harry Manfredini's reprisal musical score.  Other than that, you'd be forgiven for skipping this Friday the 13th entry
Not Happy. I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?
The can be written for a Democrat, or Republican. For that matter it can be written for any party candidate that wants the truth of his/her dirty secrets covered up. I feel that it's the most insulting film to be released. It hides the fact that we as citizens, and our government don't really care about who we stick in office. If the party lines up with what we believe in screw the fact he had to cover something up. I can't fathom why we continue to fall for this all the time, and believe me I don't feel it's right to air it all over the news either. I feel that it comes down to the man, and if he does have the values his/her party believes in then he will do the honorable thing, and own up to his/her mistake. This movie is just another nail to drive into the justification that it's alright to cover things up, and there are no absolutes, or rights or wrongs. Wht happens when we tick off the wrong person who's rich? Do we wait until then to change the moral? That's Pathetic, and so is this movie
Pretty Bad Movie. Brokedown Palace is bad.  How bad is it?  It's pretty bad, man.Don't tell me I didn't warn you
Larry Garfield is compared to?. When Danny Devito's plays Larry Garfield he is like Taxi's Louie De Palma of Wall Street
Jungle Book 2 Did not Have To Be made Limited Issue Is 100 Times Better. Disney keeps goming out with sequels to the best DVD's ever made.The  Jungle Book Limited Issue Is the best movie ever made.My Grandson watches it all the time. Its made for  the child also the adult like me. I bought  Jungle Book 2 totally dissapointed in the dvd.  I did not like it at all I returned it.Its a horible movie for children:  Disney stop ruining our excellent dvds.I give this dvd A -
I WAS FOOLED BY THE DVD ART!. Ok though I can't find the actual version of this DVD on amazon.com that I own I'm going to warn you anyway..So I am at the local pawn shop and I see a DVD titled GRAVEYARD TRAMPS and it's all colored with black and purple HOT TOPIC style fonts and a very attractive goth girl on the front standing in a graveyard.Now don't get me wrong I knew I wasn't picking up a piece of cinematic gold.. but I did not get what I expected.. I expected a modern cheezy low budget film about maybe zombies or just psycho girls in a graveyard.. GOTH GIRLS in a graveyard.. as the cover art depicted..I knew it would be low budget I knew it would be [...].. but oh well I have an addiction for sexy young goth women.So I get home put the DVD in and to my dissapointment I have a 70's cheese fest about naked better homes and garden type housewives sexing men to death..I have yet to watch it past the first ten minutes.. and that was pretty liquored up.. so I can't judge if this movie is good or not..maybe I'll get comatose and make it through the whole thing..I can say the visuals remind me of the original STEPFORD WIVES.sooooo don't be fooled by stock photos and creepy goth cover art.. I guess that's the moral of this story!
Read the book instead. "The World According to Garp" is on my top 5 list of favorite books of all time.  It's one of those rare books that makes you laugh out loud, but still really feel the emotion of the characters, and the story really sticks with you.  (I made a joke about an Ellen Jamesian just the other day, lol ~ yes, it was a dumb joke that no one else got, but, that's how it goes sometimes :)  I was introduced to the book in college, well after the book and the movie were released, but I had never heard of either one.  I read the book in just a couple of days ~ I couldn't put it down, and I chatted it up with everyone who would listen.  I've re-read it several times since then, and i still think it's terrific.  Naturally, when i found out there was already a movie . . . I was thrilled!  I ordered it right away . . . but i wish i'd never wasted my money.  On it's own, the movie might be alirght.  But when you're invested in the book, when you know the characters, Robin Williams just isn't Garp.  I love Robin Williams, he's a great comedian, that's not a question.  I just think that the casting for this part was way off base.  and if you can't believe the main character, the rest of it's crap.   If you've never read the book, I highly recommend it!!
waste of money. Dont purchase episode 5 of season 2, it's 7 minutes long and you dont get any of the Charlie Murphy Prince story.  WTF!!!  Can someone fix this and refund or offer the entire episode for re-download!!!
WHO'S THAT KNOCKING IN THE WOODS. THE TOMMYKNOCKERS is one of the more unsuccessful of Stephen King adaptations to hit the screen.  Originally a 1993 tv miniseries, the movie suffers from lackluster direction, mediocre performances and no sense of true suspense or horror.  Typically set in a homey little New England town, the plot centers on the discovery of a mysterious object in the woods by a local writer (Marg Helgenberger) who along with her alcoholic poet boyfriend(a poorly cast Jimmy Smits) decides to keep it a secret until the whole thing is unearthed.  Meanwhile, a ghostly green light emits from the object, causing the townspeople to go bonkers in one form or another, whether it be by inventing stupid gadgets or wandering around with glowing green eyes.  At three hours, THE TOMMYKNOCKERS definitely overstays its welcome and that is one problem in watching a miniseries in one take; it can become redundant.  Tighter direction and a more focused cast could have helped but aside from John Ashton, EG Marshall and Joanna Cassidy in supporting roles, most of the performances seem phone in, and Traci Lords is ridiculously hilarious as the postal slut.  A real misfire
AMAZON SUCKS. I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!
This is a true vision of history. It's about time someone stands up and says : "red scare is all about mean politicans and innocents writers", "soviet spies never existed". That movie is telling us just that, by completely ignoring the spionage problem and the Corea war. One thing is particularly shocking, let's think of the millions of the victims of the Gulag when we see Stalin's poster in Streisand's room. "Freedom of speech will never exist in this country", says Redford-Pollack ; i just wish you were born in USSR, you criminal.
Great performances are not enough to save it. I rented this movie because I really adore the two lead actors.  However, although they do the best they can, there is no saving this banal, movie of the week-esque movie.  There are a couple of nice moments, most notably when D'Onofrio's character talks about his father and about his love of football.  Other than that, the story seems to be cobbled together from many other "uplifting" movies.  At times, you can not only guess what will happen next, but can guess what the exact line will be.Football hero becomes self-pitying after an accident leaves him blind (and unable to satisfy his cheap girlfriend in the sack--which she exposes in a tell-all book).  His tutor from school shows up, himself in a wheelchair, and pops this crazy idea to enter a whitewater rafting race.  Even though he professes to have it all together and is all rah-rah, he still feels his own sadness that his dreams of being a dentist were dashed by a drunk driver.  But first--you knew it!--they have to learn to trust each other.  This involves whacky stunts.  The two drive to the race, having adventures, learning about themselves and each other, suprising locals with can-do spirit.  Each scene seems to end with the two sharing a warm laugh in the fuzzy sunset.  Each person they run into is nutty.  And even though I said I liked this, the lines from the scene where Olee talks about his dad seem to practically be directly from "The Breakfast Club" where the jock talks emotionally about his dad.  Only the commitment of Hines and D'Onofrio keep this one from getting no stars at all.So to recap: Person who's cocky and beloved for his physical prowess loses it and feels sorry for himself? Check. That person has one last chance to hear the chanting of the crowd and relive the glory? Check. Another person who's been down that same road of self-pity and redemption comes along to save him? Check. Two men bond on the road and endure colorful locals? Yup. Student becomes teacher? Yes. Locals try to keep them down? Check. Other dreamers lend a hand? Drunk driving? Boy stunted emotionally by father? Bathroom humor? Improbable competition set up to prove worth of the outsiders, and won to stirring music and cheers? All those who've been touched by the quest and who we've met along the way show up at the end? Suprise ending that is supposed to warm your heart and teach you what's really important?  Yes, yes, yes
If only the movie would have followed the book.... This movie was awful. That's all I can say about it. It killed the book, which happens to be one of my favorites. When I got this movie after reading the book, I excitedly stuck it in my VCR (yes, VCR-- no affordable DVD Players at the time), I was expecting so much more than what I received. I know movies have to cut out a lot from the books to fit them into 2-hours, but I've never before seen a movie cut out the main hero! Now, that's just ridiculous! If I were the author, David Baldacci, I would be furious that my story had been so badly butchered. Clint Eastwood had to be the star, so he twisted the whole plot around to make Luther Whitney the hero, when in the book Luther Whitney is gunned down half-way though. In the movie, the book's hero Jack Graham is totally non-existent.My advice to you if you're looking to buy a good movie: look someplace else. Read the book. *sigh* If only the movie would've followed the book a little more closely... It might have been a blockbuster hit. Too bad.
Why the Charge. Curious as to why Amazon would charge for this content when CBS offers it for free on the official Survivor Website.  Yeah, at the CBS site you have sit through 4 commercials, but it is worth it to not have to download any extra programs
Doesn't live up to its promise. I am an Asian cinophile, and I love suspense and action films.  I can also appreciate the asthetics of quiet, space, and subtlty.  This film really didn't move me on any of those levels however.  The eroticism was fleeting, suspense soggy, and drama weak.  Not recommended.
I Know Fred twoo. The personality of a Nazi brownshirt was one of a heightened need for acceptance.  Fred Leuchter was painted as such by many people, some who knew him(and I'm guessing knew better) and as we may be witnessing others who didn't.  Brownshirts insult, assault, rather than intellectually confront and expose objections to their popular ideas.Maybe a major lesson of the Holocaust is that the brownshirt mentality can live in any culture so long as a popular movement of idea is available for them to cling to.  So long as the need for acceptance outweighs the need for a competition of ideas.  There must be someone to hate for the brownshirt to exist, so that they may prove their allegiance to the group.  Maybe a great contribution one can give to their group is sincere dissent, as dissent does not equal disloyalty...except in a Nazi state.There was a great free press in Germany in Nazi times, so long as that free thought was constrained within the preset boundaries."Mr. Death" is not representation of Fred Leuchter.  Fred Leuchter is representation of Fred Leuchter.  Might I suggest NOT suggesting a collection of articles by many of the same people in this documentary.  That's not clarification, that's reinforcement of one idea.  Rather go and find Fred and speak to him.  Get his view.  If you don't have a preformed agenda (like Van Pelt or Morris), you may get him to respond like I did.  I found a different Fred(and a much much different story) than I was given by director Morris and others.The question is not whether German gas chambers were used to murder people, the question is whether someone will be allowed to think contrary to that, or any other idea.  That is, without having his house firebombed, a concerted effort to ruin him financially take place, have his reputation ruined, or any of the other stuff happen.  If Fred's ordeal is any indication, the brownshirts are alive and well, but I don't think Fred is one of them.The one fact I would alter in my previous post is Rabbi Bauer's support for "no gas chambers".  Bauer supported Fred's methods, not necessarily his conclusion.  I tried in vain to contact Bauer, on where he differs with Fred.  Fred has high regard for Rabbi Bauer.  The Polish forensic investigation(which came soon after Fred's!) did not come to the same conclusion as Fred, but did essentially duplicate Fred's data collection methods and results.There was testimony at the Nuremburg trials by both inmates and German staff that homocidal gassings took place in those camps in Germany.  In 1960, physical and chemical tests showed that no gassings occured there.  It took 16 years(1976) for Simon Weisenthal to admit that no gassings took place in those German concentration camps.  A former inmate at Auschwitz has said that no homocidal gassings took place there.  But all this isn't to say that the Auschwitz gassings didn't occur, but rather to simply say that some may think they didn't occur and for that they shouldn't be condemned...unless the idea is to create an enemy out of sincere people like Fred
My copy a dud. Having first seen this film at university twenty years ago I was really looking forward to watching this scary but masterful political propaganda film once again but my copy was a dud. About 70 minutes into the film it started to get the wobblies. The images became broken up and pixelated and then the image froze altogether whilst the sound continued. Then the sound froze. I had to keep fast forwarding to get through the glitches. QA could not have been to rigorous. The digital reproduction on the DVD is poor at this point and this continues throughout the whole of the SS review.I'll be asking for my money back.
A  Dog. This movie is a dog, pure and simple. We ended up with two of these are the freebie give aways for the last few DVD players we bought. They can't sell it, so they're giving them away.  Hide ...fast
Bad Device. I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service
Not worth the time  - save your money. This is a case where the book is wonderful and the movie is just pathetic.  I hadn't read the book before seeing the movie.  The film stunk.  A few years later, I read the book and was enchanted.  I did not make the connection that this was the same story until I saw the film again on late night tv.  I was all excited to see one of my favorite books on the screen.  Then, I realized what movie it was.  I tried to sit through it.  I just couldn't.  The monster should have eaten the film
Good book...bad movie. I LOVED the book and made the mistake of buying the movie without watching it first. This movie is boring and did no justice to the book
What Was I Thinking?. I watched this movie last evening and I have to say that I have never seen weird, confusing movie since 12 Monkies.  I'm still confused.The plot is pathetic and mindlessly confusing, it's all about lucid dreams and Tom Cruise seeing how many times he can flick his hair in a minute while the cameras on him.  The film is basically all a blur from start to finish, it's a dreadful mix of sci-fi nonsense and obvious fake romance.  Why on earth would someone want to remake a foreign film with this kind of plot anyway.  Don't buy this film on DVD or you'll be wasting your money.  I'm sorry if you've found this review uninformative, but since Vanilla Sky is really about nothing whatsoever it's very hard to go into much detail.
A Waste of Time and Money. I purchased this DVD hoping it would relay information on coral reefs and the myriad of life living in them.  While the focus of the movie was on the endangerment of the reefs due to global warming, overfishing, etc., most of the movie was spent above the water focusing on the the filmmaker and his wife and their trivial lives.  The imagery was beautiful when they were under the water, but it's only a small percentage of film.  Very disappointing
Note the running time--7 minutes!!. Make sure you pay more attention to the running time than I did.  I paid $2 for 7 minutes of a cartoon!  The word 'episode' implies at least 23 minutes of showtime.  I am disappointed that they did not combine several 'episodes' to make this a more realistic purchase.  The quality was good, however, and it downloaded right away to my tivo
A Tale In Two Minds. The border in this film which is beyond belief is that of credibilty. The drama's tone is disturbingly melodramatic with the Relief Doctor's appearance at a high society fund-raising ball in London. We can accept this though, given the painful urgency of his message. But when Jolie quits her poor husband to Ethiopia in pursuit of responding to well-intended empathy for the war and famine stricken camps, the balance of the film gets crazily out of whack, and never recovers. It's not to say that romantic love has no place in such dire life circumstances. More, the film makes this point above the far more expressive needs of the people who the aid workers are there to service. Quite addled really, and undrermining all other high-minded and serious utterances made by the lead actors. In Ethiopa, in particular, this seemed in errant taste. The conceptual work is at the root of this
Bad Enough to Start Race Riots. Rhea Perlman, a short white woman, is going to teach basketball to her towering Black high school students. And even though she knows nothing about hasketball she can still turn them into winners because she's White and sensitive and wants to be their &quot;sistah.&quot; Gag me. This whole movie is completely insulting to people of all races. The director seems so sure he can sell a hip-hop basketball movie this bad to &quot;those people&quot; that he doesn't even bother to hide his apparent distaste for them. Avoid at all costs
Pathetic excuse for comedy 0/5 stars. This movie was even more ignorant (in a bad way) compared to that other movie THE STUPIDS and I thought that movie was ignorantly bad as well. The name of the movie (dumberer) explains how retarded and unfunny this movie really is. The old dumb and dumber movie with jim carrey and jeff daniels is way better than this sorry excuse for comedy + it was part of a classic comedy which made lots of people laugh. Don't waste your money on this sorry excuse for comedy if you like dumb and dumber go for the unrated never before seen film of the old dumb and dumber instead it's worth every penny for comedy fans
Dont get "Fiji" final week ... Dont dwnld " Survivor, "Thunderstorms & Sacrifice" ". Its my fault for not reading the whole thing. you would think that the last episode would be the finale , but NO, its just a 10 minute recap going to the finale 4. I didnt even get a full 45 minute episode. No finale. I got rippped off. $1.99 dwnld not well spent. Dont bother dwnldng any episode of fiji if you dont know the ending. Because they dont have that episode, not even the reunion show
Worset movie ever. I can't stand this movie, it's one of the worset.The acting is horrible, it's dark, gloomy, and so boring.It's fun to watch and make fun of it, but thats about all. I do not recommend it, I would give it zero stars if it was possible.The child actress "mary" and then the older grown up "mary" actress isn't suitable, she doesn't even look like she could have been the same person or type, how awful!Watch another version, this one is a waste of time and money!
Lack of balance leads to lack of credibility. In short, the film does a fairly good job of getting the message across, as it should do, in making people aware of the evils of war and the fact that the international community is often slow to act. At the same time, however, it does not provide a balanced examination of the situation on the ground, which only weakens the very effect it is trying to create.What the film ends up doing is the one thing it must avoid at all cost in order to be effective: NOT to choose sides.  The Catholic Croats and the Muslims are the "victims," while the Orthodox Serbs are wholly to blame...  That is neither witty nor wise when trying to carry out a "noble cause."  There is a term used in such situations and it's called... propaganda!A more balanced and objective approach (i.e. there are no good guys and bad guys in such conflicts) with less bias and closed mindedness would have made the film more effective and therefore, more successful. The ultimate goal is good, but the method used is not necessarily the correct one.Another setback is in relation to the acting (or lack of it); that is to say that the cast are badly in need of acting lessons (with the exception of Woody Harrelson)!  The acting-oh my- the acting is beyond words...  School plays (and pre-school for that matter) have better actors!  It is truly sad...Yet another weakness is in relation to the very poor dialogues and the weak plot/storyline for which the writers and director are to blame.In conclusion, the potential for a good movie was there if only the writers/director had the ability to... write and direct!  A shame really...
Poor support. This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet
Great for the Zen Vision. At first I didn't realize that you have to use Amazon's software to load onto the Zen.  Once I figured that out (actually my husband figured that out) the show played perfectly and it was very easy to do.  I wasn't able to edit the stars.  If I could I would give this 5 stars.  If you have tried some other sites for the Zen, they are much more difficult to use. Amazon's Unbox is great for the Zen
Survivor Rip Off. I have bought 2 seasons of Survivor on unbox and both of them are not complete. Very dissapointing. Guatemala  episode 11 is from a completely different season and it is missing the last 2 episodes and the reunion show. Just leaves you hanging. Exile Island is missing the final episode it just goes from the competition between Danielle and Cirie for a spot in the final 3 to the live reunion show
AMAZON SUCKS. I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!
Nails on a chalkboard. Let's face it. Nothing anyone says can sway a particular fragment of this movie's viewing audience one way or the other. Those who love J.Lo will declare the greathess of this movie, in a variety of ways.  Those who hate J.Lo will counter their every point in describing how bad it is. And those who love quality film won't waste too much time even recognizing that this movie even exists. Guilty pleasure, indeed! One thing you have to admit about J.Lo, she's consistent. She sings bad, acts bad, and is merely eye candy, for thoe who find her appealing. And this movie is full of all of the above, plus awful, cliche ridden, emotionally pleading writing that should be an inspiration to anyone with Hollywood writing aspirations, since this movie demonstrates how little talent it takes. At least it's had it's short, but sill way too long presence on the premium movie channels, cause for a while this piece of garbage was ubiquitous, just like the lead starlett. Maniupulative only begins to describe this drek. But that said, it's more than enough time wasted on this movie. I merely felt compelled to warn folks. Don't waste your time. It stinks
Nothing funny about it. Jack Nicholson is wasted in this movie. He doesn't get to be JACK, he just plays a watered down characature of himself. But the worst aspect of the movie is the very basis of the story. Sandler's character keeps getting set up and as a viewer you keep wanting a payoff, a reprisal, but the point of the movie is that his character won't do it. So you have a buildup of tension throughout the movie followed by a weak and rushed attempt at a payoff. The movie should have been dumped in the first draft stage.I chuckled at 3 throwaway gags in the film; the rest of the time I kept looking at my watch wondering when it would be over
attack of the (totally fake and unconvincing) sharks. how many modern day jaws rip-offs do there need to be. Well! Okay this film i would rank lower than 2 stars if it wasn't for the fat that i liked sharks and i want to be a marine biologist. The other reason was i think Casper Van Dien is good actor with a good career ahead of him. But this movie stunk. In no ways does it compare to jaws nor even Deep Blue Sea. I hated almost every moment of it. If you want to see a good shark movie rent or buy Deep Blue Sea. Or better yet just stick to jaws its still the best after all these years. Don't be fooled this is a waste of time and effort. This film needs some coupe de grace some spice but it gets none. ...
gobbledygook & self-righteousness & pretentious twaddle make for a terrible movie. there is a certain new-fangled school of screenwriting that thinks that if you put a bunch of characters on screen and have them make no sense of one another but sound as if theyre being profound, then they ARE. the prime example of this in recent years is the abominable "crash", but at least that was (somewhat) assuaged by strong performances. this -- arguably the worst "mainstream" motion picture of 2005 -- is redeemed by nothing. an excruciatingly long 2 hours, and as much as i (usually) enjoy george clooney, i might never forgive him for this drek
UnBox video not yet working. Will not play once video was downloaded. I get the error message:  "can not play file, please try again later. error# 0x80040273" I made the exlusive give me call me back feature but the UnBox department was already closed, I was told the UnBox Saturday and Sunday 6-5 hours. I have to say I am impressed with the Call back feature. I downloaded the Unbox Beta now and am recieving email assistance to try to resolve the problem. Thanks Amazon UnBox! I will Update again - Feb. 10,200
Overhyped, Overrated, and a Big waste of money. This was quite possibly the worst movie I have ever seen.  It was boring and lacked any climatic moments.  During the entire hour and a half, I managed to squeeze out a couple chuckles, but don't expect to get much more.  I would not recommend this movie to anyone
Overt Child Exploitation That Never Redeems Itself Satisfyingly. A well-acted, well-portrayed, sickening, overt example of an adult whose sole desire for a child is based on getting that child to meet his own selfish needs.  He has little or no love for the child based on who the child is in her core, and sends her the basic message that she does not count as a human being aside from being an object to gratify him.  If the child does not mold to his expectations and desires she gets rejected, and this is the horrible tension of the movie.Although the movie has some twists and turns that shake things up, the man's character never develops much in a satisfying way, and nor do the basic themes of adult selfishness and cultural repression.  As such the movie is essentially non-redemptive, and portrays a sad and tragic side of humanity.Although this movie is set in an outer province on China in the 1930s, it's actually a good metaphor for Western culture, much as Western cultural norms do not allow parents to exploit their children so overtly..
Wellman Adaptation Lacks Suspense... After watching the fabulous bonus features on this DVD (a biography of William 'Wild Bill' Wellman with observations by Robert Mitchum and Tab Hunter, another bio of "Track" author Walter Van Tilburg Clark, a look at actual mountain lions and their habitat, and more), I realized I held a 'minority opinion' of the film, itself, compared to many of the reviewers you'll read, here; I think it is stagy, lacks the sense of dread and palpable suspense of the novel, and doesn't 'hold up' as well as most of the director's work.A tale of a dysfunctional family at it's boiling point, and the impact a nearly primordial panther has, in changing their lives, the characters, with the exception of always watchable Robert Mitchum, as the domineering middle son, are all either boring, frustratingly indecisive, or downright unlikable. Oldest son William Hopper, best-known as 'Paul Drake' in television's "Perry Mason", is the dreamer, who 'bonds' with the environment, but lacks the instinctive power to defeat the cat, and never comes across as more than wishy-washy; bitter spinster sister Teresa Wright offers a one-note portrayal that soon becomes grating; youngest son Tab Hunter is so wimpy that you quickly lose interest in him; Philip Tonge, the loquacious alcoholic father, whose drinking problem, in the novel, is tragic, here becomes a stereotyped comic drunk, with hidden bottles of liquor providing 'comic relief'; Diana Lynn, as Hunter's girl, tries hard, but never seems more than a minor character in the proceedings; even legendary Beulah Bondi, as the greedy, Bible-spouting, mean-spirited mother, seems to simply channel her 'bad mom' portrayal from the "What if?" sequence of "It's a Wonderful Life". Worst of all, ex-Little Rascal Carl 'Alfalfa' Switzer, encased in phony-looking 'old age' make-up to 'pass' as a 100-year-old ranch hand/medicine man, looks neither believable, or comfortable in the role.With a farm set that looks patently artificial (and obviously on a sound stage), the outdoor scenes, shot at Mount Rainier, must take up the slack; sadly, despite the creativity in using high contrasts to make the colors achieve a 'black and white' look, the book's greatest asset, the constant, frightening 'unseen' presence of the malevolent cat was, to me, never achieved, despite a Mitchum monologue as he gradually succumbs to helpless fear; in fact, Hunter's final confrontation with the cat is handled so 'routinely' that you can't understand what all the fuss was about!The film was a big letdown!
Bad from beginning to end. Not sure what is worse, the horrible script or the horrible acting. Typical mean girl makes epiphany and changes to good person script. Watching Schneider dress in women's clothes for an entire movie is just creepy. Using lemon juice for eye drops would be more enjoyable than watching this movie.
Don't Let Rob Schneider Steal More Money. I guess we can thank the global population for making Rob Schneider a  leading actor by continually buying tickets to that Deuce Bigalow fiasco.  I could only sit through about thirty minutes of that before my head started to hurt and my eyes started to burn.I guess I have sheer boredom or desperation to thank for actually watching this abysmal feature about a thief who finds a magical earring, which transforms him into a blonde teenager overnight.  This body transforming-opposite sex switcharoo has been done time and time again, but not this badly.If the dwarf size Schneider makes you laugh because he looks like he's been on a narcotics binge for months on end, you might like this film.  I can cut the guy some slack because the script is so horrible that it would be hard for Lawrence Olivier to be convincing.The majority of scenes intended to make you laugh are physical bits that aren't remotely funny.  Girls having pillow fights where Schneider overpowers them and sends them flying through the air with each blow (literally), the standard overweight character that dances sexy even though it's the most vile thing you've ever seen.  Schneider falling down bleachers, smashing his face against every seat, a cross dressing eight-year-old boy...Adam Sandler has been stealing money for years because this same movie going public has made him a superstar.  He makes a cameo, talks so low you can't understand a word he's saying and wears quite possibly the worst wardrobe ever assembled by a costume designer.Two things make this film at least worth watching if you're as mind numbingly bored and desperate as I was last night:  1)  Whoever the Foley Artist was for this film should never work again.  Pillows making contact, Schneider falling down, rear end slapping..it's all the same sound.  It's exactly like someone stood on a third story balcony and dropped a suitcase full of bowling balls onto the street below.  (2) Anna Faris...I can't decide whether I think she's really cute or if she's just a Plain Jane with large eyes...but when I'M thinking she's pretty cute, she's nice to look at.
"I want to tell you my secret now.". M. Night Shyamalan's "The Sixth Sense" is a noteworthy example of how the technique of misdirection can be employed in cinema.  However, the mere use of misdirection does not guarantee that a film will wind up being any good.Psychologist Malcolm Crowe (Bruce Willis) returns home one evening after receiving an award for his work with children.  A former patient awaits him there and shoots him in front of his wife.  Time passes and Crowe tries to put the incident behind him by immersing himself in a new case.  Crowe takes on a new patient named Cole Sear (Haley Joel Osment) who claims that he is able to see dead people around him."The Sixth Sense" created a sensation upon its release as filmgoers relished its twist ending.  Yet, if the truth be told, the ending will not come as a surprise to fantasy and science-fiction fans or to those who are actually paying attention to the events unfolding onscreen rather than sitting back and just going along for the ride.  The entire success of "The Sixth Sense" hinges on whether you are able to figure out the ending ahead of time and unfortunately Shyamalan's use of misdirection just does not mask the final revelation effectively enough.  From the beginning of the film, one knows that something is amiss and the twist becomes more and more obvious as the story continues to unfold.  The acting is first rate with Willis, Osment, Toni Collette, and Olivia Williams turning in great work.  Willis in particular turns in an interesting performance that is a departure from his more action-oriented roles.  However, even with all the quality acting on display, you just cannot shake the feeling that the "The Sixth Sense" is essentially just a drawn-out "Twilight Zone" episode when all is said and done
AMAZON SUCKS. I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!
contrived, implausible crime drama. "Four Brothers" is yet another nail in the coffin of John Singleton's increasingly moribund moviemaking career.  The director - who burst upon the scene in 1991 with the vibrant and gritty "Boyz n the Hood" - has here mounted a film so burdened by implausibility and contrivance that it makes one wonder if the once-promising filmmaker will ever be able to get back on track again.  The story, reeking of artificiality, features Mark Wahlberg, Tyrese Gibson, Andre Benjamin and Garrett Hedlund as four troubled young men raised by the same foster mother.  When she is killed in a convenience store robbery, the quartet launches into action, seeking revenge against the perpetrators and becoming slowly convinced, through their investigation in the neighborhood, that the killing might not have been as random in nature as they had been initially led to believe.The main weakness of this film is that it gives us virtually no reason to care about any of the characters.  By not showing us any scenes between the boys and their foster mother (except for one embarrassingly bad Thanksgiving dinner fantasy sequence that looks as if it were conceived by a first-year film student), we are forced to take their relationship totally on faith, rendering the boys' thirst for revenge arbitrary at worst and academic at best.The acting is uniformly flat, with the characters little more than wafer-thin stereotypes, and even the action scenes come across as surprisingly mundane and second-rate given the Singleton pedigree in this area.  The boys' running around from venue to venue in their Detroit neighborhood, brandishing guns in full view of the populace and screaming for information about their mother's killer, is ludicrous on the face of it and often reduces the film to the level of cheap low comedy burlesque.With nary a single moment that rings believable or true, "Four Brothers" is by-the-book filmmaking from a director who has proven that he has the wherewithal and talent to do so much more.
Not worth $107. I purchased my version of El Hazard from a zShop for 19 bucks and I am SO glad that I did.That said, the first series is worth watching for two main reasons: overt lesbianism and Jinnai. The former is self-explanatory while the latter (Jinnai) is without a doubt the best character in the series (despite the fact that he is the antagonist). You can't say that any of the characters are very deep or well developed, but throughout the first series Jennai is by far the most satisfyingly fleshed-out character, as well as the most ammusing and true to his nature. This superiority is all the more appearant when he is contrasted with story's main character who is shallowly developed and in no way engaging.And this is what makes the second series (all four dismal episodes) so tragic: they nerfed Jinnai. He could never have been called a genius in the first series, but he was decidedly intelligent, cool, pragmatic, supremely self-confident and an effective leader (even though he was also manic and delusional). In El Hazard II, as if in response to the world recoiling at the sight of a humorous though competent villain, they have turned Jinnai into a slapstick-idiot persuing his increasingly nebulous ambition with foolish abandon.I suggest purchasing El Hazard through...alternate means,... watching the first series and discarding the second. Let's face it: even lesbian humor gets old when the writing sucks and the characters are empty
What's up with that?. I wish I had read the other reviews first.  Though the quality of the episode and the video are top notch, the episode cuts off after 22 minutes.  Obviously, I already know the ending of "The Black Death", but I still wanted to see the full show
Enjoyable At Some Parts But Just Plain Stupid In Others. What i mean by the title of my review is yes this movie is going to be funny its Monty Python! but there is also some parts where it just really gets out of hand in my mind. If you are new to Monty Python I would get the quest for the holy grail before this one. Also the Monty Python's Flying Circus is great too. It comes in a 16 DVD set so it will give you a lot of their old stuff. I really did not enjoy certain parts. But there is a few good moments.
The most stupidest horror movie of all. THIS MOVIE IS GOD AWFUL. I MEAN POOR RENE ZELLWEGGER. BEING CAST IN THIS MOVIE. WHAT DID SHE TURN DOWN IF THIS IS WHAT SHE PICKED. DON'T GET THIS MOVIE SEE IT ON TV. DON'T EVEN RENT IT. DON'T GET IT PLEASE. I'M SAVING YOU 12 BUCKS
Attack of the Mutant Flies. The script outrageously lifts the opening set up from &quot; The Big Chill&quot; until the swarm of mutant flies shows up and attacks the cast. Thats right MUTANT FLIES! The problem is that flies are not scary at all they do not have the shriek factor of spiders, scorpions or roaches. The terrible CGI effects do not help- there are a couple of effective suspense moments-but most of the action takes place in daylight which deminishes the scare factor
My copy a dud. Having first seen this film at university twenty years ago I was really looking forward to watching this scary but masterful political propaganda film once again but my copy was a dud. About 70 minutes into the film it started to get the wobblies. The images became broken up and pixelated and then the image froze altogether whilst the sound continued. Then the sound froze. I had to keep fast forwarding to get through the glitches. QA could not have been to rigorous. The digital reproduction on the DVD is poor at this point and this continues throughout the whole of the SS review.I'll be asking for my money back.
Don't even steal this movie!!!. This tripe was horrible. The only reason i gave it 1 star is because of the bus wreck that was very gory. Besides that, and when the boy scout zombies attack, I fast forwarded thru the entire movie. Even the nudity was horrible. If all other movies on earth are destroyed and TV is abolished, you should STILL not watch this film!!!!
Warning Incomplete Episode!!!. The episodes in this series have an average running time of 50 minutes. This one happens to be only 18 minutes. This mean sthat the file abruptly stops right in the middle. Even though it only cost me $2 I still got jipped.  Let's hope Amazon can iron out these kinds of problems before they get this service farther underway. Be careful enough to sheck the running times to be sure they seem accurate before you buy them
Star Trek:  City on the Edge of Forever. My favorite show of the Trek series but there's no way I'd buy another individual program from Amazon.  It will ONLY play on their downloaded player ...won't burn to DVD so can't play it on my television.  Don't bother buying this ...just go for the Trek collection on DVD
jeremial johnson, a stellar movie. i love nature and cowboy movies.  Jeremiah Johnson was on of the best movies i've seen.  it is unforgetable.  It was my favorite  RobertRedford movie.  He did very little talking talking in this movie, he just acted, his best performance ever.  the movie deals with the american indian also, in a profound and touching way.  this movie is engrossing and based on a true story,  it's simply the best. Don't miss the opportunity to see this movie, it is a classic.  It truly is in a league of it's own.
The Lisbon Suicides. Therese, Lux, Mary, Bonnie and Cecilia make up the five Lisbon girls, ages 13, 14, 15, 16 and 17. Cecilia, the youngest, lives in her sisters shadows because they are all older and of much more interest to their male neighbors. As a cry for help, she slits her wrists and lays down in the bathtub, she survived the incident. After a psychiatrist highly impresses upon the strict Mr. and Mrs. Lisbon that it would be benificial for Cecilia to be exposed to environments which have boys her own age, Mr. and Mrs. Lisbon decide to allow the girls to throw the one and only Lisbon party. Some of the neighborhood's boys are invited over and while the party is in session, Cecilia is pretty inanimate, sitting on the couch while her sisters flirt, talk and laugh. Midway through the party, Cecilia asks to be excused and Mrs. Lisbon - though somewhat reluctantly - allows it. Cecilia goes up to her room (on the second floor of a two-story house) and jumps out the window, landing on the spiked fence on the front lawn of the Lisbon house. In this way, Cecilia Lisbon commited suicide. Only four girls remain.The act which Cecilia committed did not go at all unnoticed. The father saw her immediately, the party ended there and all of the boys went home rather glum. Four of the Lisbon's neighbors, four young boys, suffered a rapidly growing obsession with the Lisbon girls, who were beautiful and a total mystery to the outside world. They got hold of Cecilia's diary and tried to explain why she committed suicide. The eldest decided Cecilia was a dreamer, and she did not think she would fall when she jumped out her window, she thought she would fly.With their youngest sister gone, the remaining Lisbon girls grow closer to each other, stranding themselves further from the outside world. When school starts again, they attempt to go on acting as if nothing happened, not ever mentioning their youngest sister. The run-of-the-mill awkward act is taken part by the rest of the school however. The usual profuse apology to the mention of the word "death" and the like.Trip Fontaine is the most popular guy in school, the object of desire to all of the girls at school... Except for the Lisbon girls, which is of no importance to Trip until he sets eyes on Lux. Trip cannot help but be enchanted by her flawless beauty. In the beginning, he is unsuccessful in his quest to even catch her attention for she bluntly shows she's not interested. But after his consistent courtship, Lux falls for his charming ways. Trip then attempts to convince Mr. Lisbon to let him and three of his football team pals take the Lisbon daughters to Homecoming. After Mr. Lisbon talks to his wife, he agrees to Trip's request, knowing nothing but Trip's sincerity and claimed honorable intentions, on the understanding that Trip have all of the Lisbon girls returned to the house by curfew.After Trip explains the situation to his football peers, he gives in to those who bribe him the most handsomely. Meanwhile, the Lisbon girls are picking out fabric for the dresses they shall wear to the Homecoming Dance. Though one pattern is used for all four dresses, each dress looks unique when concentrating on detail. Once they pick up the girls, they stop midway to the Homecoming in order to smoke, Lux being the only girl volunteering to smoke.They then drive to the dance. Trip and Lux sneak away and sneak swallows of alcohol. Another one of the Lisbon sisters and her date follow, but leave soon afterwards, not being as wild nor daring as Trip and Lux. At the time they all decided to meet back at the car so they could make the girls curfew, they are all there... Except for Trip and Lux, who at that time were alone in the middle of the football stadium field. Deciding they must make their own curfews, Therese, Bonnie, Mary and their dates leave without them. After fooling around, the intoxicated Trip and Lux fall asleep in the middle of the football stadium. Trip awakens in the middle of the night and leaves Lux there alone. When Lux wakes up early the next morning she is confused as to why Trip is not there. She takes a taxi home and her parents were worried sick (of course). But they take measures as far as pulling the girls out of school and stranding them inside the Lisbon residence.The girls, in a desperate attempt to hold onto a connection to the outside world, begin using morse code to interact with the four boys who so closely follow their lives. One of which boys lived across the street and the rest which came over daily after this in order to contact the girls. Soon following, the boys begin talking to the Lisbon girls via phone. One day, the girls invite the boys to come over once Mr. and Mrs. Lisbon are asleep. The plan being that the boys were to drive the girls somewhere, the boys hastily agree. They sneak over and Lux invites them to wait inside for her sisters and Lux goes to wait in the car. The boys wander down to the basement while waiting for Therese, Bonnie and Mary, verbally expressing their hopes for the night. But then they realize they have stumbled upon one of the sisters. She had hung herself. The boys, scared to death, run all the way home. Time passed, things changed, girls came and went... But no matter what, those four boys NEVER forgot the Lisbon suicides.Ultimately, the movie was nothing short of queer. When trying to sum up the story in a few lines (such as "Follow the lives of the Lisbon sisters and how they connect to their neighbors. A story full of obsession, gossip, lust, love, desire and isolation.") the story sounds quite unique and intriguing, but the story fell short of that for me personally. Partly because the Lisbon sisters really committed suicide for a reason not much deeper than isolation. The movie, in places, is also extremely flawed. I do not believe Mr. and Mrs. Lisbon could've removed their daughters from school for so long without their daughters being taken from them by social services. In many parts of the movie, they should've used upbeat music to fill the deafening silences. The whole movie was filmed in a style that I can truthfully say makes me rather bored. I would only suggest this film to, perhaps, people who like movies such as "Elizabethtown" which Kirsten Dunst is also in. But I personally disliked this movie which was not very tasteful and will not be watching it again in the future
Pretty Lame. I rented this movie on VHS because that was teh only formate they had. I think its pretty FReaking Lame. The Sport Sequeces are cool, but aside from that it was very boring. Basicly i Think this movie was yet another example of Hollywood Movie Trash
Give Your Fast-Forward a Work-Out!!. Let's just be honest: this film is terrible . . . and not in the way that "Attack of the Killer Tomatoes!" is so "terrible" that it's great . . . more like the way "Caddyshack II" is so terrible that the director should forever live in shame . . .I was a kid when this film was released. And, while it was not particularly exciting then, it is insanely tedious now. It is a genuine test of patience . . . but with no pay-off what-so-ever.Here's some potentially helpful information:The slasher film can branch in two directions: supernatural (Friday the 13th II, Halloween, Nightmare on Elm Street etc...) and crime/revenge (I Spit on Your Grave, Friday the 13th, TCM, Scream, Urban Legend ect...). This one falls under the latter heading. And while realism can render a more potent effect ("This could really happen!"), this film simply fails to engage the viewer ON ANY LEVEL.The goal of a slasher film is two-fold: to horrify and repulse. This does neither!! The "horror" element is non-existent: there is no point in expounding, since there is nothing to examine.  And, if you love gore (and who doesn't?) try another film. The "murders" are barely visible (literally) and so sloppy that they solicit no response other than a yawn. Many of the film's problems are technical: the cinematography is just horrendous. The entirely film is extremely underlit, the colors are needlessly washed-out, and the film stock is grade "F." And this, as you know, is not because the film is over twenty-five years old . . . the problem was always there.There is ONE "good" moment in the entire film . . . when the school's "bad boy" has his head lopped-off and it clumsily thunks down the prom-court walk-way. Still, it is more comic-relief than genuine horror.The soundtrack could not BE WORSE. I am not referring to the disco tunes (we accept those since this film was made at the end of the disco period), but the tracks made for the film . . . they sound like they were squeaked-out by The Carpenters. So, imagine lots of disco punctuated by lackluster, psuedo-thoughtful ballads (like the final song on the track). Words cannot explain how wildly offensive it is!!Did I mention that Leslie Nielson has a meaty role (yes, THAT Leslie Nielsen from Airplane, and Naked Gun)? He plays a tough-minded principal who is tormented by the death of his daughter. I know, it SOUNDS funny, but IT'S NOT!! Trust me!!If you dig watching unattractive teenagers "disco the night away," hey, this film is totally for you!! But if you are looking for a decent slasher film from the early middle-period of its reign look elsewhere (like Halloween, Friday the 13th etc...)I'd be willing to get all Ed McMahon's Star-Search on you and give this "film" a 1/4 star. But it is an important milestone in the slasher sub-genre (I will not spoil the film and tell you why, though). So if you are a slasher enthusiast or a horror scholar, watch it . . . on picture-in-picture . . . maybe after a few drinks . . . on a day when the cable is out . . . on fast-forward!
It watched it on fast forward!. Except for two cuties: William Zabka and Dana Ashbrook! Especially Dana who constantly having a hard-on
Not Happy. I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?
The Story Of Rubin Carter, According To Rubin Carter. The first thing you should know about The Hurricane is that it was based on two books, one of which (The Sixteenth Round) was written by Rubin Carter.The second thing you should know is that Rubin Carter is not a man of exemplary honesty.The third thing you should know is that the other book (Lazarus and the Hurricane) on which this movie was based was written by two of the Canadians who bought into Carter's hokum, as have so many after them.I will not go into a point-by-point list of the patently false claims that Carter makes in his book, since other posters here have already done a good job of that. Instead, I'd like to offer some reactions to those here who have given this movie glowing reviews. These are divided into three groups.The first is composed of those who did not know they were taken for a ride. If you belong in this group, I do not fault you. Hollywood has a way of perpetrating some very repugnant deceptions on the unsuspecting public. But let me ask you this: if you were presented with hard evidence that this movie is just one big lie put forward by the title "hero," would you still rate it highly?If your answer is "yes," then you belong in the second group, those who gave this movie a thumbs-up on the basis of its being a powerfully moving drama, and never mind the glaring factual inaccuracies. To this group, I have this to say: if a filmmaker wants to present a true-life story, he has a responsibility to see to it that he has his facts right. It's called integrity, and it means placing truthfulness far above profitability. You say this is a dramatization and not a documentary? Well, even a dramatization should be done with some integrity. I can go along with some minor embellishments here and there, but when a movie is based on a series of disgustingly blatant lies and tries to pass itself off as a true story, that, in my book, is unforgivable. And so what if it was a rival studio that went out of its way to expose this movie's dishonesty? Vested interest does not render their arguments invalid.Finally, to the third group, those who actually believe that Carter is in fact a martyr-scholar, I ask you to please open your eyes. There is absolutely no documentation to support Carter's claims that he defended his friend from a pedophile, that he was a civil rights activist, that he was robbed of a crucial ring victory, and so many other proclamations aimed at propping up his hero image. On the other hand, there are reams of documents that present virtually irrefutable evidence that these very proclamations are a product of one man's delusional fantasies. You say that Cal Deal, the man behind graphicwitness.com, is a racist? Please visit graphicwitness.com /carter/racism.html. Also, know this: Deal went into the Rubin Carter case actually believing that Carter was innocent. It took just one interview for Deal to see the many glaring inconsistencies in Carter's statements. He went on to uncover numerous documents and testimonies that exposed Carter as a liar.Many accounts today have it that Carter is a changed man. I sincerely hope this is a real change, and not just a show. But whatever the case, the fact remains that he owes it to the public to admit that his book and this movie are just a lot of hogwash.I'm not counting on that, though
Star Trek:  City on the Edge of Forever. My favorite show of the Trek series but there's no way I'd buy another individual program from Amazon.  It will ONLY play on their downloaded player ...won't burn to DVD so can't play it on my television.  Don't bother buying this ...just go for the Trek collection on DVD
For Mamet fans only!. I couldn't get past the very stylized dialogue which seemed to coming from the same source although different actors were speaking.  The characters are cliches through and through and does anyone really speak the way the people do? Mamet appears to have never left Manhattan and has no clue to writing non urban roles or a script with enough nuance to delineate his characters perspective.  To be honest I didn't finish the entire film, but instead checked the TV Guide for reruns of Northern Exposure for the real thing
spiderman high boltage villains. I found the DVD to be completey inappropriate for children.  Too much violance and too much swearing.  My kids watched 5 minutes of it and its now in the garbage
hORRIBLE QUALITY - bLACK SCREEN WITH ONLY VOICES. tHE SHOWING OF dORA GOES TO A BLACK SCREEN SHORTLY INTO THE SCREENING.  tHIS WAS A WASTE OF MONEY.  i WILL NEVER DOWNLOAD UNBOXED ITEMS AGAIN AS THEY ARE NOT GOOD QUALITY.  dON'T EVEN BOTHER.  JUST BUY THE dvd
"Pheelyp es a weeynie". This is a ho-hum buddy picture about a bunch of guys driving aimlessly around the west for "one last fandango" before they get drafted. Most of their time is spent ragging on one guy, "pheelyp," to the point where one wonders why he is friends with the other three. The peril of Vietnam hangs in the background while these dopes carry on with their fake Texas accents. Passable popcorn fun if you've got nothing better to do.
Warning Incomplete Episode!!!. The episodes in this series have an average running time of 50 minutes. This one happens to be only 18 minutes. This mean sthat the file abruptly stops right in the middle. Even though it only cost me $2 I still got jipped.  Let's hope Amazon can iron out these kinds of problems before they get this service farther underway. Be careful enough to sheck the running times to be sure they seem accurate before you buy them
Oh the humanity!. "Red Water," a made for television film starring Lou Diamond Phillips and Kristy Swanson, carries on the now long and wearisome tradition of ripping off "Jaws." You would think that nearly thirty years after Steven Spielberg's project arrived in theaters filmmakers and producers might move on to another genre. You would be wrong. Every year brings us even more "animal gone wild" flicks, everything from sharks, octopi, whales, snakes, bears, rats, ants, birds, cats, dogs, dinosaurs, crocodiles, alligators, and genetic laboratory experiments gone horribly awry ripping their way through a fresh crop of hapless humans. If the creature in question has sharp teeth, claws, wings, talons, tentacles, and pincers expect to see the monster in question appear in a low budget, straight to video knockoff of "Jaws." Sure, there are elaborations to the standard plot lines, none of which significantly improves these rip-offs, but all of them owe a big debt to Steven Spielberg's film. For example, "Red Water" tries something a little different by having a freshwater shark terrorize people on a Louisiana River. It also inserts a plot thread about a gang of criminals recovering a stash of money from the riverbed. None of these ideas disguises what is really going on."Red Water" is the story of John Sanders (Lou Diamond Phillips), a down on his luck fisherman with an ex-wife, horrific memories of a disaster from his days as an oil drilling technician, and loans on his boat he can't afford to repay. At the same time Sanders dithers with the bank about his delinquent loan payments, a shark somehow manages to enter the river and promptly wreaks havoc on swimmers, fishermen, and anyone else who manages to get in the way. Sanders could care less about the shark, primarily because he doesn't know about it at first and also because his ex-wife Kelli (Kristy Swanson) just walked back into his life. She's a scientist working for some big oil company that is drilling for natural gas on the river, and she knows that John is an expert on this sort of thing. Whether you buy the idea that a scientist would go by the name "Kelli" is another matter. Sanders eventually agrees to help out when he learns that the oil executives will pay him handsomely for his troubles. After all, he'll do just about anything to bring in enough cash to keep his boat. What none of these people know is that they will run headlong into several sharks, one that swims and several that walk around on two legs.The movie switches focus long enough to tell us about some Jamaican criminal who lost a ton of money in the river when one of his underlings dropped the box containing the cash in the water while eluding the authorities. This guy hires some mercenary thug, along with a goon named Ice (Coolio), to go track down the subordinate in an effort to persuade him to reveal the location of the cash. And wouldn't you know it? The site just happens to lie right near the oilrig where Sanders and Kelli eventually show up! What follows is incredibly predictable: the criminals take over Sanders's vessel because they think these guys angling for the money, a disaster occurs on the rig that claims the lives of several workers, and the shark turns up to chow down on a few of the principals. How predictable is "Red Water"? Not only is there a Cajun chap helping out on Sanders's boat, we get a few scenes of a Cajun party complete with music and dancing. Just in case you aren't aware that you should laugh at these hicks, the script throws in a few lines comparing the party to "Deliverance." How clever and original is that? I'm starting to get real tired of seeing this sort of prejudice in films and television shows. If you put any minority group in the place of these Cajuns and did the same thing, the outcry would be deafening.It's not the overt prejudice of the Cajun scenes that sinks "Red Water"; it's everything else. The venerable Lou Diamond Phillips hasn't made a good film since...well...I can't recall, actually. I quit following his career after "The First Power." As for Kristy Swanson, I was surprised to see her here. I remember her star rising in the early to mid 1990s, but at some point she fell off the radar and, if "Red Water" is any indication, into B-movie purgatory. It's sad, really, because she's not that bad of an actress. Coolio, on the other hand, goes over the top in his role as a thug looking for some money. If I had known from the start that this guy was in the film, I wouldn't have watched it. Aside from the performances, or the lack thereof, the production values are low, the pace drags, and the film has the propensity to put the strangest dialogue in its characters' mouths. I really, really wish I had written down some of the odd lines uttered by Phillips's character. I remember watching the movie and thinking at the time, "I should write that down and use it later in a review." For some reason, I didn't. Probably because I just wanted this thing to end quickly.In another bizarre turn, the movie carries a 'R' rating even though there isn't much bloody carnage going on. The only extras on the disc, fortunately, are trailers for "Bats," "The Big Hit," and "Ride or Die." If you're really interested in watching creatures attack flicks, there are plenty of other bad movies to choose from, most of them unintentionally hilarious schlockfests that manage to entertain on some level. "Red Water" is too bland, too confused plot wise, and too full of actors on the downhill slide of their careers to be entertaining. If you decide to head up this river, good luck to you.
WARNING: Wrong Episode!. This item is supposedly titled "UFOs: The First Encounters." It is, however, an episode about reincarnation. It is incorrectly labeled. DO NOT PURCHASE unless you are looking for an episode on reincarnation
Does not do the book justice. Wuthering Heights the novel grabs you at the first page and drags you through passion, betrayal, madness, despair, greed, hatred, and revenge. It's not necessarily a pleasant read, but always an engrossing one. Emily Bronte's characters jump off the page and will continue to haunt you long after you've finished the book.Modern day moviemakers have had a notoriously bad time translating any of the Bronte sisters' works into film and this is no exception. The characters are representations in name only and fail to capture any of the true spirit behind this amazing book. Juliet Binoche and Ralph Fiennes are two of the best actors working in film today, but this movie is a definite low point for both.As Heathcliff and Catherine, Fiennes and Binoche seem to have failed to grasp the depth or the passions of the characters and their performances are flat and bland. Binoche's personality is too grounded and mature for the wild and carefree Cathy so she compensates with endless giggling that got on my nerves. Fiennes comes across as greasy and sullen instead of a tormented and complex soul; he simply does not have the charisma or the depth to play such a demanding role. The other characters are likewise lacking in realism, only Janet McTeer fares well, she is fabulous as Ellen Dean.Even if the acting were better, the story does not capture the essence of the book. Everything moves too quickly, the film jumps around frequently and large plot holes are left either unexplained or are patched quickly with a few brusque words. Sinead O'Conner's appearance as Emily Bronte to bookend the film is contrived and unnecessary.This film was very obviously made on a budget and the sets and costumes show it. The wigs are dreadful and the costumes are for the most part, ugly and unflattering. Fiennes actually looks potbellied in some of his vests!Maybe someday someone will make a film that does this remarkable book justice. This isn't it
Dead and Bloated. My SECOND review, as my first did not get printed (AS USUAL).  Anyway, I'll try to make this short and sweet.  I usually try and give credits to directors, producers, writers, and actors in most of my movie reviews; however, I'm going to make an exception here.  I've read other reviews that have called this gigantic turd "hilarious", "Night of the Living Dead + money + color", "wonderful for gorehounds", etc., etc., etc.  All I can say is it must not take much to please you people.This is, WITHOUT A DOUBT, the WORST excuse for a movie I've ever seen.  (My most humble apologies to Tobe Hooper and "Mortuary").  The whiners of horror movies are always moaning and groaning, "why don't critics take horror movies more seriously?".  Well, Einstein, here's a glowing example.  This is nothing but grade D trash:  horrible effects, horrible acting, horrible writing, horrible directing.  You name it; it's NOT in there.  This movie's most FEEBLE attempts at humor come off as just that:  feeble.  I bought this, together with "Dead and Breakfast", and I can't begin to tell you which one is worse.So, here's a little advice from me:  go check out a book at the library, buy a book, go to a REAL movie, have your hair done, have a manicure--do ANYTHING but waste your time on this gag-fest (for all the WRONG reasons) of a movie.  Another one that I would give ZERO stars to, if I could.
Bad Device. I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service
Cant watch. I downloaded this program and it was garbled and video as if played in slow motion.  This is the first of two downloads that didn't play.  I know it was not my computer because I did download three that played ok
What about the missing episodes. Why should one buy this series? What about the missing episodes? Are they going to be added later, or this is it? I cannot believe this. Would you buy a bicycle with a missing wheel? Or a keyboard without the C and R keys? I'd like Amazon to explain its customers what it plans to do..
Yikes and eww... I have friends who might be into this stuff, if only because they like the old and the strange. Me, I'm just like -- Is this "It's a Wonderful Life"?I think I might have enjoyed this more if it was a novel or maybe if I picked up the script. As it is, this just barely seems to translate into a movie, and--forgive me for I have my own opinion--"City of Angels" was a good movie. Too bad if you don't like all this "contemporary nonsense." I feel like it worked.My opinion: it's long, it's boring, it's hard to hear. Even if it has a message, I just can't relate to it. So maybe that's my problem.Your opinion: your own. keep it. you're lucky I gave it two stars
Not Happy. I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?
Really deserves 0 stars, but that's not a choice!. this movie sucks it sucks donkey balls. If you enjoyed this movie you should be shot you should be shot in the head. DIE YOU EVIL FANS OF THIS HORRIBLE MOVIE. Who the hell would put the time, money and effort into such a peice of junk. I suggest that everyone who was involved in the making of this &quot;movie&quot; should be rounded up and sent to consentration camps. I think this is the major problems of this world. This movie is the reason war exists. This movie is the reason people hate each other. please read this review and never watch that peice of crap
Unfunny. This is pathetic.  Vile language, inept writing, and silly casting.  Worst: This film just isn't funny.  It's a waste of Gene Wilder and Harrison Ford
Not the real thing. If you saw the original Broadway cast of Fosse perform, you would realize how sad this video really is. If you want to see real Fosse choreography, rent or buy one of his movies.
But Why is it Called Belly?. The American Dream is an appealing myth, no doubt. The idea that anybody can come from anywhere and strike it rich in America sounds great. The problem, as George Carlin put it, is that you have to be asleep to believe in it. So instead of representing opportunity for everybody it has become code for greed at all costs. And that is where "Belly" comes in, an ode to thug live and all the riches that come with it. This urban drama stars DMX (perpetually rapping), Nas, and Method Man and they would have you believe that they earned their cash by selling drugs and pimping as opposed to selling out to record companies. The story barely exists and seemed like a burden for the director who just wanted endless shots of people having sex and smoking drugs. When the plot does poke its head up I picked up on a criminal enterprise that moved shop from Queens to Omaha. Once there the cops get involved and people start getting shot. One couple tries to escape to Africa, but find it easier said than done. And Tommy (DMX) is sent on a mission to kill a minister. But really this film is about selling a lifestyle that doesn't even exist. Come on now, I've known drug dealers in my day, and they didn't live in large gaudy mansions . . . rap stars do. Rather they live in shacks or their parent's basement.If my response to the film seems lukewarm it is because it is. The directing by Hype Williams isn't that bad. He is able to capture some beautiful images and uses a few creative camera tricks. The lighting never seems quite right, but I'm gonna let that one slide. As a man who has always called for more sex and drugs in films I can hardly complain about their presence here. There people are living life to the fullest and are certainly not being weighed down by bourgeois conventions. All that said this film still fully deserves the big no vote that I am going to give it. As the most nihilistic person I know I am surprised to report that this one really seemed lost. Any image they could flash on the screen that would appeal to the wannabes in the audience was used. The N and F words are used to comedic proportions. Their palaces that represent their gluttony are turned into war zones and destroyed for no good reason. And then, on top of it all, we have to listen to the characters wax philosophical on how leading this life somehow places them on a higher plain than the rest of us. Sorry man, but just because you sell drugs instead of stocks doesn't make you any less slimy than those Wall Street hacks. You're still a businessman. This film is not worth watching. Any social point that is made is made accidentally, and any filmmaking skills the director may have are lost under his love fest for all things gangsta. **1/4
The creator of M*A*S*H wrote this?. I was surprised to see Larry Gelbart wrote the screenplay of this unfunny movie.  I can recall very few laughs in this film.  The premise of the film is to highlight the greed of the 1980's, but the lesson is quite dated in the era of Enron and WorldCom.  The greed here is apparent and at least honest and upfront, in contrast to the dishonesty and deception of some of the greed of the late 1990's.  As for the message, I certainly don't think the shareholders of RJR Reynolds minded being courted so well.  If I were a shareholder of a slumping company I'd be mighty grateful to live in a society where people have the freedom to pay whatever crazy price they want for my stock!  James Garner is wonderful in this show, and the movie does a nice job of laying out the business concepts in terms your grandmother can understand.  I do have to confess, however, to dozing a bit in the middle of this movie, so perhaps I missed the funny parts
Garbage pure and simple. This has got to be the absolutely the sickest bottom of the heap horror movie ever made. You have been warned
7 out of 100. Horrible. Q, the Winged Serpent was one of the worst movies I have even seen. I went into the film knowing it was a "B movie", but still wanting to be entertained. I was not entertained.For a 1982 film, the gore in Q, the Winged Serpent, probably shocked quite a few people. There is also a [...] scene that is quite enticing. But aside from these two points of note, the film offered little else, including entertainment.The acting was passable, but of course with such a dull story and script to flesh out, the OK acting goes to waste.Save your money. This is one of the worst movies ever made. There are far better B movies. It is the type of movie I would have liked in college in 1987, if I had been drunk and looking for laughs. But this is 2006, and there are better bad movies with better gore and nudity. You won't like Q, the Winged Serpent, at all. Even for the drunk college student, there are far better ways to spend 90 minutes. Stay away.Total Score (out of 100) = 72 (out of 50). Enjoyment. A rating based on my overall enjoyment of the film.4 (out of 10). Acting. How good was the acting?1 (out of 10). Immersion. Did the movie suck me into the story?0 (out of 10). Intangibles. Special effects. Movie pace. Is the movie forgettable, or something you will talk about and remember for weeks? Years?0 (out of 10). Must see. Is this movie worth seeing/renting?0 (out of 10). Must buy. Is this movie a must buy/purchase
UnBox video not yet working. Will not play once video was downloaded. I get the error message:  "can not play file, please try again later. error# 0x80040273" I made the exlusive give me call me back feature but the UnBox department was already closed, I was told the UnBox Saturday and Sunday 6-5 hours. I have to say I am impressed with the Call back feature. I downloaded the Unbox Beta now and am recieving email assistance to try to resolve the problem. Thanks Amazon UnBox! I will Update again - Feb. 10,200
Wonderful program, but flawed files... Okay, so to catch up on this exciting new series, I decided to try this revolutionary downloading program - Amazon Unbox!  I selected the first 10 episodes and hit Purchase.  Minutes later, I was watching the first episode, it came quickly, sounded great, and looked wonderful... however the second one was missing a few minutes at the end.  Forgiveable, until... whole episodes starting arriving incomplete or had missing video, making it incredibly frustrating and disappointing.But, this IS a good concept... unfortunately, Amazon has yet to verify all their own files for both audio and picture quality!  So, until the issue is fixed and paying customers recieve completed files or refunds... DO NOT try and download Season 1, Episodes 2, 4, 5, 6, and 7!!!  1, 3, 8, 9, and 10 were the only ones that were 100% complete for me
The Adventure of Sherlock Holmes' Smarter Brother. If you're a real Sherlock Holmes fan, this is not the movie you want to see! It's pretty dumb and not worth watching again
This is really misguided. I have seldom seen such a bad movie with so much talent.  (David Arquette, Stephen Baldwin, Mickey Rourke, etc.) One wonders what they saw in potential for this script or why they made choices to be involved.This horribly misguided film centers around a juvenile prank gone awry that ends up involving two bank-robbers who freak and there is enough gratuitous violence and mindless killing (and torture) to last me for the rest of my life.  The film starts out terribly boring and gets more mindless and boring as it concludes, perhaps expecting the violence to make up for the total lack of story.This is a disaster not worth enduring.  Save the actors and film-makers the embarrassment of seeing this film and see something else.
not even good. When I purchased devils rejects this movie came free. I watched it and hated it.Its about a sick individual who is on the internet trying to get women to come over for "a party" when they do he torchers them, with hooks piercings, the whole nine yards. After he is cought he is put into a mental institution. When he comes back as a nice guy the town people still want him dead. He gets beat up so slowly he tries to take on some of the town people 1 by 1. Now he then goes back for the girl that escaped and well doesnt live because her father kills him. Its not a good movie at all
Underwhelming, to say the least. I've enjoyed more than my fair share of Sundays in suspense about whether the Jets would cover 3 1/2 and so on, so I suppose I had reasonably high expectations for some entertainment when approaching this movie.  Of course, I should know by now, that's a terrible way to approach a 'film' with Matthew McConaughey in it.  It's also not a good way to approach a film that looks on the surface like another chance for Pacino to phone it in and laugh all the way to the bank.Let's not speak of Rene Russo's typically superfluous and embarrassing presence, ok?, this sentence excepted.Why is it bad?  Let's start with the acting.  I've known sugared-up 3rd graders with more pathos potential than McC.  He's fair enough during the "aw, shucks" portion of the flick, which survives through much of the first act, but by the times things start rolling and he has to turn into Mr. pr**k it's all over.He also suffers by comparison to Pacino, or course, at least at first.  After a few minutes on screen though it's clear Pacino's just doing his 'hey I'll see how over the top I can make this' thing that he's been doing for 15 years and the scenes become mutually embarrassing.  And I said we wouldn't speak of Russo.  The deligtfully slimy Jeremy Piven, who's at home in a movie like this, of course is relegated to a C story and about 7 minutes of screentime.Let's also talk about the script.  I don't expect much from movies like this, but I do expect some exploration of and exposure to the subsection of society they're covering.  But aside from a few rushed conversations in Mc's office we don't really get to the meat of sports gambling, we don't really see everyday gamblers living and dying on every possession like happens, you know, in real life.  I wanted more of that.  Another problem with the story is that it gets wrapped up in a love triangle plot...Hollywood, I know we have to try our best to make this a date movie, but next time at least make the triangle a believable and interesting one.Is there anything else?  Yeah, but I've already wasted too many words on this film.  Avoid it..
What a waste!. I have to say that even though Teti Hatcher's performance was good the movie itself was terrible. The plot was pretty dumb and the situations that take place in the movie are not believable. I can;t believe I wasted my money on this one
"Rumor Has It" Perpetuates A Gender Double Standard Asking You to Embrace A Character That You Would Loathe If It Were A Man. I know that the critical reception to "Rumor Has It" was very chilly, but something about the idea of the film really appealed to me.  The concept, the plot conceit, is a genuinely clever notion. Being a fan of "The Graduate," I was interested to see how well they would integrate the "characters" of that film with the "real life" counterpoints in this film.  I mean, come on, Shirley MacLaine representing Mrs. Robinson and Kevin Costner as Ben Braddock--seems like a great idea!  But, alas, when all is said and done--an amusing and well conceived setup did not equal a satisfying movie experience, for me.Jennifer Aniston returns to her Pasadena homestead with her new fiance, played by Mark Ruffalo.  Plagued with doubts about her engagement, and seemingly disengaged from any real affection for her own family, she hears a rumor that leads her to suspect that the book and film of "The Graduate" were based on her deceased mother's experiences.  Confirming that her grandmother (MacLaine) was indeed the "Mrs. Robinson" character, she deduces that her mother had a fling prior to marrying her father.  Thus, with the notion that she might be the daughter of this man--she sets off to find the truth.  Encountering Costner, as the potential daddy and "Ben Braddock" character, she discovers truths about herself and her family.All of this plays out very routinely, but the supporting actors are engaging and comfortable.  It's always great to see MacLaine, but she offers nothing new or inventive in this performance--it's the standard brassy MacLaine persona we've come to expect.  Costner continues to embrace his middle-aged status and has, thus, developed into a far more interesting actor than he used to be.  (But for a more nuanced and astute role, check him out in "The Upside of Anger" with the luminous Joan Allen.)  And Mark Ruffalo, a great serious actor, continues to play lightly as a romantic leading man.  Recently cast with Witherspoon, Garner, and now Aniston in lightweight fluff--I do miss the more challenging roles he used to take on.But it is Aniston's character, to me, that is a despicable movie creation--one that I've seen all too frequently, but this one is supposed to be endearing.  Born into a life of privilege, she has accomplished nothing in her 30+ years and has become a self-involved and unpleasant "Woman-child."  She floats through her sister's wedding as if it's all some great inconvenience.  She doesn't think twice about mistreating a man who loves her.  She never acts on anything that doesn't blatantly promote her own self-interest.  I'm just so tired of it--it's not charming.  Don't get me wrong--there are plenty of "Man-child" movies too (more so, even) about men who still act as if they were adolescent.  But, think about those movies--the "Man-child" is an object of scorn and ridicule, we laugh at him.  But "Rumor Has It" doesn't ask you to laugh at Aniston's social ineptitude and selfishness--far from it--we're supposed to embrace it and identify with her as a real person.  Well, frankly, I wished everyone in Aniston's life would abandon her because of her behavior so that she'd learn to grow up.  But, of course, this is wish fulfillment--and she learns about life while retaining everything of value--there is never any consequence to being a nasty person.This gender double standard really bothers me, and the fact that I genuinely disliked the central character--obviously, I didn't care for this film.  Otherwise it would have been a fairly generic picture, but these two things caused me to feel strongly and negatively.  I am giving it an extra star for a good idea, but unfortunately, it didn't pan out for me.   KGHarris, 01/07
Femme Fatales or Very Lame?. Terrible direction, terrible writing, it almost feels like the director didn't know what he was working with. Although this movie wanted to be in the same race and quality of the movie CLUE, it fails to realize that the plot and characters are incredibly riculous and not funny ha ha but funny stupid. It was a total watse of good celluloid
Missing Nite Life Sucks. I wish I had read further in the reviews, if I had known that the song 'I Love The Nite Life' had been replaced I would never have bought the film. It is very limp without this...shame, shame, shame! This should be mentioned so that folks can make a more informed decision, instead of wasting money
Woefully Embarrassing. This is not just a bad Woody Allen film. This is a bad, boring, dull-witted film, period. I have to assume that Woody is now just completely senile (as he comes across in the film) and his handlers are walking him through the film production. Then slapping the Allen name on the front to sell a few tickets.Scarlett Johanssan, hardly much of an actor in the first place, comes across as stiff as an illiterate attempting read her lines from cue cards. And Woody, ouch, his timing is so far off I have to assume he missed a Daylight Savings Time switch somewhere.Unless you're a seriously committed masochist, don't waste your time or money on this disaster
Bad Device. I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service
Did not work. The ones that are posted twice do not work. If they are posted once, you can try to download it, but it might not work. The video only worked for about a minute. Shame, since I really like this show and I wanted Amazon Unbox to be cool. The one cent CSI works, go download tha
A gun shot in the Belly. Hype Williams is the greatest music video director of all time.This, however, does not automatically mean the transition to film is going to be a good one.The movie is not good. I don't know if it's supposed to be a black Scarface or what, but it's really bad.Rappers are not known for their Oscar-worthy work, and Nas and DMX are no exception. DMX has charisma, but he needs to work on remembering he's reciting lines, not rapping.I love T-boz, but she needs to stick to her day job.Taral Hicks is a good actress, but her talents are wasted here. I don't buy her as a bad girl.I know The Godfather was an inspiration for Hype, but his attempt to give the movie a dark tint backfired. He made it too dark. Everytime I see the movie, I mistakenly think I'm looking at a bootleg or something.Hype should start over in film by directing material written by someone else
A Disturbance It Was Made. If a "suspense" filmed was played in the woods, and it didn't actually contain any suspense, would a bear watch it?The previous sentence makes about as much suspense as the reason behind making "Domestic Disturbance", the newest `thriller' starring John Travolta, Vince Vaughn and Teri Polo.Let's talk for a few minutes about Mr. Travolta. Can anyone name an actor who has received more chances in his career and squandered them? I think that Travolta has now surpassed Richard Dreyfuss as the comeback/ lose it again king. After a brilliant comeback engineered by his longtime admirer Quentin Tarantino in "Pulp Fiction", Travolta appeared in a number of films that were interesting and proved interesting choices. "Face/Off" and "Broken Arrow" highlighted a string of hits that ultimately allowed Travolta to join the $20 million club. In the last few years, every film Travolta has appeared in has failed miserably. "Lucky Numbers"? "The General's Daughter"? That film was a hit but can anyone even remember one significant scene from it? "Swordfish"? Interesting, but a flop. "Battlefield Earth"? Why does he keep making this trash? It has to be the paychecks. I can't see any other conceivable reason. John, baby, how long before the studios realize that these films aren't making any money and they stop hiring you? John, baby, how long before you need another comeback vehicle?Frank Morrison (John Travolta) is a divorced father who makes wooden boats. He doesn't get a lot of business, but the business that he does get gets a great deal. He doesn't charge his customers enough to make a profit. Frank does this because HE IS THE GOOD GUY. His son, Danny (Matthew O'Leary) has a lot of problems accepting his mom's (Teri Polo) new relationship with Rick Barnes (Vince Vaughn). He gets into a lot of trouble and lies to everyone. A couple of days after his mom and Rick get married, he stows away in Rick's car and witnesses him murdering a business associate. The police don't believe him however. After a little soul searching, Frank believes his son. He may lie to everyone, but he doesn't lie to Frank.Directed by Harold Becker ("Sea of Love"), "Domestic Disturbance" is a suspense film without any suspense. From the moment Danny stows away in Rick's car and WATCHES HIM MURDER Ray (Steve Buscemi), which we also watch, we know who the good guy is and who the bad guy is. To make matters worse, Frank instantly believes his son, which means that the film boils down to a cat and mouse game between Frank and Rick. A boring cat and mouse game. When you know the identity of the villain, a huge percentage of the suspense is flushed down the toilet. When Frank believes Danny early on, the rest of the suspense is flushed down with it.The film would've been greatly improved by showing Danny in the backseat of the car, watching everything, the pain and suspense registering on his face, while the audience sees nothing. Then, when Danny tries to convince his dad, the police chief, his mom, that Rick is a murderer, at least we haven't seen the act, and we would require some convincing as well.Because the filmmakers chose to show us everything, the next logical step to provide some suspense would be to have Frank doubt Danny, his son. However, after a very brief segment, Frank believes Danny, causing us to watch a battle between Frank and Rick, which isn't very interesting.Each of the actors, including Travolta, are serviceable in their roles, but because the film robs us of just about everything in the first fifteen minutes, the remaining ninety become an exercise in tedium.Skip "Domestic Disturbance". It isn't even worthy of a video rental. Go to see the far superior and very different "Amelie" or "The Man Who Wasn't There". Your money will be much better spent.
ATTENTION: Friday freaks. If anyone can tell me where i can get the UNCUT versions of these films please email taylor5821@hotmail.comCheersMick
This is Horrible. I love the Avatar and I was so thrilled that amazon allows people to download it except the only problem is I've been trying for the past days and darn it all, it's not working!!! It's not as if I'm downloading it for free. I am willing to pay and yet it just wouldn't go through!!! I think it's better to just buy the dvds...I think it's absolutely horrible to tease customers like that..
2 1/2 stars - I'm sure it was more exciting in the early 70's. I guess I missed the point. I can see how this film could be considered a horror "classic". I'm sure the violence was ground breaking in 1972... in fact, one of the comments in the "making of" on this dvd was that teenagers were actually throwing up in the theatres. I don't think it's a well done film overall... it's lacking in story, music, direction, and suspense. The acting is not too bad, but could have been more intense and believable in some scenes. If I was craving some good 1970's horror, I'd rather watch "I Spit on Your Grave" or "The Texas Chainsaw Massacre"
Warning Incomplete Episode!!!. The episodes in this series have an average running time of 50 minutes. This one happens to be only 18 minutes. This mean sthat the file abruptly stops right in the middle. Even though it only cost me $2 I still got jipped.  Let's hope Amazon can iron out these kinds of problems before they get this service farther underway. Be careful enough to sheck the running times to be sure they seem accurate before you buy them
Not worth $107. I purchased my version of El Hazard from a zShop for 19 bucks and I am SO glad that I did.That said, the first series is worth watching for two main reasons: overt lesbianism and Jinnai. The former is self-explanatory while the latter (Jinnai) is without a doubt the best character in the series (despite the fact that he is the antagonist). You can't say that any of the characters are very deep or well developed, but throughout the first series Jennai is by far the most satisfyingly fleshed-out character, as well as the most ammusing and true to his nature. This superiority is all the more appearant when he is contrasted with story's main character who is shallowly developed and in no way engaging.And this is what makes the second series (all four dismal episodes) so tragic: they nerfed Jinnai. He could never have been called a genius in the first series, but he was decidedly intelligent, cool, pragmatic, supremely self-confident and an effective leader (even though he was also manic and delusional). In El Hazard II, as if in response to the world recoiling at the sight of a humorous though competent villain, they have turned Jinnai into a slapstick-idiot persuing his increasingly nebulous ambition with foolish abandon.I suggest purchasing El Hazard through...alternate means,... watching the first series and discarding the second. Let's face it: even lesbian humor gets old when the writing sucks and the characters are empty
Pervasive Silicone Enhancement. Flat lighting, cheap sets and costumes, dull dialog, wooden acting, and a goofy plot; even pervasive silicone enhancement can not save this movie.  Zero stars should be an option.  For more inspired soft porn, check out the work of Andrew Blake (andrewblake.com)
Not happy. This is only a portion of this episode.  It cuts off in the middle of a sentence
Great Movie, Lousy Video. I was 11 when I first saw Black Sunday.  It was very scarey and I thought about it nightly for months.  I think Barbera Steele was my first love.I enjoyed the movie very much - as a reminder of times past.  However, the video was terrible.  The sound was slightly better than terrible.  I'd have paid more for a better quality video.  I wonder if the expensive DVD has the same issues as the VCR tape
Where is the old hunter Buldeo?. The best of Rudyard Kipling's Jungle Book stories took place in the man village because that's where Mowgli meets a superstitious old hunter named Buldeo.   Buldeo claims that the tiger Shere Khan is supernatural,  the ghost of a wicked old money lender.  When Mowgli says that Shere Khan is only a very disagreeable tiger Buldeo threatens to spank our young hero.When Buldeo learns that Mowgli has a vendetta with the tiger and a black panther as his personal body guard the old man tells the other villagers that Mowgli is a demon child who is able to turn himself from a boy to a wolf, and back to a boy at will.  This is great story telling.  But where is Buldeo?  He isn't in the movie at all!  It's like leaving the Wicked Witch out of the movie version of "The Wizard of Oz".On a side note, in the Kipling stories the black panther Bagheera has a secret so shameful he can tell no one but Mowgli.   Bagheera was born in a zoo, chained and keep in a cage for the amusement of men.  But rather than blame Mowgli for the cruelty he suffered in captivity Bagheera sees the boy as a kindred spirit.  They were both separated from their own kind at an early age.  Once we have that bit of information the relationship between the boy and the panther makes sense.   We are able to understand Bagheera's total devotion to the Mowgli.  But the movie never explains that.  I realize that the movie shouldn't follow the book completely.   But since the book was so much richer the movie seemed like a let down
WHO'S THAT KNOCKING IN THE WOODS. THE TOMMYKNOCKERS is one of the more unsuccessful of Stephen King adaptations to hit the screen.  Originally a 1993 tv miniseries, the movie suffers from lackluster direction, mediocre performances and no sense of true suspense or horror.  Typically set in a homey little New England town, the plot centers on the discovery of a mysterious object in the woods by a local writer (Marg Helgenberger) who along with her alcoholic poet boyfriend(a poorly cast Jimmy Smits) decides to keep it a secret until the whole thing is unearthed.  Meanwhile, a ghostly green light emits from the object, causing the townspeople to go bonkers in one form or another, whether it be by inventing stupid gadgets or wandering around with glowing green eyes.  At three hours, THE TOMMYKNOCKERS definitely overstays its welcome and that is one problem in watching a miniseries in one take; it can become redundant.  Tighter direction and a more focused cast could have helped but aside from John Ashton, EG Marshall and Joanna Cassidy in supporting roles, most of the performances seem phone in, and Traci Lords is ridiculously hilarious as the postal slut.  A real misfire
Mild Things -- Lame pun for a lame movie. What does WILD THINGS 2 have going against it from the get-go:A) No Denise Richards  B) No name actors  C)Being a crappy direct-to-video sequel  D)No Denise Richards NAKED . . .What is wrong with WILD THINGS 2 after the fact:A)A script that tries to overcompensate its idiocy with more twists than a corkscrew  B)ONE sex scene -- A (weak) threesome, one of the few things even linking this to the original C)Sexy actresses who star in a sexy movie but decide not to be naked (leaving us with a body double and naked-from-behind shot) . . . Wait let me play that again!If I seem to be dwelling a little too much on the sexuality aspects of this film maybe its because this is an EROTIC THRILLER.Did I mention no Denise Richards?
Chomsky on Chomsky. I recently bought this DVD and was really looking forward to seeing it. Halfway I stopped watching it. Disappointing
Great film, lousy print. It's difficult to figure why anybody would bother using a poor 16mm print to transfer to DVD when there must be good 35mm prints out there, but this is another case of showcasing a very poor 16mm print. Otherwise, this is an excellent madcap film, but it doesn't start cooking until the Edgar Kennedy bartender scene, and Kennedy was absolutely masterful. From this scene on, the rest of the film is a romp. There was much luck with the sequences with Jacky the lion, so Sturges must have lived a charmed life. All the performances shine
Beware of Unbox!!!. Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for
Disappointing. I was expecting much more from this video. It did have kids doing poses, but it was hard to find the 13 year-old. Some of the circle games looked like they might  be fun.   I wanted to show  it to my third grade class, but I don't think it would hold their interest.  All in all I felt I was watching someone's home video of their family doing yoga
Refund Please. If I knew, at the time I saw this movie, that a lot of theaters give back refunds...I sure would have gotten one.  At least the popcorn was good!  Since I love Adrien Brody, I will give him another chance......This movie was nuts.  Skipping between scenes, you really had to be on your toes to figure out what in the world was happening.
I love to dance. I'm writing this for my seven year old grandaughter --she loves this DVD- she twirls and bounces and dances all the way thru it -- it transports her to an imaginary stage where she is the star-- I love watching her enjoy this dvd!!
Warning Incomplete Episode!!!. The episodes in this series have an average running time of 50 minutes. This one happens to be only 18 minutes. This mean sthat the file abruptly stops right in the middle. Even though it only cost me $2 I still got jipped.  Let's hope Amazon can iron out these kinds of problems before they get this service farther underway. Be careful enough to sheck the running times to be sure they seem accurate before you buy them
Is it OK for child actors to portray sex scenes?. Like so many others, this movie struck a raw nerve with me regarding the graphic detail that was enacted by then 12 year old Jena Malone.  Although the movie has a point to make about child abuse and sexual abuse, I, as the mother of a 13 year old, can not understand how another mother could stand by and watch her child being filmed in such graphic detail.  I could not watch the whole movie as the car scene was so disturbing I turned it off.  What is the difference between a child being molested, and a child actor who is sitting in the lap of a grown man?  Why are the laws different for Jena?  Yes, these types of movies have a point to make, but sacrificing the innocence of another child is not the way to do it
Nice idea but too slow to be enjoyable. I wonder if bad subtitles ruined the film but it was SO PAINFULLY SLOW I found it impossible to sit through. I wonder if it picked up but I couldn't tolerate it. It's also unbelievable past the normal suspension of disbelief. OK there's one guy with deep thoughts but everyone else has deep thoughts and/or is a maniac? Can't anyone have a blank mind like Homer Simpson
What's up with that?. I wish I had read the other reviews first.  Though the quality of the episode and the video are top notch, the episode cuts off after 22 minutes.  Obviously, I already know the ending of "The Black Death", but I still wanted to see the full show
Disappointment. I was expecting it to be scary, richly textured and ambient. However, the low budget quality of the film creates many boundaries. Something as simple as the lack of makeup on any of the actors is...distracting. This movie is not compelling and is not scary. The story is predictable. This is not a movie you "think" about after you watch it. I would recommend this only to those who love the genre
Definitive portrayal of generation X (for what that's worth). Many reviewers and critics said it best...what do you do when the "hero" of the film (Ethan Hawke) is a complete a---hole, Winona Ryder is a horrid documentarian that would give Ed Wood, Jr. a run for his money, and Stiller, who is supposed to be the bad guy, actually isn't that bad of a human being?  And Winona's friends are the smarmy, arrogant, Generation X punks who think they know everything (when the reality is (forgive the pun) they don't know jack).  Past generations would quote Tolstoy and Shakespeare, Generation X quotes TV commercials, Scooby Doo cartoons, Star Wars, and bad sitcoms.  Generation X is probably the most insincere generation ever, detaching themselves and calling themselves "ironic", when all they really do is indulge in pretentious pseudo-intellectualism.   Is this film an accurate portrayal of them?  Yes, in some ways.  Is the film worth watching?  Yeah, at least once.  Stiller gives a decent performance, it's nicely shot, and Garofalo actually almost gives her slacker character depth.  This is probably due to the fact that Garofalo actually has some substance herself, as opposed to the character she plays.Check it out more as an artifact of its time more than a cool film.
This version is a very bad "remake" of a very good film. Greetings to one and all.  Just wanted you to know that if you are looking for a pretty good film called "The Desperate Hours," this is NOT the one you want to watch. You want to watch the 1955 version with Humphrey Bogart and Fredric March. This is the 1990 "remake" with Mickey Rourke and Anthony Hopkins. The original is a taunt drama in which a man discovers that his home has been invaded and his family taken hostage by a trio of gangster escaped from prison and focuses on his desperate attempts to save their lives. This remake is exercise in terror in which the sadistic violence of the criminals becomes the driving force of the story and the goal is to see how far they will go before they are finally stopped. On paper you would have thought Anthony Hopkins could do a marvelous job in the role of the father, but the script pretty much makes that impossible. Turning the bad guy into a major league psychotic just destroys the psychological chess game that made the original so compelling. Rourke is simply the wrong choice for the role, always coming across as a sick punk rather than a criminal menace, but then few actors are going to be able to play against Hopkins, even when he is in low gear. I cannot believe anybody would watch this film twice; I only watched it because I was interested to see how they updated the original, the ending of which I just watched again on television. Of course the ending would be more violent, but it was the elegance of the ending of the original, as the hero saves his family with an unloaded gun, that made it stand out. This one is just a splatter flick dressed up a bit to fool you. Go check out the original because like Rourke's character, you do not want this in your house anywhere near your family
Dismayingly bad. It's not just that If lucy Fell is a bad film. 90% of what comes out of Hollywood is uninspired, formulaic dross just like it, and usually you can just shrug it off and forget about it. What makes this movie memorably, remarkably bad is writer/director/star Eric Schaeffer's nauseatingly immense sense of self-regard, which arises from every frame like the stench of yesterday's roadkill. The mere fact that the photogenically-challenged Mr. Schaeffer should have the likes of Elle MacPherson tell him he's "cute" speaks volumes
not what I was looking for. This movie concentrates on Cobb as a bitter old drunk desperately trying to get his life story told from his point of view.  I expected to see more scenes from when he was playing ball, but sadly there is really only one scene that showed his legendary hitting and baserunning....and that scene is very short and quite poor.  If you are interested in what Cobb was like as an old angry man, go for it.  If you are interested in Cobb as the greatest offensive ballplayer ever.....skip this one in a hurry.  Other than that, I thought the movie - on its own merits as a movie - was pretty lousy.  I regret buying it
Cant watch. I downloaded this program and it was garbled and video as if played in slow motion.  This is the first of two downloads that didn't play.  I know it was not my computer because I did download three that played ok
A great B-Movie. Many have seen this movie on TV many times. For a B-movie it is great fun and interesting to watch. No extras on the DVD. I wish they did add something from behind the scenes, etc
Didn't work. I downloaded the player and this episode as part of a promotion that gave a free episode. Not only did I get charged, but when I cancelled the download to contact about the charge - I was told I had to finish downloading before they could refund. Once it finished downloading, it didn't play anyway. I gave up.
Swept From the Sea. I hated, hated, hated, hated this movie. It didn't make sense to me. To depresssing
Not great. I wanted to see a romantic and touching movie.  This movie is contrived. The character that Reeve plays acts like a star-struck groupie.  Personally, I don't find his behavior to be romantic.  He seems like he is just like a groupie that is really excited that this actress is interested in him.  This is not romantic to most women nowadays.  He is not suave in the role he is playing.  It seems like a cheesy 70's contrived romance that does a bad job of it
Dont get "Fiji" final week ... Dont dwnld " Survivor, "Thunderstorms & Sacrifice" ". Its my fault for not reading the whole thing. you would think that the last episode would be the finale , but NO, its just a 10 minute recap going to the finale 4. I didnt even get a full 45 minute episode. No finale. I got rippped off. $1.99 dwnld not well spent. Dont bother dwnldng any episode of fiji if you dont know the ending. Because they dont have that episode, not even the reunion show
Missing episodes. This series is being sold with missing episodes, like many others here in Unbox. Do they think their customers are so dumb? Would you buy a DVD series with a missing DVD? What sense does this make? What a disappointment this service is..
Cant watch. I downloaded this program and it was garbled and video as if played in slow motion.  This is the first of two downloads that didn't play.  I know it was not my computer because I did download three that played ok
WARNING: Wrong Episode!. This item is supposedly titled "UFOs: The First Encounters." It is, however, an episode about reincarnation. It is incorrectly labeled. DO NOT PURCHASE unless you are looking for an episode on reincarnation
Just a bit too much. Barry Longyear's story is perfect. This movie could have been but what was that bull at the end with the whips and factory slaves and that stuff? They should have ended the movie as the story ended and not added that last bit. That totally ruined the movie for me. The novella and its sequel at least give humanity the benefit of a doubt; the war is over and there is an uneasy peace and humanity, if love doesn't prevail, at least strives to be better. In the movie, they made humans brutal savages in the way they treated the Dracs. Did we learn NOTHING from the USA's foray into slavery and brutality? IT seemed that a violent ending was gratuitously grafted onto the movie to make it more palatable to the 13-18 year old testosterone crown, thereby destroying what could have been as perfect a film as the novella was perfect. But, when has Hollywood ever gotten it right? They usually find some way to shoot themselves in the foot.
Not Happy. I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?
Why did they bother..... I am a Van Damme fan and still hold out for the day when he makes a return to the big screen. I bought this recently and now wish I hadn't. Unfortunatly with this entry it seems Van Damme has decided to self-destruct what remains of his career. I hope he made this during his drug addiction years, if not, then I think he has received one to many kicks to the head and should consult a doctor. Very predictable throughout which by no means is a bad thing if only the film was enjoyable and didn't treat its audience as if they were 10 year olds. Logic seems to have been thrown out the window along with the two page script. Rent this before parting with your hard earned cash if only to see the fight scene in the lapdancing club! Van Damme has shown some glimmer of hope with Desert Heat and Replicant but I think the good old days of Kickboxer, Timecop, Universal Soldier and Sudden Death are long over
superficial, stereotypical view of Bosnian war. This flick has all the sophistication of a music video. It is basically an excuse for the director to show guys getting drunk and shooting off guns in a village in flames at night time, while Yugoslav rock music blares. The relationship between the Serb and Muslim boyhood-friends-turned-enemies should be the crux of the movie but it is never adequately explored.It is no different than every other movie on the Bosnian war, with the exception of No Man's Land. It does not show the geopolitical situation of the time or the machinations of elites but rather assumes the bloodshed was the result of ancient or grassroots ethnic hatreds. Obviously there were "ordinary" Croatians, Serbians, and some Bosniacs involved in atrocities, but this is only part of the story.I got the feeling that this is the kind of movie made by a director who spent the early 1990s in Germany.
Not Happy. I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?
Cant watch. I downloaded this program and it was garbled and video as if played in slow motion.  This is the first of two downloads that didn't play.  I know it was not my computer because I did download three that played ok
2 Stars for Carly. Carly Simon's the only one worth watching on this DVD,but she's only in  the film for 69 seconds,and her only line is "I read that Sh-t you wrote about me."and thats what this movie i
Why the Charge. Curious as to why Amazon would charge for this content when CBS offers it for free on the official Survivor Website.  Yeah, at the CBS site you have sit through 4 commercials, but it is worth it to not have to download any extra programs
AMAZON SUCKS. I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!
Not for people who jiggle. I'm overweight and was looking for something with more cardio/aerobics than what I had so I could burn some fat. This video is not for anyone with flab. You'll be jiggling all over and tripping on your feet. This is for people who want to tone, not lose weight. It's also very bad for people that aren't super coordinated. I got frustrated and turned it off after ten minutes. There is no teaching or steps to show you the moves, she just jumps right in at full speed and leaves you behind wondering what the hell is going on
M Night takes some suckers for a ride AGAIN... In case you're wondering, the aforementioned 'suckers' are anybody who paid to see this movie..and i dont mean just in a theater...i count myself in because it cost me $3.79 at my video store! Looking back, i should have given that money to a homeless person, then went home and stared at a wall while playing suspenseful music! I would have gotten the same effect of watching this pretentious piece of garbage!This GUY SUCKS!! Seriously, his talent level should place him as a writer for the SCI-FI channel...maybe he could write a few decent outer limits or twilight zone episodes??..but he is in over his head when it comes to big-budget movies...and where the F did the budget go? Has the the price of 'monster suits' (signs anyone?) increased to the multimillion dollar range? My guess is he pocketed half of it and the other half went to the unwitting actors who's agents suckered them into this sham of a film. If you read the 'quotes n trivia' on Amazon's link you will find that (a) Kirsten Dunst bailed out on this sinking ship (good thinking girl) and (b) Sigourney Weaver had nightmares after she read the script...obviously she had already committed..SPOILER....Short summary of the INCREDIBLY unfeasible plot: A bunch of people from the city who have had deaths in the family do the logical thing and go live in a wildlife preserve (although we see no animals in it), undetected by authorites , long enough to raise children, whom they traumatize into never leaving the village by dressing in monster suits and other scary tricks. Anyone ever seen a Scooby-Doo episode? Then 1 guy stabs another and they send a BLIND girl (with 2 guys we never saw before who wimp out immediately) to go get medicine through the forbidden forest (how she is supposed to acquire multiple-stab wound effective medicine is up to her)..but the 1st guy she meets gets it for her no problem and helps her back over the wall into the park! And the cult lives on...seriously..thats the plot.I've read that he stole this plot from the book 'running out of time'...not to mention the scooby-doo thing, or his camera style which he takes from hitchcock...this guy is a hack folks
Ponderous. Welcome to Bucharest where Zachary (David Gunn) the vampire killer has come to hunt the creatures that turned the woman he loved into a monster he had no choice but kill.  This time his objective is Ash (Jonathan Morris), a master vampire who maintains his tribe in the secret Bucharest underground while operating a very high toned nightclub as a lure for new 'blood.'What Zachary doesn't count on is his attraction for Sofia (Kirsten Cerre), a beautiful American pianist who has come to Bucharest to perform and who has become the object of Ash's desires.  Not only must Ash deal with Zachary's attempts to destroy his nest and reclaim Sofia, he has political problems among his own vampire servants.Welcome to a film where everyone speaks as if they used to have a Romanian accents and only saw the scripts a week ago.  The is a kind of heavy handed lack of emotionality about this film as vampires announce their intent to destroy each other with almost no inflection in their voices.While this is a pretty film to watch, with lots of midnight scenes of Bucharest, the moodiness of the cinematography and the score are not matched by the acting.  Obligatory scenes with fake blood and frontal nudity give the work a sense of awkwardness that Director Ted Nicolaou never quite manages to overcome
Dull and boring. This 'Trick' should refund your money... Like most indie gay themed movies, "Trick" had quite a bit of buzz around it. A terrific movie with Tori Spelling! How could I not love it?  I loved "Die Mommy, Die!", "Girls Will Be Girls", and "Jeffrey". So I gotta love this too, right? Right??I found it cloyingly sweet and completely out of touch with reality. A hot go-go boy wants to hook up with a nerdy dweeb?Uh... why??So they spend the whole evening looking for a place to get busy.  And then it's one contrived situation after another getting in the way of their plans.  As much as I can't stand Tori Spelling's "acting", she's the only performer not phoning it in. (Maybe she had an extra espresso before the shoots?)  What little life there is in this movie, it owes it to her.The problem is that both male leads are incredibly dull and not that good looking.  The "sizzling" dancer looked like bored monkey. And the soft, sensitive Gabriel has no personality. Why these two people continue to want to have sex with each other after six hours of roadblocks is a complete mystery.  I guess if go-go boy dropped the zero and found another guy (which wouldn't be too much of an effort for him), there wouldn't be much of a movie.A cameo by Miss Coco Peru is a nice treat.  But she's lit so unflatteringly and gives a monologue so ghoulish, you'd think she was in a different movie.High expectations, very low gratification. Honestly, skip it
Eh. Bland, bland, and more bland.It seemed to be trying for some kind of emotional resonance, and fell far short of the mark.  With the except on the main character's mother, nearly every single character was completely unlikeable.  And a little Lea Delaria goes a long, long way.It does replicate the 80s very well, but it just feels so devoid of humanity
Cliche ridden, "worst of kung fu" waste of time!. With all due respect to different tastes, I found Five Deadly Venoms lethally boring. I thought the dialog was trite and incoherent, the humor lame and predictable, the martial arts stunts and display average to bad. The plot lack subtlety, imagination or surprise and although some of the sets and costumes looked authentic, I could not finish this loser. Perhaps it was better than bad when it first came out, but hard to watch after more recent kung fu fare.
YUCK. THE DESCRIPTION OF THIS MOVIE IS VERY INTERESTING....DONT FALL FOR IT. THE ACTIONS DESCRIBED HAPPEN- DONT GET ME WRONG; BUT IN A PLODDING AND TALENTLESS WAY. THE SUBTITLES MOVE VERY FAST AND INTERFERES WITH YOUR ABILITY TO ACTUALLY " SEE " THE MOVIE. ACTING VERY SUB PAR AND STORY NOT DISTINCTIVE ENOUGH TO MAKE IT WORTH RECOMMENDING TO A FRIEND OR WATCHING AGAIN
NOT the Original Version. This has already been expressed here in the reviews, but just as a reminder one more time..... this DVD is NOT the original version.  The original version has more material and is much better.  Hopefully someday they'll release an Unrated Version the way it was on VHS at one time.
Cant watch. I downloaded this program and it was garbled and video as if played in slow motion.  This is the first of two downloads that didn't play.  I know it was not my computer because I did download three that played ok
Unable to review. Unable to see the movie. Received the original shipment, and later a replacement, and both had the same defects and we were unable to watch the movie
AWFUL. This terrible movie has singing!  Bad singing, and lots of it!  Overacted, trite, and BORING!  All those good reviews, I thought it would be campy and cool, but it's NOT!
Painful to watch... Another product of Hollywood's "Karaoke Culture".  In an age where we see cinematic remakes of every kind, we have in "U-571" an outrageous attempt to borrow from the success and acclaim of "Das Boot".  But instead of a gripping war drama that reveals the tragic waste of war, we get a cheap flag-waving pile of Hollywood propaganda. The lighting, camera angles and claustrophobic set are obviously inspired by DB. But the bigoted innacuracies (German submariners machine gunning helpless sailors) and absurd scenarios (an incredibly lucky stern shot sinks a destroyer in hot pursuit) put this ridiculous movie in its own category. U-571 is just another thin, over-promoted, throw-away movie you'll forget the day after you see it
Ewwww that smell... this stinks...Buy Flying Daggers, [just plain] HERO, or buy Fong Sai Yuk at an online retailer..
Uncle Tom's Cabin - Review by Trish New. A catalyst for the civil war, Uncle Tom's Cabin gives vivid details on the living conditions of the black slaves. The book's literary worth lies in the fact that people can make a difference by speaking out, and by preserving a kind of fictional history of the African American's pain, despite being redundant, rube and rife with tautology. The story is about Tom, a slave who saves his master's daughter and is promised his freedom. But his master dies before Tom is actually freed. The family falls upon hard times and Tom is sold to a horrible slave owner named Simon Legree. Legree tried everything to degrade Tom, but Tom holds firmly to his religious convictions.
Bad Device. I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service
Survivor Rip Off. I have bought 2 seasons of Survivor on unbox and both of them are not complete. Very dissapointing. Guatemala  episode 11 is from a completely different season and it is missing the last 2 episodes and the reunion show. Just leaves you hanging. Exile Island is missing the final episode it just goes from the competition between Danielle and Cirie for a spot in the final 3 to the live reunion show
7 out of 100. Horrible. Q, the Winged Serpent was one of the worst movies I have even seen. I went into the film knowing it was a "B movie", but still wanting to be entertained. I was not entertained.For a 1982 film, the gore in Q, the Winged Serpent, probably shocked quite a few people. There is also a [...] scene that is quite enticing. But aside from these two points of note, the film offered little else, including entertainment.The acting was passable, but of course with such a dull story and script to flesh out, the OK acting goes to waste.Save your money. This is one of the worst movies ever made. There are far better B movies. It is the type of movie I would have liked in college in 1987, if I had been drunk and looking for laughs. But this is 2006, and there are better bad movies with better gore and nudity. You won't like Q, the Winged Serpent, at all. Even for the drunk college student, there are far better ways to spend 90 minutes. Stay away.Total Score (out of 100) = 72 (out of 50). Enjoyment. A rating based on my overall enjoyment of the film.4 (out of 10). Acting. How good was the acting?1 (out of 10). Immersion. Did the movie suck me into the story?0 (out of 10). Intangibles. Special effects. Movie pace. Is the movie forgettable, or something you will talk about and remember for weeks? Years?0 (out of 10). Must see. Is this movie worth seeing/renting?0 (out of 10). Must buy. Is this movie a must buy/purchase
imho:  Dumb movie... After seeing some of the other Amazon reviews of this movie, and the fact that Jason Swartzman was in it (after having seen him for the first time in "Rushmore" - a wonderful film), I had to purchase a copy of this DVD for myself to view.  It's got a wonderful cast of fine actors, but I found this movie really dumb.  One critic on the DVD box claimed this was "Laugh Out Loud Funny."  Really?  What movie was he watching?  I strained a chuckle here and there, but that was about it for me.  The Lily Tomlin & Dustin Hoffman characters were particularly annoying as was the script.  I know this was supposed to be a satiristic movie, but I didn't find much to snicker about.
AMAZON SUCKS. I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!
On Tivo: Not the widescreen version!. Was very disappointed to realize that on my Tivo (series 3, but I don't think it matters) I got the 4:3 version.  NOT the widescreen version.So of course it displays "windowboxed" instead of full screen.  Yeah, i can ZOOM the tv display but this degrades even further the image quality.  Not very pretty in the end.Is this going to be the case for all Tivo downloads?
UH...NO!!!. Don't even think about it
Michael Moore is an idiot. This was a ridiculous documentary. I watched with an open mind, and after it was finished I was so irritated because he showed such a one sided biased view, it was ridiculous. Being that it is a Michael Moore movie I should have expected this but I tried to view it openly. Let me warn you now, don't waste 2 hours or 20 dollars
did they read the book??. while not one of his best novels, tommyknockers was much better than this waste of time! jimmy smits does his best,but the underwritten screenplay does him and this movie about dead aliens and the thought control they have over a small new england town is just not worth the trouble!! SKIP IT!!!!
could not be viewed!. i downloaded it and i couldn't view the video paste the intro. then i RE-downloaded it thinking that maybe it was a corrupt file, but it again it only had sound and not video. this one is a waste of money
so many gaps in the story. This movie is the story of a gay Cuban writer who eventually makes it to the U.S. to escape the persecution he's suffered in Cuba. And that's about all that can be inferred from this movie. There are large chunks that are spoken in a different language. But there are no English subtitles so you have no idea at all what's going on. This disrupts the already choppy flow of the movie so that it has almost no cohesiveness at all. Whatever the message of this movie is, whatever it's trying to convey, it's lost in the plotless story
Don't waste your time... ....boring and Woody Allen will drive you insane. He never stops talking!!!
Star Trek:  City on the Edge of Forever. My favorite show of the Trek series but there's no way I'd buy another individual program from Amazon.  It will ONLY play on their downloaded player ...won't burn to DVD so can't play it on my television.  Don't bother buying this ...just go for the Trek collection on DVD
Pretty Bad Movie. Brokedown Palace is bad.  How bad is it?  It's pretty bad, man.Don't tell me I didn't warn you
Star Trek:  City on the Edge of Forever. My favorite show of the Trek series but there's no way I'd buy another individual program from Amazon.  It will ONLY play on their downloaded player ...won't burn to DVD so can't play it on my television.  Don't bother buying this ...just go for the Trek collection on DVD
This Movie was very Disappointing. This movie is strickly for the women now I see why it was made for the lifetime channel. It was hard for me(as a man)  to watch this show knowing that there are people out there like these characters.  I was looking for a happy ending and didn't get it.
Horrible  Movie!!. This one is just plain awful!!   It's a bunch of Hollywood brats being histrionic.
Watch Das Boot instead. I just finished watching Das Boot.  To even draw comparisons between these two movies is absolutely ridiculous.  Where Das Boot is a gripping human tale of the tragedy of war, U-571 is just more Hollywood tripe.If you just want 'splosions and escapism, I guess U-571 does the trick.If you want a realistic sub movie that will haunt you for many nights to come, go with Das Boot
Terrible. I could not sit through this movie. The acting and screenplay are terrible. This film could be described as a bad made-for-tv movie at best.I ended up fast-forwarding though the entire movie after the first 30 minutes and turned the player off before I reached the end. I couldn't take it anymore. This movie is one of the worst I've attempted to watch in a long time.Not recommended.
U.S release doesn't compare to the original. The U.S release is a far cry from the original,and more of an insult than anything else.I can tell everyone though,for a fact that the original theatrical release (spoken in original Mardrin&Cantonese&subtitled in English) is the S&^%!?*^!.It's not only entertaining and hilarious,the fight scenes are absoloutely INCREDIBLE.So,if you get the opportunity,buy the VHS tape.I did about 6 years ago,and although it's not dvd quality,it's still a fantastic film.I suggest checking out EBAY for it on DVD,you may be surprised and find the original out there?This is a MUST HAVE film for any Jackie Chan/Martial arts fan.It's a perfect blend of action and comedy.I suggest staying away from the editied/dubed U.S release,it's been butchered...find the original,it will be worth every penny even if it costs a bit more
Same Thing. The Dane Cook episode is the same one that it on his "Harmful If Swallowed" c.d. The c.d. also has the uncensored version of this routine that is over 1 hour long. The one star rating is not based on the content. It is based upon Amazon not sharing this fact with customers
DONT BUY IT IF YOU BUY COMPLETE EPIC SERIES. Gosh....., where can I start, I buy it combine with Complete Epic Series, I found it no much diffrent.  CES also have this episode.  Amazon should advice the customer clearly pertaining this matter before the customer buy it.Now I'm facing difficult to sell it back to amazon due to the locality of my country (Malaysia) and its very difficult to find fans of BSG (old version) in my country in order to sold it off.So should there any BSG fans in my country who read this, I'm willing to sell it around RM30.00 (very good condition)I can be reach at : 019-756740
What a bad movie!. I wouldn't recommend this movie, unless you have nothing else to do for the night and want to watch it alone. Due to a high content of bad words, screaming and violence, it's kind of embarrassing watching it with someone else. Some people really enjoyed it, and that's not me, and that's not the other two people I know who watched it. Some violent parts are a bit hard to believe, but I guess that's what the story is about. This movie is a bit of a hollywood-style suspense, with rather cheesy college scenes that are common to comedies.There's one good idea in this movie and that's how life develops as it goes along, and one action or inaction changes how life plays out. But this is no where near original, even the Simpsons had an episode like that.So, this movie is definitely not on my best movies list.
Accurate But Boring. This is probably the most accurate version of "A Tale Of Two Cities" but, it's the worst version to own or watch. Sticking strickly to the plot of the story and historical facts this movie has no spark or passion. It's an easy out though for the teens to lazy to read the book for English.The movie is extremely long which is part of the problem and the acting is horribly done.I found myself straining to stay awake. The script is something out of the Middle Ages with no modern word adaptations it's hard to imagine any of the characters are "real." The storyline is straight out the book with no hollywood adaptations this causing part of the problem-- you don't get any sparks between Lucy and Carton- or dialouge. It focuses more on the war and hardly anything on the romance or passion in the story.All in all this movie in my opinon butchered one of the classic love stories in literature. Tale of Two Cities fans- we know buy the classic it's always better
Not good, but what other choice do you have. First of all, I would like to start off by saying that this movie sucks.  Here are a few of the things that supports my decision. 1. Dacascos does not know Capoeira. He played the berimbau (an insrument used in Capoeira) wrong, he pronouced many of the terms incorrectly, and he had no flow to his movements.  2. The acting was horrible.  While watching this, you kind of get the picture that the director wanted to finish this movie a soon as possible.  Most of the lines were just stupid.  Dacascos character had no real history.  apparently had this mysterious past you really could care less about because the plot was so predictable. 3. The fighting was laughable at best.  Capoeira is the only martial art that was outlawed for being so violent and unstoppable.  You don't need corny fight scenes to show it's usefulness.  Most of the fight scenes where repeated movements that were shot at different angles.  Dacascos was doing meia lua's (a spinning kick in which both hands are on the ground as you strike) that were knocking out three people at once.  In one ridiculous scene, Saverio (the drug lord) pointed to where he wanted Dacascos to stand so that he could miraculously appear behind him and perform and unchallenged jumping kick to the back of his head.  I wish an experinced Capoeirista would have done the fight scenes.  Although this movie was horrible, it is the only movie in which Capoeira is suppose to be the main artform used. While watching this movie, one can only hope that this poor performance dosen't hurt Capoeira's chances at being the cornerstone of another movie.
LOL~!. If you want UNCUT ORIGINAL version, ALWAYS look for ORIGINAL LICENSED Production. NOT US Release. Its a foreign film, it should not be US version to begin with~! HELLO!!!?? Why settle for LESS with US Version where they edit and cut so many excellent scenes especially with Jackie's Fighting Scenes. And US Release ruins the speed and sound as well.I found HK Version to be MUCH MORE in enjoyable, and HIGHER in Quality. American Market always like to "Americanize" and "Control". Regional Code Regulation thing is one of the example to CONTROL the Market. Why not let everyone enjoy the same HK Original Release move the same way REST OF THE WORLD enjoys it ?? No one makes Hollywood American movies to "French version" or "Chinese Version" ~! This what Americans are doing~! Well, enjoy the cheap "American version" then~! LO
Some movies better not be rewatched. *** This comment may contain spoilers ***When I first saw Liliana Cavani's controversial film about sadomasochistic love affair between former Nazi officer Max (Dirk Bogard) and a concentration camp survivor Lucia (Charlotte Rampling)whom he used to abuse sexually and physically during the WWII, it had a shock value. I saw it in Moscow in the middle of 80s, and when our friends brought the tape to watch I thought it was a screen adaptation of the Irwin Shaw's novel "Nightwork" which is a completely different story (both were translated to Russian as "The Night Porter" - hence the confusion). As you can see, the film had a triple-shocking value for me - first, I expected to see a different movie; second and third, for its dark and disturbing subject matter and for the breaking all kinds of taboos in the way Cavani had explored it.I remember that I was very impressed by Cavani's use of flashbacks, music, and her classy cinematography. Both leads were very good as two people who had met at the most horrifying circumstances but according to the writer-director were not able to forget the disturbing relationship and were willing to give anything just to be able to carry on with it. It was a first time I saw Charlotte Rampling and she became one of my favorite actresses.I saw it again couple of weeks ago and I have to admit that without its original shock value it did not impress me at all. The plot does not seem that shocking, the story does not make much sense. Some of the dialog is just ridiculous. For example, Max confesses to his old friend, Countess Stein ( who knows everything about his past) after Lucia had entered his hotel and his life:"Max: I found her. I found my little girl.Countess: Such a romantic story.Max: It is not a romantic story, it is a biblical story."The second part of the movie when the couple try to hide in Max's apartment and the other Nazi wait outside for days for them to come out is just bad, IMO. The final scene is plausible and makes sense -  there could be never a happy ending to the story like that but, alas, it took too long for the ending to come - I actually could not wait for somebody to finally take the unfortunate couple out of their misery and I was grateful when it happened - not a good sign for the movie where you should sympathize with the main characters.I am not sure if the movie is one of "Nazi chic" flicks or a serious and honest even if flawed exploration of the very dark depths of human soul. It sure has the characteristics of both.2.5/
ugh, what drivel. I'm a big Mann fan, and i even enjoy his not very good non noir or western films, thunder bay for instance. a great director, but this one stinks. i can't even get up the enthusiasm to criticise i
Ultra-Stylish Modern-Day Noir with a Too Convoluted Story (and a Surprise Twist). They say Brian De Palma's `Femme Fatale' has a very tricky plot. It is true that the plot has a big twist, but I am not allowed to reveal it, so let me only say this. Whether or not you like the film depends on the incredibly convoluted story. I thought it is overcooked, way too much for me to take. But you might feel differently. Well, but who can tell?All I can say with confidence is that `Femme Fatale' is a noir, or dark crime thriller that features a beautiful but dangerous woman Laure (Rebecca Romijn-Stamos). At the 2001 Cannes Film Festival (and the scenes were shot during the real premier showing of `East-West') Laure and other robbers try to pull off a heist.After outwitting other gangsters, Laure becomes another person named Lily. But how? You might not believe me, but she was so lucky that she could find an exact look-alike of her, and no one suspects the truth! Well, seven years later Laure is still doing this masquerading game successfully until one cameraman Nicholas (Antonio Baderas) takes a photo of her face, which makes the cover of a magazine. Now intrigues, blackmails, shootings, etc. ensue.As the film's title suggests, `Femme Fatale' has references to crime thrillers like `Double Indemnity' Some might remember Hitchcock's `Vertigo' for the very obvious reason. Watching someone through a camera is a familiar theme to this genre (`Rear Window') and Brian De Palma himself has used it several times in his career. There are interesting details - Laure's hair, repeated images and hidden meaning of water and clock, for instance - and there is even split screen, signature technique of De Palma. Like his previous films (no, I'm not talking about `Mission to Mars' or `Mission Impossible'), `Femme Fatale' needs repeated viewings.But for the following two reasons, I don't think many would watch it more than once. One is the weakness of the acting of the leading lady Rebecca Romijn-Stamos. I hear the contrary opinion about her, and I confess that my judgment about acting is totally subjective, but it is clear, I think, that she is no Barbara Stanwyck. I am not saying that Rebecca Romijn-Stamos is not sexy - she is - but not good and seductive enough to call her femme fatale who can seduce a man and a woman alike (yes, look at the opening sequence, where some might have guilty pleasure like me).And the other reason is THE twist that comes later in the film. Please see for yourself. For all the smooth camerawork of De Palma, and the beautiful photography of Thierry Arbogast (`The Fifth Element') and score of Ryuichi Sakamoto (`The Last Emperor') I felt I was cheated in the end. I never thought it is coming. But is it my fault that I didn't expect it?`Femme Fatale' has stylish images and good soundtrack, but the script is too smart for its own good
I've been cheated by Amazon. It really sucks, tried to download but it's not able to be viewed in pc's outsided the united states. Crikey.I'll have to wait for reruns to watch it on the telly.Whatta shame amazon dot com. Let's send a CSI to yer headquarters
Warning Incomplete Episode!!!. The episodes in this series have an average running time of 50 minutes. This one happens to be only 18 minutes. This mean sthat the file abruptly stops right in the middle. Even though it only cost me $2 I still got jipped.  Let's hope Amazon can iron out these kinds of problems before they get this service farther underway. Be careful enough to sheck the running times to be sure they seem accurate before you buy them
Just when you think Dolph can't get sink any lower.......... I will be honest I like Dolph Lundgren.........a look at his filmography you see B.movie classics such as "The Punisher",Universal Soldier" and "Blackjack" Dolph has been going trough a slump.........Storm Catcher and the startlingly routine Jill The Ripper and the awful Minion(AKA Fallen Knight) but with Agent Red Dolph Lundgren hits rock bottom. Agent Red first of all steals it's music from Predator 2......and it's plot from Counter Measures,Oh I'm not finished yet. It steals footage from Storm Catcher!!!!!!!!! The scene where Jon Penner steals the  air craft while posing as Dolph Lundgren..........Now Penner is 5'11 Dolph Lundgren is 6'5 for goodness sake! yet they try to pass it off as Dolph Lundgren as the soldier stealing the aircraft for part of a mission.....This scene made me wanna throw up but I hung in there.....It turns out more footage is stolen.......I swear I saw footage from Iron Eagle  and Iron Eagle II.......I saw footage from Crimson Tide and I saw footage from Counter Measures........What the heck was Dolph thinking when he signed for this junk? I have no idea. When I was a teen (When Showdown In Little Tokyo came out) I thought Dolph Lundgren couldn't sink lower then Showdown In Little Tokyo,Then when I saw The Minion I was almost sure Dolph couldn't do worse........Well I pray he can't do any worse because Agent Red is one of the worst movies I have ever seen in my life..........This is coming from a guy who likes Don The Dragon Wilson. Bottomline:On Agent Red's cover it says "Once exposed you cannot survive"  Take this as a warning
Star Trek:  City on the Edge of Forever. My favorite show of the Trek series but there's no way I'd buy another individual program from Amazon.  It will ONLY play on their downloaded player ...won't burn to DVD so can't play it on my television.  Don't bother buying this ...just go for the Trek collection on DVD
Bad Device. I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service
Befuddled. I am completely befuddled that anyone with any love for the book could enjoy this movie. It is merely a monument to Hollywood's stunning inability to read or to understand the simplest moral tale. In Dumas's book the Count learns that he cannot play God--dispensing punishments to the evil and rewards to the good--because of the complex ways in which the wheat and the tares are intertwined in this earthly life. He abandons his project of perfectly just revenge and accepts a new love as a gift from a mysteriously merciful God.Hollywood gives us instead: Triumphant Revenge.
Indeed, Reality Bites. If this is the generation I am supposed to belong to, I want to disown it.  Ben Stiller's directorial debut centers on four friends recently graduated from collage, and are now trying to find their way in the world.  The movies messege is that we are a lost generation, but that is not are parent's fault (where this movie tries to lay the blame).  The kids in this movie are just lazy, more or less.  And they spend their free time trying to make meaning out of their lives.  Indeed, Troy (Ethan Hawke) even tries to ratinalize stealing a candy bar by saying society ows him.  Winona Ryder plays waify Lelina, who makes a documentry out of recorded footage she has of her friends.  One day she meets Michael (Ben Stiller) who is their age but has made a good career out of the TV industry.  Ethan hates him for his honest approach to life, and so the battle for Lelina's love begins.  I really wasn't too impressed with this movie, it just made it seem like my peers are just wallowing in self pity for the sake of being the cool, tortured artist; when they should get off the couch and go get a job
Where Is Shania Twain?. When you do a search for Shania Twain this video pops up. I can't even find her in the half time show. Is there a football player with the same name? She is the greatest female vocalist of all time and is much prettier than those football players, but I am sure she doesn't play football. LO
Somewhat interesting, if dated - and polemical. This tape includes two very different pieces from Buuel (directed at not too distant time from each other, the late 1920s and the early 1930s). The first is Un Chien Andalou, which is credited as being codirected by Salvador Dali. This surreal short must have been terribly shocking when it was made, but I think that more than 75 years later, a lot of its impact has softened, perhaps because its surreal tricks have appeared in a lot of later movies.The second piece is flawed too, though at least is more interesting - and I think more polemical, also. It's a 30 minute documentary about life in one of Spain's poorest regions. What I find wrong about this movie is that while Buuel gleefully shows us the poverty and ignorance of the people living there, he doesn't have much clues (and doesn't seem to care much) of how to solve this. Now, 70 years later, Spain is much richer than it was then. And if poverty receded in Spain it was not exactly with the sort of leftism that Buuel favored, but with Western European style capitalism. Shockingly, in one scene, the narrator chides that in school, children are taught the value of Pi. Teaching math to poor people, the horror!. Buuel shortsightedness is at its most glaring here, not realizing that it is access to the latest knowledge and technology what will help the poor overcome their situation.All in all, two pieces that have not aged well
Extremely slow... Utterly horrible movie. I honestly can't believe that Robert Patrick wasted his time on this piece of [junk] movie.  Ugh!  One of the worst movies I've seen in quite a while
Missing episodes. This series is being sold with missing episodes, like many others here in Unbox. Do they think their customers are so dumb? Would you buy a DVD series with a missing DVD? What sense does this make? What a disappointment this service is..
Disappointing - Would Love to See a Good Remake. This movie took most of the great songs from the stage play and dumped them.  For a theater lover this is heartbreaking.  What a disappointing story.  If a movie can be faithful to the theater version then this one is a class-A adulterer.  Even the ending was changed and not for the better.  The dubbing for the two leading ladies was also disappointing.  A pretty face is not enough
Okay. I agree with David Thomson when he says few audiences in the West would be content to view an American epic composed solely of battles and their contexts. Kurosawa was a keen businessman and his reputation in the West was entrenched with "Kagemusha" and "Ran", he knew what (American) audiences think of as heroic and mystical about "historical" Japan: Kurosawa's art takes a great deal on its impetus from what Americans (or Westerners) imagine about Japan. He was not popular in Japan (where they thought his stuff was particularly hokey and outmoded, hence the suicide attempt). I am not saying that the work is rubbish - there is no "ugly" shot in either "Ran" or "Kag" - merely that there are more "authentically Japanese" films out there to choose from.
Survivor Rip Off. I have bought 2 seasons of Survivor on unbox and both of them are not complete. Very dissapointing. Guatemala  episode 11 is from a completely different season and it is missing the last 2 episodes and the reunion show. Just leaves you hanging. Exile Island is missing the final episode it just goes from the competition between Danielle and Cirie for a spot in the final 3 to the live reunion show
Stupid Movie. This movie suck...first the comedy is not even funny, they'll do anything to make you laugh. The acting is horrible, the fight scene suck, none of these actor know how to fight. Princess Phoenix is the most annoying person in the world. Avoid this movie at all cost
SUPER TEEN. Having been a teenager once, I can certainly understand the inner turmoil and angst teens experience.  However, in PUMP UP THE VOLUME, the movie's attempt to martyrize teens and make all adults look like uncaring morons only serves to underscore why so many adults look with disdain on teens.  The teens in this movie seem to have little respect for authority and their assignation as to being tortured and misunderstood is vanquished in their juvenile behavior.  Even our hero (well played by Christian Slater) cannot communicate with people on a one to one level; he instead decides to become some kind of salvation to his teens by using his pirated radio shows to cause some kind of uprising among them.  As a proponent of truth, he is a vapid antithesis of truth: he fakes masturbation to arouse the youths; he doesn't use his real name or voice; and on a call with a potential suicide victim, he treats the caller as someone who isn't serious and never really offers any kind of consolation.  The suicidal teen says he is lonely and we automatically assume he is lonely within his familial structure, but isn't he just as lonely with the peers who mourn him after his demise?  The adults are played almost as caricatures and the teens as misunderstood heroes.  Sorry, folks, been there done that...living at any age requires a commitment to better yourself and do what you feel is right.  Questioning authority without any viable alternatives, as none of these teens do, merely escalates the generational gap, and movies like this are merely attempts to exploit the so called misunderstanding of youth
Biscuit eating fools. The film-makers will walk the plank in shark infested waters for this one.Blackbeards ghost does not wander around a random college campus making smart comments, pulling lame pranks, and acting like a low-life burn-out loser, I do. Blackbeard is obviously drunk on his ghost-ship in the caribbean. The film-makers are obviously the heirs to filthy british royalty carrying out a plot to give pirates everywhere a bad name.
Beware of Unbox!!!. Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for
Firefly: Excellent.  But buy it on DVD, not "Unbox"!. Read the Unbox terms of use CAREFULLY before choosing this route over a regular DVD purchase.  It is not your usual set of "blah blah" legal jargon.For example, 3c:"Removal of Software. If you uninstall or otherwise remove the Software, your ability to view all Digital Content you have downloaded to the Authorized Device will immediately and automatically terminate and we reserve the right to delete all Digital Content from that Authorized Device without notice to you."If you ever remove the Unbox software, Amazon may revoke your ability to view the Firefly episodes you paid for and may even delete them from your machine!Amazon, I've ordered literally thousands of dollars of stuff through you and always had a great experience; why did you let Unbox create these anti-customer terms of use??
Out of Reach... out of ideas... out of patience...outta here... On the trail of stinky excrements such as The Foreigner and Out for a Kill, current reigning straight-to-video monarch Steven Seagal returns to again inflict upon his ever-dwindling fan base more of his patented scowls, unsubtle enviromental messages, and his ridiculous, past-prime brand of martial arts.Steven Seagal half-heartedly (and even that might be giving him too much credit) portrays William Lansing, a former special ops agent turned wildlife refuge environmentalist, who travels to Poland to look into why his 13-year-old orphaned buddy Irina Morawska has stopped corresponding (maybe she found out Seagal's 77 years old and is a slug). Lansing unearths a slimy but lucrative slavery ring and comes face to face with malignant main baddie Faisal. It now only remains to see how grisly a fate Faisal will have at the chubby but deadly hands of Lansing.Out of Reach is utter crapola. The amateurish production values, the corny, highly derivative script and the cringe-worthy acting "performances" cause this video release to plummet faster than an ugly prostitute's self-respect. Seagal's mumbled diction is at an all-time low. At certain points, a voice actor had to dub Seagal's voice because the Green Peace sensei couldn't be bothered to come back to the studio for post-production work (it's so obviously not him doing the voice-over, reading those letters to Irina). The action sequences are so preposterous and so clumsily-set up that even David Carradine is giggling.I was such a big fan of Seagal when he first exploded on the scene in Above the Law (1988). Back then, he was the epitomy of the film action hero, more down to earth than Van Damme and more realistic than Ah-nold. His first five features were awesome, stripped-down virtuoso cinemas of abrupt, lethal, down-and-dirty ass-kicking. In the 1990s,  the fact that he was a man of monosyllabic tendencies only contributed to his cultivated silent but deadly image. He was well on his way to becoming a martial arts icon. Then, sadly, pfffft...Obviously, Seagal found out that he could still make beaucoup money without putting in a 100 percent effort. Over the years, the man had just let himself go, and it's a damn shame. True, he never was much of an actor: he probably uses his Burger King cash card more often than his SAG card. But now, even the low-rent genre he toils in should be embarassed to have him as a member.Is it a surprise anymore when we find, in whatever film he's in, that his character has had special super-duper combat training in his past? First of all, if Steven Seagal were to now play a role other than that of an ex-military name-taker and ass-kicker, his Jabba the Hut-sized noggin would probably explode from the unexpected dramaturgical exertion, and all we'll have left of Seagal is the desolate remnants of a ponytail. His acting is now as strained and forced as his trousers belt must be. This is not the worst movie I've ever seen (I once walked out of a Dolph Lundgren flick; The Red Scorpion, I think it was) but it's pretty bad. For the record, Seagal has almost officially surpassed the unlamented Michael Dudikoff in terms of film careers rapidly circling into the toilet. One and a half stars. The rating would be lower but I'm sentimental.
Star Trek:  City on the Edge of Forever. My favorite show of the Trek series but there's no way I'd buy another individual program from Amazon.  It will ONLY play on their downloaded player ...won't burn to DVD so can't play it on my television.  Don't bother buying this ...just go for the Trek collection on DVD
Prisoners of the Mountains. I thought this movie was decent but nothing spectacular.  It kept me awake but just on the verge.  The few comical scenes helped to keep me interested as did the totally unexpected ending which was probably the best part of the entire movie.  I thought the acting in this movie was just mediocre at best. Overall I was not impressed with the movie but the few good scenes earned it two stars over just the lonely one star.
Oh the humanity!. "Red Water," a made for television film starring Lou Diamond Phillips and Kristy Swanson, carries on the now long and wearisome tradition of ripping off "Jaws." You would think that nearly thirty years after Steven Spielberg's project arrived in theaters filmmakers and producers might move on to another genre. You would be wrong. Every year brings us even more "animal gone wild" flicks, everything from sharks, octopi, whales, snakes, bears, rats, ants, birds, cats, dogs, dinosaurs, crocodiles, alligators, and genetic laboratory experiments gone horribly awry ripping their way through a fresh crop of hapless humans. If the creature in question has sharp teeth, claws, wings, talons, tentacles, and pincers expect to see the monster in question appear in a low budget, straight to video knockoff of "Jaws." Sure, there are elaborations to the standard plot lines, none of which significantly improves these rip-offs, but all of them owe a big debt to Steven Spielberg's film. For example, "Red Water" tries something a little different by having a freshwater shark terrorize people on a Louisiana River. It also inserts a plot thread about a gang of criminals recovering a stash of money from the riverbed. None of these ideas disguises what is really going on."Red Water" is the story of John Sanders (Lou Diamond Phillips), a down on his luck fisherman with an ex-wife, horrific memories of a disaster from his days as an oil drilling technician, and loans on his boat he can't afford to repay. At the same time Sanders dithers with the bank about his delinquent loan payments, a shark somehow manages to enter the river and promptly wreaks havoc on swimmers, fishermen, and anyone else who manages to get in the way. Sanders could care less about the shark, primarily because he doesn't know about it at first and also because his ex-wife Kelli (Kristy Swanson) just walked back into his life. She's a scientist working for some big oil company that is drilling for natural gas on the river, and she knows that John is an expert on this sort of thing. Whether you buy the idea that a scientist would go by the name "Kelli" is another matter. Sanders eventually agrees to help out when he learns that the oil executives will pay him handsomely for his troubles. After all, he'll do just about anything to bring in enough cash to keep his boat. What none of these people know is that they will run headlong into several sharks, one that swims and several that walk around on two legs.The movie switches focus long enough to tell us about some Jamaican criminal who lost a ton of money in the river when one of his underlings dropped the box containing the cash in the water while eluding the authorities. This guy hires some mercenary thug, along with a goon named Ice (Coolio), to go track down the subordinate in an effort to persuade him to reveal the location of the cash. And wouldn't you know it? The site just happens to lie right near the oilrig where Sanders and Kelli eventually show up! What follows is incredibly predictable: the criminals take over Sanders's vessel because they think these guys angling for the money, a disaster occurs on the rig that claims the lives of several workers, and the shark turns up to chow down on a few of the principals. How predictable is "Red Water"? Not only is there a Cajun chap helping out on Sanders's boat, we get a few scenes of a Cajun party complete with music and dancing. Just in case you aren't aware that you should laugh at these hicks, the script throws in a few lines comparing the party to "Deliverance." How clever and original is that? I'm starting to get real tired of seeing this sort of prejudice in films and television shows. If you put any minority group in the place of these Cajuns and did the same thing, the outcry would be deafening.It's not the overt prejudice of the Cajun scenes that sinks "Red Water"; it's everything else. The venerable Lou Diamond Phillips hasn't made a good film since...well...I can't recall, actually. I quit following his career after "The First Power." As for Kristy Swanson, I was surprised to see her here. I remember her star rising in the early to mid 1990s, but at some point she fell off the radar and, if "Red Water" is any indication, into B-movie purgatory. It's sad, really, because she's not that bad of an actress. Coolio, on the other hand, goes over the top in his role as a thug looking for some money. If I had known from the start that this guy was in the film, I wouldn't have watched it. Aside from the performances, or the lack thereof, the production values are low, the pace drags, and the film has the propensity to put the strangest dialogue in its characters' mouths. I really, really wish I had written down some of the odd lines uttered by Phillips's character. I remember watching the movie and thinking at the time, "I should write that down and use it later in a review." For some reason, I didn't. Probably because I just wanted this thing to end quickly.In another bizarre turn, the movie carries a 'R' rating even though there isn't much bloody carnage going on. The only extras on the disc, fortunately, are trailers for "Bats," "The Big Hit," and "Ride or Die." If you're really interested in watching creatures attack flicks, there are plenty of other bad movies to choose from, most of them unintentionally hilarious schlockfests that manage to entertain on some level. "Red Water" is too bland, too confused plot wise, and too full of actors on the downhill slide of their careers to be entertaining. If you decide to head up this river, good luck to you.
Man oh man.... You talk about disappointed, this is the icing on the cake.  All I hear about is how scary and cutting edge this was.  Not even close.  Whatever big shot film critics say that are truly wrong.  I love older movies too and am open minded to the change in times and such. There are actually some scary or at least entertaining horror flicks during the 70's, but this is not one of them....seriously, don't buy this.  I don't know why it is so highly regarded.  The acting, story, and especially the music is EL TERRIBLE'.  It's like porn quality acting, a story written in about 25 minutes and music from a Disney movie.  It could have been a good movie if they would have taken out the attempt at comedy, through in some disturbing music, and made the bad guys, well, more bad.  It could be remade (which i'm usually against)
Dont get "Fiji" final week ... Dont dwnld " Survivor, "Thunderstorms & Sacrifice" ". Its my fault for not reading the whole thing. you would think that the last episode would be the finale , but NO, its just a 10 minute recap going to the finale 4. I didnt even get a full 45 minute episode. No finale. I got rippped off. $1.99 dwnld not well spent. Dont bother dwnldng any episode of fiji if you dont know the ending. Because they dont have that episode, not even the reunion show
My Friend & I saw this in the 70's....... ...and I can remember some of the scenes to this day (i'm 49 now). I was 16;my friend,17 at the time. I used to hitchhike to and from her house a lot in those days,and after that movie, I didn't-for a long time. At the time it was a really scary film,and the urban legend at the time was that it was based on a true story,which only added to the starkness of it. Of course,as some have opined here, what is perceived as horrifying then and what's considered horrifying now is like comparing oranges and rutabagas."Horror-and-brutality technology" in films has definitely-and I use this word wryly-evolved
Cult classic...please, a waste of my childhood. i actually saw this movie when i was 7 and it freaked me out abit, but i mean the brother was basically a blob with a face and the story was as bad as the acting. The ending was garbage and it had nothing to offer in todays world.Dont even rent this, i dont even know why you are considering the film.I only give it a 2 star rating because t managed to scare a seven year old and i havent forgot how dumb the film was since.
Buyer Beware - Not What's Advertised. Don't know why my first note hasn't appeared, so I'll briefly restate. the claim-to-fame of this film is it's avant-garde, push-the-envelope sexuality. Amazon describes this film as "Unrated", but that's not what nearly all of these listings are selling. These are the new "R" Rated version that is MASSIVELY redacted. In fact, all of what makes this film famous has been reduced to some brief nudity. Even though the box continues to bill it as "The sexiest movie ever made." On top of that, despite an English only cover, my VHS purchase was subtitled in SPANISH. The seller has offered an adjustment. He didn't know. But Amazon needs to drop the 'Unrated' description, as that implies the original. Those still interested might look for something like a 'director's cut'. I still haven't found one. Sorry if this is a duplicate of previous post
Same Thing. The Dane Cook episode is the same one that it on his "Harmful If Swallowed" c.d. The c.d. also has the uncensored version of this routine that is over 1 hour long. The one star rating is not based on the content. It is based upon Amazon not sharing this fact with customers
One of the sickest movies ever. I wish I could give this movie zero stars. It's really amazing how someone can inject raw gore, violence, and sick humour into a movie, and try to pass it off as slick comedy, drama, and deep philosophy. This movie is a great example of how a director can actually make a deliberate and hard working effort to produce a despicable movie.The sheer perversity in this movie that is dressed up as comedy and paraded as some kind of dark humour is beyond criticism. Do yourself a favour and please don't ever watch this movie if it comes on air. It's not even worth watching for morbid fascination. I terribly resent the fact that I gave up an hour and a half of my life watching it out of sheer curiosity. But then, I may actually be glad that I did. At least it taught me how an exercise in atrocious film making can be
could not be viewed!. i downloaded it and i couldn't view the video paste the intro. then i RE-downloaded it thinking that maybe it was a corrupt file, but it again it only had sound and not video. this one is a waste of money
Warning. Do not buy this book unless you have a very high tolerance for new age gibberish.  There is factual information here, but it is buried in gushy self-absorption.  I bought it for psychotherapy patients who are going through menopause, but I'd be embarrassed to lend it out
AMAZON SUCKS. I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!
The Mystery Goes On. I had heard all the hype about this film and Ginger's Oscar, but after several viewings, I still find the film rather flat as an experience, and Ginger's Oscar is still a mystery.  I guess it proves the adage about winning one "For women, play plain or ugly (remember Charlize Theron) or play against type"
Same Thing. The Dane Cook episode is the same one that it on his "Harmful If Swallowed" c.d. The c.d. also has the uncensored version of this routine that is over 1 hour long. The one star rating is not based on the content. It is based upon Amazon not sharing this fact with customers
LOL~!. If you want UNCUT ORIGINAL version, ALWAYS look for ORIGINAL LICENSED Production. NOT US Release. Its a foreign film, it should not be US version to begin with~! HELLO!!!?? Why settle for LESS with US Version where they edit and cut so many excellent scenes especially with Jackie's Fighting Scenes. And US Release ruins the speed and sound as well.I found HK Version to be MUCH MORE in enjoyable, and HIGHER in Quality. American Market always like to "Americanize" and "Control". Regional Code Regulation thing is one of the example to CONTROL the Market. Why not let everyone enjoy the same HK Original Release move the same way REST OF THE WORLD enjoys it ?? No one makes Hollywood American movies to "French version" or "Chinese Version" ~! This what Americans are doing~! Well, enjoy the cheap "American version" then~! LO
The worst version of a Christmas Carel. This was the only movie in the trilogy that I thought was clean enough to get a G rating.  They did not follow the story line from the last two films.  We meet a new Villian Belandona Ambells evil sister who has manipulated Carfaxce and his minnion Killer to help here ruin Christmas.  How careface got on Earth when he supposed to be dead and be in Hell is never covered. They have a cheesy flash back when you find out why he became such a bad dog.  Charlie is supposed to alive giving and second chance at the end of second film When he returned Gabriels horn. Belandona is decent but not as evil as the other villians I have seen if on my top hundred villans list Belandona is 11th in the top 20.  The 1st Sauron.  The 2th Naraku. 3th Malificent. 4th Cluney. The 5th Slagar the cruel.  The 6th Tasarmina. 7th. Badrang.  8th Golloum 9th Team Rocket. Tenth  Kagura.  I hardly recommend you don't she this movie it sucks even though it has a happy ended. And Carface goes good
DO NOT WASTE YOUR TIME OR YOUR MONEY... While boasting an excellent cast and an intriguing plot, this film simply tanks. Ashley Judd plays the role of a black widow, a female serial killer, who systematically kills off every man she meets. Ewan McGregor is the British intelligence officer who is hot on her trail. For some incomprehensible, mumbo jumbo reason, he ends up being protective of her.In fact, incomprehensible is a good way to describe this entire film. It is poorly edited and shuffles along at a snail's pace. Despite the excellent cast, the action plods along and the movie is dead before the first body hits the ground. One finds oneself having little sympathy or empathy for any of the characters in this cinematic fiasco. Do not waste you time or your money. This one is a turkey
Not Happy. I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?
Bad Device. I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service
Watch the Original. An EXACT copy of Ang Lee's wonderful &quot;Eat Drink Man Woman&quot;.  Frankly what annoyed me here was I watched this one first.. I just finished watching Eat Drink.. it took me about 15 minutes to realize I was watching an exact copy of something I'd already seen a couple years ago. Anyway, I was annoyed because while I could predict events in Eat Drink because I'd seen Tortilla Soup, Eat Drink was clearly the better movie -- so unfortunately it spoiled some of the pleasure of Eat Drink for me. If you haven't seen either, see the better of the two (exact same stories): Eat Drink Man Woman
Bloody Awful!!!. 3rd installment of the Urban Legend movies (why make more?)after the 2nd idiotic movie. First was pretty decent but this one is beyond bloody awful. People are dying from Urban Legends because years ago some of the teenagers parents accidently were involved with getting girls drunk and doing stuff to them. Their kids do it in the now days passing it on as tradition (TRADITION! What parent would pass on getting girls drunk and doing stuff to them as tradition?!!) Mary, one of the girls was killed and the person who killed her hid her body. Now she's stalking and killing the parents kids. Kate Mara (Tadpole, Nip/Tuck) and Robert Vito (Spy Kids 3D, Buffy The Vampire Slayer) try to figure out what happened and also try to stop Mary and put her soul to rest....it's pretty formulaic and dumb. The Urban Legends are rendered stupid and nothing is scary about this movie it's a waste of time. I know more better horror movies out there then this. Also starring Tina Lifford (Hostage, Blood Work), Ed Marinaro (Catch Me If You Can, Doomsday Rock), Lillith Fields (Day of Defense) and Nancy Everheard (Locust Valley, CSI). Pretty lame
Awful!!!!!!!!. Dolph Lundgren stars as a Mercenary sent to kill a Tribal leader and then him discovering the wrong of his nation,Dull and just plain pointless (And Stupid) action film suffers from Inept Action scenes and logic lapses. Lundgren is Imposing but can't act
What a bunch of village idiots... At first, I was really hyped to see this movie with the big named stars, especially Ms. Weaver. But when it was over I shouted, "I KNEW IT!" For a hard-core horror movie fan like myself, that's definitely a sign of a bad movie review to come. This movie broke my record of figuring out the plot even before the first minute was through. And the only reason why I sat through the entire movie was because I had my check book to balance, and a few crypto puzzles to complete. The Village reminded me of nothing more than a slap-shod script tossed around for a few days among amature script editors, then rushed into the credulous hands of famous stars. Not only did this movie ruin a few good careers, it also ruined my respect for those who stared in it.Tip for the day: If someone gives you a free copy of The Village, sell it on an auction site immediately. Trust me, you won't feel guilty getting rid of it as fast as you can. You'll experience more suspense selling it to the highest bidder than having to sit through the entire movie.
Not for Young Kids. I saw this movie a long time ago and had forgotten all but the basic plot.  I recently purchased the DVD thinking it would be a fun movie for my younger kids (9, 8, and 6) to watch.  Also, it was rated "PG" so I thought it would be pretty safe.  I was wrong.  While the plot is innocent enough, the language was atrocious.  I couldn't believe this thing was rated PG and not at least PG-13.  Be advised that if you don't want your kids to hear a lot of cursing throughout a movie, then this is not for you
Echo Parque. My main motivation in seeing this movie was to better understand the reputation of Echo Park, a little area nestled next to downtown Los Angeles. I moved to Echo Park in late 2004.It's depressing - the vicious cycle of drugs, dropping-out, and  domestic violence. And it's all here, told through the eyes of Latina teenagers. It was easy to see the woman's hand on the direction of the piece with the important roles that women played.I didn't care for the movie as a whole because it felt sluggish and uneven. I also found myself not caring about any of the characters. So-and-so gets shot, la la loo goes to jail. Whatever!As an aside, though, the evil neighborhood druglord was called Ernesto. It turns out my next-door neighbor in real-life is also called Ernesto. Luckily, it's just a coincidence
For the Cover, Not the Film. I watched both "Seven Brides for Seven Brothers" and its documentary "Making of ..." and was impressed by the dancing and the dancers (particulary the incredible Tommy Rall).  Looking for a film that showcased any of the dancers in that film I came across this and after having read the reviews of the dance sequences both on this website and on imdb, I decided to purchase the film.Then I noticed the cover.  I thought "Is this what I think it is?", and clicked on 'see larger image'.  YIKES!  It is!I have children at home and thought that this is not an illustration that is positive or educational, to say the least (after just having placed "Hands Are Not For Hitting" on my wish list!).  If Warner Bros decides to change the illustration on the cover, then I'll consider buying it.  Until then, for those of you who are concerned with the images your children see, I suggest you view the 'see larger image' of the cover before you decide to buy
Firefly: Excellent.  But buy it on DVD, not "Unbox"!. Read the Unbox terms of use CAREFULLY before choosing this route over a regular DVD purchase.  It is not your usual set of "blah blah" legal jargon.For example, 3c:"Removal of Software. If you uninstall or otherwise remove the Software, your ability to view all Digital Content you have downloaded to the Authorized Device will immediately and automatically terminate and we reserve the right to delete all Digital Content from that Authorized Device without notice to you."If you ever remove the Unbox software, Amazon may revoke your ability to view the Firefly episodes you paid for and may even delete them from your machine!Amazon, I've ordered literally thousands of dollars of stuff through you and always had a great experience; why did you let Unbox create these anti-customer terms of use??
Great Book - Bad Movie - Good Actors. My view is skewed.  I was in VA-196 and flew with Steve oonts a few times as a B/N.  His book captured our collective squadron stories and placed the A6A Intruder into the public eye.  People would tell me about their experiences while reading the book...they did not know my connection to it.  Steve wrote so well that they could smell the cockpit and sense the adrenalin.  While the movie paralleled our actual experiences at sea and in port, it did not convey the excitement of the book.  So, I was disappointed in my expectations and give the film a good try.W. Stewart Tittle, Lt USNR 1966-71
Was I supposed to laugh in this?. I seriously did not laugh once in this movie.  Horatio Sanz got me to crack a smile a couple times, but I can't believe I think he should have been in the movie more.  I thought Saturday Night Live was bad, I had no idea!  SNL is gold compared to this.  Every single joke falls flat and the director obviously has no clue how to make a movie.  I can't even tell if Jerry O'Connel and Jake Busey are bad actors because the director doesn't even give them a chance.  I think one thing that could have really helped this movie out would have been a script.  In case the director reads this review I want to tell him you need to have a script BEFORE shooting a film.  Just a tip.One of the worst movies I have ever seen, easily.0/
Quality deteriorated--desperately needs restoring and digital remastering. This movie must be restored--the quality of picture is unacceptable beginning with Bloody Mary's singing Bali Hi. I tried to purchase a completely restored, digitally remastered DVD of this musical and could not find one in 2007.  I returned this DVD to the seller
Good basis. This film is an integral one in the study of film adaptation of Jane Austen's most popular novel, Pride and Prejudice.  It represents the beginning of a serious love affair between film and Austen novels; however, it is not great in terms of adaptation.  If you love Pride and Prejudice and have never seen this film, skip it.  It will only anger you.  If you're studying film adaptation of Austen novels, you MUST see this one as it has influenced everything that came afterwards.  AND--it's Laurence Olivier, afterall
Survivor Rip Off. I have bought 2 seasons of Survivor on unbox and both of them are not complete. Very dissapointing. Guatemala  episode 11 is from a completely different season and it is missing the last 2 episodes and the reunion show. Just leaves you hanging. Exile Island is missing the final episode it just goes from the competition between Danielle and Cirie for a spot in the final 3 to the live reunion show
Bad Device. I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service
They Tried. This movie well it was boosted up like it was something really great. It had its moments but man. It had its weak times too. The little monster in this movie was just screaming like a girl the whole movie and that was really annoying. You can check it out. I didn't like it too much though. Oh well thats my opinion. Maybe you can find some good in it.
If you are not able to sing. Then you shouldn't call yourself a singer.The "concert" is lypsinch, lypsinch and lypsinch again, there is not any song on it which is live
Speechless. As cute and talented as I think Hugh Jackman is, this production was a waste of time, space and money. Everyone involved in this feature should be ashamed of themselves.  The acting is bad, the script is horrendous and the CG people apparently think their stuff don't stink...which it does-badly.  It's not the worse movie I've seen, but it's surprisingly close.  Please don't waste your time with this film
Great movie, horrible DVD!. Buena Vista (the company that releases Disney films on DVD) chose to not release anamorphic DVDs when they first came to DVD, so none of these films are anamorphically enhanced. This means, if you have a widescreen television, you will have black bars on all four sides of the picture. Also, these discs are absolutely barebones, only featuring a Dolby 2.0 soundtrack and a 1.85:1 widescreen presentation. Where are the extras?! I don't know about you guys, but I am a Mighty Duck fan who is disappointed by the DVD release of this film
Poor support. This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet
could not be viewed!. i downloaded it and i couldn't view the video paste the intro. then i RE-downloaded it thinking that maybe it was a corrupt file, but it again it only had sound and not video. this one is a waste of money
did they read the book??. while not one of his best novels, tommyknockers was much better than this waste of time! jimmy smits does his best,but the underwritten screenplay does him and this movie about dead aliens and the thought control they have over a small new england town is just not worth the trouble!! SKIP IT!!!!
Not Happy. I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?
Big Bird too whiney. I bought this DVD for my daughter who is from China and though I think Xiao Foo is adorable, I am disappointed by Big Bird's behavior. Not only does he seem frustrated every time the slightest thing does not go his way, but he tells Barkley at one point to "sic" the Monkey King and then later, again frustrated, tells the Monkey King to put his dukes up (as if to fight to resolve the issue). I am appalled by this.  Big Bird is also somewhat demeaning to the Chinese people he encounters--they don't understand him because he is speaking English and rather than explain the language barrier, he just gets upset. I love Sesame Street, and although I will keep this DVD to hear Xiao Foo sing in Chapter 7 (our daughter just loves her), I feel I will need to use Big Bird's behavior as an example of how not to act
Good God! What is this ...? Needs a zero star!. I gave it a chance and not suprisingly I was thoroughly sickened. This is one of the latest in a crop of Hip Hop crime dramas featuring the same horrible rappers that fuel the ... soundtracks in the acting roles. This movie left a foul taste in my mouth and quite a headache. This is further proof that Rap is ruining all forms of entertainment. Do yourself a favor and stay away from this incorrigible trash. Word Yo
Histoire d'eau. This movie is more a curiosity than a "chef d'oeuvre" (French for masterpiece) of erotism. It hasn't aged very well either... It may have been a hit then, because it was one of the first of its kind - although I am not sure.Coming from my fellow French men, I was expecting a more sensual and passionate love story rather this 2 hours of voyeurism and sadomasochism. I found the movie rather boring, expect maybe for a few scenes. The total exploitation of a young woman for sex and pleasure will be very disturbing to some.
The Mothman Travesty. Three problems with this film:1. PACING - The film's pacing doesn't vary.  It's very boring.  As a matter of fact, this wouldn't be a problem if the film were much more tense (e.g., "Speed"), however this film lacks the high-action intensity to pull off such a slow expository speed.2. EFFECTS - Too many sequences of this film rely on color and light superimpositions, and there is an overabundance of high-speed imaging.  The scene changes that employ erratic barrages of images desensitize the viewer from the thrilling "horror" scenes.  Furthermore, they fail to make enough sequential sense of the film's plot to really mean much to the film as a greater whole.  The upshot: the film relies too heavily on the art of editing, to the point where plot twists are no longer interesting.3. TRIVIALITY - The plot's conclusion quails in the face of the "so what?" question.  The viewer is left with a sense of, "I sat through the film for THAT?"  In light of points (1) and (2), this obnoxious bit is the icing on the cake.Don't waste your life.ALon
Same Thing. The Dane Cook episode is the same one that it on his "Harmful If Swallowed" c.d. The c.d. also has the uncensored version of this routine that is over 1 hour long. The one star rating is not based on the content. It is based upon Amazon not sharing this fact with customers
a waste of time. a typical altman film. made to please himself not an audience. i don't know how he keeps getting financing. no one sees them except family and friends. additionally. it suffers from soft focus, out of focus, photography that will drive you nuts! after awhile you don't give a damn whether they have a wedding or not
This is Horrible. I love the Avatar and I was so thrilled that amazon allows people to download it except the only problem is I've been trying for the past days and darn it all, it's not working!!! It's not as if I'm downloading it for free. I am willing to pay and yet it just wouldn't go through!!! I think it's better to just buy the dvds...I think it's absolutely horrible to tease customers like that..
Same Thing. The Dane Cook episode is the same one that it on his "Harmful If Swallowed" c.d. The c.d. also has the uncensored version of this routine that is over 1 hour long. The one star rating is not based on the content. It is based upon Amazon not sharing this fact with customers
Same Thing. The Dane Cook episode is the same one that it on his "Harmful If Swallowed" c.d. The c.d. also has the uncensored version of this routine that is over 1 hour long. The one star rating is not based on the content. It is based upon Amazon not sharing this fact with customers
You have to download Amazon software into your PC... I am never happy when a purchase requires that you install the company's software.  The vid is encrypted so that you need Amazon's player to view it.  Blah.  You're better off buying the DVD for $20 with all the episodes so at least you can watch the DVD somewhere other than your own computer.
Give Your Fast-Forward a Work-Out!!. Let's just be honest: this film is terrible . . . and not in the way that "Attack of the Killer Tomatoes!" is so "terrible" that it's great . . . more like the way "Caddyshack II" is so terrible that the director should forever live in shame . . .I was a kid when this film was released. And, while it was not particularly exciting then, it is insanely tedious now. It is a genuine test of patience . . . but with no pay-off what-so-ever.Here's some potentially helpful information:The slasher film can branch in two directions: supernatural (Friday the 13th II, Halloween, Nightmare on Elm Street etc...) and crime/revenge (I Spit on Your Grave, Friday the 13th, TCM, Scream, Urban Legend ect...). This one falls under the latter heading. And while realism can render a more potent effect ("This could really happen!"), this film simply fails to engage the viewer ON ANY LEVEL.The goal of a slasher film is two-fold: to horrify and repulse. This does neither!! The "horror" element is non-existent: there is no point in expounding, since there is nothing to examine.  And, if you love gore (and who doesn't?) try another film. The "murders" are barely visible (literally) and so sloppy that they solicit no response other than a yawn. Many of the film's problems are technical: the cinematography is just horrendous. The entirely film is extremely underlit, the colors are needlessly washed-out, and the film stock is grade "F." And this, as you know, is not because the film is over twenty-five years old . . . the problem was always there.There is ONE "good" moment in the entire film . . . when the school's "bad boy" has his head lopped-off and it clumsily thunks down the prom-court walk-way. Still, it is more comic-relief than genuine horror.The soundtrack could not BE WORSE. I am not referring to the disco tunes (we accept those since this film was made at the end of the disco period), but the tracks made for the film . . . they sound like they were squeaked-out by The Carpenters. So, imagine lots of disco punctuated by lackluster, psuedo-thoughtful ballads (like the final song on the track). Words cannot explain how wildly offensive it is!!Did I mention that Leslie Nielson has a meaty role (yes, THAT Leslie Nielsen from Airplane, and Naked Gun)? He plays a tough-minded principal who is tormented by the death of his daughter. I know, it SOUNDS funny, but IT'S NOT!! Trust me!!If you dig watching unattractive teenagers "disco the night away," hey, this film is totally for you!! But if you are looking for a decent slasher film from the early middle-period of its reign look elsewhere (like Halloween, Friday the 13th etc...)I'd be willing to get all Ed McMahon's Star-Search on you and give this "film" a 1/4 star. But it is an important milestone in the slasher sub-genre (I will not spoil the film and tell you why, though). So if you are a slasher enthusiast or a horror scholar, watch it . . . on picture-in-picture . . . maybe after a few drinks . . . on a day when the cable is out . . . on fast-forward!
Hasn't this been done much better before?. Let's be frank, shall we? This mock sci-fi is just one more take on "can't we all just get along".  How transparent.  Dress up the black guy in a silly rubber suit and pretend he's an ALIEN.  Involve him in SPORTS!  There aren't many films that make me curse out loud, but this is one of them.  Treacly and brain-dead beyond endurance, the only thing that might have saved it would have been a spirited rendition by poor Gossett of "It Isn't Easy Being Green".  One of the other reviewers mentioned Lee Marvin and Toshiro Mifune in HELL IN THE PACIFIC. I couldn't agree more. That film, essentially the same thing, is immeasurably better.  Do yourself a favor: skip this exploitive garbage and watch either HELL IN THE PACIFIC or some genuine science fiction.
AMAZON SUCKS. I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!
Bad director, bad!. God, this movie was....lame. I mean, it was lame. It limped; it struggled, it staggered.   I lost track of the cliches during the first five minutes.  The really graphic sex scene that indicated the girl was gonna get killed? Check. The sleazeball guy getting killed? Check. The sleazeball guy practically begging for death? "Here, doggie..."?  That's eighty minutes of my life I'll never get back.
Deeply disappointing. A Midnight Clear (Keith Gordon, 2002)Keith Gordon will probably be best remembered for playing Arnie Cunningham in John Carpenter's so-so film version of Stephen King's so-so novel Christine. Gordon, however, hung up the acting togs in the late eighties and went behind the camera, and it is here he has truly shined, turning out such brilliant movies as Waking the Dead and television genius on such series as House, Dexter, and Homicide: Life on the Street. The man has an amazing track record. So it's with some confusion that I regard those works where Gordon comes off as being somewhat less accomplished. A Midnight Clear is one of them.Based on a novel by William Wharton, A Midnight Clear is the story of a World War II platoon (full of misfits, natch) who are ordered to scout out a mansion inside enemy territory. They encounter the enemy-- but not an enemy they expect. The survivors of a German platoon are in a house down the hill looking to surrender. The two groups spend a companionable Christmas together before they turn to the task of deciding how to get each other out of the situation they've found themselves in-- enemies in wartime becoming friends.This is not your typical war film; characterization is much more important than action here, and as in many other substandard war films of this stripe (Hart's War and Tigerland immediately come to mind), it almost seems as if the director wanted to still play it as an action film. There's not enough real character development here to float the entire movie; we get to know our main character well enough, and the character upon whom the entire plot will turn later. We get a little less on the guy who's here for the purpose of building sympathy. On the rest of the platoon, very little, and on the enemy, nothing. We know more about the back-line lieutenant-- a minor character at best-- than we do about the Germans.Not up to the standards set by either Gordon or Wharton. *
Star Trek:  City on the Edge of Forever. My favorite show of the Trek series but there's no way I'd buy another individual program from Amazon.  It will ONLY play on their downloaded player ...won't burn to DVD so can't play it on my television.  Don't bother buying this ...just go for the Trek collection on DVD
Land of Oprahisms. Having avoided seeing this film, I found that the mistake of sending my partner to the rental store on his on, brought "Tuesday..."unbiden into our home.My aversion to Oprah and her ilk, does not cloud my dislike of this film. A bad film is a bad film.Devoid of any real plot and hampered by some very poor acting on the part of all concerned, and directionless directing, this film should not be seen by anyone who values the aforementioned,To me a reasonable premise should move a story forward. Something should occur, my interest should be engaged. This film takes reams of pre-packaged aphorisms and greeting card verses, and attempts to build the plot from words alone. It is as if someone picked up the telephone book and said, "Hey,this book is full of words, lets make a movie."In a way a movie about the different lives of those listed in the telephone book would be more interesting.To be honest, Jack Lemmon was not very good in this film. He played the same character he always did. Just older. Hank Azaria was just awful. He talked as if his mouth was filled with stones, and was wooden and expressionless. Maybe he was too embarrased to be there. As to the other actor's; well they filled up the space nicely.The look of the film was cheap and of the movie of the week quality. The sprayed on snow in a winter scene looked as fake as it was. They even covered the green leaves on the trees. Some better acting, some good R rated dialogue, and maybe some nudity would have spiced up this film. As it stands,however, it will only be of interest to fans of Oprah and Dr.Phil, etc. The purveyors of our national state of pity and feeling soory for ourselves.It is seldom that we find car keys under our chairs, but films such as this perpetuate the myth that a few nice phrases, a good cry, and a genial talk-show presenter will somehow make it all better.I,for one, think that a nice cuppa is more beneficial. Then pull the finger out, and just get on with it.(To the grammar and form police: I did have this in paragraphs, but the editing process scrunched it all together. Sorry
Lack of talent ruins a movie that could have been good. Battlefield Earth is an adaptation of the book by L. Ron Hubbard.While the book was a rather interesting story about humans, led by Jonnie Goodboy Tyler, taking back Earth from the Psychlos, the film has turned the story into a string of badly filmed action sequences, with silly camera angles and awful editing. The Psychlos already have human workers before capturing Jonnie. This change in the story serves no purpose but makes the story even more messy. The film then focuses on some of the story elements in the book, but leaves most of it out, including the entire last half.Considering this was a dream project for John Travolta, it's strange that he would let the book be made into such a bad movie, especially such a silly one. While the book was not without flaws, it was actually pretty good, but the movie is for the most part more or less incompetently made. The director, writers and editors all did a bad job. It does have some entertainment value though, which keeps me from giving it the lowest rating.
Fatally Flawed. Sure, this movie is a classic. But is it any good? Frankly, I found it to be tedious in the extreme.It's certainly pleasant to look at. The sets are quite amazing, and the cinematography is absolutely beautiful.The story (as described in detail in many other reviews here) has potential as both a thriller and a thought-provoking essay (ultimately it is neither).The acting is top notch, as are all of the special effects. Those of us who cut our teeth using teletype machines always get a kick out of seeing them in all their anachronistic glory. In fact, all of the computer stuff is believable for the era and pleasantly nostalgic.But the whole thing never rises to its premise. Its "thriller" aspect is artificial and not tied to the central plot line, and entirely predictable from the moment our friend is handed THE ONLY KEY THAT CAN STOP THE NUKE! The resolution is an afterthought (a quick fix in the extreme), and barely even mentioned in about two lines of dialogue after the artificial danger is (narrowly, whew!) averted. The characters are thin at best, and stock at worst.This movie is really a slow survey of what people in the early 70s thought technology would be like in the mid 70s. Yawn. (I must laugh at the whole bell/paper bit. It means nothing to the plot, and is the ultimate contrivance.)If a deadly virus actually came back from space, there would certainly be action on many fronts, with plenty of interesting conflict to go around. Some people would try to understand it, others would want only to kill it. There's some potentially interesting tension right there. Some people would argue to keep the danger hidden from the public, others would want to warn them. Again, that could have been a good source of tension. Someone would surely have suspected that the military wanted to harness it as a biological weapon (mentioned in passing, but never developed), while others would try very hard to prevent that. More tension.I'm just saying that this movie is littered with missed opportunities for something more than the collection of boring experiments and pointlessly slow-moving scenes which it actually contains. This movie is the poster child for boring science fiction, and it would not have had to be that way.I haven't read the book, but I bet it's a lot better. At its core, this movie is a boring dud.
The Postman is a very seriously boring movie. The Postman is a very seriously boring movie with terrible story line. One of the most conspicuous flops of its decade and there is good reason for it. I had to write this review when I saw that there were several people actually rating this movie at 5 stars. Seriously guys you forgot to take your pills this morning and your friends will the white coats will be visiting later to check on you, until then please refrain from using your PC as we are in danger of obliteration of good taste
Bad Device. I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service
waste of money. Dont purchase episode 5 of season 2, it's 7 minutes long and you dont get any of the Charlie Murphy Prince story.  WTF!!!  Can someone fix this and refund or offer the entire episode for re-download!!!
Embarassing performance by Szeryng... ...make no mistake, I'm a big fan of Szeryng...however, he had a reputation of occasionally having one or more cocktails before a performance...and in this video he appears to be lit up like a Christmas tree and the result is sloppy and demeaning
Swimming With Sharks - Kevin Spacey. This film is beautifully acted by Kevin Spacey, but far too dark and gloomy for comfortable viewing.It may indeed depict what the writer thought of the film world, but why inflict this depiction on the world I ask.The story is cynical, cruel and I found the last half of the film very uncomfortable to watch.  Not a favourite
One word: Dull. I read this book for a project two years ago. I wasn't about to finish this book and had to move to another one. First off, this book lacks emotion. This character is so boring. She doesn't seem to ever feel sad or mad and to me, a book without emotion is just unreadable. I hated this book, but I don't like most Scott O'Dell books. Just go read another book
There's Got to Be a Morning After....Please. The most surprising aspect of this 2006 thrill ride of a movie is that at ninety minutes, it is almost a half-hour shorter than its 1972 predecessor, a blessing really given that director Wolfgang Peterson seems only interested in filming the action sequences. An inspired choice for the remake, the veteran director has already proven a sharp acumen for providing exceedingly cramped, seafaring adventures with his classic WWII submarine movie, "Das Boot" and the more recent fishing trip-gone-wrong, "The Perfect Storm". The offsetting problem, however, is that Mark Protosevich's trite screenplay abbreviates character development in favor of banal dialogue and stock responses. The net result is that there is little concern for the fate of any of the characters, especially the women who look interchangeable when soaked, no matter how dire the consequences.Peterson wastes little time, barely fifteen minutes, in setting up the ten key characters for the big tidal wave. From that point, he combines predictably spectacular CGI effects with outsized set pieces to dramatize the familiar journey this group takes to find their way to the hull where they seek safety. The one indisputable improvement over the original is the way Peterson effectively shows the fast elevating water level in a more realistic way, especially in having the characters swim a lot more through the submerged air shafts. Less realistic is the way all the characters appear to swim at Olympian levels in their ability to forego oxygen for lengthy periods. But the set-up gets repetitive, and the only diversion, albeit a minor one, is figuring out which character will be killed next.As the alpha male, Josh Lucas cuts a reasonable action figure playing the Gene Hackman hero role though a more mercenary type given that his character is a professional gambler. Relegated to second lead, Kurt Russell seems to be inheriting Ernest Borgnine's role but not as a blowhard cop but as the sensitive former mayor of New York (huh?). They argue periodically about what path to take, but that's the only relationship that has any semblance to reality in the film. With no one as colorful as Shelley Winters or Stella Stevens this time, the rest of the actors barely register, including wide-eyed Emmy Rossum playing Russell's conflicted daughter and Jacinda Barrett as the brave mother of a predictably precocious son.The biggest waste is the normally colorful Richard Dreyfuss cast rather pathetically as a gay, suicidal architect who barely says a word once the action starts. The climax gets quite convoluted in its technicalities, and then it simply ends. There are nine minutes of end credits at the end listing the multitudes who worked on the special effects. The two-disc 2006 DVD is strictly for aficionados of this genre of film with several "making of" featurettes and a History Channel documentary which looks at the possibility of such waves wreaking such havoc. Surprisingly, there is little reference to the 1972 inspiration directed by Ronald Neame. And consequntly, there is barely enough to hold interest over the course of two discs. An unmemorable viewing experience overall
BOB SAGET IS THE ANTI-CHRIST. BOB SAGET WANTS TO EAT YOUR CHILDREN - DO NOT SEE HIS MOVIE
Boring. I bought this movie after reading the rave reviews on this site.  I have to say I was highly disappointed.  Although the 2 main characters are very likeable and their acting is good, the disco-type music in this so-called scary movie was just annoying.  I also found the 'love-scene type' music very inappropriate.  The type of music they used just made me hate the movie even more.  I was hoping for a 'haunted house' theme in this movie and it just didn't deliver.  I will give this movie 2 stars because I liked the 2 main characters.  There are no gruesome murders or anything like that in this film
Wonderful program, but flawed files... Okay, so to catch up on this exciting new series, I decided to try this revolutionary downloading program - Amazon Unbox!  I selected the first 10 episodes and hit Purchase.  Minutes later, I was watching the first episode, it came quickly, sounded great, and looked wonderful... however the second one was missing a few minutes at the end.  Forgiveable, until... whole episodes starting arriving incomplete or had missing video, making it incredibly frustrating and disappointing.But, this IS a good concept... unfortunately, Amazon has yet to verify all their own files for both audio and picture quality!  So, until the issue is fixed and paying customers recieve completed files or refunds... DO NOT try and download Season 1, Episodes 2, 4, 5, 6, and 7!!!  1, 3, 8, 9, and 10 were the only ones that were 100% complete for me
boring....... i only liked it when pinnochio talked. that was funny, but the rest of the movie was discusting. Some of the scens were very sick (not the blood, but other things). There was no blood hardly, and i could have made it alot better. I espected a good film but it was ... and i would never see it again
Big disappointment... Jane Fonda was not only an excellent actress but a beautiful, if opinonated (remember Hanoi Jane?), woman.  I watched this as a teenager and despite the "striptease" this has to be one of her worst.  Hormones be damned, watching this was a waste of time.  If you like Fonda, try Klute.  She was an excellent actress --- but no one could survive this mess.
Barberella Psychadela It's Not. The opening strip scene is reminiscent of Barbarella - too bad those aren't Basinger's legs though. Nerdy scientist falls for galactic beauty as presented by Kim Basinger. I have never understood Ackroyd's characters. And keeping in form, he is once again as unfunny as mud. Basinger tries so hard - too hard - to rescue this film, but that's no small task considering the ineptness of this way silly film. OK so she munches on batteries, and thinks she has to cook everything in the kitchen at mealtime. She seems a genuine Betty Crocker given that her favorite foods are nuts and bolts. Jon Lovitch also tries to prop up Ackroyd and this weak script. However, his contribution seems way overstated to me. He doesn't have much to do. Funny are the scenes inwhere the teenage girl eventually decides that her step-mother is not like other people. Basinger's character has a magic purse with an annoying creepy critter in it who tells her what to do. Think, Jar-Jar Blinks. I suppose it's OK as a backdrop for housecleaning. But that's it. Flat and mechanical
Terrible!. I have never not been able to sit through a rated G movie.  However, my sister and I rented this thinking it would be a funny show, and it was so terribly BORING that I was forced to leave the room.  I couldn't believe it because I love movies.  I can see how this movie would be funny for a 6 year old boy to watch, but don't count on the parents or older siblings being able to sit through it
power. i can't rate it because i received (2)discs from amazon and bth of them jammed on me i would luv to see this movie .Beware if your considering ordering it.
When Hippies Make Movies. I had looked forward to seeing this movie for quite a while, being a big Sellers fan and a Ringo/Beatles fan - as well had heard through the grapevine that this was supposed to be a fun and interesting movie. It is neither. Perhaps you could rate it a curiosity - if you happened to be a fan such as myself. The idea of the film would seem to offer great opportunities for both Sellers and Starr to shine, but the script and story (what there was of it) fails to deliver on the promises it alludes to. One strange setting after another ends anti-climatically, which in turn quickly leads to a sense of frustration at a great missed opportunity. It really does seem that they "wrote" it as they went along, if there was anything written at all. And one tired anti-establishmment cliche after another gives good example why professionals instead of hippies should run with the good ideas in order to see them well executed
Could have been so much better!. I have to say that I am not familiar with any of the old Shaft episodes, or had had any other contact with the character apart from this movie so I cannot make any comparisons to other sources, nor can I take part in discussing the technicalities and the specifics like other reviewers have.  Therefore, coming from someone that did not "know" of Shaft prior to the film I have to say... that I was rather disappointed!The acting is about average with the exception of Samuel Jackson who carries out his performance very well (as always), and Jeffrey Wright who really steals the show as Basquiat, the gangster.Regarding the plot, it is weak; the chances that the character, Walter Wade Jr., would provoke and then deliver as he does are way beyond "slim!"  The desperate need to demonize what W.W. Jr. represents gets tiring after the first 1000 or so movies!  Enough is enough!  The same applies for main characters with "chips on their shoulders!"  Let's move on please!As for having Vanessa Williams (who is GORGEOUS!) play in this film and not have a single nude scene (in this R Rated movie!) with her is such a WASTE!Though the potential for a great movie was definitely there it fails to take off.  A shame really...  No masterpiece here.
Man oh man.... You talk about disappointed, this is the icing on the cake.  All I hear about is how scary and cutting edge this was.  Not even close.  Whatever big shot film critics say that are truly wrong.  I love older movies too and am open minded to the change in times and such. There are actually some scary or at least entertaining horror flicks during the 70's, but this is not one of them....seriously, don't buy this.  I don't know why it is so highly regarded.  The acting, story, and especially the music is EL TERRIBLE'.  It's like porn quality acting, a story written in about 25 minutes and music from a Disney movie.  It could have been a good movie if they would have taken out the attempt at comedy, through in some disturbing music, and made the bad guys, well, more bad.  It could be remade (which i'm usually against)
Why?. Why? Someone tell me why. Someone e-mail me and explain to me why. There is nothing to gain here. Nothing to be learned, nothing to excite, no story. Why? Seriously, is there any documentation that might explain WHY this thing (not a film) exists. Return of the Texas Chainsaw Massacre is so unprecedented in it's poorness, that it doesn't even succeed in being a dumb slasher flick. Let me reiterate. The filmmakers actually FAILED at the least complicated genre in the book. If I wanted a series of randomly assembled images leading nowhere I would have rented "Week End".The only reason to see this is that ever crafty curiosity value. Yes, you will be compelled to watch, if only to observe some clue as to why both Matthew McConaughey (pre-"A Time to Kill") and Rene Zellweger (pre-"Jerry Maguire") accepted the lead roles (the clue never comes). Texas Chain Saw fans will, of course, feel the completist need to see this, the death knell of the series. And finally, I think just the concept of Leatherface as a shrieking cross-dresser will garnish a few bewildered viewers. But believe me folks, this still doesn't answer the ultimate question: Why? Why?! WHY?
"You Are Acting Like Hu-Man Not Ro-Man!". ROBOT MONSTER is one of "those" classic Five Star One Star '50s horror movies. The problem with "C" movies is that they can't be rated by the usual standards. By its own standards its a gem.But for the fact that this gobbler wasn't touched by Ed Wood it has all the guaranteed elements of bad moviemaking. Actually, ROBOT MONSTER was panned so severely upon release that director Phil Tucker attempted suicide afterward.ROBOT MONSTER concerns the depredations of a fat gorilla-suited space alien in a diving helmet (Ro-Man from the planet Ro-Man which is populated by the race of Ro-Mans) who comes to earth and destroys virtually all of human life with the aid of a vacuum tube radio and a Lawrence Welk bubble machine.Ro-Man is a grouchy, slow moving space visitor who talks with his hands and grumbles a lot. He lives in one of the more familiar Hollywood caves of Bronson Canyon, California.The few surviving humans (a family of five) protect themselves by stringing aluminum foil around their house so that Ro-Man cannot use his death ray machine against them. Instead, he must dispose of them one at a time "by the process of strang-u-laaa-tion" if they are so foolish as to step outside of their Reynolds Wrap safety zone.Given their current world political situation, the humans, Richard Nixon-like, are seeking "Peace---But peace with honor!" from Ro-Man. Hmmm. Seems reasonable. After all, Ro-Man has really shown restraint up until this point. Why shouldn't they trust him?But wait! Even after atomizing everybody else (apparently including the film's scriptwriter) Ro-Man has developed a penchant for Alice, the eldest daughter of the survivors. Fortunately for us, Alice seems to have a corresponding yen for excessively hirsute and overweight men wearing fishbowls on their heads. So while Ro-Man is distracted picking a bouquet for his new girlfriend, the family figures out a way to finally finish him off.Exactly how humanity is going to repopulate the earth with only the Father Knows Best kids around escapes me, but clearly someone involved with this film escaped from somewhere.It's as bad and as much fun as it sounds.
hmmm... fun, but don't take it as history. This movie is a bit new fantasy. They go waaayy beyond reinventing a story. Still... Garbo does a nice acting job. Too bad they didn't thought it would be neccisary to dy her hair black like Mata Hari was in real life.The movie is still a good classic... but don't take it as history.Mata Hari... the Legend[...
Goin Coconuts. The VHS took quite a while to arrive. I had ordered 5 other items at the same time and it arrived almost 3 weeks later than all the others, I actually had given up on it's showing up.  The video itself rolls quite a bit at the end of the video when played. However, with the age of the movie, I will grant them some slack.  I was disappointed in service and the product.  I will not buy another movie from this seller
Missing episodes. This series is being sold with missing episodes, like many others here in Unbox. Do they think their customers are so dumb? Would you buy a DVD series with a missing DVD? What sense does this make? What a disappointment this service is..
no copy recieved. i never recieved this item . so i cant review it . id like it sent i vaguely remeber ordering it . so if i its on backorder or ill be recieving it soon let me know please .thanks
Really Really Really Bad. Off-hand, I can't think of a worse movie. (And I think Nicolas Cage has done some truly awesome work in other films--hey, he's making a buck, here.) That's all. 1/32 star, if possible
Wonderful program, but flawed files... Okay, so to catch up on this exciting new series, I decided to try this revolutionary downloading program - Amazon Unbox!  I selected the first 10 episodes and hit Purchase.  Minutes later, I was watching the first episode, it came quickly, sounded great, and looked wonderful... however the second one was missing a few minutes at the end.  Forgiveable, until... whole episodes starting arriving incomplete or had missing video, making it incredibly frustrating and disappointing.But, this IS a good concept... unfortunately, Amazon has yet to verify all their own files for both audio and picture quality!  So, until the issue is fixed and paying customers recieve completed files or refunds... DO NOT try and download Season 1, Episodes 2, 4, 5, 6, and 7!!!  1, 3, 8, 9, and 10 were the only ones that were 100% complete for me
A Politically-Correct Melodrama: A Definite Stinker. Waste of money.  Waste of time.  Well-known cast.  Amateurish direction.  Plotless.  Politically correct to the point of being stupid.  The film's incessant attempts at humor fail.  Eric Roberts' character laughs-off his grave circumstance throughout most of the film.  He is self-important, Godless and emotionally false.  It's difficult to empathize with such an unrealisitic character.  The best performances in this film were given by Gregory Harrison and Lee Grant.  The best scene is Gregory Harrison and Eric Roberts' passionate farewell kiss.  Most authentic moment in the film: Lee Grant's reaction to her dying son being carried off.  Very difficult to watch through in one-sitting because it's so repetitive and vapid. You will wait and wait for something to happen and nothing ever does until the final moments.  If you choose to waste your time with this film, you'll be sorry you did
Not happy. This is only a portion of this episode.  It cuts off in the middle of a sentence
The Last Picture Show Meets Von Ryan's Express. Unless you are seriously into coming of age movies you can skip this one.  Critics love this film because it conforms to the modern liberal message that you should have sex with basically anyone.  The attempt to make the protagonist Milos into a tragic hero as a resistance fighter fails because it is obviously unimportant addition to the main story, which is that a young man should have sex early and have sex often
U won't care for this one. Sat down and saw this one on televion.Only good service was that now I know buying the DVD would be a waste of money.What was actually achieved by the British is portrayed as an American achievement. Slanders the U-boat men portraying them as heartless marauders. Other than allied Propoganda pieces, There are no incidents of U-boats machinegunning people in lifeboats.The movie itself I have little respect. Basicly Plotless and  unrealistic. Action scenes unbelievable. Characters Two Dimensional.This film Awful.
Not a good choice for me. My child is 2 1/2 years old .  She watched about 10 minutes into the movie and appeared to be quite frightened by some of the images.  The story line appeared to be sensible but not one that a toddler will understand.  At the end of the day I do not think the point of the story is what she remembers as much as she will remember the scarry pirate.
a putrid stinker of a film. This has to be one of the worst movies I've ever wasted my time watching! Don't dispose a precious cent on this movie unless you are a gigantic Drew Barrymore fan and you are merely viewing the movie for the raw sex scenes and constant,random nudity. The storyline could have worked, yet the movie is pathetically low budget, the acting is horrid and the movie falls desperately flat. It is impossible to like this movie unless you are obsessively in love with Drew Barrymore and you want to watch her at her lowest point. It's so bad that I had to come here to  vent about it online. The director was obviously a film school drop-out who offered the actors free cocaine and produces low budget porn.
Dumb Story. This is the most dumbest story I've ever seen.  It does not make sense and waste of my time to watch it.
Not far enough. The Wisdom of Menopause provides an accurate description of what happens to a woman's body during and after ovarian failure (menopause). This book describes in detail the negative effects of menopause (ovarian failure) while still describing it as a natural and normal process to embrace. I don't believe we should be so willing to allow our ovaries to fail, instead we should look for ways to help them work better and for longer.
Vaguely Entertaining. Not sure what to make of the movie but it is definitely not one of the best movies and not sure if it is even a movie
Not Happy. I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?
The Mothman Travesty. Three problems with this film:1. PACING - The film's pacing doesn't vary.  It's very boring.  As a matter of fact, this wouldn't be a problem if the film were much more tense (e.g., "Speed"), however this film lacks the high-action intensity to pull off such a slow expository speed.2. EFFECTS - Too many sequences of this film rely on color and light superimpositions, and there is an overabundance of high-speed imaging.  The scene changes that employ erratic barrages of images desensitize the viewer from the thrilling "horror" scenes.  Furthermore, they fail to make enough sequential sense of the film's plot to really mean much to the film as a greater whole.  The upshot: the film relies too heavily on the art of editing, to the point where plot twists are no longer interesting.3. TRIVIALITY - The plot's conclusion quails in the face of the "so what?" question.  The viewer is left with a sense of, "I sat through the film for THAT?"  In light of points (1) and (2), this obnoxious bit is the icing on the cake.Don't waste your life.ALon
creepy and disturbing. I did not like this movie. I know that times have changed and it would be revisionist to hold this movie to millennium standards of sexual conduct and infidelity. Nonetheless, I found it very disturbing: his lack of concern for his wife and children, how the wife was unsympathetic and one dimensional, and how absolutely de rigueur it was in the sixties for married men to have "a bit on the side." And what about her kids? apart from the first scene we never see them again; she instead seems to spend all her time cooking and keeping house for a married man. I'm not a prude, really, but this film left a bad taste in my mouth
For the Cover, Not the Film. I watched both "Seven Brides for Seven Brothers" and its documentary "Making of ..." and was impressed by the dancing and the dancers (particulary the incredible Tommy Rall).  Looking for a film that showcased any of the dancers in that film I came across this and after having read the reviews of the dance sequences both on this website and on imdb, I decided to purchase the film.Then I noticed the cover.  I thought "Is this what I think it is?", and clicked on 'see larger image'.  YIKES!  It is!I have children at home and thought that this is not an illustration that is positive or educational, to say the least (after just having placed "Hands Are Not For Hitting" on my wish list!).  If Warner Bros decides to change the illustration on the cover, then I'll consider buying it.  Until then, for those of you who are concerned with the images your children see, I suggest you view the 'see larger image' of the cover before you decide to buy
Bad Device. I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service
Someone owes Orwell an apology. Orwell's novel was about taking spectacular ideas about life and co-operation and morphing it to fit your own greedy desires, losing all purpose and ultimately ending in a futile, corrupt dictatorship. It made fun of dictators then and still makes fun of dictators today, and though an easy read it went deep in speaking politically about man's actions against man.Sadly, none of that is in this film. In fact, this movie is a travesty to the original novel.One major problem is that it renders Orwell's novel cute, probably due to the release of all the animal films during this time ("Babe", "Gordy", what have you). Old Major's speech is a great speech, and who better to perform it than Peter Ustinov? Unfortunately, this speech is ruined by being talked over by Julia Louise Dreyfus as the horse complaining that she will lose her ribbons if man is overthrown, among other animals and their minor problems. Imagine Katie Couric talking over Winston Churchill's "We Will Fight on the Beaches" speech and you'll understand how I feel.It gets worst later on. The main character is not the farm entire, but instead a female dog that annoyingly whines and complains the whole time and tries to narrate what is going on. Does this sound bad? It gets worst. In the end she leads the animals out of the farm, and then tells us everything lived happily ever after. Napoleon's animalism fails (we're never told how or see it happen, they basically throw it at us and say "Take our word for it!") and then a white, middle-class family of four moves in and takes over the farm. The End.Did Orwell's point just fly past these people or what? Orwell was always a master of the closing line to me, and "Animal Farm" is no exception. Even the British animated film managed to sneak in Orwell's metaphor before closing with a happy ending.This was such a waste. Peter Ustinov as Old Major, Ian Holm as Squeeler, Patrick Stewart as Napoleon...all these talented names being wasted sounds horrible, but it is true. Such a great book with serious representation being treated in an amatuerish fashion may not bother some, but for others it is a big deal.If you like Orwell, if you loved the novel, if you enjoy great stories, and if you enjoy good films...don't watch this movie
All the bad things you heard and then some more. There is nothing good I can say about this movie.There is absolutely nothing remotely entertaining about it.If the main-characters didn't go by the names of Mario & Luigi, you'd be lost.Nothing here resembles the video-game it's based on, which isn't a bad thing neccessarily......except that nothing here resembles any kind of story.The acting is bad, perhaps on purpose......but who cares? It's not amusing in the slightest.The movie is boring. In 90 minutes, you'll want to gouge your eyes out."Super Mario Bros." -- the movie -- has been proven to damage brain-cells upon each viewing.In a Koopa-shell, don't waste your time on this movie. Don't even look at the cover. Don't even read this review. Just try and pretend this "movie" doesn't exist
Did not work. The ones that are posted twice do not work. If they are posted once, you can try to download it, but it might not work. The video only worked for about a minute. Shame, since I really like this show and I wanted Amazon Unbox to be cool. The one cent CSI works, go download tha
Disappointed. So not at all what i was expecting.I had heard a lot of good things about this movie over the years and when i finally sat down to watch it,i was terribly disappointed and confused.
read my review for skyscraper it's the same thing.... Even though it's not a &quot;movie&quot;, everything I said on my skyscraper/to the limit review applies her
Maybe I'm blind but I just don't see it... I just want to say that I really, really wanted to like this movie...I just couldn't bring myself to.  It came on IFC the other night and since I've been on this Independent Film kick lately, that and it starred Penn, Morton and Thurman, I decided to give it a watch through.  I had heard good things about it, mostly about Morton's performance as well as Penn, so I can honestly say I had high expectations.  Those expectations, sadly, were not met.First of all I want to say that Penn's performance was so overrated I was left appalled that he was even considered among Spacey, Crowe and Washington that year.  Morton on the other hand did add some weight to the picture and proved that she is a commanding actress even when she says not a single word.Penn plays fictional jazz guitarist Emmett Ray, a very conceded and irresponcible man who spent his time womanizing and obsessing over better known musician Djamgo Reinhardt.  The film follows this mans life as he takes up with Hattie (Morton) a mute woman who's nave enough to love this man and then leaves her to marry aspiring news reporter Blanche (Thurman) who is using Emmett for a story.  The much underused Anthony LaPaglia and Brad Garrett make almost too-short cameos as gangsters who get involved with Emmett and Blanche.All in all this was a very slow moving film that eventually went nowhere.  Woody Allen is known as a classic director, and that maybe the case, but this is nowhere near classic.  It's mockumentary style of directing is annoying since it's not funny nor interesting, and Sean Penn is just plain ridiculous (as is his character) in this over hyped film
Baseball lovers only. If you don't enjoy baseball at all, then you won't enjoy this movie
Even Steve thinks this film sucks. After doing this film Steve Martin quit doing movies for a while and even turned down scripts written for him so if your a huge fan you may enjoy it, but Roxanne, LA Story, and Bowfinger are some of Steve's best works.
bogged down. Liz Hurley has her top off 4 or 5 times; there is incest, lesbian love between sisters-in-law, the main character's husband is having an affair with his brother's girlfriend who really isn't his brother's girlfriend, she really is his girlfriend that was coming along on the boat trip pretending to be his brother's girlfriend so she could meet his wife who happens to be having some psychic connection with a "solved incorrectly" murder from 125 years ago on an island with some Norwegian people. And honest to god the movie is boring. Sean Penn broods, leers, pains, and smokes cigarettes, his wife is played by Catherine McCormack who is like a young Charolette Rampling, very watchable but condemned to a weak role;  Liz Hurley acts very vampy and takes her top off (unforgettable): All this and the movie drags, and drags. Liz stops taking her top off at the 1/3 mark which then forces you to realize how bad the movie is.  The parallel stories just don't come off. Actually it is a one star movie, Liz taking her top off boots it one extra star
THE WORST FRIDAY! ....BUT IF YOU WANT THE COMPLETE SET. I was really disappointed with this entry even though Jason Takes Manhattan isn't much better! The DVD treatment is way to good for this film. If you want to complete the Friday series it should be seen as it does set up for the Freddy VS Jason movie.
WHY  AREN'T ZERO STARS AVAILABLE FOR RATING??????. Maybe I should have known better, but hokey and horrible do not have to be the same. This is a four dollar movie in any department store
Loaded deck shoots blanks. Considering the sensational cast (Eli Wallach, Terrence Hill, Bud Spencer, Kevin McCarthy and Brock Peters), the Euro-western era it was made in and the locations where it was shot, Ace High is a major disappointment. The plot is uninvolving and incoherent, the cinematography is cramped and completely lacking in style, the music is weak during a time that spawned so many memorable soundtracks and the direction lacks any focus whatsoever. The editing looks like it was performed with a butcher's knife. After the first ten minutes, I knew I'd made a mistake buying it. A boring 120 minute piece of junk, Ace High is hopelessly outgunned by any number of great Italian westerns including Corbucci's The Mercenary or Parolini's Sabata series. Save your fistful of dollars for a better film
Pretty forgotten by now. The Forgotten starring Julianne Moore and Domnic West is a slow, tepid, and hard to grasp film. The previews for this film were better than the actual movie, I guess that's a bad sign that the movie isn't going to be great (I'll try and remember that next time). The only reason I am giving The Fogotten 2 stars is the scene with Alfe Woodward, you'll know what I mean when it happens, the scence is scary and comes out of nowhere, very intrguing spurprise awaits. Anyways The Forgotten is a movie you should see once and that's it, happy viewing
Did not work. The ones that are posted twice do not work. If they are posted once, you can try to download it, but it might not work. The video only worked for about a minute. Shame, since I really like this show and I wanted Amazon Unbox to be cool. The one cent CSI works, go download tha
Bad Device. I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service
"slice of life"?. I've seen the phrase "slice of life" used many times to describe this movie, which makes me wonder - whose life is this a slice of? Certainly not mine, and not most people's. The Anniversary Party is a slice of the lives of a group of people who are extremely vain, self-absorbed, jaded and rich beyond most people's wildest fits of imagination. Worse, there isn't much of a hint that the filmmakers were aware that most people, or at least most people who are fun to be around, don't act the way these characters do.Good films can be made about Hollywood - in "Mulholland Drive" it's kind of a dream world, both in the sense that it's hazy and ambiguous and in the sense that one of its characters dreams of being a bigger part of it; in "State and Main," the self-absorption of many of the characters is offered for our amusement. "The Anniversary Party" is presented as if most viewers will be sympathetic with the characters, but I can't imagine them elicting much sympathy from anyone who isn't also a bored rich prick. If this is truly a "slice of life" for the Hollywood set, it is no wonder that so many films produced in Hollywood are so cynical and shallow.
I made it all the way through. Alright, second time I did.   But I still enjoyed it.  I went into this just hoping bolo would be in a few one-on-one fights, and luckily he was.  He looks pretty tough and is not a bad kung fu actor.   But his directing job just fails miserably.  Btu with a ton of great character actors and all teh final fight baddies are funny, so it wasn't a total loss of a movie.  Not like some of bolo's newer day stuff.  Overall a comedy that works, but only in that aspect, the kung fu could have been really good, but then againagain, I have seen much much worse.  The final fight was fun  and was a good way to end the movie.Pai Pao is pretty good, but thsi movie I think would be really popular around the ladies, cause I got pretty sick at looking at bolo.  And his fake beard just ruined his character.  Also there is a part where bolo gets mad, and then smoke comes out of his nose.  enjoyAlso, the movie would have recieved a 3, but  some of the kung fu was actually really good and a widescreened presentation would have helped tremendously.  But then again, maybe I didn't see it very well cause bolo and pai paio were the action directors.So full screened and a watchable picture.  No distortion or fuzzy lines, would have been watchable I guess if the movie was better.
Too true to Life. I read the book when it was first published and then a friend had a son diagnosed with leukemia and went through the same thing as the Mom in the book. Fortunately he had a lot of advocates that pushed him to ignore the insurance company and his son finally found a donor match but it was too late. So I feared that this movie would not be up to the book. My fears were unfounded, the casting was brilliant and I loved this movie, even though it is tough to watch, I still catch it in reruns on the satellite occasionally and "must watch". That is how good it is
A Tale Told By A Teenager, Signifying...?. The premise - that one could change specific events in ones' past through psychic concentration - could have been the foundation for a fascinating thriller.  I don't condemn the film's corollary either: that each change produces new, unforseeable tragedies.  It's the way the story is told - its ham-fisted dialogue and plot, its forced obscenity at every turn - that reveals its teen sensibilities.It is therefore fitting that the director's preferred ending is included here.  It is the perfect catharsis for teens who "...wish I was never born!
Poor support. This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet
Hate it!. To violent for anyone! This movie is horrible. The cast is good, but the plot stinks! Its just this family who have super powers. Then this kid wanted to be Mr. Incredibles side kick. (in a way)Mr. Incredible says no so then he hates him. Then the kid turns evil and kills people, and wants every body to like him. Thats origanal. There are barely any jokes you laugh once every 20 minutes, and there is way to much violence. Killing, guns, punching, bombs, and they say stupid words sometimes. I do not like the person who directed this film because he should not like violence. So I do not recommend this movie to anyone. Especially the 2 disc special edition!
Ultimate Jordan is a lot better. I bought this DVD with great anticipation only to be let down.  Sure the visuals are great but I'm more interested in the plays that made the Jordan experience special.  The Ultimate Jordan is a much better DVD
The worst version of a Christmas Carel. This was the only movie in the trilogy that I thought was clean enough to get a G rating.  They did not follow the story line from the last two films.  We meet a new Villian Belandona Ambells evil sister who has manipulated Carfaxce and his minnion Killer to help here ruin Christmas.  How careface got on Earth when he supposed to be dead and be in Hell is never covered. They have a cheesy flash back when you find out why he became such a bad dog.  Charlie is supposed to alive giving and second chance at the end of second film When he returned Gabriels horn. Belandona is decent but not as evil as the other villians I have seen if on my top hundred villans list Belandona is 11th in the top 20.  The 1st Sauron.  The 2th Naraku. 3th Malificent. 4th Cluney. The 5th Slagar the cruel.  The 6th Tasarmina. 7th. Badrang.  8th Golloum 9th Team Rocket. Tenth  Kagura.  I hardly recommend you don't she this movie it sucks even though it has a happy ended. And Carface goes good
WARNING: Wrong Episode!. This item is supposedly titled "UFOs: The First Encounters." It is, however, an episode about reincarnation. It is incorrectly labeled. DO NOT PURCHASE unless you are looking for an episode on reincarnation
Same Thing. The Dane Cook episode is the same one that it on his "Harmful If Swallowed" c.d. The c.d. also has the uncensored version of this routine that is over 1 hour long. The one star rating is not based on the content. It is based upon Amazon not sharing this fact with customers
floozy & boozy jessica gets her golden boy. jessica lange won an oscar for this, proof positive that some years are so bereft of strong performances, they HAVE to give it to somebody. apart from that, this is a silly exercise in anti-government paranoia, with a wasted tommy lee jones and not much else.
Disappointing. First of all, for the caliber of actors in this movie, they deserved a better script.  Michelle Pfeifer and Peter Gallagher are class acts, but really this movie just did not dig deep enough. I have read all the rave reviews of Claire Danes, as I have read all the raves in the past and I am beside myself. I mean she has mastered the part of the proverbial angst-ridden pouting teenager to a tee. If this is her niche, so be it. The premise of the story is pretty decent -- a man loses his wife in a tragic freak accident and has a hard time moving on. Completely understandable.  Then his annoying sister in law and  her equally annoying husband arrive and proceed to berate the poor guy for mooning over a wife that is dead. Oh my god, stop the presses. These people had the sensitivity of androids.  It would have been nice to see him kick these people out of the house, but then the film would'nt drone on and on,  This is a good film for a rainy day.  But I expected more
I've been cheated by Amazon. It really sucks, tried to download but it's not able to be viewed in pc's outsided the united states. Crikey.I'll have to wait for reruns to watch it on the telly.Whatta shame amazon dot com. Let's send a CSI to yer headquarters
Worthless Western. The Claim purports to be an adaptation of Thomas Hardy's classic novel, The Mayor of Casterbridge transplanted to the Old West. The producers clearly wanted The Claim to be accepted as a literate Western and it is clear that the critics fell for it. However, as anyone who has read the original Hardy novel can tell you, the movie fails as a Hardy adaptation. Meanwhile, any fan of movie westerns can tell you that The Claim is a failure in that department as well.The Claim begins in 1869 where Daniel Dillon (Peter Mullan) lords supreme over his company town. His gold mining company is a topflight operation. Dillon is easily one of the most admired men in California, if not in the nation. However, Dillon is not a terribly happy man. Deep down, he broods over a dark secret that, if exposed, could lead to the destruction of his reputation.You see, the gold claim was originally made by another man, but Dillon sold his wife and daughter to the original claimant in exchange for the claim. The prospector thereupon took both wife and child to Boston and raised the family there. Meanwhile, Dillon ruthlessly exploited the gold claim to become one of the richest men in all of California. Needless to say, if it became public knowldege that Dillon's success was based on the sale of human beings, that would be nothing short of disastrous.Matters are brought to a head when his wife (Nastassja Kinski), daughter (Milla Jovovich) and his wife's subsequent daughter with the other man (Sarah Polley) show up in town and request that he take them in as his family. Just when you think that things are going to get interesting, the rug is pulled out from the audience's feet when it is revealed that Dillon conveniently never married after making his dirty deal. This enabled him to marry his ex-wife without never having to publically admit that they were previously married or what happened to that union. This effectively removed all dramatic tension and helped make The Claim a colossal bore
The worst movie ever made. This movie has got to be the worst I have ever seen. Garfield written by Jim Davis is a wonderful comic with lots of clever humor. Garfield is my favorite comic of all time. but this movie was nothing like the comic at all. Even Jaws: The Revenge and Batman and Robin can entertain me when I'm really bored. This movie I felt like I was trapped threw the whole thing. Before this movie I believed that every movie could be slightly entertaining, nd then I saw this. If you're a fan of the comicdon't see this movie. Its not Garfield its just a bunch of characters with the same names, that don't act at all like there comic counter parts. I think if I could rate this movie any number I would rate it -10. Its just that bad. Do not by this movie. In fact don't even rent it you aren't missing anything if you don't see it. My final word is that if you want to see the real Garfield just read the comics
A must pass for true fans. I have loved Riverdance since the first time I saw it on PBS.  I could wait till I received my Riverdance: Live from New York DVD so many years ago.  Recently, I had a chance to see it on tour when it came to Los Angeles.  I had been waiting for that moment so long and it was everything I could hope for (with the exception of them having removed the song "Home in the Heartland" which any ture fan knows brought the story full circle).  That night, I ordered not only Riverdance: Live from Geneva, but also Jean Butler's Irish Dance DVD (Which I would recommend).  To make a long story short, don't waste your time with this version of the show.  The main female singer is absolutely horrible (Definitely doesn't hold a candle to Katie MacMahon's original vocals), and the lead female dancer's too short hair drove me crazy.  Do yourself a favor and purchase the 1999 DVD Live from New York.  I promise you won't be disappointed
If you find another source... If you find another source for this movie, pursue it!I liked the movie very much, and saw it first produced on Showtime Entertainment.  This copy appears to be burn made from someone's TV set.Good movie for cheesy fun films, poor quality recording.
O.K. As a die-hard fan of Lenny who was born after his death, I must warn those that in this he strictly just goes over his court problems and doesn't do routines or bits
Vulgar and disgusting. Saw this one on television.Vincent van Gogh was misfortunate in life and certainly crazy. The artist who portrays him does his job very well.The scenery is breathtaking.However the nudity  in the film is vulgar. The chaeracters are hard to identify with. Some of the scenes are disgusting.Not going to see this one again
BORING, TACKY. Watching this movie is about as much fun as having your wisdom teeth pulled. Boring and tacky even by horror standards, the only fun comes from seeing the psychic kids' future wicked stepfather being eaten by the monster that lives in his closet, hence the title. I've seen far worse, but those worse movies were more &quot;enjoyable&quot; than this. The following morning you probably won't remember having seen it. If only the monster had eaten this movie's negative, then we would all be spared
What about the missing episodes. Why should one buy this series? What about the missing episodes? Are they going to be added later, or this is it? I cannot believe this. Would you buy a bicycle with a missing wheel? Or a keyboard without the C and R keys? I'd like Amazon to explain its customers what it plans to do..
Being French does not mean you don't have to say your sorry. as the director and actors of this mess should, on their skinny french knees.  Complete waste of film and your time. Not erotic, sexy (? was that actress really a woman?, was her boyfriend really a man? or visa/versa) Damned if I could tell.  And that old man who tired her up, ya think he had enough rope? The movie was as clinicial as the gyno exam she went through.  French people are not pretty, and this woman was not only NOT pretty, but she drifted through the entire movie in a coma.  Even when she got screwed she looked like she was in a fog.  Save you money and your eyeballs and buy some french fries and eat them on your porch for the same experience
not a horror movie(except for the fact it is a horror to watch). sstephen king can blame no one but himself for this missfire of a movie,because HE WROTE THIS JUNK! never finds it's feet, horror,comedy,drama,fantasy,adventure,and even thriller,it tries to be all and fails at each one!!! skip it!!
new answer to the question "What the worst movie next to Missing in Action I"?. This by far the worst movie that I have ever paid to see at a theatre.  That is not to say that it wouldn't make a good rental; where through multiple viewers you could knock the viewing price down to 15 cents a person, but then that would still be too much to pay for this movie.  WWE Entertainment should stick to what it does best -  wrestling events where the story line is better inside the squared circle.  Outside of a Terminator reference made to Robert Patrick, this is a total waste of 91 minutes of your life
Just horrible. This movie was awful. The main reason was, it is just too unrealistic. You have "angels" played by people like scatman crothers and Charles Durning as well as the Devil played by the now later Oliver Reed coiming into the middle of the scenes and "fast forwarding" and "freezing".......just not realistic at all. Plus you have travolta as an inventor. Edible sunglasses? Yes I know not all movies have to be 100% realistic but this movie just goes too far. I watched it because Grease was such a great movie but this movie just is pathetic, even compared to an average movie, let alone Grease.On the bright side however, the theme song "twist of fate" is one of the best songs of all time and the video is equally awesome. I think I may have just bought the movie to hear the theme song
WARNING: Wrong Episode!. This item is supposedly titled "UFOs: The First Encounters." It is, however, an episode about reincarnation. It is incorrectly labeled. DO NOT PURCHASE unless you are looking for an episode on reincarnation
crumb ripoff!. i started liking this movie, i thought the pinball metaphor and wild characters and lifes a cartoon shiz could have worked out, if it werent for the fact that bakshi is thinly disguising himself and his own frustration as being an unoriginal "underground" cartoonist who caught on to the scene too late...if you like the depressing, gritty, wild, fastpaced style of this movie, check out the original master ROBERT CRUMB, toward whom bakshi is obviously seething with jealousy and riding anxiously on the coattails of...this is crap in noncomformity, and dont say i "didnt get it", i just think hes being hugely self-indulgent and this whole thing is an homage gone awry, lacking the wit, psychedelia, and pornographic brillinace that crumb could create so effortlessly.
Why the Charge. Curious as to why Amazon would charge for this content when CBS offers it for free on the official Survivor Website.  Yeah, at the CBS site you have sit through 4 commercials, but it is worth it to not have to download any extra programs
Looks like a routine television program. I am amazed and mystified that most of the reviewers herein found the movie to be excellent!! As for me, I made it about thirty minutes into the film before turning it off in dismay. The fault in order of importance: poor screenplay, poor cinematography and poor performance by Pacino, who seems to be vying for the most over-the-top performance. The film was absurd in many ways from the outset: the pans from star to star lasting just short of giving the viewer any purpose for any of the fast camera pans. Close-up after close-up conveying no meaning, Pacino overacting like Jack Palance in one of his not-so-famous European pieces of tripe from the sixties and seventies, an utterly dumb plot with Pacino and company proving at the beginning that they are bumbling cops.First example, they chase the bad guy to a cabin which is on stilts or something like that; then, instead of staying on the ground below and smoking the bad guy out or something at least tactically sound, they storm the stairs and Pacino stands right in front of the door yelling "Police, you're under arrest."They kick in the front door and find that the culprit has escaped through an underground water source. Of course, Pacino follows and dives right into the underwater stream, having absolutely no idea where the guy is or if there are boobytraps of some sort.Cut to Pacino running around in nearly zero visibility fog, glimpsing the guy for a second or two before losing him in the fog. Stumbling around further, Pacino is obviously disoriented until a shot is fired at him from, we must assume, his quarry. Did the screen writer forget that Pacino's colleagues are also supposedly chasing the culprit, too?Inevitably and apparently not, because Pacino spots a figure in the fog and plugs him. As I watched this scene unfold, I became thoroughly disheartened when it becomes clear what I knew already, that Pacino has fired on and killed his partner. It was then that I decided that I had had enough.By the way, the European version, with Stellan Skarsgaard is infinitely superior. Don't waste your money or on-line rental queue on this Hollywood drivel. Ditto for the other Pacino junk I rented at the same time, The Recruit, which I could only stand for about a half hour too
"Who would want to kill the sweetest ****** woman in the world?". I knew I was in trouble with FOUR BROTHERS when I saw that Josh Howard (of SPORTS NIGHT fame) was scowling hard, trying to be a tough Detroit cop. Not believable for a nanosecond. And then it got worse when Marky Mark said, "Why don't you two cops get some doughnuts and coffee?"The rest of the film veers along in that kind of lame and clichd rhythm. Almost every scene in this thing is a howler. And watching it, I remembered I hadn't forgiven Tyrese Gibson for the travesty that was 2 FAST 2 FURIOUS. Still, Tyrese is better than Garrett Hedlund, who looks like he's a refugee from THE OUTSIDERS.But the movie's not a total wash; after all, it's got a GREAT soundtrack
UnBox video not yet working. Will not play once video was downloaded. I get the error message:  "can not play file, please try again later. error# 0x80040273" I made the exlusive give me call me back feature but the UnBox department was already closed, I was told the UnBox Saturday and Sunday 6-5 hours. I have to say I am impressed with the Call back feature. I downloaded the Unbox Beta now and am recieving email assistance to try to resolve the problem. Thanks Amazon UnBox! I will Update again - Feb. 10,200
Missing episodes. This series is being sold with missing episodes, like many others here in Unbox. Do they think their customers are so dumb? Would you buy a DVD series with a missing DVD? What sense does this make? What a disappointment this service is..
Only watch it if you are a Brian Heidik fan!. He is the winnner of the latest Survivor & is in this movie.  It is barely watchable, only view it if you are a die hard fan
Didn't work. I downloaded the player and this episode as part of a promotion that gave a free episode. Not only did I get charged, but when I cancelled the download to contact about the charge - I was told I had to finish downloading before they could refund. Once it finished downloading, it didn't play anyway. I gave up.
Missing episodes. This series is being sold with missing episodes, like many others here in Unbox. Do they think their customers are so dumb? Would you buy a DVD series with a missing DVD? What sense does this make? What a disappointment this service is..
What's up with that?. I wish I had read the other reviews first.  Though the quality of the episode and the video are top notch, the episode cuts off after 22 minutes.  Obviously, I already know the ending of "The Black Death", but I still wanted to see the full show
Didn't work. I downloaded the player and this episode as part of a promotion that gave a free episode. Not only did I get charged, but when I cancelled the download to contact about the charge - I was told I had to finish downloading before they could refund. Once it finished downloading, it didn't play anyway. I gave up.
Defense of Jamie Gertz. I'm writing because I thought Fine's review was bad.I was interested in this movie because it has Jamie Gertz, who has proven to be a durable, dependable character actress.  Mr. Fine may or may not have talent but he is not spectacular.  Waspishness insults are passe and not becoming to a serious reviewer.  Ms. Gertz, by contrast, turns an abundance of personality to good account through her career.  I just don't know what "untalented" means in the context of this silly movie, but it was twenty years ago.  Is the insult intended to be forthe movie or for her whole career since?  kBad form and fuzzy thinking.I think the movie is an attempt to imitate features of Flashdance: upbeat background music, meaningless but interesting visuals, skill display, romance,  people with aspirations surviving at a humble level.  Jamie Gertz is the "face" girl
(*&^^$. unfortunatlly i got a dvd that dosnt work.... he lagnguge is not english and when i tried changing and choosing english lang. it dosnt repond... so am stuck with i
Lack of talent ruins a movie that could have been good. Battlefield Earth is an adaptation of the book by L. Ron Hubbard.While the book was a rather interesting story about humans, led by Jonnie Goodboy Tyler, taking back Earth from the Psychlos, the film has turned the story into a string of badly filmed action sequences, with silly camera angles and awful editing. The Psychlos already have human workers before capturing Jonnie. This change in the story serves no purpose but makes the story even more messy. The film then focuses on some of the story elements in the book, but leaves most of it out, including the entire last half.Considering this was a dream project for John Travolta, it's strange that he would let the book be made into such a bad movie, especially such a silly one. While the book was not without flaws, it was actually pretty good, but the movie is for the most part more or less incompetently made. The director, writers and editors all did a bad job. It does have some entertainment value though, which keeps me from giving it the lowest rating.
A Tale Told By A Teenager, Signifying...?. The premise - that one could change specific events in ones' past through psychic concentration - could have been the foundation for a fascinating thriller.  I don't condemn the film's corollary either: that each change produces new, unforseeable tragedies.  It's the way the story is told - its ham-fisted dialogue and plot, its forced obscenity at every turn - that reveals its teen sensibilities.It is therefore fitting that the director's preferred ending is included here.  It is the perfect catharsis for teens who "...wish I was never born!
Bad.... First: The original Magic Flute is in German. This version is NOT !!Second: The audio is not Dolby Digital, not even Prologic... Bad qualityThird: Bad image quality....I do NOT reccomend this version of Magic Flute.I do not frequently review items I have bought, but I decided to review this one because everytime my kids ask me to watch this DVD, I remember what bad choice I've made...
I turned it off half way through. Michael Moore can be really funny at times, but most people should not take this goofball too seriously.  About half way through 'The Big One', I turned it off because I did not find it the least bit funny and I didn't know where Moore was going.  What is the point of putting in a pointless sequence where he is talking to the guitar player of Cheap Trick?  This is not one of his better films
Get real. Quite possibly, the stupidest movie ever made."well-written"--could have fooled me."artfully shot"--I guess it had its moments, especially if you like a lot of very black shadows covering most of what you want to see, but the rest of it is no better than the standards of crappy 60's TV."finely edited"--I guess there's an art to cutting a real turkeyNot a campfest, not a comedy, just plain bad. Get some busty dolls and some dopey guys, throw them in a stew, show some teasers of the breasts, add a cheesy, dashed-off script by a guy who suddenly exemplars "do as I say, not as I do" and plan on it becoming a "cult classic." This is not "The Rocky Horror Picture Show"! And you'd have so much more fun watching that one again instead.Roger Ebert, do you really chuckle when you remember this one claim to movie making fame? I thought your profession was about helping people to not waste their time. You sure wasted mine
AMAZON SUCKS. I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!
Where's the passion?. Recently I read about the revival of "A Chorus Line" on Broadway. I've never seen the Broadway show or any other staging of it, so I thought the movie might give me a sneak peek.  Well, somewhat disappointed here.  I can only assume that the stage version, with its long-running reputation, must be better than this film.  It's not that the film is a total debacle, but it's only mildly pleasant -- and quickly forgettable.  Even songs which I had heard before, like "What I Did For Love", were reduced to barely a mention in the film.  The film seemed to lack any real point.  A bit of a yawner.
Monumental issues, but fails to convince. I have been a Le Carre fan until the end of the Cold War. I somehow still managed to follow him later for some time. But now it is over, definitely. I disliked this novel, and the movie is obnoxious. Rachel Weisz is quite ridiculous in her part. Which idiot nominated her for her Oscar is beyond the point. Zellweger got an Oscar for an even more horrible performance recently, in the otherwise quite acceptable Cold Mountain. And even the otherwise great Blanchett had to turn in an awful performance in The Aviator to get one. (Why can these nice girls not get one for one of their good movies?)My conclusion: this world is strange. It has no idea what is good and what not.
Vampires: Los Suckos. This brainless, low-budget attempt to cash in on the success of John Carpenter's Vampires was so foul and lame that the studios couldn't even bribe one of their lap-dog "reviewers" to crank out a glowing review for the DVD cover. Or maybe they couldn't afford the kickback--who knows? In any case, the bad casting and inept acting had a kind of narcotic quality like an over-the-counter sleeping pill and the movie had so many plot holes that I used the DVD later to drain my spaghetti. "John Carpenter Presents"--a piece of incredible crap!! Its general level of radioactive badness probably made me sterile
Fahrenheit 451 DVD. Quite disappointing if you are expecting a film true to the book. Hopefully they will remake the movie soon, because the technical capabilities back in 1966 did not do the novel any justice
Not Good: Very Weak and Inept as Love Story or as Thriller. Though I like Rachel Leigh Cook, and like her turn as a sulky (but really sweet) girl in 'She's All That,' and love to see her in anywhere you name it, 'Tangled' is a wrong choice.  As a thriller, it is not intriguing; as a love story, it is too familiar.  And the story is, as the film says, too tangled to take it seriously.It is about a love-triangle that got tangled -- David (Shawn Hatsey), Alan (Jonathan Rhys-Meyers) and Jenny (Rachel Leigh Cook), all juniors at a college.  Jenny and David are seeing each other when Alan, handsome and reckless, steps into their college life out of the blue.  Quiet boy David (who studies poetry) and Alan were in fact friends when much younger, but because of some incidents in the past, their relations was an awkward one.  And because of Jenny's ambiguous attitudes to Alan, and Alan's seductive attitudes to Jenny, things get more complicated, and more dangerous.That's what the opening of the film implies, by the choppy shots of flashbacks.  The film follows the memories of David, who, now hospitalized after some (still unknown) terrible accident, recounts his story before the investigator Lorraine Bracco.  So, here, the film also tries to give a twist to the otherwise mundane story, using flashbacks that slowly reveals the key events in the past.The original intention is good, and there is a decent film buried behind the film (which I am afraid no one in English-speaking coutries have seen in theater).  There are some good shots that suggest the emotional tense between the characters.  And Rachel Leigh Cook is as sweet as before, and sexy at times.But, unbelievably, the film takes almost one hour to explain the relations between the three, which is not particularly original.  And after that, it drifts into the revelation of the facts, in the style that faintly resembles 'Rashomon.'  But what can you do in thirty minutes with that format when you need more time to present the shifting viewpoints that challenge our perception of reality?My overall reaction to 'Tangled' was like -- What happened to RLC?  She is as busy as before, as far as I can see her filmography on internet, but living in Japan, I hear about less and less.  Please, no more this, or 'Get Carter' or 'Anti-Trust.'By the way, Estella Warren appears, but her role is very small, and her turn is not very outstanding.  Sorry.
Survivor Rip Off. I have bought 2 seasons of Survivor on unbox and both of them are not complete. Very dissapointing. Guatemala  episode 11 is from a completely different season and it is missing the last 2 episodes and the reunion show. Just leaves you hanging. Exile Island is missing the final episode it just goes from the competition between Danielle and Cirie for a spot in the final 3 to the live reunion show
An arid technical exercise and not nearly as funny as it thinks it is. Despite liking a couple of his movies, I've never been a fan of Preston Sturges, and a second viewing of Unfaithfully Yours did nothing to change that. With rare exceptions like Frasier or Comme une Image, most supposedly `sophisticated' comedies are usually either too clever by half or not half as clever as they think they are: this definitely falls into the latter category. It may be slightly more articulate, but it still comes down to pratfalls and clichs clumsily dispensed (not to mention an incredibly one-dimensional role for Linda Darnell as the wife whose sole reason for existence seems to be to worship her husband). Unfortunately it soon becomes apparent that despite his confidence in the early part of the film, Rex Harrison is entirely wrong for the part: aside from being so incredibly unsympathetic that he simply alienates you for most of the film, he has absolutely no facility for physical comedy, which renders what could and should have been a great comic setpiece where he accidentally trashes his hotel room far more thoroughly than any rock star ever could even dream of rather tedious and protracted. (Alfred Newman's surprisingly crudely over the top slide-whistle and horn 'comic' underscoring all but stones the scene to death, a surprising lapse of judgment from a great composer in a film revolving around classical music.) In the hands of an actor with a modicum of physical comedy timing it could have been gold, but instead it's almost reduced to a technical exercise.But the same could be said for much of the film. The idea of having the execution and resolution of Harrison's fantasies dictated by the pace of the music he conducts (Rossini for murder, Wagner for mournful forgiveness, Tchaikovsky for suicide) is inspired, but it results in scenes that feel forced, as if at the mercy of a galley slave master's drumbeat. That the scenes themselves are so predictable doesn't help, as goodwill and admiration gradually gives way to boredom in the second half.There are, however, two saving graces. One is the scene in private detective Edgar Kennedy's office, where Harrison is furious to discover that the man he has come to castigate is a knowledgeable fan with his own tale of loss. The scene is crudely performed and reads better than it plays, but there's heart and humanity there that's lacking in too much of the rest of the film. But the film's genuine standout moment is the orchestra rehearsal, one of the best pieces of filmed musical performance in the movies, not only showing how the music is constructed but showing the life, character and human soul behind it. The loss of those qualities in the rest of the movie is all the more keenly felt in an increasingly arid and overplayed technical exercise.
AMAZON SUCKS. I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!
old documentary!. Please think this DVD is recorded in 1986. More worse, this is recorded as a documentary. Sound quality is worst. After I bought this and DVD of &quot;Company&quot; (same, worst sound quality DOCUMENTARY), I suspect the word &quot;concert&quot; or &quot;soundtrack&quot; in DVD title
Terrible Transfer to DVD. This is absolutely no improvement on the poor VHS video tape.A travesty.I subtract all stars for the terrible transfer, menu, and options.
Bad director, bad!. God, this movie was....lame. I mean, it was lame. It limped; it struggled, it staggered.   I lost track of the cliches during the first five minutes.  The really graphic sex scene that indicated the girl was gonna get killed? Check. The sleazeball guy getting killed? Check. The sleazeball guy practically begging for death? "Here, doggie..."?  That's eighty minutes of my life I'll never get back.
fading, fading, gone. This movie is great if you want to go to sleep and you ran out of boring books. Ethan Hawke leans to heavily on Kris Kristofferson's performances not to mention Jeff Tweedy's music. As a matter of fact the only gleaming light in the movie is the music. It is written interestingly enough, but the visuals look like there wasn't enough money in the budget to clean up the cheap video that it was shot on. The best way to watch this movie is in the background. You don't need the visuals, and if you dare watch them you will get dreary eyed and fade away
Would've given it nil stars if I could've... Dated, derivative, self-indulgent & unintelligent.  This is truly bottom of the range stuff.  The acting, directing, soundtrack and script are all dire.  None of the characters are even remotely sympathetic, in fact I was hoping they'd die slowly and painfully.  I note that Billy Bob Thornton was both star and a scriptwriter - methinks his true nature is revealed in the script and the part he chose - an arrogant, amoral, misogynistic, self-important coward (with zero sense of humour).  Don't waste your time watching this drivel, it will leave you with a bad taste in your mouth that no amount of tequila can erase.
Something gets lost in translation. I recently rented this movie, having never seen it before.  I'm wondering what all the kudo's were for.  Denuve was pretty and had a boyfriend who was interested in her.  Why did she lock herself in that ratty apartment?  Did she have a history of mental illness?  If she didn't like being alone why didn't she go with her sister or visit her parents for the weekend.  We're never told.  I was confused and bored.  What a let down
Very sad attempt at a sequel. I rented this film immediatley after seeing the first Bride with White Hair hoping for a fluid and entrancing continuation of the story.  There was a perfect setup for a sequel and I couldn't wait to watch it unfold.  After the first half an hour I knew that director Ronnie Yu had abandoned the feel of the first film and it seemed he didn't really give a damn about how interesting the story was.  Poor dialogue, inadequate story, there was nothing satisfying or even interesting in this film.  If you enjoyed the first BWWH you'll probably still be tempted to watch this movie just make sure you rent it before buying
Same Thing. The Dane Cook episode is the same one that it on his "Harmful If Swallowed" c.d. The c.d. also has the uncensored version of this routine that is over 1 hour long. The one star rating is not based on the content. It is based upon Amazon not sharing this fact with customers
Not Happy. I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?
not very interesting. maybe i'm just too picky because i'm fond of the quality of recent bbc films.  i did not think much of this movie (pseudo-artsy, in my  opinion..very drab and plotless).  the characters are flat and boring.   honestly, i can't believe i watched the whole movie
AMAZON SUCKS. I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!
Inferior sequel. I loved Mortal Kombat,and I thought the sequel would carry on the great Kombat legacy.I was heartily dissapointed when I saw annihilation.Brian Johnson was cool as Khan,but some of the special effects were so fake I had to laugh.Robin Shou returns as Liu Kang,the savior of Earth.After killing Shang Tsung,the group heads on home when all of a sudden,the Emperor busts up the party and sends his minions down.There,Khan makes his first appearance,along with his abnormal,yet awesome soldiers.Johnny Cage is killed,and Rayden(now played by James Remar)fights Khan,winning but sacrificing Johnny Cage.Now,Earth has seven days before it's destroyed.What I didn't like about this movie was appearances by people who had died in the first film,like Scorpion and Sub-zero.Who heard of Sub-Zero having a brother.Another thing that got me was how Liu Kang's fighting got worse since the first film.He was losing every battle,except the end,and even then he wasl osing.Do not get this film if you want to avoid dissapointment
Throw "Timecop 2" in the garbage bin, because it's nothing but trash... If you want to checkout a good Jason Scott Lee film, I recommend the following:Dragon: The Bruce Lee StoryRapa Nui"Timecop 2: The Berlin Decision" is an awful film. Awful production values. Awful acting. Awful script. I would not recommend this film to be watched by anyone who seriously believes that tripe like this is quality entertainment or advances Asian American awareness in Hollywood (This film does neither.).I would at the very least say that this film is passable entertainment on a rainy day if you ever come across it while channel surfing. If you are curious, perhaps a rental from Netflix, but this film is definitely not for keeps.If you are one of the few people who watched this film as a means to raise your Asian American film awareness, and came away disappointed, then I recommend the following films for your personal viewing. These are well-written films with high production values that feature a talented cast of Asian American actors:Better Luck TomorrowMulan
let's make this short and sweet... This is one of the most boring movies I have ever seen.  I knew from the very beginning of the movie that there was no way I was going to be able to stay awake through the whole thing.  I was right; I fell asleep about fifteen minutes into it.  Recently, I was offered the chance to watch it again.  I thought, "OK, I didn't see the whole thing, it might have gotten better, so I'll give it another chance." ... Bad mistake.  This little tale about a horse race across a vast desert did nothing to hold my interest for very long.  Hidalgo is the name of the horse.  So what?  That's about as boring as this movie.  So why the 1-star markup? Cause the main character is played by Viggo Mortensen, of Aragorn fame in the smash movie series The Lord of the Rings- and I do like Viggo.  I did not, however, like this movie.  It's kind of fitting it should be set in a desert- cause that's exactly where this movie should be buried, never to bore another wave of audiences again.  If you find yourself overworked and in need of a nice long nap, watch Hidalgo; you'll be out in no time
Not Happy. I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?
most boring movie i have ever seen...... i finally decided to purchase this movie considering i was told by one person it was symbolic and by another it was truely disgusting.  however i found it to be very slow and boring which made want to go to sleep, making it difficult for me to actually catch any of this great symbolism i heard about.  as far as the digusting goes....i didn't find it that disgusting compared to some movies i have seen.  it isn't very explicit in the violence so there is not any gore to it and they aren't very innovative with the torture compared to some movies i have seen. the movie consists of alot of monotonous sodomy and an old lady telling stories of her sexual exploits while her friend plays the piano (these parts were rather torturous to sit through because they were the most boring in the film and she told quite a few stories).  if you want to see something shocking i would not look here and if you are looking for symbolism i wouldn't look here because it is difficult to stay awake unless you like watching a bunch of naked people walking around groping one another
Missing episodes. This series is being sold with missing episodes, like many others here in Unbox. Do they think their customers are so dumb? Would you buy a DVD series with a missing DVD? What sense does this make? What a disappointment this service is..
What about the missing episodes. Why should one buy this series? What about the missing episodes? Are they going to be added later, or this is it? I cannot believe this. Would you buy a bicycle with a missing wheel? Or a keyboard without the C and R keys? I'd like Amazon to explain its customers what it plans to do..
Columbia Wimps Out. Too bad Republic didn't make this serial because over there they at least had Commando Cody and Captain Marvel up in the skies. Instead we get some fake animation everytime our boy in blue jumps. I'm sure that some think it's cute but I felt cheated. I give them 2 stars for trying though
The book is better. This film is based on one of my favourite books, so I was really looking forward to seeing it. Despite great performances by Blanchett and Fienes, it just doesn't hold together well. Too much of what is in the book has been left out and that which is there lacks weight. The characters in the book are so much more complex and endearing. The book was very moving and engaging while the movie is not. There is also an ending tacked on that doesn't exist in the book, and that always annoys me. I was very disappointed. I think had I not read the book, I'd have stopped watching the movie about 1/3 into it
Another sequel..... Not much really needs to be said but, I'm sure you are all asking the same question as I am...When is Michael going to die!  I love the original Halloween movies but come on kill him already and end this series before you screw it up anymore.  The same goes for Friday the 13th I mean Jason X with Jason...in space?!  Jason needs to die, Mike Myers needs to die and Freddy Krueger needs to die.  We love the old movies but please stop reviving them somehow just let them die
[2.5]--Cheese-la-Weez What Happen Here?. As curious as I was about this movie it had me dazed. The 'Good Shepherd' always struck me symbol for Christianity. Shepherds look after their flocks so the sheep can be killed and eaten. What's good about that? Fortunately, sheep don't have the intelligence to be paranoid. With Bourne Identity movies under his belt, Matt Damon has a good pedigree to play spy movies. Is this one a killer or dead on arrival? With a budget of $85m, we've got Oscar-winning actors, writers, cinematographers, and more stars than flocks by night ever get to see. Pet project of actor-turning-director, Robert De Niro, "The Good Shepherd" tells a story of the CIA from its early days, weighing in at just under three hours. The scene before the opening credits is the one which the whole movie revolves around once that's miss you won't get it. This is a shame, because it's a tantalisingly mysterious and artistically shot.This movie is told from Damon's point of view, its scope is epic, and covering the years from 1939 before the CIA was even a speck in President Truman's eye, to 1961 and the Bay of Pigs. We see the founding years, the London Blitz, post-war reconstruction in Berlin, and increasingly intricate machinations as the Cold War gathers pace. Angelina Jolie doesn't feature in much of the movie, but when she does, she' get into character very well. It's enough to make you wish she would put down her excellent humanitarian work long enough to take on more of the challenging parts for which is so eminently capable.Robert de Niro (got to love him), in the director's chair, is sadly the weakest link. Although he handles it professionally, almost magisterially, he lacks the experience to slowly build momentum, convey gradual moral decay, or make this the Godfather standard-bearer of CIA films. He's done a fine job - just bitten off a bit more than he can chew. What he deserves credit for is attempting a classic depiction of one of the world's most important institutions and pulling it off with considerable dignity; if not quite the artistic flourish that he would have aspired to, given that his mentors are people like Francis Ford Coppola (who is the executive producer). With sufficient dedication, it is easy to imagine De Niro pulling off an Oscar for direction in a future film: his grasp is very broad, and all it needs is a little tweaking.
Do not watch this film. This film is laughably bad. The entire plot is completely unrealistic and it is difficult to have any sympathy for the cruel murderer who is central to the plot, who is not only a murderer but also totally retarded, missing numerous opportunities to escape and make life easier for himself and the saps who for some random reason have taken it upon themselves to look after him. This film is an absolute waste of time, but feel free to watch it if you feel like wasting 107 minutes of your life
AMAZON SUCKS. I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!
Marco?. I'll always watch Gary Cooper. But as Marco Polo he's just not that good. MGM lavish production seems kind of chinzy. Amusing?  Entertaining? Not so much.  He hops effortlessly from Venice to China. He messes around with another man's fiancee in the 13th century as 20th century American men were wont to do. Nobody knows what Marco Polo was really like. He brought the west spaghetti & gunpowder. The rest of the story seems like it's from the screenwriters at MGM. The movie ends with Marco taking Princess Kukachin (Sigid Gurie) to her husband in Persia, the long way around. The more time to fool around until she marries. Nice
BLAH, BLAH, BLAH... this has got to be the WORST film I've ever seen. its not sad. Its not funny, jest over blow mellow dramatic garbage. I don't have any sympathy toward nick in this movie, because he does give you anything to work with or want to keep him. the actor is the worst of all. i cant tell if he's sad in some seens, or angry or jest retarded. I've seen some sad movies but this one jest sucks, I guess its aimed at a different time of homosexuals instead of the present. it probably worked better back in 96'. but this movie is SO SO SO BAD. its embarrassing. do not rent it or buy it or view it on television.NOTE'S: THIS FILM HAD  SOME GREAT TALENTA song from Olivia Newton Jon, and (one of my most personal favorites) Mila AND my favorite comedians Margaret Cho. She's to good but...why this film, she (and Mila ) are to good for some want to be tearjerker movie like this.
KILL MEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEE!!!. KILL MEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEE!!!   THIS MOVIE IS THE WORST MOVIE OF ALL, ALL, ALL, TIME SINCE THE HISTORY OF THE UNIVERSE AND BEFORE THAT! IN THEATERS I WAS THE ONLY ONE WATCHING THAT MOVIE AND I FELT LIKE WALKING OUT!! I WANTED TO CRY  :( THE ACTORS STINK ALONG WITH THE PLOT AND 3-D EFFECTS!!!All I can say is BOOOOOOOOOO THIS MOVIE SUCKS
Definitely not recommended. I'm afraid that the reviewers who didn't like this movie understood it all too well.  At times it promises real drama and tension, but never delivers.  There are too many character twists with no basis.  And the ending really does make the viewer feel cheated.  This is a really poor attempt at making a movie
The details are wrong, the big picture is inexistant. The details are all fine if you don't know the middle east - but are not well researched and inconsistent.  I won't bore you with the list.All the big picture takeaway is that the middle east and big oil are a complicated business with many parties that have a big stake.  Tell us something new.The overall storyline does not have much else going for it - I was expecting more intrigue, a more synthesized story line.  A disappointment.
NOT the Original Version. This has already been expressed here in the reviews, but just as a reminder one more time..... this DVD is NOT the original version.  The original version has more material and is much better.  Hopefully someday they'll release an Unrated Version the way it was on VHS at one time.
The Village Idiots. Note: If you don't want to know how the movie ends, don't read this. (I'm giving you fair warning now, so don't complain about spoilers later). The only reason I'm mentioning the ending and the "big secret" is because I'd like to spare you from the huge disappointment I experienced when watching this movie.                        When I first walked into the theatre to see this, I couldn't have been more excited; after months of waiting, I'd finally get to see the movie whose preview had given me chills every time I saw it! The movie started out wonderfully: great acting, scenery that could go from gorgeous to terrifying in a matter of seconds, and, at times, almost unbearable suspense (that Shyamalan really knows how to scare!)The story takes place in a small town in the 1800's. At first this town seems like the perfect place to live: the people are friendly, the houses are cozy, and the scenery is beautiful. Despite the peaceful setting, however, we get the feeling that something sinister lies beneath the surface of this sweet little community, something that frightens the villagers and keeps them from  being completely at ease. Every now and then, they glance fearfully at the forest surrounding the village; nobody ever ventures into it, and a guard is stationed every night to watch over it. Pretty soon, we find out why: according to the village elders, there are dangerous, hostile creatures lurking in the woods that will kill anyone who dares enter their domain. These creatures are supposedly unidentified monsters who are so bloodthirsty that the color red is forbidden in the village (it attracts them). For years, the villagers and the monsters have had an understanding: as long as the villagers stay out of the forest, the monsters will not harm them. At one point,however, one of the creatures enters the village at night, leaving the villagers to believe that their uneasy truce may soon come to an end and more of the creatures will attack. While all this is happening, we (the audience) still don't know what the creatures look like and half the suspense comes from wondering what they really are. It was halfway through the movie when all my hopes for the story came crashing to an end: There are NO MONSTERS IN THE WOODS.  When one of the villagers revealed a monster costume and said the shocking words "It's all a farce", I still couldn't believe what I was hearing; it was all I could do to keep myself from screaming right there in the theatre! After months of anticipating this film, of expecting a truly scary thriller, and of trying to guess what the monsters really are, THERE ARE NO MONSTERS! Disappointed doesn't even begin to describe it. It got worse, though. The next big surprise was the reason the villagers created the story of the "monsters". The villagers aren't really living in the 1840's; they're living in a modern-day wildlife reserve. Supposedly, the leaders of the village used to live like normal modern people, but when tragedy struck their families, they decided the real world was too much for them and moved into a wildlife reserve to start a new (if extremely delusional) life. The story of the monsters in the forest was created to terrify their children and keep them from wandering too far and discovering the truth. They even had the village retard dress in a costume and wander around occasionally to scare the other children and make them believe the monsters were real! When the retarded boy died in the woods (still wearing the stupid costume), the leaders, rather than mourning him, remorselessly saw it as another opportunity to lie to their children by telling them he was killed by one of the creatures. I basically went from sympathizing with the characters to being repulsed by them. What parents could lie to their children and deliberately terrify them like that? I don't think I've ever been this disappointed in a movie before; not only was it completely misleading, but the plot was pitiful and the adult characters were pathetic (I'm sorry, but I have no other word for people who are perfectly happy to live a lie and deliberately frighten and traumatize their children to continue living it). Many fans of this movie have said that those of us who didn't like it "don't get it". I assure you, I did get it, and I didn't like it anyway. I'm no fan of slasher films and I didn't expect this to be one, but I also don't appreciate false advertising or almost totally unsympathetic characters. The two stars are for the cast and the filming. Better luck next time, guys
I have only SIX WORDS for this pitiful, woeful "remake" of a classic Frankenheimer flick. And what are those words?Why, simply put they are:"DENZEL WASHINGTON IS NO FRANK SINATRA"Any questions?  No, I didn't think s
Why the Charge. Curious as to why Amazon would charge for this content when CBS offers it for free on the official Survivor Website.  Yeah, at the CBS site you have sit through 4 commercials, but it is worth it to not have to download any extra programs
BOOORIIIIIING!!!!!. I WANT THE TWO HOURS OF MY LIFE BACK!After all the talk about what a cult classic this film is! What a waste of time! Maybe this movie was a novelty to American moviegoers in 1973. That time is past (even then, the "robots attack people" concept was hardly new). Now this is just a boring B movie with bad acting and anticlimactic action. This film is only good for academic or nostalgic purposes. Unless you are doing a research paper on American Sci-fi cinema, or you are in your 40s and enjoyed this movie as a kid, or you just like boring anticlimactic B movies, AVOID THIS DULL PIECE OF DRIVEL.I FEEL CHEATED!
Philadelphia. Denzel Washington is probably my favorite actor. Even in that dog of a movie called THE MANCHURIAN CANDIDATE, he shone. Tom Hanks? Well, lemme quit hating the guy. This is a well-intentioned movie, Tom did a creditable job, and we had extreme close-ups with funny colors to camouflage the spots where he overreached. I was also pleasantly surprised to see Antonio Banderas fly in the face of his Latino studliness by playing a gay guy. A passionate one, though, since he's still a Latino, after all.Actually, this is a Hollywood "message movie," and you know what that means. It's about as subtle as Michael Moore. Those who agree with the message flock to be beaten about the head by it for two hours. Those who the filmmakers would like to see the movie, those who don't agree with the message, stay as far away from it as possible.There's a scene in the library where nobody wants to sit at the table with AIDS boy. The way they stared at him reminded me of "lao wei in China" experiences. Denzel's character was reminded of segregation, even though he's too young to remember it, and started to care about Tom Hanks' character.AIDS discrimination is bad. Actually, any discrimination at all is bad. And that's the movie's message. I agree with the message, but still. That's all we've got.As a totally irrelevant non-sequiter, if the name "Sam Francisco" means anything to you, you've seen subtle commentary on discrimination.I love a great courtroom drama. This one was merely good. With so much of an agenda to squeeze into a two-hour film, they had to take a few shortcuts here. Sad, ain't it? But even so, a well-intentioned film that I'm glad I saw. Once. Not twice. Once is enough, thank you.
Same Thing. The Dane Cook episode is the same one that it on his "Harmful If Swallowed" c.d. The c.d. also has the uncensored version of this routine that is over 1 hour long. The one star rating is not based on the content. It is based upon Amazon not sharing this fact with customers
Two Smart Girls Grow Up. I would have rated it three stars if it would have had all three girls from the Original but since it didn't two stars. The plot drags and while Deanna gives a good performance it was hard to see Helen Parrish as Kay Craig. Kay grew up all right she grew up into an entirely different person! Nan Grey's presence is nostalgic as was Charles Winninger reprising his role but it lacks what Three Smart Girls had-fun! The songs however are very good. An uneven sequel that proves that even during Hollywood's Golden Age sequels have never really worked
Aims low and hits its target. This straight-to-video's modest budget is attested to by the fact that while most of the action is supposed to take place at a large state prison, this prison only seems to house about 12 inmates. The plot is that old but reliable one about a man posing as a prisoner so he can go "undercover" and solve a crime. The crime in this case is not especially interesting and it's resolved in much too pat a fashion. However, leading man Tommy Lee Thomas looks good with his shirt off, (though he seems too small to be throwing his weight around), and there's a torture scene, (modeled on the one in "Lethal Weapon"), in which he's hanged by his wrists and zapped with electric shocks. Mr. Thomas' performance may not be of Oscar caliber but he does know how to yell.
They stole my money. I never received this product and the order tracker never displayed the 'problem with this order?' icon. They stole my $20.00 and now have the nerve to ask me about the product. Its bad enough I am stuck in Iraq, now I have my money stolen. They are thieves. Even if I had to return it, I still may have received a refund. Do not buy from this seller, I could never report it and now I am out 20$. DO NOT PURCHASE FROM THIS SELLER
UnBox video not yet working. Will not play once video was downloaded. I get the error message:  "can not play file, please try again later. error# 0x80040273" I made the exlusive give me call me back feature but the UnBox department was already closed, I was told the UnBox Saturday and Sunday 6-5 hours. I have to say I am impressed with the Call back feature. I downloaded the Unbox Beta now and am recieving email assistance to try to resolve the problem. Thanks Amazon UnBox! I will Update again - Feb. 10,200
Dont get "Fiji" final week ... Dont dwnld " Survivor, "Thunderstorms & Sacrifice" ". Its my fault for not reading the whole thing. you would think that the last episode would be the finale , but NO, its just a 10 minute recap going to the finale 4. I didnt even get a full 45 minute episode. No finale. I got rippped off. $1.99 dwnld not well spent. Dont bother dwnldng any episode of fiji if you dont know the ending. Because they dont have that episode, not even the reunion show
Bad Device. I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service
Indiscreet DVD. Do not buy this.  I have bought 2 diffferent copies of this factory sealed and I can not play clear through either of them.  The movie is as wonderful as it has always been.  However, the physical DVD is hopeless.  I have tried to play them on my Apple dvd drive and 2 seperrate DVD players and they all freeze up
Poor support. This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet
If you loved Terms of Endearment, never watch this film. I adore Terms of Endearment, it's a movie that time and time again has never failed to touch my heart and make my cry. I have known about "The Evening Star" for a long time, but I just got around to seeing it for the first time.While it was fortunate that Shirley MacLaine reprised her role as Aurora, the film didn't have the same chemistry that made Terms of Endearment such a memorable and much loved film. The cast was just off, with nobody except for Marion Ross delivering a much appreciated and genuine performance.Aurora returns in The Evening Star as a woman who has been weakened, and instead of seeing her as she was (and as she was loved) we see her adapt to the lives of her loser grandchildren with little contest. It's not the same Aurora from the first film. The Aurora we see in Evening Star doesn't have the same essence of "Houston class", the same sharp wit, and overall she is a different woman than the Aurora you grew used to in Terms of Endearment.Watching this movie was painful, just because it was so predictable and, well, it was just lacking that soul that made the first film so special. This movie was put together so poorly, and it really shows. Emotional scenes are poorly done, because whomever wrote the screenplay really tried to make everything over-the-top, so when there was a crisis, it became an emotional spectacle with the entire cast instead of an intimate and thoughtful event between certain characters. When tragedy would strike, you'd have a room full of characters you don't care about dilluting the scene and creating a disconnect in the moment.I give the film 1 star and that is only because we get a moment of time with Jack Nicholson, Marion Ross did a good job, and Shirley MacLaine came back to do her very best under the circumstances. These people are the only minute saving factor in this entire upset of a film.Honestly though, if you really love Terms of Endearment, you may find yourself let down by The Evening Star. I personally wish that I hadn't of watched it and allowed for the story to end with the first film. Overall, I advise, if you loved Terms of Endearment never watch this film.
Just when you think Dolph can't get sink any lower.......... I will be honest I like Dolph Lundgren.........a look at his filmography you see B.movie classics such as "The Punisher",Universal Soldier" and "Blackjack" Dolph has been going trough a slump.........Storm Catcher and the startlingly routine Jill The Ripper and the awful Minion(AKA Fallen Knight) but with Agent Red Dolph Lundgren hits rock bottom. Agent Red first of all steals it's music from Predator 2......and it's plot from Counter Measures,Oh I'm not finished yet. It steals footage from Storm Catcher!!!!!!!!! The scene where Jon Penner steals the  air craft while posing as Dolph Lundgren..........Now Penner is 5'11 Dolph Lundgren is 6'5 for goodness sake! yet they try to pass it off as Dolph Lundgren as the soldier stealing the aircraft for part of a mission.....This scene made me wanna throw up but I hung in there.....It turns out more footage is stolen.......I swear I saw footage from Iron Eagle  and Iron Eagle II.......I saw footage from Crimson Tide and I saw footage from Counter Measures........What the heck was Dolph thinking when he signed for this junk? I have no idea. When I was a teen (When Showdown In Little Tokyo came out) I thought Dolph Lundgren couldn't sink lower then Showdown In Little Tokyo,Then when I saw The Minion I was almost sure Dolph couldn't do worse........Well I pray he can't do any worse because Agent Red is one of the worst movies I have ever seen in my life..........This is coming from a guy who likes Don The Dragon Wilson. Bottomline:On Agent Red's cover it says "Once exposed you cannot survive"  Take this as a warning
Dont get "Fiji" final week ... Dont dwnld " Survivor, "Thunderstorms & Sacrifice" ". Its my fault for not reading the whole thing. you would think that the last episode would be the finale , but NO, its just a 10 minute recap going to the finale 4. I didnt even get a full 45 minute episode. No finale. I got rippped off. $1.99 dwnld not well spent. Dont bother dwnldng any episode of fiji if you dont know the ending. Because they dont have that episode, not even the reunion show
Wish I would have paid attention. Vanity! Nude! Bizarre story! Sounds perfect! What more could one want? How about a decent transfer to DVD?! Had I been paying attention, I would have noticed this DVD was released by Jef Films, which is known for its shoddy and cheap quality. I have other DVDs from Jef Films, which I purchased because those films are available only from that company, and the quality is just as bad. It appears they transfer these films from old VHS copies, which renders the video quality nearly impossible to watch. It is painfully obvious the company is only interested in making money and doesn't care at all about issuing a quality product. Vanity: 5/5 stars; the movie itself: 2.5/5 stars, the DVD: 1/5 stars.
This is a comedy?. Seriously, I didn't even think that this was a comedy until I came here and saw people saying "it wasn't funny."  I got it as part of a boxed set of Cary Grant films (purchased here), and it's the only dud of the lot.There was one scene that, I will grant you, was light and entertaining.  Not laugh out loud, but funny enough (I won't spoil it by saying which one).  Aside from that, the film struck me as a rather unbelievable farce about infidelity.Most of all, you could almost feel the very talented cast trying to keep this elephant airborne.  Grant and Simmons, in particular, are strong - but their efforts are ultimately squandered.  Bob Mitchum is OK, but generally miscast, and Kerr's beauty and talent are basically wasted.  No amount of acting would allow you to believe that anyone could act as impetuously and stupidly as she does here.  She goes from happily married to tramp in about 5 minutes, for no discernible reason.Overall acting: C (Grant/Simmons: B)Directing: FWriting: D-I understand that this film caters more to English tastes, and that's fine, but I found it most un-satisfying
Missing episodes. This series is being sold with missing episodes, like many others here in Unbox. Do they think their customers are so dumb? Would you buy a DVD series with a missing DVD? What sense does this make? What a disappointment this service is..
Where is Jermaine Jackson's music video?. This DVD is a waste.They should've included Jermaine Jackson'smusic video Closest Thing To Perfect.I read somewhere else online thatJamie Lee Curtis was in the video.When they bring these movies on DVD, they need toinclude extras like the music videos off the soundtracks.I don't understand why some do and others don't.Some company executives just don't know what they're doing.Don't waste your money on this DVD with no extras.Scott
Really dumb Disney flick!. They chosen Robin Williams to be in a Disney movie and this movie turned out to be very corny. Special effects are dull though. If I were a kid I would probably like this movie but now that I'm 15 I think it's stupid. I think I saw it in theater when I was 8 and I don't remember much of it but I think it's not in stores anymore out to buy because people don't really care much about this movie anymore. I don't care about it either. I'm glad this movie is out of stock and it should be. It is very boring!
I've been cheated by Amazon. It really sucks, tried to download but it's not able to be viewed in pc's outsided the united states. Crikey.I'll have to wait for reruns to watch it on the telly.Whatta shame amazon dot com. Let's send a CSI to yer headquarters
Not happy. This is only a portion of this episode.  It cuts off in the middle of a sentence
will carrie wind up with zhivago or stalin?  oops, i must be mixing up my stories ... an insufferable view of life among a claque of ruskie girlfriends from the late 50s to the late 70s. nothing more than "sex & the city" transplanted to moscow in the khruschev and brezhnev eras -- if thats your cup of borscht, more power to you
This Film is a Disaster. Tom Berenger must have been desperate for work when he signed up for this embarrassment of a film.  It has the feel and tone of  the kind of made for television movie you might watch out of sheer boredom and exhaustion on a Sunday afternoon when you're too tired either to locate the remote or to fire a bullet at the television screen.  The acting is wooden and unnatural, and the music, which is supposed to be awesome, sounds curiously like a bad rip-off of Springsteen, even though the flashbacks in the film (when most of the musical scenes occur) are set, for the most part, in 1963, when NOTHING sounded like Springsteen.  Worse yet, the sets do not look like 1963.  This is very clearly a cheap production, doomed from the start by an awful script, terrible acting, and a devil may care attitude about capturing the feeling of an era.  Here's the premise of the film: years after Eddie, the tempestuous and dumb lead singer of the Cruisers, has disappeared (he died in a car accident, but his body was never recovered), a reporter decides to write a story about the band.  She has a theory that Eddie is still alive and believes that the band may be on the verge of a renaissance, if the missing final recordings, named A Season in Hell, can be located.  She forces her presence into the lives of the remaining band members, who are, by the way, dull as dirt, to piece together the band's history.  The reporter is so creepy and annoying that she'd probably have a restraining order slapped on her, nowadays.  Ironically enough, A Season in Hell describes quite acccurately the viewing experience
Star Trek:  City on the Edge of Forever. My favorite show of the Trek series but there's no way I'd buy another individual program from Amazon.  It will ONLY play on their downloaded player ...won't burn to DVD so can't play it on my television.  Don't bother buying this ...just go for the Trek collection on DVD
Movie is great, but Unbox is uncooked. Movie got 2/3 through and just quit. No problem, this is Windows right? Just reboot and start where you left off. Only for whatever reason I can't restart this movie from anywhere but the beginning. I'm not going to watch this moving over from the beginning just to see if it fails in the same place again. Only a couple bucks, but definitely not worth it
Could have been better. Simply not enough of Amy Weber in the film. In the scenes she was in she looked lovely, but I was hoping to see more. Anyone hoping to see Weber get down and dirty will be disappointed
Fellini's Rome --- A Commercial Collection of Stereotypes. There is a lot of traffic in Rome.Especially on the "raccordo annulare", where accidentsare also frequent.The traffic is noisy and dirty, especially when it rains.Romans swear when they drive and also when they don't.There are many American tourists in Rome,especially around the fountains in the piazzas,where they cluster and sing American songs.Italian men hit on women tourists, who resist their advances."Se vedi gente che lavora, allora non e` Roma".Romans do not work.No, some of them do, and, in fact, morning till night.But Rome is not what it used to be.Everybody knew each other and was polite,while now everybody is rushed and rude.Besides, the free love of today has substitutedthe brothels of yesterday.Yes, some of the brothels were chic, while others less so.Rome was bombed in the Second World War. In fact,bombing would sometimes interrupt a theatricalperformance. The public then proceeded to theshelter, where flirting and lovemaking would ensue.The Roman aristocracy is close to the Papal Court.They run parties together, even fashion shows.Cardinals complain that outsiders try to teach the Popehow to rule the Church.And, yes! Motoryclists can and do go around theColosseum, providing a tasteless final sequence.One leaves the cinema with a heavy sense of wasted time.Does Fellini really have nothing at all to sayabout the Eternal City? After all his years there?Nothing except thestandard collection of stereotypesabout Italians, stereotypes that occur in everyscurrilous joke, that are met on the pages of every trashy guide?It is true that there are a few nice sequences, especiallythe often mentioned one of the destruction of the frescoes.And then, the great Anna Magnani appears for about 10 seconds to tell Fellini she won't talk to him.That is perhaps also a scene worth watching.But the rest is commercial cinema."Vai a dormi', Federico".
Valentine  (2001). Director:  Jamie BlanksCast:  Denise Richards, David Broeanaz, Marley Shelton, Jessica Capshaw, Jessica Cauffiel, Katherine Heigl, Hedy Burress, Fulvio Cecere.Running Time:  96 minutesRated R for strong horror violence, some sexuality and language."Valentine", the over-slasherized version of the excellent Tom Savage suspense novel, starts with a pre-teen valentine disco set in 1988. A bespectacled young boy heads on the dance floor looking for a young female to share a dance with. First he approaches Shelly (later played by Katherine Heigl) who embarrassingly rebuffs him. His charm doesn't seem to work with Lilly (Jessica Cauffer), Paige (Denise Richards) or Kate (Marley Shelton) either; they all send him packing quite arrogantly. His luck changes when Dorothy (Jessica Capshaw) actually acknowledges him and the twosome leave hand in hand. They are later caught kissing under a bench by a gang of bullies. In order to save her own self from persecution, Dorothy accuses the youngsters of attacking her and so the gang decides to take their own revenge. They cover him in red gooey stuff ("Carrie" anyone?), strip him, and chase him onto the dance floor where they proceed to beat him up.  Fast forward ten years and the girls are now women; no one is sure what happened to Jeremy (the bullied brat from earlier) as he disappeared after that dance. It's close to Valentine's Day (of course) and they each receive a card signed with a poetic threat to their lives. They soon realize to take them seriously when Shelly is found with her throat sliced. Before long a mysterious masked madman stalks each of them leaving Kate and her boyfriend Adam (David Boreanaz) to work out that she's next on the psycho's list.The acting is standard horror fare. Denise Richards once again shows us her amazing and wide-range acting talents: Those two large things attached to the front side of her body that we like to call "breasts." David Boreanaz gives a fair performance, but definitely shouldn't give up his day job on the WB's "Angel." Newcomer Marley Shelton can't do much with her underwritten role, and she comes off as extremely annoying and whiny for the most part. The rest of the acting is close to pitiful. Another problem with Valentine is that the characters are all so self indulgent and morally extracted that it's almost impossibility for them to win over the audience. In the beginning they're shown as mockers to any child that's unfortunate enough to be less pretty than their egotistical selves and actually possess a brain. This discrimination continues throughout the movie as they brush off the men who are trying to woo them out on a date, simply because they're not up to their high standards. How can anyone want such pompously arrogant characters to survive? In a typical slasher movie, the `final girl' is usually the shy reclusive type that the audience feels sympathetic towards, like Laurie Strode. These characters have no such power, leading you to believe that the world would be a better place without them anyway.  Director Jamie Banks ("Urban Legend") has proved that he has the potential to become a fair filmmaker; however this is his first feature failure. It's a shame that he couldn't have made more of the talented cast and competent budget, but in the end, Valentine just feels empty. A couple of talented cast members are not really enough to warrant the many obnoxious ones. Cupid certainly missed when he fired the arrow of fortune at this heart.  This one's destined to escape our memories in the not-too-distant future
Cant watch. I downloaded this program and it was garbled and video as if played in slow motion.  This is the first of two downloads that didn't play.  I know it was not my computer because I did download three that played ok
could not be viewed!. i downloaded it and i couldn't view the video paste the intro. then i RE-downloaded it thinking that maybe it was a corrupt file, but it again it only had sound and not video. this one is a waste of money
Please not another season of this!. Ok so I have always thought Courteney Cox should not be allowed on screen due to lack of acting talent and this show just proves it. It really is the most boring show Ive seen in a long time. If you thought she was bad in scream...and friends..dont watch this...there are other actors in this show who do redeem it somewhat but could never save it. Hopefully this show will be scraped
Did not work. The ones that are posted twice do not work. If they are posted once, you can try to download it, but it might not work. The video only worked for about a minute. Shame, since I really like this show and I wanted Amazon Unbox to be cool. The one cent CSI works, go download tha
Corny movie. I admit that I'm a die-hard Johnny Depp fan, but this wasn't anywhere near one of his best.  He IS adorable in the movie, but the plot is extremely corny, and I found myself rolling my eyes more than laughing out loud.  Guys will enjoy this movie for the hundreds of bikini-sporting girls, but not much else.  Although there are a few remotely funny parts, it is mostly because of how dorky this movie is.  But then again, it was worth it to watch Johnny
The Film That Sunk Two Careers. "Two of a Kind" has a unique distinction of being somewhat responsible for sinking two acting careers.Olivia Newton-John, coming off the dismal reviews from the critically underappreciated "Xanadu", was reteamed with John Travolta, her well-matched partner from "Grease".  It's obvious that rather than wait for an appropriate script to come along that would showcase the pair to their best advantages, this film was hurriedly put together simply to team them up once again and salvage Olivia's acting career."Two of a Kind" starts off with God (the voice of Gene Hackman) deciding that humankind has made his world a wasteland and mulling over the idea of having another great flood and just starting over.  A trio of enterprising angels talks him out of it (at least temporarily), emphasizing how redeemable humankind is.  God goes along with it, on the condition that two people must sacrifice everything for the other.  Now what two people do you think God will choose?Newton-John plays Debbie, a wanna-be actress living in New York and working as a bank teller.  It seems that she has gotten a little behind in her payments and her furnishings are on the verge of being repo'ed, along with her landlord being a little testy about the rent being late.Travolta is Zack, a down on his luck inventor, who is in deep debt and figures that robbing a bank will solve all his problems. The attempted bank robbery is comical, with Debbie taking the money and Zack taking home a bag full of worthless receipts.  Debbie is fired, for flirting with the bank robber, but apparently no one thinks to check her pockets.  She immediately buys new furniture, pays the landlord and no one (including her roommates) wonders how she can drop so much money after just being fired.In the meantime, Zack tracks Debbie down, wanting his money.  No surprise here, the two fall for each other and even with the Devil making cameo appearances, attempting to upset the heavenly angels' applecart at keeping Debbie and Zack on track, the two sacrifice, humankind is saved and our duo end up in each other's arms.  Fade out.While this should have been a feast for Travolta and Newton-John fans, the fact that both characters are playing so out of type throws the whole picture off.  In her previous two roles, Newton-John plays sweet, innocent type girls -  -probably how the movie audience wants to see her.  Debbie is hardly sweet and innocent.  She thinks nothing of stealing money from the bank she's working at and spending it foolishly.Travolta, still in his boy-next-door, good-guy phase, is the con-man/inventor/hapless bank robber.  Certainly no Danny Zuko.And while Travolta and Newton-John look gorgeous together, they just didn't generate the same chemistry here that they did in "Grease".Not surprisingly, this film was a bomb in its initial release.  Newton-John's song "Twist of Fate" was a nice little hit, but not much else good came from this pic.  Newton-John's acting career was finished and after the perfectly disastrous "Perfect" several years later, Travolta's acting career was also sent into deep freeze (although it would thaw out in later years).All in all, a sad end to Newton-John's acting career and the cinematic partnership of Newton-John and Travolta.
Miserable acting, horrible script, inane directing. What a mind-numbingly inept end chapter to a series that began with the greatest horror-comedy of all time, The Re-Animator.  Continuing in his deluded quest to claim the Re-Animator series for his own, and to convince us that he can direct, producer Brian Yuzna has managed the opposite.  Beyond Re-Animator merely confirms what was evident about the Yuzna-directed Bride of Re-Animator, that Yuzna knows nothing about directing actors and story.As with Dagon, Yuzna seems to have secured financing from Spanish sources for this film.  Unfortunately, the problem is that they also tried to force in a mostly Spanish cast.  This is a story set in Massachusetts, for crying out loud -- why would the warden of the prison, the reporter coming to cover the story, the guards, and a good 90 per cent of the inmates all have Spanish accents?  It wouldn't be as howlingly horrible if these guys could act, but they can't.  Simon Andreu as Warden Brando and Elsa Pataky as love interest Laura Olney get the most screentime of anyone in the cast, but their acting is so bad, and their ADR-afflicted lines so glaringly off, that they manage to sink the film every time they open their mouths.  Yuzna seems to pick his leading ladies based on their willingness to take off their clothes (witness the gratuitous "nurse nipple" scene in this film, or Fabiana Udenio and Kathleen Kinmont in Bride of Re-Animator), and Pataky makes for one of the most unsympathetic love interests I can remember.But even Pataky and Andreu pale in incompetence next to that blustery, seething mass of bad acting that is leading man Jason Barry.  Based on Yuzna's shoddy history with actors, one might be tempted to blame it on the director, but the fact is that in this film, Jason Barry is incapable of pulling off a single believable moment, basic elementary acting.  His every internal and external beat rings false, his dialogue delivery sounds like a cold reading, and even his basic body movements look like amateur theatre.  Most high-school students do better than this.  Jeffrey Combs as Herbert West, seasoned pro that he is, gamely plays along, but the script puts West's character so far off to the sideline in favour of the vomit-inducing Pataky-Andreu axis that Combs is unable to save this film.On a strictly technical level, the cinematography looks good, the score is all right (though often too serious-minded for its own good), and the film doesn't look low-budget.  But when the "story" is such a mess and the actors so inept, no amount of slick lighting and camera moves can save a film.  Yuzna really should stick with producing, because on the Stuart Gordon-directed Dagon, at least there were some good moments.  But Beyond Re-Animator is beyond salvaging, possibly the worst film sequel I've ever seen, and way up there in the list of worst films I've ever subjected myself to
The Mothman Travesty. Three problems with this film:1. PACING - The film's pacing doesn't vary.  It's very boring.  As a matter of fact, this wouldn't be a problem if the film were much more tense (e.g., "Speed"), however this film lacks the high-action intensity to pull off such a slow expository speed.2. EFFECTS - Too many sequences of this film rely on color and light superimpositions, and there is an overabundance of high-speed imaging.  The scene changes that employ erratic barrages of images desensitize the viewer from the thrilling "horror" scenes.  Furthermore, they fail to make enough sequential sense of the film's plot to really mean much to the film as a greater whole.  The upshot: the film relies too heavily on the art of editing, to the point where plot twists are no longer interesting.3. TRIVIALITY - The plot's conclusion quails in the face of the "so what?" question.  The viewer is left with a sense of, "I sat through the film for THAT?"  In light of points (1) and (2), this obnoxious bit is the icing on the cake.Don't waste your life.ALon
New York stock trader to messenger?. I don't think so.  Contrived movie with a little cycling thrown in to make up for a poor script.  Think about it: take a dump on a stock and get wiped out; now you are a messenger?  I do not think so.  I know of a few New York Stock Exchange brokers who blew themselves up on trades, but this is crazy.  Thank goodness they kept the New York scenes to a minimum.  Yes, he was suppose to be at the NYSE and not the Pacific Stock Exchange as a previous reviewer wrote
Read The Book. My first viewing of Fahrenheit 451 since its initial release in 1966 was last night via DVD.  Any casual film fan who watches will fall to sleep very fast. Based on the novel by Ray Bradbury, the clever idea of the future sets the stage for an interesting movie. The vehicle that the 451 unit drives is one of the most unusual devices science fiction will ever see.  The plot, the sound and the characters are all completely uninteresting, minus Montag, whom Oskar Werner plays very well.  The moment with the lady with the hidden library was probably one of the silliest examples of what books meant to some. FAHRENHEIT 451 may be considered a classic to some, but without a remake quick, this is a boring artifact to science fiction theater.In the future, the government outlaws books and promotes people to do nothing but watch TV and take drugs. Miserable firefighter Montag, set for a promotion in the 451 book burning unit, takes up the suggestion from a fellow monorail passenger to read a book. His life then goes upside-down from there.Skip the movie and read the book instead
Disappointing Flick Overall. The Initiation is very slow and dreadful movie. The first 40 minutes are wasted with flashbacks and talking but the end in the shopping mall is decently done. The ending plot twist was a nice surpise but other than that this movie is strictly rental material
UnBox video not yet working. Will not play once video was downloaded. I get the error message:  "can not play file, please try again later. error# 0x80040273" I made the exlusive give me call me back feature but the UnBox department was already closed, I was told the UnBox Saturday and Sunday 6-5 hours. I have to say I am impressed with the Call back feature. I downloaded the Unbox Beta now and am recieving email assistance to try to resolve the problem. Thanks Amazon UnBox! I will Update again - Feb. 10,200
Not happy. This is only a portion of this episode.  It cuts off in the middle of a sentence
Will Denis Leary ever figure out he can't act... Well the title kind of says it all. Dull,ugly,boring men in a dull,ugly boring movie. Also the most unreallistic sexual pairing in the world. Stunningly beautiful Elizabeth Hurley with ugly, skinny, beaked nosed  Denis Leary.Steve Buscemi is comical as usual and adds the only bright spot to the film.
A stellar book, a disappointing movie. My boys and I read "My Side of the Mountain" together for our homeschooling lessons. I can't tell you how much we loved the book! Jean Craighhead-George does a remarkable job of taking the reader deep into the wilderness of the Catskills, complete with reference to Washington Irving's Rip VanWinkle. We were delighted by each and every page.Why in the world any screen write would change such a marvelous creation is beyond me! The movie wasn't even close to the novel, and we felt like it was a complete waste of time to watch. I can only wonder what the book's author must have felt watching a washed and clearly faded rendition of her creation. She must have been deeply disappointed.The book itself would make a wonderful screenplay all its own. We truly hope that someone will resurrect the story and put it on the screen in all its glory. Until then, this movie is not it! Save your money; buy the book!
UnBox video not yet working. Will not play once video was downloaded. I get the error message:  "can not play file, please try again later. error# 0x80040273" I made the exlusive give me call me back feature but the UnBox department was already closed, I was told the UnBox Saturday and Sunday 6-5 hours. I have to say I am impressed with the Call back feature. I downloaded the Unbox Beta now and am recieving email assistance to try to resolve the problem. Thanks Amazon UnBox! I will Update again - Feb. 10,200
Only mildly interesting, and no "classic". I saw this at the library and brought it home, thinking it might be interesting to watch. I very rarely watch films made after the 1950's, but this one looked as if it could be enjoyable. It ended up being only mildly enjoyable, and a bit boring. I felt that within all the time it ran, we didn't really get a good understanding of the inner being of the main characters; seemed to remain in shallow waters all along. The film was sort of good...pretty photography,and for the most part it seemed like the costumes, hair, way of speaking, etc. were accurate for the time period (so often such movies are so obviously modern people dressed up and pretending to be from way back when) but something just wasn't quite right, and it is hard to know exactly what it was. I was surprised and disappointed that there was quite a long scene with male nudity which to me was quite unnecessary and inappropriate. I think the whole swim scene could have been done effectively without showing full nudity. I am grateful the women in the film remained properly clothed. So I would not recommend this film for families with young  children, because of the nudity.
Not very likeable or fun. I felt more sympathetic toward the hookers and sex workers in Km.0 and the porn folks in Fluffer than I did with these sad, scheming, nasty theives.They basically drive their uncapable third partner to suicide by being really hateful to him (even though the father "loves" him.)The only decent character is the young man they recruit to replace the ailing man, who, turns out, has a thing both for women and men.  In this case, father and daughter.  It could be interesting, but it's lost here among the artificial-feeling grittiness and endless series of theft attempts, which pass for story.Bascially, I didn't relate to or care much about the characters, who didn't have much redeeming value, and who didn't learn anything during the movie.  And they are all really bad to each other.There are lots better choices than this.
Not Happy. I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?
Just awful. One of the worst movies I've ever seen.  To begin with, it butchers a classic book -- my kids were appalled when Frightful the falcon was killed.  But beyond that, everything about it is just awful -- screenplay, acting, direction, music, dream sequence(!)  Totally amateur, not one entertaining minute in the picture.  Negative five stars
The blue fairy? Gimmie a break!. This movie was cheeseball beginning to end...I thought the concept was corny even before I watched it but decided to give it a try anyway. Big mistake. A robot who can love? Lame! And with all this high tech stuff the docs can't bring the couple's real son out of a coma (or whatever was wrong with him) so the parents forget all about him and get some robot kid who can 'love' but lacks the common sense of a human making him a danger to himself and everyone..Brialliant plan (especially considering the amount of orphan human kids there must be in this messed up futuristic world)..Then the real son wakes up and comes home and thats when the problems with the robot kid begin. The family decides they don't want the robot and the mom 'loves' him so much she dumps him somewhere instead of sending him back to the lab to be humanely disposed of...It was then I knew I was smelling a stinker but NOOOOO someone else wanted to watch it till the end until he soon found out the horrible truth...I have since nicknamed it Artificial Idiocy...The worst part was the end, Ugh, I don't even want to get into it but those of you who see the title of my review above and have seen the movie know what I mean. The whole plot was muddled and full of holes with no sense of realism. For those of you who have not seen it, I suggest renting it before you buy it. Maybe this movie is great for some people, it just wasn't my thing.
Pretty forgotten by now. The Forgotten starring Julianne Moore and Domnic West is a slow, tepid, and hard to grasp film. The previews for this film were better than the actual movie, I guess that's a bad sign that the movie isn't going to be great (I'll try and remember that next time). The only reason I am giving The Fogotten 2 stars is the scene with Alfe Woodward, you'll know what I mean when it happens, the scence is scary and comes out of nowhere, very intrguing spurprise awaits. Anyways The Forgotten is a movie you should see once and that's it, happy viewing
one of the worsts!. the movie title itself says a lot, the movie itself is a total scam, fools people to rent or to watch it. a horrible directing, script and performance. you'd better jump off empire state building in the late afternoon if you feel bored than watching this brain-dean bad movie
AWFUL!. ok SO FIRST LETS GET ONE THING STRAIT THIS IS ONE OF THE WORST MOVIES EVER AND THATS ABOUT IT.ok so I really liked the book and i was excited when i heard they were making a movie of it but then i saw it and didn't even end up finishing it it was soooooo bad they ruin everything nothing is the same...and when they go to the giant village there like belly dancing and Ella is singing?????? alright that doesn't even sound good but theres a ton of other things as well but it would take to long to right it all down. I really sugest that you don't wast your time on this movie its not funny cute profitible not anything except bad. ITS A WAST OF TIME TO WATCH THIS MOVIE.
I've seen wayyyy better... even Fonda's hotness couldn't save it. I have never saw the original Nikita merely because its hard to find. I settled with the American remake as a last resort insted. It can't be that bad its got a few legendary actors in it like Gabriel Byrne, Harvey Keitel & Anne Bancroft in it. Not to mention my childhood dream woman Bridget Fonda. Damn is she sexy. But boy was I so wrong.Anyways, the film is very violent for all the wrong reasons. Has swearing for all the wrong reasons. Even a drug addict like Fonda wouldn't mouth off everytime she opens her mouth. Thats not the girl I fell for. The pace is every sloppy. Its hard to believe how many holes in the screenplay there are for such a simple story. What is the major problem is its lack of plot. You just sit there after her missions not knowing what will happen. Its unpredicable in a bad way. There are no twists off any kind. I found the ending quite stupid. It seemed like an easy way out because the movie was almost at its 2 hour point. After the credits I felt dissapointed.As for the actors. The beautiful Bridget Fonda puts in a good one in my book. Her blank stares are quite annoying but her sexy angry look works so well for this movie. Gabriel Byrne one of favourites puts in a kind but strict performance as he gradually becomes a father/kinda love interest figure to Fonda. Who wouldn't fall in love with her? The two work well together I'll give you that. R.I.P Anne Bancroft, forever Mrs. Robinson to me, is also scrict but very understanding to Fonda.Its also good to see her in films now that she passed away around 6 years ago I think. Finally Harvey Keitel, good in his early career is very dull at this point but since his playing a character who is dull and coldhearted, lets nothing get in his way, has no attachments and is plain evil works for this movie I guess. You see how generous I am to the actors. I could be mean to them for being in a so-so movie but I like them too much to say bad things about them. Oh did I mention I think Bridget Fonda is sexy
Poor support. This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet
Brannaugh Blows it Again-Bad!. Although not a fan of Kenneth Brannaugh's,  I was willing to give his Hamlet a fair viewing.  Since this is my favorite play, I was hoping the film would be better than his last two mediocre endeavors into Shakespeare's plays; unfortunately, it's worse! Beginning with the performances: Jack Lemmon is a wonderful actor, but here, he is an embarrassment, as are many of the other actors assembled, including Julie Christie (whom I usually adore). The casting is all over the map which makes for uneven performances and unsatisfying scenes. Brannaugh's own delivery of the text is rushed and usually unconvincing, despite the vehemence with which he delivers every over-ennunciated syllable, which sounds manic, bordering on farce. Bad direction and over-indulgent acting! It might be interesting to see what Brannaugh would do with good direction, instead of his own.  I could go on about my problems with the staging and other production values but the damage to this brilliant work is on every level and not worth going in to in depth.The good news is that Zefferelli's Hamlet, with another actor I don't normally like--Mel Gibson--is spot on perfect. The actor's are excellently cast, the production values and direction are serve the text, rather than competing with it, as in Brannaugh's version. Zefferelli knows his Shakespeare and his films, in my opinion represent the definitive versions (watch his Romeo & Juliet and Taming of the Shrew), too bad for us he didn't do more. Too bad, also, no one contemporary seems as capable. Instead we get the recent unwatchable junk with "hip-cool" sensibilities. Argh!It's not surprising no one is in a rush to produce a dvd of this tragedy of a film
You love it...or you hate it..it seems to be that way!!!. Having watched this film three times since 1996,I keep revisiting it hoping that maybe something in me would change to make me like this film more,but it hasn't!!!When a movie wins nine Academy Awards I think,maybe the "intelligentia" knows better.They don't!!!This film is positively plodding. The acting or the screenplay is not anything exceptional in any way.(No small wonder that Fiennes and Scott-Thomas were beat out!)I am a person who is usually moved by what I see,but the more I view this picture,the more I realize why the SEINFELD show dedicated a whole episode to their hate of this movie.When I revisit the nominees for 1996 I see what a weak field this film was up against,but certainly FARGO,SHINE,SECRETS AND LIES and even JERRY MAGUIRE were more compelling than this 3-hour bore.To each his/her own.You will either love it or hate it.I preferred the latter vehemently
pretty lame. maybe i'm spoiled by big-budget sci-fi films, but i thought this movie kind of stunk. it felt and looked like a TV movie and wasn't scary, at all. the best/funniest part was how no one could remember the one lady's name or face, and everyone described her the same way--"the one with the glasses." "Oh, her--haven't seen her." LOL
AMAZON SUCKS. I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!
Lame. Two problems.First problem.  Let's say you're the typical kidnapper-rapist-killer.  For fun and out of postmodern boredom, you kidnap two girls off the street in New York City.  What are the odds that your randomly-chosen getaway and killing spot is going to be exactly where one of the girls lives, 60 or 70 miles away?  One in ten million?  Twenty million?Second problem.  The movie, even with a run time of an otherwise-short 84 minutes, doesn't have enough action or development to fill the void.  In short, it's boring, and in several scenes where Craven seems more interested in the bucolic Wechester County scenery than moving the plot along, I found myself reaching for the fast-forward
If I could give it a negative 5, I would... This movie was just about the worst movie I ever saw... so utterly and painfully pointless, and not the slightest bit funny. Tom Green makes a complete fool of himeself. I actually turned off the movie half-way through because it was so stupid... Don't waste your time or money on this one!
The Snake Man Cometh..... Okay, the rating above is not going to be liked but I have to be truthful.The only good thing going for this movie was the return of "Snake Plissken".This film's plot was essentially a rehash of the original "Escape From New York"...A bit more special effects (which in fact, did not make this a better movie)...When I go to a sequel I expect to get what I paid for a totally new adventure with the same character / characters.Kurt Russell's character is older and even more in the know of what the rewards are before he is offered them.Obviously the movie doesn't really know where it's going as it takes two scenes (15 minutes of the film) (1st scene - President, Commandant, and Lackey give Snake the mission) (2nd scene - Commandant and Lackey brief Snake before he leaves for the mission)  to explan to the audience what's the basic conflict.I guess either Carpenter or Russell are just getting too old to take a GREAT leap and recount either an earlier Snake Plissken adventure or an adventure well worth telling..I also wish to comment that this disc has no special features besides a movie trailer..."Carpenter....Russell! " Please don't tell me "money" caused you to revisit a "cult figure"!Some redeeming qualities are the acting performances of  Cliff Robertson, Stacy Keach, Steve Buscemi, and Pam Grier.  Robertson, Keach, and Grier may be old but they can sure make you believe in their characters!Sorry, Snake...."I don't love L.A."The-Big-Green-Pointy-Eared-One!
Pretentious and Mediocre. This is by far the most pretentious piece of French crap I have seen in years. What bothers me are not the admittedly disturbing scenes, but rather the banality of the film's underlying idea, which the director, Gaspar Noe, attempted to convey in a thoroughly unremarkable fashion. The characters are not shown in any depth; in fact, there is no meaningful dialogue or any other attempt at all to introduce them to the viewer. Camera work is simply awful - somebody should have explained to the cameraman that rotating a hand-held camera at will for minutes at a time does not always produce art. Apparently, these sterile methods combined with shocking scenes of rape and murder are supposed to produce a new form of cinma vrit.In short, even though in France almost every baker is an "artiste" (think "baguette artisanale"), Mr. Noe is not a "cinaste" even by French standards: hit someone in the face with a teakettle and call it art
Horrid. I once saw this movie seven years ago and really liked it.  Hey, I was young and naive.  I recently rented this movie to see it again.  I was once again robbed of my money. Cameron's Closet is 90 minutes of pure boredom.  The acting is horrible, the monster is laughable, the writing is unbelieveable, I could just go on and on about how terrible this movie is. Cameron is a young boy who has telekinetic powers.  He then brings a demon to life through a statue his dad gave him.  Then people begin to die.  A detective and a psychiatrist begin to investigate. I can't begin to comprend why I liked this movie the first time I saw it.  This is just one big laughfest from the start to the end
Misleading search results. I bought this DVD on the basis that Shania Twain performed the half time show. Even when i did a search for Shania Twain this DVD was listed - INCORRECTLY - as there is NO Shania performance on the DVD. As far as the football goes i really can not comment as i am from the UK and know nothing about American Footbal - sorry!!
just not really funny. If you aren't really into jokes about the difference between black/white, sex, drugs and how bad gays are this is not for you.I had seen other stuff by Pryor I always liked but this time I never once really laughed out loud. It was dissapointing, good thing he has so many other good stuf
"I can't see ya, but I know you're here.  I can feel it.". The story of Wim Wenders' "Wings of Desire" is told through images and thoughts.  Abandon all expectations of seeing anything resembling a conventional film before watching it.Two angels glide through the streets of Berlin surveying its inhabitants.  Cassiel (Otto Sander) embraces his role as witness but Damiel (Bruno Ganz) wants to break free of his ethereal existence.  He is willing to cast aside his immortality in order to experience the simple joys of everyday life.  The primary catalyst for his desire to change is his attraction to trapeze artist Marion (Solveig Dommartin)."Wings of Desire" does not quite work.  It stumbles not because it is too pretentious or too ponderous.  Rather, it stumbles because it is just too abstract.   Relying on imagery and monologues to tell a story makes for an interesting lesson in unconventional filmmaking, but it also leads to frustration and annoyance to anyone conditioned to more traditional narratives.  "Wings of Desire" deserves a lot of credit for its innovative approach toward its material and its beautiful dream-like visuals.  Yet, it is a film that unfortunately will not appeal much to the mainstream viewer.
Extreme something. Some folks need only a paper-thin plot to string together a bunch of action sequences, without character or theme or language or logic getting in the way. If that's you, this may be your movie. Xtreme sports, xtreme ops. Get it? If that doesn't strike you as xtremely clever, you may find this movie painful to watch. I'm thinking of telling The Agony Booth about it.The humor doesn't work, to the extent that I think I want a laugh track after all. Or a drummer doing rim shots. Ba-DUM-bum! Characters are distinguishable by such things as fake national accent and stereotyped mannerisms, hair style and/or color, or shouting all his dialogue. I didn't watch it all. I didn't even watch enough to tell you what it's about. Amazon or Imdb can tell you what it's about. Just something else we found in the flat. Someone's losing credibility as a selector of DVDs.
Poor support. This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet
Please enter a title for your review. Interesting premise, but the plot is like swiss cheese.This review will just be a point by point of all the major things that I found so implausable that I couldn't just suspend disbelief and enjoy the ride. Spoilers alert.I wasn't able to make the leap to believing Sarah's sudden turn towards malicious opportunism as soon as she saw the cash. When questioned about what she would do if she found some hypothetical millions, she insists with chirpy disinterest that she would certainly turn it in. Just one scene of her looking longingly at a brochure for a holiday she couldn't afford would have established some repressed dissatisfation with her life situation, but her general demeanor seemed to suggest not only comfort, but satisfaction.Why did Hank decide he would burn the money instead of return it if it turned out someone legitimately owned it? Surely it wouldn't be too difficult to anonymously return it without being implicated in it's disappearance.The first murder, after the old guy regained consciousness, why did Hank not try to negotiate with or threaten the old guy to keep quiet about his brother assaulting him? For Hank, finishing the job his brother started didn't seem like an absolute last resort, it seemed like he took the murder lightly.When Hank got home apparently he volunteered information to his wife about what he'd just done. What? Like he knew she'd be understanding about it or something? Hi honey, I'm home, by the way I just killed a man to protect the money. Wtf?When Jacob shot Lou to protect Hank, why didn't Hank just give the tape back before it got to that point?The shotgun impact on Lou's wife was cartoonishly ridiculous, sending her flying three feet into the air when the blast didn't even hit her at an upward trajectory.And the final ridiculous flaw. Jacob taking the fake FBI agent's gun, and instead of just shooting himself before his brother had time to react, he hands it to his brother, and charges him with the responsibility of killing him, setting up the final emotional crescendo of the film. Supposedly the explanation was that it wouldn't look like the fake FBI agent shot Jacob if the shot was fired at point blank range, but why not? Why couldn't forensic investigators at the scene believe an altercation could have transpired where Jacob charged at the gunman from behind when he was about to shoot the sheriff, wrestled with him, and wound up taking a point blank shot to the head? It really makes no sense.One inspiredly believable moment I will give them film credit for is Hank's difficulty in finding the bullets in the sheriff's office and loading the gun. A lazier writer would have just had him find the gun loaded.If the major plot developments were fleshed out in more detail to be made believable this could have been a great film. As it is, it's a frustratingly flaw-ridden glimpse of what could have been and a waste of time to watch.
Like All Gossip: A Lot of Talk About Nothing!. A very boring and stupid film about college freshmen with a kindergarten maturity level. The movie is horribly slow to get to the point and is riddled with nonsense dialogue: I've heard better lines in 'Fast Times At Richmond High' thank you.Altogether a very forgettable film that has a lot of talk about nothing. Don't believe the great reviews about this film: the film might appeal to the 14-17 year-old crowds fantasizing about how 'cool' college life might be with all the 'cool' people and 'parties.' If you're not in that category, skip this boring film and save both your time and your money.
This version is as exciting as paint drying. When this film version of "Much Ado About Nothing" came out, there was a great deal of critical acclaim for it. I disagree with all of this acclaim.Kenneth Branagh's production has taken a lively Shakespearean comedy and turned it into a bloviated not-very-funny movie. Shakespeare comedies should be done fast and with a certain silly madcap fun to them. This production is so slow, I had trouble staying awake. It is so bogged down and so full of its own self importance that it becomes a dead bore.This is the worst version of Shakespearean comedy I have ever seen, either on stage or on TV or in the movies. (The worst production of any Shakespearean play I have seen was a UC Berkeley theater department production.)Please compare this 1993 movie version of "Much Ado About Nothing" to the Joseph Papp's 1973 TV version of the same (based on his New York Shakespeare Festival production). The latter is fast paced, lively and madcap. Mr. Papp moved the story to the turn of the century (1900) and incorporate additional comic elements by adding keystone cops to his version without cutting lines. Mr. Papp's version is done in the true spirit of Shakespearean comedy. It is delightful.  It does not have the big stars (Kenneth Branagh and Emma Thompson) but does not suffer from their absence.My experience in the past is that any Shakespearean production that has to cut out some or many of the Bard's lines is one in which the cuts have been made to make room for non-Shakespearean bloat devised by the director.This is not the first time I have disagreed with the general consensus on a production of a Shakespearean play. Not sure if this means I am idiot or that I have higher standards for Shakespearean productions than others.
Starts Out Strong, But Fizzles Quickly... Let me start by saying that I may need to quit listening to the opinions of some of my co-workers in regards to movies to watch, at least when it comes to the horror genre. Numerous people where I work told me that this movie, "The Descent" was absolutely one of the best horror movies ever to be made.  In their defense, my co-workers weren't the only people with this opinion, many critics and other moviegoers said the same thing.  Well, apparently the hype that was built up for me regarding this movie was more than the film could live up to, because I was sorely disappointed, but more on that later, for now I will give you my plot summary for last year's supposed horror spectacular, "The Descent""The Descent" begins with a young woman on vacation with her family and friends, when her husband and her daughter suffer a tragic accident. One year later at the prodding of those same friends, she accompanies them on a spelunking adventure, the problem is none of her friends have ever been to this cave, in fact it's a newly discovered cave that no one has explored as yet.  So as they attempt to explore the unexplored these brave young women become trapped in the cave.  Making matters worse, this cave is not like any ordinary cave, for this one is inhabited by bloodthirsty mutant creatures who have just found their next meal.At the beginning of watching this movie I was really interested in the developing story, and the shocking opener really caught my attention, giving me a sense that this movie is going to be different than most horror movies by actually giving you the unexpected.  However, once the story gets to the part where the girls are inside the cave, which is actually where the majority of the film takes place, things begin to go awry for the picture.  At first, the filmmakers were doing a good job of using the claustrophobic atmosphere, giving the audience a sense of entrapment and anxiety which served to heighten the suspense regarding the possibility of impending doom.  Then the filmmakers introduce a fact that I felt completely derailed the movie, this is a cave that no one has been in, and these girls are hardly professional.  So, who in their right mind would put all of their friends lives in possible jeopardy just to be the first to explore a newly discovered cave.  It's absolutely stupid, especially when placed viewed in the context of the character's interaction and companionship with each other, none of these girls would do this to each other. After this occurs the mutants show up, a plot point that I was hoping would help put the movie back in the right direction; however, this is where the movie begins to unwind even faster, because it's now just one gory scene after another, and the movie is nothing more than your average monster movie.  A decision I somewhat agreed with, yet still didn't agree with was the decision to keep the mutants origins unknown.  On the one hand this served to add to the mystery of why they are attacking these girls, you just assume they're cannibalistic, but on the other it would have been nice to know how they got there.Even though "The Descent" was hyped as being one of the best horror movies of recent time, by both my friends and many critics and moviegoers, to me it was merely another average addition to a genre that is already full of mediocrity."The Descent" is unrated and contains violence and language
A great film given the basest possible DVD treatment from Fox Lorber. Most of those who were lucky enough to see this stunning Srdjan Dragojevic film at select film festivals in the U.S. have not forgotten its clarity, its anger, and its power.  The movie was passed up for theatrical distribution, although it was readily available on VHS and now on DVD from Fox Lorber.This DVD is a bust in every thinkable way, although Fox Lorber was obviously aiming very low.  The phrase "bare-bones" is usually used to describe discs that are given rudimentary, dismissive releases, lacking supplements that more presumably marketable titles might warrant.  This DVD does contain a trailer, but the trailer, sadly, looks better than the feature.  "Bare-bones" would have been fine, but watching this disc is torture.It's obviously a quickie transfer from the VHS -- I could have produced a better amateur transfer -- with a loud hiss tainting the soundtrack throughout, poor audio balance (with dialogue pulsing between speakers in an artificial echo) poor contrast, a muddy, dark image, burnt-in subtitles, and so forth.  Fox Lorber were long the scourge of the art-film DVD market, and their soulless neglect of their titles has never been more apparent than in this disc.  New Yorker and Wellspring (formerly Winstar) are guilty of similar offenses
Why does Jet Li star in Wong Jing films?. This film has been re-released as "Meltdown."  There are a few reasons for watching this movie: 1) Jet Li.  2) Chingmy Yau (the reporter).  3) Wu Ma (Frankie's dad)  4) a decent fight scene at the end.  Jacky Cheung is also not as aggravating as usual.   That's it.  Jet Li has appeared in three or four films directed by Wong Jing, and, just as Chow Yun Fat does in God of Gamblers and Jackie Chan does in City Hunter, he does what he can.  The direction of the film, however (as well as GOG and CH), stinks.  The plot copies Die Hard and Speed, with some broad satire aimed at Jackie Chan, but that is not the problem.  Put simply, Jackie Chan knows how to direct a film.  Wong Jing does not.  If you want to see Jet Li, go see Fist of Legend, Once Upon A Time in China, or just about anything else he has done.  If you want to see a good Hong Kong action movie, watch films directed by John Woo, Ringo Lam, Tsui Hark, Jackie Chan, and Sammo Hung.  Jet Li is fun to watch, but go watch everything else he has done before you get to this
too much hollywood hype. When I saw this movie as a young boy, I loved it.  I saw it later in life, having served 4 years in the USMC, and I found it way off the mark.  I was very disappointed
Star Trek:  City on the Edge of Forever. My favorite show of the Trek series but there's no way I'd buy another individual program from Amazon.  It will ONLY play on their downloaded player ...won't burn to DVD so can't play it on my television.  Don't bother buying this ...just go for the Trek collection on DVD
Where's Richard Pryor when we need him?. eddie murphy is a comical guy, but is he really the right guy to play in something as stupid as this? Of course, who is the right guy for it? One of the questions i can't stand to think about in this movie, is how Dolittle hears the animals speak, but their lips move and nobody notices. Can't they connect the dots? Obviously not. And obviously, the filmmakers couldn't either
where is the class?. one of the most pretentious and exaggerating movies ever seen. the dialogue, the acting...whatever, all suck big time. everything in this movie looked unrealistic, not funny but pathetically pretentious and exaggerating to the extreme. that kinda performance would have won an oscar, yeah, right, maybe just because there were only worse pictures nominated in that year. what a hype
The usual Cardone fare. The Forsaken (J. S. Cardone, 2001 )I should probably know better by now. And yet I still subject myself to J. S. Cardone movies.In this one, Sean, a guy (Dawson's Creek's Kerr Smith) hired to drive a car from Los Angeles to Miami picks up a hitchhiker, Nick (Final Destination's Brendan Fehr) in the middle of the desert. The two of them encounter Megan, a sick girl(Coyote Ugly's Izabella Miko) when they stop for the night in town. Nick insists she come with them, saying he knows what's wrong with her, and eventually tells Sean that the group have vampires on their tail. (Well, the word "vampires" doesn't exactly crop up seriously, but come on, you know what they are.) The rest of the movie can be summed up with "things blow up."Cardone is one of the straight-to-Sci-Fi-Chanel directors who fills his movies with young-and-beautifuls who have limited (if any) acting ability, but are relatively easy on the eyes. (In their defense, this is not a new tactic; witness the brilliant film career of, say, Farrah Fawcett.) Smith is a bit above the average y-n-b in acting ability, though the other two here are right on the mark. The minor characters don't have much to go on, either, as the script came straight out of a "write your first screenplay in twenty-one days" kind of book. Which could make a passable film if you had a really original, or even a really good, fast-paced plot. Alas, no such thing exists here.This movie deserves a mercifully quick slide into obscurity. About the only was I can imagine it having any longevity at all is if it's somehow turned into a drinking game. *
Please not another season of this!. Ok so I have always thought Courteney Cox should not be allowed on screen due to lack of acting talent and this show just proves it. It really is the most boring show Ive seen in a long time. If you thought she was bad in scream...and friends..dont watch this...there are other actors in this show who do redeem it somewhat but could never save it. Hopefully this show will be scraped
Not good, but what other choice do you have. First of all, I would like to start off by saying that this movie sucks.  Here are a few of the things that supports my decision. 1. Dacascos does not know Capoeira. He played the berimbau (an insrument used in Capoeira) wrong, he pronouced many of the terms incorrectly, and he had no flow to his movements.  2. The acting was horrible.  While watching this, you kind of get the picture that the director wanted to finish this movie a soon as possible.  Most of the lines were just stupid.  Dacascos character had no real history.  apparently had this mysterious past you really could care less about because the plot was so predictable. 3. The fighting was laughable at best.  Capoeira is the only martial art that was outlawed for being so violent and unstoppable.  You don't need corny fight scenes to show it's usefulness.  Most of the fight scenes where repeated movements that were shot at different angles.  Dacascos was doing meia lua's (a spinning kick in which both hands are on the ground as you strike) that were knocking out three people at once.  In one ridiculous scene, Saverio (the drug lord) pointed to where he wanted Dacascos to stand so that he could miraculously appear behind him and perform and unchallenged jumping kick to the back of his head.  I wish an experinced Capoeirista would have done the fight scenes.  Although this movie was horrible, it is the only movie in which Capoeira is suppose to be the main artform used. While watching this movie, one can only hope that this poor performance dosen't hurt Capoeira's chances at being the cornerstone of another movie.
I've been cheated by Amazon. It really sucks, tried to download but it's not able to be viewed in pc's outsided the united states. Crikey.I'll have to wait for reruns to watch it on the telly.Whatta shame amazon dot com. Let's send a CSI to yer headquarters
Warning Incomplete Episode!!!. The episodes in this series have an average running time of 50 minutes. This one happens to be only 18 minutes. This mean sthat the file abruptly stops right in the middle. Even though it only cost me $2 I still got jipped.  Let's hope Amazon can iron out these kinds of problems before they get this service farther underway. Be careful enough to sheck the running times to be sure they seem accurate before you buy them
Sentimental and fake. Having enjoyed LOST IN TRANSLATION, I thought I might like this one, which seems to have some sort of cult reputation-- why I can't fathom. The entire plot is self-serving, shallow, and unrealistic. I guess it's supposed to depict the horror of repressive religious values, and while I don't condone those, the film lacks clear characters or any motivation. A lot of people have buttoned up parents who don't get it, and it doesn't mean they kill themselves-- because they were grounded!?Since the writer-director gerw up in Hollywood, she may not be aware that you can't keep your kid home from school without a very good reason-- social workers and what not come after you. So the entire premise is false.Romanticizing mass suicide by having a bunch of soft focus young blondes do it-- after which they supposedly ascend to erotic eternity in the imaginations of their boyish peers-- could actually encourage the act. It's not caring, not real, and not responsible.But I guess that wouldn't bother the rich, overfunded daughter of a Hollywood genius out to make a name for herself.
No need to Suicide. I get the story line but 5 grown women need to suicide!?  The one dare to have a boyfriend and not go home for the night.  Why would that kind of free sprite would kill herself!?!?  It is not matching the character
kind of aimless. I found this movie somewhat entertaining, although the intertwining stories were a mixed bag of annoying and fun. Unfortunately the fact that the stories each receive only limited attention, and the story changes from one focus to another storyline entirely just as things start to seem interesting, makes this film a bit frayed and taxing to the patience. Nevertheless, the film is about a whole host of young people, dressed up and heading for a party (ostensibly Martha Plimpton's party), but they never quite make it there. Plimpton, someone I never really cared for, is actually rather funny in this role, and in fact hilarious when she misses her own party (and her idol, Elvis Costello). Christina Ricci and Gaby Hoffman are both quite funny; Courtney Love, Paul Rudd and Janeane Garofalo are also quite a trio. Overall this is light comedy; nothing special but still worth the effort.
Just not gripping. Admittedly the film is clever and the acting is good and it has it's moments of entertainment, BUT overall it's long and pretty boring.  It seems it would have been better suited as a play, which apparently it was originally.  I had just finished re-reading Romeo and Juliet when I rented this, thinking I was still in a Shakespeare mood, but this didn't do it for me.  I suppose if I had just finished reading or watching Hamlet, it would have been better.  My favorite parts are Oldman's silent scientific discoveries, completely amusing.  Couldn't wait for the movie to end, honestly
McGregor and Judd voyage threw a boring obsession tale. Ewan McGregor (The Pillow Book, Brassed Off), becomes obsessed with mystery woman Ashley Judd (Double Jepordy, Twisted) and soon he starts to follow her around everywhere she goes. His fascination gets the best of him and it becomes deadly, yeah, ok. He sees her kill someone and the obsession starts right there...no wait was it there or was it when he took her picture. He then sees her kill another guy, she sucks up onto a blind guy who McGregor ends up accidently killing, she ends up almost being arrested but McGregor sets her free and then he follows her to a restaurant in the middle of a snowy area where he gets closer to her. Then she finds out he's stalking her and she tries to run but then he chases after her with his car and ends up killing her and that's that. Wow, exciting. McGregor also suffers from seeing his little girl everywhere he goes and he talks to her. Plays off like one of those Music Videos....like from a sappy writer.....a voyage of obsession. Also starring Patrick Bergin, k.d. Lang (the singer), Jason Preistley (Calendar Girl, Beverly Hills 90210) and Genevieve Bujold
Children, lend me your ears. "Children of the Corn" had some potential: a "corn" cult for children with a charismatic adolescent as its leader takes over a rural town in Nebraska. Based on a short story by Stephen King, this is a fairly interesting and unusual concept. Unfortunately, some very weak execution is what mars the movie. Its director, Fritz Kiersch, sometimes works as "Alan Smithee," the pseudonym for directors who don't want to attach their real names to movies they know are turkeys. This movie doesn't quite warrant that, though it isn't very good either. There is scarcely anything more pathetic than a movie that claims to be frightening, yet simply is not. Most egregious is the use of hokey, faux sacred music. Aside from Linda Hamilton, John Franklin and Robbie Kiger, the performances are pretty weak. It doesn't help that some of the dialogue is laughably bad and that some of the special effects are cheap and look awful. Isaac Chroner (Franklin) instructs the children of the town to murder all but one adult, who is apparently needed to warn potential visitors against entering the town. His advice nearly prevents Vicky and Burt Stanton from seeking medical help there, but darker forces prevail and the couple finds itself fending off attacks from the kids. If the excessively dramatic acting and cheesy effects at the climax do not make you laugh, the incredibly lame final scene certainly will. That is not to say this movie is all bad, however. Though never scary, there are a few effective moments throughout. (I don't want to reveal any of them because they would be the only reasons for watching the movie)  Die hard horror fans might want to check out this 1984 release, though fans of good movies will probably want to steer clear. This Anchor Bay DVD is anamorphic widescreen with good picture and sound, though this is not the director's cut.
Dont get "Fiji" final week ... Dont dwnld " Survivor, "Thunderstorms & Sacrifice" ". Its my fault for not reading the whole thing. you would think that the last episode would be the finale , but NO, its just a 10 minute recap going to the finale 4. I didnt even get a full 45 minute episode. No finale. I got rippped off. $1.99 dwnld not well spent. Dont bother dwnldng any episode of fiji if you dont know the ending. Because they dont have that episode, not even the reunion show
an affair to remember. i think the newer version "the love affair" with Warren Beatty/Annette Benning better.
To bad... Not my cup a tea. Poor sound and average picture. Just for Excalibur freaks...?!
Not Happy. I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?
Beware of Unbox!!!. Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for
Quack,Quack!. "The Hospital" as well-crafted as it is is a wholly unpleasant viewing experience.  It is not so much a dark comedy but a mean-spirited one.  I was a fan of Paddy Chayefsky's "Network" and at least that film had a little bit of light to compensate for the darkness.  I'm led to believe that Chayefsky must have had a bad experience with the medical profession and this resulted in him skewering it as a whole.  If George C.Scott's character is supposed to be the voice of reason why is it that when he's not brooding, drinking, or contemplating suicide he's off on some rant?  Diana Rigg is completely wasted in this film.  Her whole purpose here seems to be to sport a short mini-skirt and be ravaged by Scott's character.  The film is also not helped by the lead-footed direction of Arthur Hiller.  The medical profession can be lampooned but don't look for it in this uneven tirade of a film
He was fired from GM for calling off and showing up late. what a joke...people believe the stupidest things...do some research and you will see that this is a joke.  I hated it
Not a sequel just another werewolf movie. For those that waited all these years for a sequel to the classic American Werewolf in London, the wait is not over.American adventurers looking for thrills across Europe decide to bungy jump from the Eiffel Tower.  But there is a beautiful woman who is going to commit suicide by jumping.  One of the boys jumps to her rescue.  But her secret is she is a werewolf and accidentally infects him.Well, it turns out that there is a pack of werewolves in Paris and they feed on Americans. (Let's talk obvious stereotyping.)  While at times it is good (especially when Julie Delpy is on screen).Don't waste your time watch the original!!
Becomes Old Very Fast!. The first five minutes of the dvd was interesting; however, after that I found that I was forcing myself to watch it without a great deal of enjoyment
AMAZON SUCKS. I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!
A really unfunny comedy. I saw this movie in the theater and was amazed at how quiet it was in there! Since I was bored, I found myself looking at other people there to see if I could get a read on what they were thinking, and after it was over I asked my friend what he thought. He said, "Oh, it was okay" but didn't elaborate. So let me: it was painfully unfunny, with jokes or punchlines that fell flat, horrible acting, totally predictable, and very forgetable. This is a movie you might want to rent ONLY if you're really bored and nearly every other movie is out. And even then, you'd be better off to go home empty handed. There's not even much eye candy to recommend, which is a nice fallback if there's nothing else going for it. How people could give this movie anything more than 1 star is puzzling. Just because you like a movie shouldn't mean you give it 5 stars, especially when it's as bad as this one. I mean, I liked Freddy VS Jason, but there's no way I'd give that movie 4 or 5 stars. This is bottom of the barrel
DUMB PERFORMANCES. Everything is this movie seems out of place. The old cliche &quot;good cop-bad cop&quot;, lived by Sutherland and his pal doesn't work at all!  Dridget is in an awkward performance, totally unconvincing, unreal, flat.  ANyway, it serves to study how a movie with so good cast can be a  tremendous waste of time.
SUPER TEEN. Having been a teenager once, I can certainly understand the inner turmoil and angst teens experience.  However, in PUMP UP THE VOLUME, the movie's attempt to martyrize teens and make all adults look like uncaring morons only serves to underscore why so many adults look with disdain on teens.  The teens in this movie seem to have little respect for authority and their assignation as to being tortured and misunderstood is vanquished in their juvenile behavior.  Even our hero (well played by Christian Slater) cannot communicate with people on a one to one level; he instead decides to become some kind of salvation to his teens by using his pirated radio shows to cause some kind of uprising among them.  As a proponent of truth, he is a vapid antithesis of truth: he fakes masturbation to arouse the youths; he doesn't use his real name or voice; and on a call with a potential suicide victim, he treats the caller as someone who isn't serious and never really offers any kind of consolation.  The suicidal teen says he is lonely and we automatically assume he is lonely within his familial structure, but isn't he just as lonely with the peers who mourn him after his demise?  The adults are played almost as caricatures and the teens as misunderstood heroes.  Sorry, folks, been there done that...living at any age requires a commitment to better yourself and do what you feel is right.  Questioning authority without any viable alternatives, as none of these teens do, merely escalates the generational gap, and movies like this are merely attempts to exploit the so called misunderstanding of youth
Attempts To Be Provokative, Turns Out Ultra-Violent Gore. The ideas behind 15 minutes aren't bad at all. Take one Robert DeNiro, put him in New York, mix him with some American-dream hunting Eastern Europeans on a killing spree, and try to provoke some emotions, and have a sly dig at the American justice system. Lets see...nothing happened...only repulse.If, like everyone else, you plan on watching this film because DeNiro is in it, you will be dissapointed. He puts in a tired performance, almost as if he knows the film is a load of B.S. The attempt to be hard-hitting goes horribly wrong, instead it's just repulsive over the top violence, and its pointless...naked prostitute gets hacked to pieces, why? There are ways to create provoking films with such violence but they have to have meaning, such as 8mm (the horrible subject of snuff movies, hard-hitting meaningfull film), 15 minutes is far from meaningfull. We all know there are some deranged psychopaths out there doing just that, but when converting it to a film, it needs a deeper meaning, otherwise it turns into melodramatic Hollywood [...].If you like brain-dead gore and violence, lack of plot and cringing melodrama. Go ahead
Don't Buy This Widescreen Edition!. Don't buy the widescreen edition of this dvd!!  I purchased the 'full frame' version of this movie a few years ago and recently discovered the 'widescreen' version and bought it right away.  As it turns out, this 'widescreen' version is actually just the full frame version with the top and bottom completely cut off to make it widescreen.  There is no difference between the widescreen and full frame version dvd's except the widescreen has the top and bottom cut off.  Get the 'full screen' version instead
What Were They Thinking?. Man, I don't know what the other reviewers of this movie were smoking, but it should be illegal!  This is, first off, a terrible DVD: 4:3 (full screen) format, with a dark, muddy picture.  Worse, the plot is typical, predictable, and poorly written.  Other than looking for glimpses of Teri Hatcher's body, sitting through this fiasco is a total bore.  I was also surprised at how bad Teri's acting was in this movie, since I've seen her do much better in things she was in previous to this.  That is probably the fault of the director, Erik Anjou, a third-rate director (at best!) who has done a total of two movies and one documentary.  Gee, I wonder why he isn't in more demand (NOT!)!I can enjoy "B" movies, and bad movies, but this one is just so totally non-involving that it is not even good enough to laugh at.  I can't imagine that this mess was released on DVD for any reason other than to cash in on Teri Hatcher's current popularity, and to suck the cash out of people who are anxious to see a younger (29 year-old) Teri Hatcher nude.Rent this, if you must, but, wow, there is no reason anyone should want to buy a movie this bad
WHO'S THAT KNOCKING IN THE WOODS. THE TOMMYKNOCKERS is one of the more unsuccessful of Stephen King adaptations to hit the screen.  Originally a 1993 tv miniseries, the movie suffers from lackluster direction, mediocre performances and no sense of true suspense or horror.  Typically set in a homey little New England town, the plot centers on the discovery of a mysterious object in the woods by a local writer (Marg Helgenberger) who along with her alcoholic poet boyfriend(a poorly cast Jimmy Smits) decides to keep it a secret until the whole thing is unearthed.  Meanwhile, a ghostly green light emits from the object, causing the townspeople to go bonkers in one form or another, whether it be by inventing stupid gadgets or wandering around with glowing green eyes.  At three hours, THE TOMMYKNOCKERS definitely overstays its welcome and that is one problem in watching a miniseries in one take; it can become redundant.  Tighter direction and a more focused cast could have helped but aside from John Ashton, EG Marshall and Joanna Cassidy in supporting roles, most of the performances seem phone in, and Traci Lords is ridiculously hilarious as the postal slut.  A real misfire
Off the Formula But Still Disappointing. The Rebel-With-A-Heart-of-Gold-Who-Learns-The-Meaning-Of-Love scenario is put aside for a kind of soft spoof of spy pictures, which were very popular in the movies and on TV at that time. The &quot;European&quot; setting got  Elvis off the beach and away from the resorts but the script and direction  were basic, to say the least, and the music was uninspired and badly mixed  on record. The movie does have one of Presley's best set of opening  productiom numbers: &quot;Long Legged Girl..&quot; and others are rousing  tunes delivered with that Presley panache often missing from his late-'60s  efforts. But about 20 minutes into the picture even the most ardent fan  reaches for a magazine. An interesting sidelight is that his co-star was a  true &quot;discovery&quot; - an English teenager making her screen debut  with Elvis Presley! She handles the light-hearted assignment very well  indeed - even the &quot;Old MacDonald&quot; sequence which usually is  reprised on documentaries as a typically ludicrous excuse for a soundtrack  album cut
Not for normal people. I thought my 2 and 4 year old sons could learn a few things about table manners by watching this video.  It turns out that this video is only about eating in extremely formal situations.  It tells which of your 5 forks to use first and how sorbet is used to cleanse your pallet between courses. Good if you are eating with the president, not good for the average family who would like to improve kids' manners
A Disappointment. First of all, I am a Joy Division and New Order fan; therefore, I tried to like this.  Really, I did.Sadly, this film stinks.  The focus is not on the bands themselves, but on the obnoxious character known as Tony Wilson.  What a monster!  Either it was the actor's depiction or he does truly have a horrid personality in real life.Maybe I'm not British, but I did not find 24 Hour Party People to be very funny.  Only a few scenes made me grin.  The randomness added very little to the overall quality of the film.In addition, the camera work was very jerky.  Looked like it was done by a novice (and yes, I'm one myself, having made two movies)The only redeeming aspect has to be the scenes with Joy Division.  Too bad the members of this band are minor characters.  I can only hope that the biopic of Ian Curtis currently in production will be much, much better
New York stock trader to messenger?. I don't think so.  Contrived movie with a little cycling thrown in to make up for a poor script.  Think about it: take a dump on a stock and get wiped out; now you are a messenger?  I do not think so.  I know of a few New York Stock Exchange brokers who blew themselves up on trades, but this is crazy.  Thank goodness they kept the New York scenes to a minimum.  Yes, he was suppose to be at the NYSE and not the Pacific Stock Exchange as a previous reviewer wrote
AMAZON SUCKS. I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!
Please not another season of this!. Ok so I have always thought Courteney Cox should not be allowed on screen due to lack of acting talent and this show just proves it. It really is the most boring show Ive seen in a long time. If you thought she was bad in scream...and friends..dont watch this...there are other actors in this show who do redeem it somewhat but could never save it. Hopefully this show will be scraped
Beware of Unbox!!!. Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for
Survivor Rip Off. I have bought 2 seasons of Survivor on unbox and both of them are not complete. Very dissapointing. Guatemala  episode 11 is from a completely different season and it is missing the last 2 episodes and the reunion show. Just leaves you hanging. Exile Island is missing the final episode it just goes from the competition between Danielle and Cirie for a spot in the final 3 to the live reunion show
Lame. Two problems.First problem.  Let's say you're the typical kidnapper-rapist-killer.  For fun and out of postmodern boredom, you kidnap two girls off the street in New York City.  What are the odds that your randomly-chosen getaway and killing spot is going to be exactly where one of the girls lives, 60 or 70 miles away?  One in ten million?  Twenty million?Second problem.  The movie, even with a run time of an otherwise-short 84 minutes, doesn't have enough action or development to fill the void.  In short, it's boring, and in several scenes where Craven seems more interested in the bucolic Wechester County scenery than moving the plot along, I found myself reaching for the fast-forward
it was egh. I gave it two stars because while I didn't hate it, it was dull and predictable.  I see beter plots on TV's Starsky and Hutch.  It probably wouldn't have been so bad if I didn't have to use subtitles; I found myself more interested in looking at the text than watching the movie.  I know, that's only my opinion, but I watch a lot of DVD's and I think I know what I like and don't like
Really awful!!! Rankin Bass needs to hire good singers. This is the worst holiday movie in America! I mean if you buy this product you'll face torture (as in singing horribly.) Making friends as the movie says is not the most important thing in the world in my belief. They also said that "If you want, wish for fairy tales and it will come true." Right. Some fairy tales are gruesome (for example this one fairy tale is so gruesome because it has fairies heads cut off.) Eeww! The voice talents are very annoying. Better save your money when you buy a christmas movie
boring chick flick. there is no actualy snowboarding or skiing, its a boring chick flick with a ranting sissy main characte
Not worth seeing. George Segal is a good actor, but he is out of his element in this type of movie.  He is much better in light-hearted movies like "Fun With Dick and Jane."The biggest disappointment is the dialog by Harold Pinter.  The characters exchange meaningless small talk at cross purposes while nothing happens, and we all get bored.This spy movie is not even in the same league with "Day of the Jackel" and "The Odessa File."I threw away my copy of "The Quiller Memorandum" after watching it once.  I can't imagine ever wanting to see it again
Don't bother with this one!. First of all I'm a Sherlock Holmes fan and have a hard time with some of the parodies.  I am also a big fan of Gene Wilder, Madeline Kahn and Marty Feldman, the three stars in this film.  These three were great in Mel Brook's "Young Frankenstein" which is one of the all time best parodies.  They fall flat on this film and I would not waste my time.  A definite no, no
Movie great, DVD substandard. The sound on this DVD is absolutely horrible.  The dialogue is at a much lower volume than the music and sound effects, making it impossible to view without constantly tinkering.  I also have the VHS, on which the sound is perfect, so I can still watch this wonderful movie.  But I would sure like to get my money back for the DVD
Good supporting cast, lead man is lost. Other reviewers who detail the silly political-correctness and faux-politics are right... This is Clancy-for-dummies.  Ford's Jack Ryan was sometimes a step behind, but in a believable way.  The audience was right beside Ryan, and when he put 2 and 2 together and took action, boy, did he take action.  Ben Affleck's Jack Ryan is terminally lost, pouting and confused while the audience waits for him to figure things out and do something productive (or at least interesting?).  This is going to go down as the "Star Wars Prequel" of Clancy movies--the one you try to forget exists as part of the saga you love.
One Word - Depressing!!!!!!!!. This movie I think was just plain depressing! Just when you think something good and happy will happen, someone dies, people seperate, bones are broken, so on and so forth. This movie got alot of great reviews, and it was a fun movie, but for people who like complete happy endings, this film is not for you.
Offensive. This is one of the most offensive and anti-gay movies I have ever seen.  Don't let the title or the box fool you.  Every character in this movie is oozing with homophobic sentiment.  I was shocked that such a film could come out of France.  If you're a homophobe and want to sit and watch a bunch of hateful people sit around and attack and harass (verbally and physically) a man who pretends to be gay to save his job, then rent this and snack on a can of worms.HIDEOUS
Enjoyable At Some Parts But Just Plain Stupid In Others. What i mean by the title of my review is yes this movie is going to be funny its Monty Python! but there is also some parts where it just really gets out of hand in my mind. If you are new to Monty Python I would get the quest for the holy grail before this one. Also the Monty Python's Flying Circus is great too. It comes in a 16 DVD set so it will give you a lot of their old stuff. I really did not enjoy certain parts. But there is a few good moments.
Please do not watch. This is one of the worst movies that I have ever seen in my life.  If you are expecting another classic like "Anchorman" watch another movie.  I was terribly dissapointed with Will Ferrell.  DO NOT WATCH THIS MOVIE
Being a French filmmaker only gets you so far.... This film is pure c..p.  For many years, there has been explicit sex used in many mainstream European films.  It is no longer the novelty it once was.  There is a point where you don't care about the sex, and you just wonder whether the film is any good.  So, yes, there are explicit sex scenes here, but that's it.  If you like porn, I would actually recommend watching something different, because the filmmakers here are trying to make us think that this is an important film.  It isn't.  You're better off looking at porn.  Baise Moi (roughly translated means "rape me") looks cheap (shot on DV), and it's a poor man's Thelma and Louise, with some John Woo style shootouts thrown in.  The film isn't intelligent or innovative in the least.  It is actually incredibly boring and feels like a 3 hour film, despite the fact it's only 73 minutes long.  If you want to see intelligent, thoughtful filmmaking on sexual matters, rent and/or buy Catherine Breillat's films.  Her films are far superior to this trash.
Dont get "Fiji" final week ... Dont dwnld " Survivor, "Thunderstorms & Sacrifice" ". Its my fault for not reading the whole thing. you would think that the last episode would be the finale , but NO, its just a 10 minute recap going to the finale 4. I didnt even get a full 45 minute episode. No finale. I got rippped off. $1.99 dwnld not well spent. Dont bother dwnldng any episode of fiji if you dont know the ending. Because they dont have that episode, not even the reunion show
Favorite ALICE, Lackluster DVD. This is my favorite production of the ALICE books.  I love the sets, songs, and casting. It's also very British, which I think adds another great element to the mix.However, skip this DVD edition.  I got it, excited to see ALICE'S ADVENTURES IN WONDERLAND in widescreen and, perhaps a better print than what's previously been available.No such luck.The DVD appears to be struck from the same crappy VHS version that's been out there for ages.  Faded colors. Pan-and-scan. In this age of DVD, quality like this is such a shame
Lacking of the facts. Don't let a propoganda wheel fool you of the truth1. The Miami Herald gained access to all Florida ballots and did their own recount, at their own time --- who won? BUSH! ----- http://www.usatoday.com/news/washington/2001-04-03-floridamain.htm2. There is a case that African American voters were turned away - however, where is the same case for the many Haitan American voters who were also turned away in droves, who are known to be sympathetic towards Republican causesThe filmmakers had a chance to make a point about voter rights and election problems - they turned this to an attack against President Bush and Republicans insteadSadly, their message will only be heard by Bush-haters, instead of the world, because of their decisio
Disappointed. This will only please the most ardent vampire fans.  Why?  It's exceedinly poorly written.  I figured when I watched it it would either be a decent movie or so bad that it wouldn't matter.  Sadly it was neither.  Don't get me wrong, it was bad, but in all of the wrong ways.  For example the writing, plot dialog, character development is basically not there...well they are they're just about as interesting as chalk.  Unfortunately the acting's not bad.  This results in what must be the worst kind of bad movie.  You can't laugh at the bad dialog because it isn't bad enough, it's just flat.  And you can't laugh at the poor acting because for the most part it's acceptable.  It's got gore and blood, but it isn't the least bit scary.  In general my accessment is it is bad in the most painfully mediocre and forgetable way.if you want sexy evil wait for the remake of Amityville Horror to be released.  Ryan Reynolds may not play a vampire, but that movie had more development in it's credits than this had in it's entirety
senseless and absurd. sorry, can't finish this garbage movie. is this girl retarded  or what? watching her father been killed in cold blood and got no feeling or emotion at all. how and why the garbage collecting, turned cow feeder young guy, would then have turned into a cold blood stone cold killer? there's no enough logic and explanation why he would have turned into a psychopath. the girl didn't look a bit retarded but acted and behaved like one is also a not quite well developed character. the whole movie just looked too deadbeat and senseless. what? life was too boring then what? started becoming natural born killer? give me a break. bone chilling? you can always say that again, but won't make me care a bit more.
Dont get "Fiji" final week ... Dont dwnld " Survivor, "Thunderstorms & Sacrifice" ". Its my fault for not reading the whole thing. you would think that the last episode would be the finale , but NO, its just a 10 minute recap going to the finale 4. I didnt even get a full 45 minute episode. No finale. I got rippped off. $1.99 dwnld not well spent. Dont bother dwnldng any episode of fiji if you dont know the ending. Because they dont have that episode, not even the reunion show
UnBox video not yet working. Will not play once video was downloaded. I get the error message:  "can not play file, please try again later. error# 0x80040273" I made the exlusive give me call me back feature but the UnBox department was already closed, I was told the UnBox Saturday and Sunday 6-5 hours. I have to say I am impressed with the Call back feature. I downloaded the Unbox Beta now and am recieving email assistance to try to resolve the problem. Thanks Amazon UnBox! I will Update again - Feb. 10,200
could not be viewed!. i downloaded it and i couldn't view the video paste the intro. then i RE-downloaded it thinking that maybe it was a corrupt file, but it again it only had sound and not video. this one is a waste of money
could not be viewed!. i downloaded it and i couldn't view the video paste the intro. then i RE-downloaded it thinking that maybe it was a corrupt file, but it again it only had sound and not video. this one is a waste of money
Star Trek:  City on the Edge of Forever. My favorite show of the Trek series but there's no way I'd buy another individual program from Amazon.  It will ONLY play on their downloaded player ...won't burn to DVD so can't play it on my television.  Don't bother buying this ...just go for the Trek collection on DVD
Weak script, poor performance.... Well, nice cinematography as set-designer work: nicely interiors and well dressed actors. Maybe, visually it is enough to keep you watching this movie once, but not enough to consider it as a remarkable  movie of year, as other reviewers trying to assure
GREAT HORSES!!!!. Movie is horrible but horses are FABULOUS!  This is some of the best footage of the fabled Andalusian Horses I've ever seen - if there's more out there somebody please let me know!  Bought the movie just to see the horses
Definitely NOT a comedy but... It's an interesting approach at what people will do for money. Still, I hated it. John Travolta was terrible [as usual]. Lisa Kudrow, who was the reason I watched this, was so incredibly unlike her role on "Friends" as she was a murderous goldigging nympho-biatch who made you mad every time she was on screen. I was very disappointed with her performance. I can't believe this hilarious comedic actress went for such a ... part. The other supporting actors were no good either with the exception of Bill Pullman, who was pretty funny as the "I could give a damn about it" cop. The best thing about this movie though, is the cute, gullible waitress named Wendy who's only on screen about five minutes throughout the entire film. Anyway, skip this one. It was just plain awful
Poor support. This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet
Attack of the Mutant Flies. The script outrageously lifts the opening set up from &quot; The Big Chill&quot; until the swarm of mutant flies shows up and attacks the cast. Thats right MUTANT FLIES! The problem is that flies are not scary at all they do not have the shriek factor of spiders, scorpions or roaches. The terrible CGI effects do not help- there are a couple of effective suspense moments-but most of the action takes place in daylight which deminishes the scare factor
waste of money. Dont purchase episode 5 of season 2, it's 7 minutes long and you dont get any of the Charlie Murphy Prince story.  WTF!!!  Can someone fix this and refund or offer the entire episode for re-download!!!
Aaron Kwok gives a great performance in this silly cop movie. Kwok is on fire in this movie with maybe his best physical performance ever. He looks like a pop star but his acting is actually very good. Unfortunately, his performance is completely wasted in a movie this bad. I won't explain the story, it is cops vs. drug dealers. There is a beautiful fighting female, good car chases, big name stars, and good fights. How did this movie go wrong? Well, Stanley Tong is a decent director, but he is a stuntman, screen fighter, and martial arts choreographer at heart. He tries to make this an American movie but he disregards everything that gives feeling to movies. I cracked a smile more than a few times but this is the most mindless modern day film I have seen in a long time. Usually, I am able to get past all of this since I am a sucker for good fight scenes, and this movie does have a few. Highlights to watch for are Ken Lo vs. Marc Dacoscos and Dacoscos vs. everyone in the final fight. The thing that ruins this movie is that the real final fight never finishes, but instead it moves on to a totally ridiculous fight to finish off the movie. 'Cradle to the Grave' has a better end fight! Stanley Tong must have been out of his mind because in the finale, Coolio ends up as the main opponent. Not Ken Lo who is the leg fighter that faces Jackie Chan at the end of 'Drunken Master 2', and not Marc Dacoscos who is one of the very best modern day martial arts actors, but Coolio.I honestly thought this was a good cheesy movie, but the final fight sequence is just horrible. Stanley Tong comes up with a great idea having the actors fighting on a huge piece of glass hundreds of feet in the air and they have to keep their balance while they fight. It is just too bad Coolio had to ruin it. 2.5/5DVD from Dimension Home Video has good sound and picture quality. No special features except the outtakes in the credits which was a much more satisfying end to the movie.
Not so much a horror movie per say.... This movie is more dark comedy and trippy foreign bizarrovision film than dyed-in-the-wool Zombie Fest.If you were like me, who isn't well versed in the foreign horror movie scene, this movie was entertaining, but not what I'd consider something I'd add to the library (thanks NetFlix).One thing I've found with Italian horror movies.....they spend alot of effort on visual trippery, seems they want every Italian movie to be an art film, and this is no exception (same goes for the Argento films of the past).  Its not a bad thing, just a distinctive style that you either buy into, or you do not.  An awful lot of strange things happen for no real apparrant reason :)  A little bit of sex (again, in that erotic italian artsy style), a bumbling mentally retarded sidekick, and a whole lot of strange, implausable things happening.  And then eventually, the movie ends.The story is definately more love story / dark comedy..its entertaining, has a few minutes of zombie suspense but its almost wrong to call this a horror film, because its really not.
I've seen better. I was somewhat entertained watching this movie, John Travolta made it more interesting that it would have without him. However, it did not really impress me very much. It's the kind of movie to see only once, it's definetely not a collector's item.
Feedback from Real Apache "Calculus Wiz". I saw a few scenes and couldn't even continue watching.  I like a lot of Charles Bronson's movies.  Examples include "Death Hunt," the 80s "Death Wish" series, and "the White Buffalo."  But his acting in this movie is unrealistic.  He does not act like a real Apache.  Bronson seems to overdo it on being "stoic."  A relative and I watched a few scenes and just switched channels.  Bronson is out of his element in trying to portray a real Apache.  Paul Newman does a much more realistic job when he portrays an Apache-raised white man in "Hombre," which I purchased on Amazon.  I do applaud Bronson in trying to portray a movie more sympathetic to the plight of the Apaches trying to avoid reservation confinement in the 1880s.  Given the time period, perhaps Bronson should have hired Roman Gabriel instead.  He does a realistic job of portraying a Cherokee Indian in the "Undefeated," which was also released around the same time (give or take a couple of years)
Land of Oprahisms. Having avoided seeing this film, I found that the mistake of sending my partner to the rental store on his on, brought "Tuesday..."unbiden into our home.My aversion to Oprah and her ilk, does not cloud my dislike of this film. A bad film is a bad film.Devoid of any real plot and hampered by some very poor acting on the part of all concerned, and directionless directing, this film should not be seen by anyone who values the aforementioned,To me a reasonable premise should move a story forward. Something should occur, my interest should be engaged. This film takes reams of pre-packaged aphorisms and greeting card verses, and attempts to build the plot from words alone. It is as if someone picked up the telephone book and said, "Hey,this book is full of words, lets make a movie."In a way a movie about the different lives of those listed in the telephone book would be more interesting.To be honest, Jack Lemmon was not very good in this film. He played the same character he always did. Just older. Hank Azaria was just awful. He talked as if his mouth was filled with stones, and was wooden and expressionless. Maybe he was too embarrased to be there. As to the other actor's; well they filled up the space nicely.The look of the film was cheap and of the movie of the week quality. The sprayed on snow in a winter scene looked as fake as it was. They even covered the green leaves on the trees. Some better acting, some good R rated dialogue, and maybe some nudity would have spiced up this film. As it stands,however, it will only be of interest to fans of Oprah and Dr.Phil, etc. The purveyors of our national state of pity and feeling soory for ourselves.It is seldom that we find car keys under our chairs, but films such as this perpetuate the myth that a few nice phrases, a good cry, and a genial talk-show presenter will somehow make it all better.I,for one, think that a nice cuppa is more beneficial. Then pull the finger out, and just get on with it.(To the grammar and form police: I did have this in paragraphs, but the editing process scrunched it all together. Sorry
DVD PUT IT ON DVD. I DONT WONT TO DOWNLOAD IT I WONT IT ALL ON DVD THIS IS WASTE MONE
Pale reflection of the 1932 Original. I saw this movie on T.V. a few years ago, and since then I have bought the original Tarzan MGM movies.  This version is a pale reflection of the 1932 film.  There is no smouldering chemistry between Bo Derek and Miles O'Keeffe.  Her character moves from being an overly confident heiress to a bumbling, blushing little schoolgirl who is in a tizzy over Tarzan's "Innocent/Natural/Virgin" state. Her father, James Parker (Richard Harris) is portrayed as an outspoken, vulgar,sex crazed expatriate obsessed with the elephants' graveyard and any female he can find. O'Keeffe's gives a "wooden" performance as Tarzan.Three Chimpanzees and a lone Orangutan follows the "Lord of the Apes". If you are looking for a great performance by legends in the business, check out the b/w originals which for all their flaws, have lasted for decades.  If you just want to gape at Bo Derek half naked, this is the movie for you.
Not happy. This is only a portion of this episode.  It cuts off in the middle of a sentence
Missing episodes. This series is being sold with missing episodes, like many others here in Unbox. Do they think their customers are so dumb? Would you buy a DVD series with a missing DVD? What sense does this make? What a disappointment this service is..
Defective Filmmaking. Willy Wonka meets Dr. Strangelove in this one-of-a-kind cinematic disaster. Barry Levinson's longtime "dream project" emerges as a garish nightmare. The impressive production design wears out its welcome after five minutes while a talented cast sinks in the big-budget quagmire. Another unfilmable concept that somehow received the Hollywood green light
waste of money. Dont purchase episode 5 of season 2, it's 7 minutes long and you dont get any of the Charlie Murphy Prince story.  WTF!!!  Can someone fix this and refund or offer the entire episode for re-download!!!
My Own Personal Hell. This is the first time I delved into the HellRaiser series, and I have to admit, I kind of regret it. The film opens with a collage of disturbing images, I guess to get my attention, but there is no real reason for them to be there. From there the film falls into a freefall where it jumps from one messed up scene to the next. It all looks perfectly twisted, but who really cares. Clive Barker, as he did in "Night Breed," shows his taste for creative costumes and set designs. Of course they are all very self-indulgent, but beautiful nonetheless in their own little way. Had this film showed up at a modern art museum I would have labeled it pretentious. But since it showed up in movie theaters I have no choice but to label it crap.I would love to describe the plot to you, but it didn't make a ton of sense to me. Kirsty (Ashley Laurence) is in a mental hospital and is convinced that her dad is calling out to her from inside hell, and thus she must go save him. Meanwhile her evil step-mom (and speaking from experience they are all evil) is reemerging from hell with the distinct disadvantage of not having any skin. Upon her return she uses her bloody pulp of a body to engage in a sexual act with another evil doer. I'm sure that gets laughs every time from the children who are watching, but to me it was silly and unnecessary. She goes on a quest for skin which goes off without a hitch, and from there a battle ensues between Kirsty and her step-mom over the soul of a little girl named Tiffany (or so everybody calls her). The whole point seems to be that our minds make up our own personal hells, and that is an idea I can get on board with. One overview shot of hell has it looking strikingly similar to an M.C. Escher print. With dead ends and trap doors and boogeymen we all travel through the labyrinth of our mind on a daily basis. But I cannot get on board with this film. It is sensational for the sake of sensationalism, which is fine with me, but not when it is mixed with a brain dead plot. What do I, or anybody for that matter, get from watching a man carve himself up with a knife? I guess that at least it is not soft like modern horror movies, but this one does not earn its gore.For those of you who demand nothing out of your movies other than the experience of a bad dream where nothing makes sense then this is your film. For the rest of you this is failed storytelling of the highest degree. I still have "HellRaiser" on my shelf to watch and I must say it won't be hard for that one to top this mess. I may never understand why people think atmosphere is enough to create a scary movie. It is the major flaw of this film and Japanese Horror in general, but I want a story to go with my scares. What this one is selling is a chance to be grossed out of your mind or bored stiff. . .or both. I hated this movie, and no I don't care how realistic it looked when the characters were peeling the skin off of their faces. *1/2
A vain attempt. Like my title suggests this movie is a vain attempt to take credit from the first movie to sell sub-par music to a new generation of viewers.  The first Heavy Metal obviously had some thought put into the scenes and the pace of the story line.  The artistry was phenomanal in the first movie, much better than the mish mosh of computer graphics and hand drawn animation in Heavy Metal 2000.  The first movie made sure the music reinforced and enhanced whatever scene was being played, the second, well the music really did not add much if anything at all the movie.  To sum up...boring plot, no imagination, and a sound track to not die for.  My advice?  Use the DVD as a coaster and read a good Frank Herbert novel instead
Boring!. After reading so many rave reviews, I decided to buy this video. I  owe many, many workout videos and this is the most boring by far. I have never been able to complete it. Very dissapointing!
Hard to Find DVD. This romantic comedy was charming, funny, and clever. I recommend it to anyone who doesn't have a problem with heavy British accents. (If you do, try it with captions). It was fun, funny, and a nice pick-me-up when one needs a lift
Considering when it was made, not too bad a movie. This was undoubtedly a propaganda film, but if one remembers when it was made and makes the necessary allowances, it's not bad a bad movie.  And it's not totally agitprop.  There is no doubt, for e.g., that Americans who  participated in the Doolittle raid and were subsequently captured alive by  the Japanese were brutally murdered.  But  some of the incidents allegedly  taking place are unnecessarily absurd.  For instance, the announcement that  Corregidor had fallen resulted in Japanese officers in the courtroom  slashing at each other with swords like a bunch of pre-pubescent children,  and an American boxer actually defeated a judo expert -- sheer nonsense.   	 The movie centers on the concept that the Japanese didn't know where the  B-25's came from, and the Americans' steady refusal to tell them.  In  actuality, the Japanese were well aware of the approaching task force and  its makeup... 	One has to realize, while watching, that this movie was  made when the mood in the country was gloomy.  Japan had staged a wide  blitz in the Pacific and had smashed easily through all opposition.  We  were frightened.  If you keep that in mind, and can make allowances for the  obvious misinformation, the performances are good and the movie fun to  watch
The Legend Exceeds The Reality. I have always been an avid fan of Westerns in general, and Charlton Heston in particular, but this is one of those movies where the legend surrounding it far exceeds the actual viewing, even allowing for its having been butchered by the studiosCharlton Heston of course, plays Major Dundee, a man with a very forceful character - resolute, determined, and even rebellious ("invading" Mexico and attacking the French army).  For such a man to later be found as a hopeless drunk wallowing in the gutters of Durango is thoroughly incomprehensible.The purpose of the "invasion" of Mexico is to capture or destroy the Apache Indian, Charriba, so one would expect the audience to watch the movie in anticipation of a great climax when the two sides finally meet.  When they do meet however, the action is over in less than a minute, and Charriba is simply shot by Michael Anderson Jnr.  So the climax is, in my view, an anti-climax.We are then presented with a new climax, when Dundee and his men have to defeat the French army in order to get back across the Rio Grande.  Although this encounter is a lot more exciting than the one with the Apaches, the overall effect, as far as I am concerned, is rather like the effect one gets when reading a murder mystery to discover that the murderer is somebody who only entered in the final pages (and the scene where a wounded Richard Harris single-handedly takes on the other half of the French army is so unexpected in view of what has gone on before, as to be virtually unbelieveable).With regard to the movie having been heavily cut by the studios, I would suggest that if any cuts had to be made, they should have cut the Durango scenes entirely, plus all of the scenes featuring Senta Berger.  Romance only slows down the action and adds nothing to the story, whilst too much romance leads to boredom.Finally, having watched the movie with the new score first, and then with the original score, I have to say that I preferred the original.The movie opens with Charriba saying to an upside down strung-up soldier, "Who are you going to send after me now?"  The original then has the opening title, "Major Dundee," accompanied by the Mitch Miller Sing Along Gang singing the Major Dundee March.  To me this is a much more stirring and rousing score than the new replacement, and sets the scene for what one hopes will be an exciting movie.By all means buy this dvd as a piece of movie history, and as part of either a Charlton Heston or Sam Peckinpah collection (even though Peckinpah disowned it), but for my money don't expect a Western anything like as great as the likes of The Big Country, The Magnificent Seven, or How The West Was Won.
A stellar book, a disappointing movie. My boys and I read "My Side of the Mountain" together for our homeschooling lessons. I can't tell you how much we loved the book! Jean Craighhead-George does a remarkable job of taking the reader deep into the wilderness of the Catskills, complete with reference to Washington Irving's Rip VanWinkle. We were delighted by each and every page.Why in the world any screen write would change such a marvelous creation is beyond me! The movie wasn't even close to the novel, and we felt like it was a complete waste of time to watch. I can only wonder what the book's author must have felt watching a washed and clearly faded rendition of her creation. She must have been deeply disappointed.The book itself would make a wonderful screenplay all its own. We truly hope that someone will resurrect the story and put it on the screen in all its glory. Until then, this movie is not it! Save your money; buy the book!
Paris When It Fizzles. In 1964 when this movie came out in the theaters the reviews it got were not good.  I was 14 at the time and remember my mother reading about it in the newspaper, and the headline for this movie was "Paris When It Fizzles."  There was little chemistry between Hepburn and Holden.  When I finally saw the movie.  They were right.  I simply like both actors, mainly because I liked them in "Sabrina" but, like the critics said; it fizzled
waste of money. Dont purchase episode 5 of season 2, it's 7 minutes long and you dont get any of the Charlie Murphy Prince story.  WTF!!!  Can someone fix this and refund or offer the entire episode for re-download!!!
Good Movie for under $3.00. I must say, this isn't the best of Ralph Bakshi. I bet the soundtrack would be worth more then the movie. There is some great songs, however there is no PLOT, there is no Reasoning, and there is no Action. Like Always, great animation by Bakshi, but I know for sure the Bakshi's team could had really done better. 5 stars for the music, 2 stars for the film. I wasn't upset for spending the 3 dollars
AMAZON SUCKS. I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!
could not be viewed!. i downloaded it and i couldn't view the video paste the intro. then i RE-downloaded it thinking that maybe it was a corrupt file, but it again it only had sound and not video. this one is a waste of money
Beware of Unbox!!!. Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for
A poor man's "Dick". I'm sorry, but this movie is clearly nothing more than and overdramaticized and historically inaccurate retelling of the story much more riotiously and enjoyably portrayed in the film "Dick." "Dick" is funny, this is not. I'm sorry, but Dustin Hoffman simply does not have the acting chops to stand up to someone like Kirsten Dunst (or that level of indefatigable cuteness).Just go rent "Dick" instead. You'll thank me, yourself, and those fine ladies who saved our country
The Lisbon Suicides. Therese, Lux, Mary, Bonnie and Cecilia make up the five Lisbon girls, ages 13, 14, 15, 16 and 17. Cecilia, the youngest, lives in her sisters shadows because they are all older and of much more interest to their male neighbors. As a cry for help, she slits her wrists and lays down in the bathtub, she survived the incident. After a psychiatrist highly impresses upon the strict Mr. and Mrs. Lisbon that it would be benificial for Cecilia to be exposed to environments which have boys her own age, Mr. and Mrs. Lisbon decide to allow the girls to throw the one and only Lisbon party. Some of the neighborhood's boys are invited over and while the party is in session, Cecilia is pretty inanimate, sitting on the couch while her sisters flirt, talk and laugh. Midway through the party, Cecilia asks to be excused and Mrs. Lisbon - though somewhat reluctantly - allows it. Cecilia goes up to her room (on the second floor of a two-story house) and jumps out the window, landing on the spiked fence on the front lawn of the Lisbon house. In this way, Cecilia Lisbon commited suicide. Only four girls remain.The act which Cecilia committed did not go at all unnoticed. The father saw her immediately, the party ended there and all of the boys went home rather glum. Four of the Lisbon's neighbors, four young boys, suffered a rapidly growing obsession with the Lisbon girls, who were beautiful and a total mystery to the outside world. They got hold of Cecilia's diary and tried to explain why she committed suicide. The eldest decided Cecilia was a dreamer, and she did not think she would fall when she jumped out her window, she thought she would fly.With their youngest sister gone, the remaining Lisbon girls grow closer to each other, stranding themselves further from the outside world. When school starts again, they attempt to go on acting as if nothing happened, not ever mentioning their youngest sister. The run-of-the-mill awkward act is taken part by the rest of the school however. The usual profuse apology to the mention of the word "death" and the like.Trip Fontaine is the most popular guy in school, the object of desire to all of the girls at school... Except for the Lisbon girls, which is of no importance to Trip until he sets eyes on Lux. Trip cannot help but be enchanted by her flawless beauty. In the beginning, he is unsuccessful in his quest to even catch her attention for she bluntly shows she's not interested. But after his consistent courtship, Lux falls for his charming ways. Trip then attempts to convince Mr. Lisbon to let him and three of his football team pals take the Lisbon daughters to Homecoming. After Mr. Lisbon talks to his wife, he agrees to Trip's request, knowing nothing but Trip's sincerity and claimed honorable intentions, on the understanding that Trip have all of the Lisbon girls returned to the house by curfew.After Trip explains the situation to his football peers, he gives in to those who bribe him the most handsomely. Meanwhile, the Lisbon girls are picking out fabric for the dresses they shall wear to the Homecoming Dance. Though one pattern is used for all four dresses, each dress looks unique when concentrating on detail. Once they pick up the girls, they stop midway to the Homecoming in order to smoke, Lux being the only girl volunteering to smoke.They then drive to the dance. Trip and Lux sneak away and sneak swallows of alcohol. Another one of the Lisbon sisters and her date follow, but leave soon afterwards, not being as wild nor daring as Trip and Lux. At the time they all decided to meet back at the car so they could make the girls curfew, they are all there... Except for Trip and Lux, who at that time were alone in the middle of the football stadium field. Deciding they must make their own curfews, Therese, Bonnie, Mary and their dates leave without them. After fooling around, the intoxicated Trip and Lux fall asleep in the middle of the football stadium. Trip awakens in the middle of the night and leaves Lux there alone. When Lux wakes up early the next morning she is confused as to why Trip is not there. She takes a taxi home and her parents were worried sick (of course). But they take measures as far as pulling the girls out of school and stranding them inside the Lisbon residence.The girls, in a desperate attempt to hold onto a connection to the outside world, begin using morse code to interact with the four boys who so closely follow their lives. One of which boys lived across the street and the rest which came over daily after this in order to contact the girls. Soon following, the boys begin talking to the Lisbon girls via phone. One day, the girls invite the boys to come over once Mr. and Mrs. Lisbon are asleep. The plan being that the boys were to drive the girls somewhere, the boys hastily agree. They sneak over and Lux invites them to wait inside for her sisters and Lux goes to wait in the car. The boys wander down to the basement while waiting for Therese, Bonnie and Mary, verbally expressing their hopes for the night. But then they realize they have stumbled upon one of the sisters. She had hung herself. The boys, scared to death, run all the way home. Time passed, things changed, girls came and went... But no matter what, those four boys NEVER forgot the Lisbon suicides.Ultimately, the movie was nothing short of queer. When trying to sum up the story in a few lines (such as "Follow the lives of the Lisbon sisters and how they connect to their neighbors. A story full of obsession, gossip, lust, love, desire and isolation.") the story sounds quite unique and intriguing, but the story fell short of that for me personally. Partly because the Lisbon sisters really committed suicide for a reason not much deeper than isolation. The movie, in places, is also extremely flawed. I do not believe Mr. and Mrs. Lisbon could've removed their daughters from school for so long without their daughters being taken from them by social services. In many parts of the movie, they should've used upbeat music to fill the deafening silences. The whole movie was filmed in a style that I can truthfully say makes me rather bored. I would only suggest this film to, perhaps, people who like movies such as "Elizabethtown" which Kirsten Dunst is also in. But I personally disliked this movie which was not very tasteful and will not be watching it again in the future
contrived, implausible crime drama. "Four Brothers" is yet another nail in the coffin of John Singleton's increasingly moribund moviemaking career.  The director - who burst upon the scene in 1991 with the vibrant and gritty "Boyz n the Hood" - has here mounted a film so burdened by implausibility and contrivance that it makes one wonder if the once-promising filmmaker will ever be able to get back on track again.  The story, reeking of artificiality, features Mark Wahlberg, Tyrese Gibson, Andre Benjamin and Garrett Hedlund as four troubled young men raised by the same foster mother.  When she is killed in a convenience store robbery, the quartet launches into action, seeking revenge against the perpetrators and becoming slowly convinced, through their investigation in the neighborhood, that the killing might not have been as random in nature as they had been initially led to believe.The main weakness of this film is that it gives us virtually no reason to care about any of the characters.  By not showing us any scenes between the boys and their foster mother (except for one embarrassingly bad Thanksgiving dinner fantasy sequence that looks as if it were conceived by a first-year film student), we are forced to take their relationship totally on faith, rendering the boys' thirst for revenge arbitrary at worst and academic at best.The acting is uniformly flat, with the characters little more than wafer-thin stereotypes, and even the action scenes come across as surprisingly mundane and second-rate given the Singleton pedigree in this area.  The boys' running around from venue to venue in their Detroit neighborhood, brandishing guns in full view of the populace and screaming for information about their mother's killer, is ludicrous on the face of it and often reduces the film to the level of cheap low comedy burlesque.With nary a single moment that rings believable or true, "Four Brothers" is by-the-book filmmaking from a director who has proven that he has the wherewithal and talent to do so much more.
You have to download Amazon software into your PC... I am never happy when a purchase requires that you install the company's software.  The vid is encrypted so that you need Amazon's player to view it.  Blah.  You're better off buying the DVD for $20 with all the episodes so at least you can watch the DVD somewhere other than your own computer.
let's make this short and sweet... This is one of the most boring movies I have ever seen.  I knew from the very beginning of the movie that there was no way I was going to be able to stay awake through the whole thing.  I was right; I fell asleep about fifteen minutes into it.  Recently, I was offered the chance to watch it again.  I thought, "OK, I didn't see the whole thing, it might have gotten better, so I'll give it another chance." ... Bad mistake.  This little tale about a horse race across a vast desert did nothing to hold my interest for very long.  Hidalgo is the name of the horse.  So what?  That's about as boring as this movie.  So why the 1-star markup? Cause the main character is played by Viggo Mortensen, of Aragorn fame in the smash movie series The Lord of the Rings- and I do like Viggo.  I did not, however, like this movie.  It's kind of fitting it should be set in a desert- cause that's exactly where this movie should be buried, never to bore another wave of audiences again.  If you find yourself overworked and in need of a nice long nap, watch Hidalgo; you'll be out in no time
Far and Away. Very disappointed because I can't watch it on my DVD player. I would have asked for a refund and returned it but don't know how to go about doing that on Amazon
Take It Off The Rack And It's Wack Put It Back. I don't know what's up with all of these 4-5 star reviews. This movie was awful. There was no plot and the movie just seemed to drag. Not even the guest appearances by Afrika Bambataa, Melle Mel, and the Rock Steady Crew could save it. I couldn't wait for it to be over with. The "graffiti" throughout the movie was absolutely awful. Ramo and his girlfriend were too white to have a baby that dark with curly hair. Guy Davis was fine back then, but not anymore. Rae Dawn Chong was just annoying. This is one movie I never want to see again
"The Silence of the Dummies". This is overall a real hoot! Anthony Hopkins is superb! "Fats" the dummy steals lots of the scenes.The question that crosses my mind is which is more frightening the Dummy or Ann Margarett trying to act!Burgess Meredith is great as the manager. One point of interest is the horrible score by Jerry Goldsmith.  He throws in a great harmonica riff when we see "Fats", but during some of the more "romantic " scenes the music is so cloying it would make Yanni blush.Don,t miss the extras where they talk with the real "vent" that worked with them on the movie.If you like movies that are a bit "outside" this is a must have for any collection.Pete Cavan
Complicated with pointless storylines. I was tod to watch this film from a co-worker and I was jsut dissapointed. I could not believe I wasted almost 2 hours watching this trash. The story was very confusing with it going back and fourth through time. There are many pointless storylines and charactors. The acting is overdone that it's not believable. I like the actors in the film but they where jsit placed in the wrong movie
GARBAGE. Don't waste your time or money with this DVD.  The best part of the DVD is probably the Trailers and most of those are Garbage also.  My DVD came loose in the package and scratched, too bad it didn't do any damage to ruin the Movie.  I couldn't wait until the Movie was over, I would have stopped it earlier, but wanted to see if any damage was done.  You'll be counting the minutes and seconds after watching the first half or even earlier.  The last story was stupid and horrible and should have been left off.  Don't waste your money, spend it on the cheap $5-6 horror DVD's, because at least those can be somewhat entertaining
Missing episodes. This series is being sold with missing episodes, like many others here in Unbox. Do they think their customers are so dumb? Would you buy a DVD series with a missing DVD? What sense does this make? What a disappointment this service is..
Beware of Unbox!!!. Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for
Poor support. This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet
Warning Incomplete Episode!!!. The episodes in this series have an average running time of 50 minutes. This one happens to be only 18 minutes. This mean sthat the file abruptly stops right in the middle. Even though it only cost me $2 I still got jipped.  Let's hope Amazon can iron out these kinds of problems before they get this service farther underway. Be careful enough to sheck the running times to be sure they seem accurate before you buy them
bad baby, bad!. Okay, it's not high art but this film has something to say all be it in a round about fashion.  It does make the viewer wonder about modern medicine and how it can possibly affect those who take it on a regular basis.  On the other hand, the film lacks true suspense.  I was hoping for an explosive opening scene when the baby is first born and instead was offered a yawn.  The baby itself is about as scary as fozzy bear and while there is some blood flow it is kept to a minimum.  The pacing is too slow at times and it just doesn't stand up that well today.  The actors who took part in this didn't go anywhere say for the father who went on to appear in the sequel.  Why there was a sequel is beyond me.  I recall how frightening the commercial was for this film when it first came out but I was only five at the time.  At the most this is a rent not a buy.  I guess good for it's time but perhaps a re-make would pump some needed life into the story.
RIPOFF. I purchased the UNBOX version, or "The International Release" of Eragon.  The movies' picture disappeared after 42.10 minutes, but not the sound.  Amazon should give me a refund of this defective download. IF they don't, it will be the LAST DL I purchase
Virtual Snooze!. I bought it because I had heard it was a good flick! Well after watching it I gave it to my brother. Save your money
Missing episodes. This series is being sold with missing episodes, like many others here in Unbox. Do they think their customers are so dumb? Would you buy a DVD series with a missing DVD? What sense does this make? What a disappointment this service is..
Too bad I'll have to forego........... The many reviews I have read of "The Merchant of Venice" make me thirst nearly unbearably to purchase this DVD.  However, I cannot, for it offers no English subtitles, which I need to get the most out of a movie.  Especially Shakespeare, whose language is difficult enough to begin with.I have "Much Ado About Nothing" which I adore & which does have subtitles.  Will look for others
swallow. The expectations for this film were high- a good cast and a promise of a remake of an old movie using today's technology.Alas- the movie was disappointing. The characters were not developed and the were quite flat.  The action starts very soon in the movie (the wave striking the ship) and thus there was no opportunity for them to develop.  The course of the movie did not allow for any significant development.Moreover, the special affects and all the action are not very well tied together or simply not believable. For example all the surviving passangers, including a young kid prove to be record swimmers that can hold their breath for a long period.It is a pity as if the script was a bit better and more developed the film could have been enjoyable.
Not happy. This is only a portion of this episode.  It cuts off in the middle of a sentence
What about the missing episodes. Why should one buy this series? What about the missing episodes? Are they going to be added later, or this is it? I cannot believe this. Would you buy a bicycle with a missing wheel? Or a keyboard without the C and R keys? I'd like Amazon to explain its customers what it plans to do..
What happened at the last 15 mins. I agree with most of the reviews here that the movie is just so bad. The director had the wrong idea of an art film, methophors and strange incoherrent ending is not the only thing you need to make an art film. I was pretty intrigued by the lead's obssession with the Hunky Swimmer but it just did not end the movie satisfactorily ... Can anyone explain like when did he have the rubber suite, whats with the garbage dump ending, it is just too pointless !!! I felt cheated of 90 mins of my life
How to destroy your career in one simple movie. George Sluizer's original Dutch-French version of The Vanishing (aka The Man Who Wanted to Know) offers one of European cinema's most quietly disturbingly anonymous and everyday sociopaths, feeling his way one step at a time towards murder. If you've seen that version, you probably still can't get the final revelation out of your head, but the film had plenty more to offer than that, playing with chronology, subverting the usual cliches of its 'Lady Vanishes' plot (the hero wants to know what happened to his missing lover far more than he wants her to be alive) and throwing in some excellent characterization. I can only assume that for this 1993 US remake Sluizer was so determined that no-one else was going to get the chance to ruin his film when he was perfectly capable of doing it himself, but few people could have anticipated how comprehensively he trashes his own work. His career never recovered.Chief culprit is an astonishing performance by Jeff Bridges that has been overthought through in every detail to a truly disastrous level. A friend who produced one of his earliest movies noted that Bridges was a great instinctive actor as long as you stopped him thinking about what he was doing, and this film is the proof of the pudding. Every movement is overly mechanical in its precision, making him look like a rusty clockwork toy, while his voice is a bizarre mixture of Tootsie, Latka Gravas from Taxi and a Dalek who have all been taking elocution lessons from Dok-tah E-ville. No banality of evil here, just a looney walking around with an invisible sign over his head saying "Please. Let. Me. Kill. You. Thank you. For your. Consideration.'But the blame really needs to be shared out here. None of the performances are good: often, they don't even look good - Keifer Sutherland looks more like a baby hamster than a distraught man at his wits end in the hurried scenes at the gas station, Nancy Travis flounders badly and Sandra Bullock makes no impression at all as the object of his obsession. Not that they're given any help by either director or writer Todd Graff. The script is particularly weak. The chronology has been altered to put the focus firmly on Bridges at the expense of the couple at the opening of the film. Worse is the rush the film is in, draining the life and character from each scene in its race to get to the next. Rather than the high/low mood shifts in the couple's relationship or the apparently casual but careful establishing of the feel of the location, we just get a couple of arguments that give you the impression that he's probably better off without her. As for the new and improved happy ending - standard woman chased by nutter in the woods jeopardy stuff complete with lame `let's end on a joke like a TV cop show' moment - best not go there... which is advice that holds for this entire trainwreck of a movie. Even a shockingly bland and uninspired Jerry Goldsmith score can't do anything for this one.
You Can't Go Home Again. I knew Woodrow Call, and Jon Voight is no Woodrow Call.  Voight is less than nothing.  Return to Lonesome Dove is less than nothing, but perhaps I'm being unfair since I bailed after the first abysmal hour.The only element of interest from that first hour was Oliver Reed's Donnegan, and only because of the wraith in Donnegan's improbable Montana mansion.  The wraith is Awbonnie, a native servant who flits through a few frames with Elle Woods-Witherspoon.  Donnegan is probably a hack Hollywood stand-in for Granville Stuart, Montana's grand old man, who married a Shoshone woman named Awbonnie.  One of their dusky daughters married another grand old man of Montana, Teddy Blue Abbot, cowpuncher and best bud of Charlie Russell.Donnegan's attempt to comingle Elle & Mr. Newt suggests to me that Elle is not Donnegan's wife, as advertised, and that Awbonnie is.  If anyone anywhere gritted through the next four preposterous hours of Return, let me know if I'm right
Very disappointing. I didn't have high expectations for this movie, yet it still managed to completely disappoint me.  I adore Robin Williams, and his performance was the best part of the movie.  But the script was abysmal and Sara, played by Marcia Gay Harden, was a completely one dimensional character.  The antics of the sidekick robot and the "flubber" itself were just plain embarrasing to watch.  Too bad, because the idea is great - but frankly, the original was pretty bad too. They really could have done so much with this story either the first OR the second time around
Van Damnes worst. Im a big fan of Van Damne,but when i saw this movie i was really disapointed,the setting is dull,the story is dull and the guy he fights dull.I love Van Damnes other movie,but this is the only one that sux
The *ahem*...LESSER Farrelly film. Ok, check it out, there's two Jack Blacks. One is the guy from Tenacious D, you see him all the time. He's funny and childish and insane. Then there's the other Jack Black. He's the evil creature who pervades films like Shallow Hal and King Kong, whose only humorous lines are the ones that are funny by accident. Well, as long as you aren't fat and don't feel patronized by Gweneth presuming to know what it's like not to be desired all her life (ha), then by all means suspend all disbelief, logic, and brain power and watch this dumb movie. Gweneth's fat suit is actually pretty convincing, although most of the movie she's played by an actual fat chick...who by the way should have just been left in, without the whole "ha ha the dude thinks she's skinny" nonsense. Obviously, a film about a dude trying to cope with dating a big girl would have a lot more resonance if:a) He weren't brainwashedb) His fat girlfriend wasn't replaced by a twiggy blond chickc) The movie didn't throw ridiculous concepts your way (like a guy could have sex with a 300 lb woman without realizing it)d) Tony Robbins was in no way involved whatsoeverI knew I was slumming it when I saw this movie.  But I'm not sure what the message of this film is.  Jack Black's character is decent, considerate, great with kids and perfect in every way.  Oh, except he's really shallow for no dicernable reason, other than his dad's dying words were for him to go out and chase tail.  The weird part is that Hal's not a bad person.  The movie beats you over the head showing you he's the nicest guy on on the face of the Earth, so you can't really laugh at him looking like an idiot.  Rosemary is so fat she has superpowers.  Her butt actually creates typhoons (I wonder if that has military applications?).  Suddenly, Hal mistakes ugly pimply girls for supermodels and evil skanks for old shrews.  Tony Robbins brainwashed him, the fiend! When Hal finally realizes this he decides to (ooh big spoiler) love Rosemary anyway, and learns a VALUBLE LESSON.  Along the way there are a ton of cliches like people thinking he's dating Rosemary just because her dad happens to be his boss, and a sexy neighbor in his building who starts to get the hots for him when she sees how non-judgemental he is dating a fat girl ('cause that would make any woman melt).  Of course there's requisite best friend, played by Jason Alexander, who is repulsed by fat people and plots to get Hal to dump her.  Then again, the friend is a complete troll, so I don't know why Hal would want him around.  And to insult us further, they force some burned kids on us at the hospital to strike a SERIOUS note about how true beauty is on the inside. Too...many...public...service...messages! PICK...ONE..!!But brain-dead writing aside, Paltrow really sells her performance when they actually show her in the fat suit (despite Gweneth's postering when this film was first released). Regardless of its clumsy benevolence, I have to rate this as a romantic comedy. And for that, I give it a rating of totally unremarkable. Nice gesture, Farelly brothers. Not to be bothered with
Are there O stars?. I am SOOOOOOOO mad. I've just wasted almost two hours of my life watching this "movie." And why? Because of the reviewers that gave this piece of sh** 5 and 4 star ratings. What exactly are you people on that you would even remotely like this film? Maybe it's that pretentious, high-brow snobbery that the best pseudo-intellectuals are versed in. I like alot of French films: Betty Blue, Amelie, etc., but this is sheer garbarge couched in "let's see how much I can piss off my audience before they claim I'm a genius." The next time someone wants to make a movie like this, PLEASE, give the money and the camera to 12-year old with a 70 IQ. I guarantee it will be ALOT better
Sorry. This movie is so freakin stupid. Yes its funny...but so very dumb. Not good dumb; bad dumb. Terribly, painfully stupid. Funny at times. Best avoided or taken in small doses
A Letdown from National Lampoon. This could have been a good movie. The premise was ripe for exploitation and nobody exploits the stupidity of people in general and young people in particular better than National Lampoon. They are the acknowleged masters of the exploitation genere: movies with absolutely no redeeming social value that still leave you laghing. In this case, however, they exploited only their reputation.The premise is of a couple of young idiots looking for an easy life without work. Hey...it's worked for years. They fail at just about everything including purse snatching and armed robbery. Finally they hit upon a scheme to marry a couple of rich spinsters and wait to collect the inheritance. There is a problem, though, in that the spinsters are hard up for cash as well and conceive of a plot to marry the dumb kids who tried to mug them, insure them heavily and then kill them for the payout. It had so much potential for comedy and it falls flat.There are a few moments of brief humor but they are far too few and far between. Most of my time was spent agonizing "surely, it will get better". It didn't.I almost gave this one a single star. What kept me from doing so is that there are a few movies out there that are even worse. Unfortunately, I have seen some of them.Buy this one if you MUST complete your National Lampoon Collection or if you want something to distract you from the pain of a root canal. Otherwise, don't bother. Even renting is a stretch
Fascination: Where narcissism collides with eroticism. Looking for a really good thriller, I spotted "Fascination," with Jacqueline Bisset and was sure that with her and the cast, my husband and I had found the perfect summer film on DVD.  What a disappointment.  Although Bisset rallies to the role, the same cannot be said of the other actors.  The dialogue is painfully inept at conveying anything in the least bit sexy, provocative or psychologically intriguing.  The cloying, saccharine musical score doesn't help.  Whereas the music in "The Swimming Pool," or "The Wide Sargasso Sea," enhances, heightens the dramatic intensity, mystery and sensuality, the musak in "Fascination," undermines whatever potential drama there might be. The characters other than Bisset and her unfortunate first husband seem too infatuated with themselves to be erotically convincing. As an ensemble cast, they seem indifferent to both the story and their audience.  Magnificent bodies and sexy entanglements are not enough, in my opinion, to compensate for the pedestrian acting and rather predictable plot.Jacqueline Bisset deserves better and so do we viewers.
Bad from beginning to end. Not sure what is worse, the horrible script or the horrible acting. Typical mean girl makes epiphany and changes to good person script. Watching Schneider dress in women's clothes for an entire movie is just creepy. Using lemon juice for eye drops would be more enjoyable than watching this movie.
The Itsy Bitsy Problem. By the time you see the ending, you'll already be wishing that you hadn't watched this movie
"HOOSIERS" slasher style... this movie is part Canadian soap opera and part effective slasher movie. The plot is a ripoff of THE PROWLER, or vice versa (either way, the prowler is a MUCH better movie, go see that instead). It deals with a vengeful wraith promising to spree if a valentine's party is ever held after a tragic holiday party-to-blame accident in a coal mine left one survivor to resort to cannibalism and unemployment. Of coarse you know them crazy kids  go and party anyways. Basically, anything to do with the killer miner or the mine itself is great, but everything else is just plain tacky. John Stanley of the Creature Features guide gave it 4 stars...I've decided that anything he says is good is automatically bad. I can't believe that a Band actually decided to ripoff this particular piece of pop culture to sell records. Its not because they were on drugs but because they were in the imagination-less state of NOT doing drugs
Monkey Business. A dissapointment. Sadly, neither of these actresses were wearing masks in this film.What in the hell happened to Kelli McGillis? Don't expect to see anyone even closely reminiscent of the sensual Top Gun actress of long ago. McGillis is simply wooden in this role. Susie Porter is somewhat of a toad who appears to be wearing the same outfit throughout the movie's entirety. The acting is poor, the frequency of obscene language is distracting, the storyline is silly and the actresses chemistry is as romantic as a mud sandwich. Don't waste your time with this one or you'll end up feeling like a monkey
Better than many, but doesn't match the hype. On the most fundamental level, i.e.,a sexual/semi-erotic level, L'Ennui most definitely has its moments. As a total film, however, it stutters more than a few times. Technically, the subtitles occasionally flash too fast or are offered with no contrast so they become almost unreadable. The camerawork is quite good, however, with a definite European style. The story itself is also intriguing, but once the point is made,it has nowhere to go. The problems begin with the actors and plot. Not that the actors were bad; they were actually very good. But you understand from minute one that Martin isn't wrapped too tightly (his treatment of a fan, for example, early on), so his bizarre behavior once he meets Cecelia isn't surprising in the least. More simply, the guy evinces no sympathy in the least from the viewer; none. He's a complete ass. He comes off as needy, selfish and egomaniacial, one of those boors who are so deeply personally insecure they become outwardly obnoxious and nasty to hide it from everyone. You really don't care what ultimately happens to him, and also understand that if he did get what he wanted in the film, he would immediately reject it once he did, just to be hurtful. Cecilia, the more you get to know her, is just as bad in another way. She doesn't come off as stupid (as someone else said)or obtuse, but as almost totally uncaring and unfeeling, not to mention far more immature than her few years. She simply does whatever she wants whenever she can without a lot of regard of how it can hurt or affect people. She understands how they can feel things, but unless it touches her directly and negatively, doesn't really care. Look at how she regarded her father. All in all, it's hard to feel sympathy for her as well. She's not opaque but almost completely transparent. And to say the film's point was hammered home way too long or that the ending was ridiculously abrupt is putting it mildly.
Historically important, but a very unorthodox, uneven film. Rudolf Nureyev and Margot Fonteyn. No other ballet partnership is as legendary -- the fiery Russian defector and the graceful, aging English ballerina formed a bond on and off the stage that for several years practically defined romantic ballet. Thus, for this very reason, hardcore balletomanes should get this dvd. Many of us (including me) were too young to have seen Nureyev and Fonteyn live, so these videos are the only example to dissect the legendary partnership.However, caveat emptor: this is NOT a "typical" Swan Lake by any means. You can argue that there is no "typical" Swan Lake -- the original production in 1877 was a failure. Some of the music went missing. After Tchaikovksy's death, the choreographers Marius Petipa and Lev Ivanov restaged Swan Lake, and that version more or less is the Swan Lake audiences know today. There's lots of music, so most versions of Swan Lakeuse the "traditional" pieces.Nevertheless, there are some different traditions of Swan Lake. In the Russian productions, the outcome is usually "happy" -- Rothbart is killed, and Siegfried and Odette are alive. In the productions used "everywhere else," Odette and Siegfried leap into the lake, and are reunited in the otherworld. I prefer the second ending personally, because I think it better matches both the story (the happy ending was enforced by the Tsar, and seems tacked on), and the music as well.Rudolf Nureyev's 1966 film, however, is unlike any other Swan Lake I've ever seen. First of all, from the opening closeup (of Siegfried in blue eyeshadow and red lipstick) you realize this film is not going to follow Balanchine (and classical ballet's) creed of "ballet is woman." The first act is redesigned to incorporate a lot of solos and dance opportunities for Siegfried (Nureyev). The first act usually ends with Siegfried picking up his bow and arrow and going hunting with Benno. In this film, there is a long elegiac solo for Siegfried (using music that's usually used in act 2).Nureyev even dares to tinker with the famous Act II choreography by Lev Ivanov. In the famous Odette/Siegfried Adagio, the melody is not repeated with the cello -- instead, there's another solo for Siegfried. Margot Fonteyn was born in 1919 so it's possible that the emphasis on Nureyev is due to Fonteyn's technical limitations at the time. And one notices that Fonteyn, as graceful and lovely as she is, is at times unable to cope with the famously demanding Odette/Odile role. For instance, Odette's solo in Act II usually ends with a series of turns and then Odette stands on pointe and holds a balance before going into the wings. Fonteyn doesn't attemptthe feat, but ends the series of turns in first position -- flat on her feet. Fonteyn by modern standards also lacks the athleticism, bonelessness (her arms always look like arms, not wings), flamboyance, and flexibility, that one usually associates with this role.Act III's music choreography is pretty standard, but the musical arrangements (and choreography) for the Black Swan Pas de deux are radically different. Fonteyn actually churns out the fouettes, confirming something I've long suspected: that everyone looks at the fouettes, but Odette/Odile's real challenges are the balances, footwork, and leaps, and this is where you can see Fonteyn suffer.Strangely, Act IV (the act that is usually cut to shreds) is the most intact. And it's the best-danced act: it;s the reconciliation scene between Odette and Siegfried that one can catch glimmers of the genuine bond that existed between these dancers. Elsewhere, the technical limitations of Fonteyn by this time and Nureyev's reworking of Swan Lake as a solo showpiece for Siegfried distracted me from simply enjoying their partnership. I particularly loved when Siegfried runs all over the stage, turning up the head of each swan, to find his Odette, and when he finally finds Margot's head, it's a truly beautiful moment. The ending of Nureyev's version follows the original Swan Lake, and not the "usual" endings of the Swan Boat to heaven.On a technical level, there are problems. The ballet was filmed on a soundstage, and seems way too small to fit a whole cpmpany corps. As a result, the dancers often look haplessly cramped and as if they'll bump into each other. The close bunching also detracted from the natural geometric shapes that are so much apart of classical ballet. The Vienna State Ballet also looks woefully underreheased. Either that or they're just bad. Their legs are terribly uneven in arabesques, their arms are a mess, and they simply look like a corps that hasnt danced Swan Lake enough. The sets are also deliberately artificial and the costuming, espeically for Nureyev and in the "color" acts, is garish. Rothbart (Redbeard here) is a non-dancing role, unlike in most productions when he's a smooth pimp-type in Act III.For a traditional Swan Lake with a more modern Odette/Odile, I'd suggest the Makarova/Dowell dvd with the Royal Ballet. Makarova was 41 at the time of filming, but her long extensions, boneless arms, exquisite balances, and still impressive technique make her Odette/Odile much more appealing to modern tastes. This Swan Lake is of great historical value,and Fonteyn is undeniably lovely, but overall I admit I wanted a more traditional Swan Lake, and I certainly wouldnt recommend this dvd as anyone's first Swan Lake. Its just too unorthodox.
Why the Charge. Curious as to why Amazon would charge for this content when CBS offers it for free on the official Survivor Website.  Yeah, at the CBS site you have sit through 4 commercials, but it is worth it to not have to download any extra programs
Poor support. This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet
Easily forgotten. It didn't take me long to forget this film. Once again it stars Jet in a strange role
Mediocre offering; male physiques help. An hour and a half of beautiful men prancing around wearing very little can never be less than watchable, but aside from the nudity and homoerotic horseplay, there isn't much else. Granted, there are a few nicely filmed poignant moments, but it's often dull
Oh the humanity!. There are bad movies, and then there are BAD movies. "Universal Soldier: The Return" is a cosmically bad movie, a movie so poor in every aspect of its execution that one would have to look to "Manos: The Hands of Fate" for comparison. The first "Universal Soldier" film was a moderately entertaining shoot 'em up flick starring action stars Jean-Claude Van Damme and "Rocky" refugee Dolph Lundgren that essentially accomplished what it set out to do: people perished in violent ways, stuff exploded, and Van Damme and Lundgren beat each other into bloody pulps at the end of the film. Even the presence of the charming Ally Walker as Van Damme's female sidekick greatly helped the film. The movie garnered enough attention and fans to merit the release of a special edition DVD some time back. It unfortunately also garnered enough attention and fans to merit this unredeemable piece of trash sequel. The second, and one hopes final, installment in a franchise that should never have become a franchise achieves such heights of utter banality and stupidity that I sat in open-mouthed awe watching it. I think I can safely say I am less of a person for having sat through this atrocity. Expect to spend a few days in a coma after the credits roll.Van Damme returns as Luc, the reanimated soldier who triumphed over the forces of government sponsored evil in the first film. On this outing he now works for Dr. Dylan Cotner (Xander Berkeley), a scientist who reconstituted the universal soldier program with the help of his supercomputer S.E.T.H. Luc, with his female sidekick Maggie (Kiana Tom), helps design and run training missions for a new batch of super soldiers. The film opens with what the filmmakers hope is a pulse-pounding jaunt up a river, a jaunt filled with explosions, stunts, gunfire, and the briefest glimpse of Tom's incredibly fit form. As the mission grinds to a halt we learn several important things: Kiana Tom is incredibly hot but can't act her way out of a paper bag, Luc has a daughter named Hillary (Karis Paige Bryant) who you just know will get into trouble at some point, and the only soldiers we must pay attention to are Romeo (Bill Goldberg) and the one played by Michael Jai White. Frankly, turning off the film immediately after glimpsing Tom's amazing physique is probably a good thing. Everything that follows is dull, predictable, and so full of plot holes as to defy description. "Universal Soldier: The Return" feels like eighty minutes of dental surgery rather than an action film.Sure enough, Cotner's computer goes on the fritz and unleashes the killing power of the universal soldiers. In the resulting conflagration S.E.T.H. implants its consciousness in Michael Jai White, Luc and his loved ones flee from the compound, and the military swoops in to contain the problem. An extraordinarily untalented actress named Heidi Schanz also pops in as nosy reporter called Erin who is interested in exposing the government's latest shenanigans. Predictably, Van Damme and Schanz team up to track down...er...well, track down something to defeat the supercomputer. I think they need some code to shut the system down, but in the meantime the film takes them all over the place so that a wisecracking Romeo can follow them around while absorbing all the abuse Luc can hand out. Even throwing in a few scenes set in an adult's only club can't make this turkey fly. It's dull, folks, and painfully so. By the time the film grinds to its inevitable showdown between Luc and S.E.T.H. back at the shattered compound--with an injured Hillary's life balancing precariously in the background to serve as motivation for an overwhelmed Luc (Geez, what a surprise there!)--I knew I just wasted far too much of my life with this car wreck. How bad can it be, you ask? Read on...Plot holes in this film are innumerable, as uncountable as grains of sand on the beach or acne on a teenager's face. For example, Luc explains to Erin that he was once a universal soldier just like Romeo but Cotner "cured" him by restoring him to life; he no longer needs injections or ice or any of the other devices used by the soldiers. What the heck are we doing marveling at this amazing supercomputer when Cotner just performed a miracle of biblical implications? He brought someone back from the dead! How exactly did he accomplish this feat? We don't find out from Van Damme, who simply smirks his way through a few lines of dialogue that simply boggle the mind with their monumentally idiotic implications. I could go on, but let's discuss the performances instead--or the lack thereof. I should say I adore Kiana Tom; she's a drop dead gorgeous babe with a body that could stop the earth's rotation, but watching her stumble through dialogue is like having your appendix taken out through your mouth. Another problem is the lumbering Bill Goldberg, whose "funny" lines are anything but. And the more I think about Heidi Schanz, the less I think of her. You have to wonder about a film where Jean-Claude Van Damme is the best thespian in the cast.You might think a movie this foolhardy shouldn't contain any bonus features on DVD. You would be wrong. Trailers for this film, "The Return," "Double Team," "Desert Heat," "Knock Off," "Maximum Risk," and "Nowhere to Run" showcase the dubious career of Jean-Claude Van Damme. A making of feature, a Van Damme career retrospective (Ha!), a Michael Jai White feature, and talent bios round out the disc. My advice to those viewers thinking of renting "Universal Soldier: The Return"? Run, my friends, run far, far away and don't look back.
We all hated this film. I bought this DVD because a friend said it was one of the funniest films he had ever seen. We're still friends, but I'll never listen to one of his reviews again--our taste must not be compatible.My wife, daughter, and I seldom agree on anything but we unanimously consider this the worst movie we've ever seen. It's the only movie I've ever turned off before the end.On the plus side, watching most of this film has given me a new perspective on cinema. I used to think I knew bad movies. Now I know that most movies are at least pretty good, and it's only a very few that are truly bad. This is one of those very few bad films.Best in Show belongs to a genre of "comedies" that I find boring at best, but often cruel and mean. Other films of this type are "Waiting for Guffman", "Bottle Rocket", etc. If you enjoy watching pathetic people struggle then perhaps you'll appreciate this movie
One of my least favorite episodes... Look...to be fair, one man's BOTE is another man's &quot;Manos&quot;. What I mean by that is some people may love this ep, but I personally didn't find it very funny and the movie is so bad that the sub-average riffing doesn't save it. The best lines that Mike &amp; the robots make are when they speak for a character and add a line to something a person says. Unfortunately, the feature's horrible pacing, slow dialogue scenes, and atrocious acting are not enough, and it seems like the writers took a break on this one. Of course, even weak MST3K is better than pretty much any other show, but I must say this is certainly my least favorite episode from season 5 and at times feels like a Season 1 episode (the riffing is sparse and not really funny). If you are a newcomer and would like to see this show at it's best, get either &quot;Manos: Hands of Fate&quot; or &quot;Red Zone Cuba&quot;
Save your money. I bought this DVD based on the excellent reviews.  As both an afficionado, and practitioner of kink, I am always looking for a good film in that genre.  Not only is "Maitresse" poorly acted but the story line is completely unbelievable.I also found the film "quality" leaving a lot to be desired. (Poor lighting) I found myself falling asleep about a third of the way through and just could not get into it.The relationship and communication between the Domme and her clients was cold and unfeeling, and left me with the impression that I had just watched two robots doing physical things with each other.  There was just no chemistry between the players.Save your money
Not having Goodtimes with Goodtimes Home Video. FUTUREWORLD is really not a bad follow-up to WESTWORLD, but Goodtimes Home Video makes viewing this film a very bad-time. The only thing good about it is seeing Yul Brynner back if this is the only way we can get to see him. He was very good if only for a short segment in this film. Hard to recommend this version at all
Not the right actors. James Spader was supposed to be in the last season of DINER. That would be my only reason for buying it. He is certainly not in this one! So where is he????!!!Are there no Diner videos or DVDs with James Spader?
One of Elvis' worst movies. I've seen all of Elvis' movies, most several times.  This is one of the worst.  Only Stay Away Joe and Harem Scarem are worse.  I usually watch every Elvis movie every time it comes on TV, but not these three
It was Ok i think. pretty raw outlook in the life of BasquiatI'm an avid fan so i have no regrets having this
Tienen razn: Es muy mala. Psele una estrella como calificacin slo para poder respaldar a quienes ya han opinado, pues se trata de un bodrio de pelcula. Yo, felizmente, slo la arrend; de lo contrario, la prdida de dinero habra sido mucho mayor.
Heartburn  or  Men..beware ! Most women only want to breed !. This movie made me sick to my stomach. Here we have a woman like Nora Ephron, a woman with professional job skills and talent and when she marries, she turns into a needy, desperate women whom evidently believes her own self-worth is determined by having babies, one after another. I ususally love all of Meryl's movies, but I could not stand seeing her turn into a needy, always pregnant &quot;homemaker&quot;. If I were a man, I would have run awary screaming, too
Christmas  in Connecticut. Very enjoyable.  I love the "old movies".  The whole family can watch and it was a pleasure to watch Barbara Stanwyck and Dennis Morgan.  Light and airy.  Great for Christmas
Beware of Unbox!!!. Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for
Didn't work. I downloaded the player and this episode as part of a promotion that gave a free episode. Not only did I get charged, but when I cancelled the download to contact about the charge - I was told I had to finish downloading before they could refund. Once it finished downloading, it didn't play anyway. I gave up.
How does such a whiney little brat become Darth Vader?. After seeing the travesty that was episode one in the theatre I decided to give this one a try, assuming that it couldn't possibly get any worse. Was I right? Oh man, I was worse than right. I was wrong. The weak character development that took place with Anakin Skywalker in no way led me to believe that this person could eventually become Darth Vader. The character Anakin is such an undisciplined whiney little brat that it becomes utterly unbelievable that this kid could become a dreaded supervillian. On top of that, the chemistry between him and Padame was very weak. The supposed romance between them was devastated by mediocre acting and no real interesting dialogue.So once again the special effects department has broken their backs carrying this movie. Without a strong plotline or interesting characters, this movie becomes not a story, but just an impressive light show. It seems as if George Lucas figured that if the technology that he has now is light years ahead of what he had twenty five years ago, then the audience won't need anything else. The special effects in the three 'prequel' movies was so inconsistent with the older films that they should have been released as a completely different story alltogether.And finally we get to Yoda. A puppet that can bounce around and defy gravity with a lightsaber, but still needs a cane to walk. In the older films, Empire Strikes Back for example, Yoda was balancing on Luke's feet during his handstand. When Luke lost his balance and fell over, wouldn't Yoda be able to just use the force and gently float to the ground instead of tumbling to the ground out of control with him? Is that because of lack of special effects technology back then, or just Yoda was getting too old to use the force anymore? Just a little food for thought. I'll let you decide.So once again the only plus in this film is the impressive visual effects. If your expecting more however then George Lucas will once again let you down
No good scenes in the whole movie. This movie doesn't have a single scene worth watching. Femalien 1 is in another league, don't waste your time on the sequel
Goodtimes Dvd = Bad Picture Quality. After reading a couple of other reviews about the &quot;quality&quot; of transfer on this dvd, I decided I wanted this in my collection. What I THOUGHT would be good or atleast a decent enough picture quiality, I WAS VERY DISSAPOINTED.THE QUALITY OF TRANSFER OF THE PICTURE IS HORRIBLE!!! A great movie a total real diaster flick in picture quality. Non anamorphic, deffintaly not remastered or digitally transfered. Picture tones are very, very bad, along with what little color that is desplayed. Almost a black &amp; white picture with most of the entire movie too dark to make out what is going on. Even with my brightness turn all the way up on my tv, it still was so dark it almost wasn't worth continue watching.The ONLY things positive on this dvd was the fact it was in widescreen and &quot;suppossedly&quot; in Dolby Digital EX. The beginning Dolby intoduction was deffinatly in Dolby and had good sound but the movie itself didn't distributeand Dolby sounds that I could make out on my theatre sound system. Sounded like mono to me.Thsi dvd reproduction stinks and I suggest those that are into quality dvd and getting you money worth saty away from this &quot;Goodtimes Video&quot; version untill it is put on dvd correctly. Why they botherd is beyond me. Because I wanted to have a copy of this movie in widescreen, I am taping it on to VHS for my collection and going to try and return it for something better tommorrow. I suppsoe I'll have to be content that I got the widscreen version on VHS for now untill they re-release it on dvd with better quality, or they show it on tv in widescreen which I highly doubt. Heck, even TAPING IT OFF TV YOU'D GET A BETTER PICTURE QUALITY THAN THIS DVD
bad movie. we saw this movie in Gym class and it is the worest movie any one has ever see
Britney...YES, This DVD...NO NO NO! Save Your Money!. This DVD was made after baby one more time exploded onto the scene. it contains no performances or music by britney, and only has a few pictures of her. It's just a bunch of interviews with people from her hometown in louisianna...all of which have hair straight out of the 80s and don't work well in front of cameras. It's been recorded on a home video camcorder obviously.my advice is to skip this...save your money, it's a snoozefest. Even if you area  huge britney fan, you'll end up regretting buying this
It scared me too--42 years ago!. I just read Doug's review of "First Man into Space" and I just had to write respond.  I was seven years old when I saw this movie. As I recall (though my recollection here may be faulty), it was double-billed with "Tom Thumb."  One of my good friends had a birthday party and we all went to the movies.  "First Man into Space" scared the bejeezus out of us. We were so scared we couldn't stop crying. They had to take us out of the movie in the middle--sometime after the car was pulled over by the state trooper.  I thus never saw its conclusion. A few years ago I found the video of the movie and I triumphantly brought it home to show to my teenagers. Needless to say, they made fun of me throughout the movie: "Dad, you were scared by this?!" :-
Missing episodes. This series is being sold with missing episodes, like many others here in Unbox. Do they think their customers are so dumb? Would you buy a DVD series with a missing DVD? What sense does this make? What a disappointment this service is..
Embarrasing to watch. I have to disagree with the reviews above and say that I watched this movie on dvd having watched it as a kid twenty years ago. Unfortunately I couldn't find anything about this film I remember enjoying. It's a cross between The Blob, The Thing and a really crap detective movie. Moriarty's character is pretty smooth but the film culminates in a farce reminicent of an 80's kiddy movie. This film is definetly not for intelligent adults and you'll lose interest halfway through I guarantee it. No suspense, few laughs, and way to hokey to watch twice. If you love this movie you need to get out more.
Please enter a title for your review. Obviously I knew going in that this movie wasn't going to offer anything more than light low-brow entertainment, but it falls below average for it's niche. Even low-brow humour requires some degree of subtlety and context to work, and those things seem mostly absent in this movie. It's also disappointingly uneventful, so much of the movie is set in the one house where not much progresses. I was hoping the guys' schemes would involve some detours to introduce additional environments and characters, but it never happened. The movie is generally pretty dark too, drawing a lot of it's gags from murder attempts. I guess it's a black comedy, but it's not marketed as such. I think it's inconsistent about what it wants to be. Trust the 7 out of 9 negative reviews on this site and don't waste your time with this movie, unless you enjoyed Big Momma's House.
This Film Hasn't Aged Well. When I first saw this film as a college student I thought it was ok, but not great.  Now that I've seen it for the second time, I don't even think it is ok.  I guess when I was younger, I either missed or wasn't so bothered by the way Robert Redford's character treats Barbara Streisand's, not to mention the way he treats his daughter.  He just leaves Katie right at the point when he finds out she's pregnant with his child.  And at the end of the movie it appears that he has never kept in touch with either of them.  This bothered me to the point where I just couldn't have any sympathy or any positive views about Redford's character and, without this, the movie doesn't work at all.
Wow!. With as many big names in this I thought it would be amazing....well, it is a corn ball adventure..its set in ancient times yet one man beats someone up, flies off whips out a pair of modern day sunglasses and puts them on and POSES!! (shakes head) its things like this that REALLY hurt the film for many kung fu/hong kong film fans. I REALLY wanted to like this film but couldn't get past the ridiculousness of it. Now corny can be ok at times but this is just rubbish
Star Trek:  City on the Edge of Forever. My favorite show of the Trek series but there's no way I'd buy another individual program from Amazon.  It will ONLY play on their downloaded player ...won't burn to DVD so can't play it on my television.  Don't bother buying this ...just go for the Trek collection on DVD
Give Me An- S! Give Me An- H! Give Me An- I!... If the sight of a 400lb. man's bare hindquarters terrifies you... STAY AWAY! If the thought of a middle-aged Lief Garrett "rapping" fills your veins w/ icewater... STAY AWAY! If foot-tall 80s hairstyles make you cringe in fear... STAY AWAY! Yes, this is CHEERLEADER CAMP, a film full of cheerleading routines that may be too intense for some viewers! Watch as 30yo teenagers fight to survive against an unknown killer among them! See the horror as pom poms swish and shake! Stand astonished during the hideous school mascots' dance-off! Feel the life drain from your body as 88 minutes simply disappear! YOU HAVE BEEN CHOSEN, YOU ARE DOOMED...
Just a Warning!. I would suggest that you rent this before buying it!  Unlike the reviews above it was one of the worst thing I have ever seen.  I walked out of the theatre on this and there were many people on the lobby that walked out before me!  This is not a film for everyone and requires a very special taste!  There was no story...that I could see just a bunch of clips that made no sense
These Guys Made Super Troopers?. I disliked this movie almost as much I loved Super Troopers.  Not sure if I would say it was awful, but it came close
Do not buy... This film starts well but gets boring past the first 20 mns, despite Winston's effects you can enjoy for about 30 seconds in the whole movie, and I guess for a few more seconds at the very end, which I didn't even wait for... Though everything is well made in that film, it doesn't have the least interest either to a horror fan or to the common viewer, which I guess is the reason why you can find so many low priced copies of it on both DVD and VHS.There are things that KILL a horror film, like having to hear a jazz piano chorus during a chase scene featuring a "monster" you don't even see anything of but the eyes of the actor who plays it, then you already jumped to something else before anything actually happened. And that's the way it is TO THE END...
All-American Boy Strikes Out. This is one of many serials I saw at the Uptown Theater in Dover, NH, and one of the few I clearly remember.  "Jack Armstrong" was one of my favorite radio serials for years, and I was thrilled when it was announced as the next movie serial at the Uptown.  All I actually remember is the first chapter with that special car, which I thought was extremely cool at the time.  The previews made us think the car was part of the story, but after the first chapter it never appears again.The rest of the story is disappointing.  It has a weak script and poor production values.  The fights are not well choreographed.  The chapter endings are mediocre.  There's a little too much sci-fi nonsense to make this serial really enjoyable--for example in a late chapter they're going to communicate with "supersonic sound"--that would be sound that's faster than sound, excuse me?  Dr. Grood's rocket ship looks suspiciously like the one in "Atom Man vs. Superman," and some of the weapons are more than faintly reminiscent of Luthor's in that same serial.  Three of the bad guys resemble the Three Stooges.John Hart looked like a movie star but he wasn't much of an actor.  He played the Lone Ranger on TV from 1952 to 1953 replacing Clayton Moore for a year, after which Moore was brought back by popular demand.  Rosemary LaPlanche was Miss America of 1941, and she toured extensively during the War selling war bonds.  She could have been used to better advantage here, as could Claire James as Princess Alura.  In fact, Miss James looks every bit as much Miss America-like as Rosemary does.Pierre Watkin makes a fine Uncle Jim, albeit without the hair he sported as Perry White in "Superman."  He may be the best actor in the film.  Joe Brown, Jr. sure isn't--he can't deliver one line convincingly.  As Billy, he's a pain in the arse--as anactor, he's a complete disaster.Columbia got really weird with the release of this film.  Charles Middleton, as big a name as ever appeared in serials and who plays Dr. Grood, was not even listed in the credits.  Middleton passed away only two years after this serial was made, and he's looking a little worn-out here
I did not find it funny. The only way you will find this movie funny is if misfortune and incompetence in life tickle you. The setting is Baltimore in the late 1950's or early 1960's and Richard Dreyfuss and Danny DeVito play the two main characters. They are aluminum siding salesmen, commonly referred to as Tin Men and are largely con men. Almost anything goes when pursuing a sale; lies and deception are acceptable sales techniques. In order to maintain the appropriate image, it is almost mandatory that a Tin Man drives a Cadillac.Dreyfuss is at the local dealership and purchases a Cadillac. In the process of backing out of the dealership driveway, he is hit by DeVito. Both men blame the other for the accident and this starts a personal feud. It starts a cycle of car smashing and other vandalism, until Dreyfuss decides to go for the ultimate score. He decides to seduce DeVito's wife. This proves to be easy, as DeVito is incompetent as a husband. Immediately after Dreyfuss scores with DeVito's wife, he calls DeVito to inform him of that fact. This immediately ends the marriage, and DeVito throws a pathetic fit. I fail to see how anyone could consider this to be funny.This starts a cycle of further disasters for DeVito. A city commission is investigating the practices of the Tin Men and DeVito is stripped of his license to sell siding. The IRS is investigating him for failing to pay his taxes and they are demanding that he pay them immediately. Once again, his responses are to get angry and blame everyone else for his problems.If there is a bright side to the movie, it is some of the conversations between the Tin Men. Especially interesting is the talk about the old Bonanza television show. One man wonders why there are four men on the Ponderosa and they appear to have no interest in women. While it is clear he is hinting at homosexuality, the producers were adept at keeping the conversation within the bounds of the time.I did not find the movie funny, in fact I was glad when it was over. DeVito is so pathetic that you feel sorry for him, but feeling sorry is nowhere near laughing.
Was expecting much more. I enjoy watching teen movies because I'm ever so curious about how the director sees this particular age group and the misconceptions present in his view as much as in the teens' view of things.This movie is unlike most teen "romantic comedies" I've seen, and not necessarily in a good way. First of all, the main characters are unlikeable and don't represent actual categories of people in real life:We have the good looking rebel who's actually not so rebellious after all but then gets back to his old ways (stupid twist if you ask me), the nerd who can't get any (they picked the worst possible guy to play the nerd; he's actually pretty good looking and a funny guy...), the nerdy girl who hasn't grown up yet (ends up hooking up with the rebel but they break up), the gay guy (I have no idea what his role in this movie was), the aggressive victim of child abuse (...), the freaky nympho with a tint of lesbian (what the hell were you thinking Daniel Waters?) and finally the rebel's childhood best friend who falls in love with him and is rejected (the film focuses about 5 minutes of its total 88 on this character... I don't know why she's even here, she has no obvious role and her situation doesn't reflect at all in the real world).Next up, I think the director is sexually obsessed or something. Ok, I know sex is an important part of a teenager's life but this movie is about lame 13 year old girls aching for sex and even lamer 19 year olds who have nothing else better to do. If I wanted to see hormonal imbalance, I would go watch Discovery Channel. There are more important things in life than sex, and this "masterpiece" definitely doesn't illustrate them. The characters' thoughts and actions are limited to the camp itself and the director focuses too much on useless stuff and tries to create stereotypes, but fails miserably. Most teen movies have a moral side to them, they teach the audience certain values, unlike "Happy Campers". This movie only taught me that it's so cool to be obsessed about sex, it's cool for 12 year old girls to think they're oh-so-hot women, that only the absolute best looking guys hook up (not true in the real world) and more [...]. Also the director makes completely ridiculous situations seem normal, such as the camp leader getting hit by lightning and then acting completely weird, the counsellors buying 47203 boxes of condoms (there's only so much sex you can have in 40 days...), the whole "Don't-touch-me Todd" thing, and so on and so forth.This movie isn't worth the $2 I paid to rent it. Those who think this is better than the American Pie series should go out more. American Pie was a work of art, this is a piece of [...]
waste of money. Dont purchase episode 5 of season 2, it's 7 minutes long and you dont get any of the Charlie Murphy Prince story.  WTF!!!  Can someone fix this and refund or offer the entire episode for re-download!!!
so many gaps in the story. This movie is the story of a gay Cuban writer who eventually makes it to the U.S. to escape the persecution he's suffered in Cuba. And that's about all that can be inferred from this movie. There are large chunks that are spoken in a different language. But there are no English subtitles so you have no idea at all what's going on. This disrupts the already choppy flow of the movie so that it has almost no cohesiveness at all. Whatever the message of this movie is, whatever it's trying to convey, it's lost in the plotless story
Throw plausibility out the window in this stinker. We went to see this at the time when we went to see any horror flick, much less anyting with Jamie Lee Curtis. It came out just about the time when every holiday was getting a horror movie named after it. Whether the movies promised to be good or bad, we went and had fun with them either way. This one we had fun in how bad it was. This was one of those, "picked on, pencil necked geek gets pushed over the edge by a cruel prank, only to come back with genius killer skills, somehow attained super strength and the speed of the Road Runner to get from one end of a train to the other to pull of impossilbie kills aided only by clever camera play." In short, there's nothing to be believed in this stinker. LIke a "Friday the 13th" flick, you merely wait for the kills, and try to outguess the next guy as to how it ends, and pray for that to come as soon as possible. The movie pulls out the stops, giving us Curtis for eye candy and David Copperfield to amaze us, perhaps even toy with us as to him as a possible suspect. But in general, this movie insults the viewers intelligence and lures you with a hope for a "Halloween" type thriller. There's too much stupidity from the victims, oh, until one genius finally puts 2 and 2 together. There's too much "not acting on a possible emergency situation in unison." And given her presence, there's just not enough Jamie Lee to make this crock worth sitting through. We had a gas picking this movie apart in the theatre. It made us callous for the impending onslaught of slasher flicks to follow in the 80s that got worse, more predictable, and far too numerous to maintain our interest. This movie got that ball rolling. Don't waste your time. You'll get more excitement out of watching Jamie Lee's finger nails dry for a couple hours
Poor support. This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet
Mommie Dearest...home for the holidays!. Every so often, Thomas Bezucha`s "The Family Stone"  injects itself with a dose of reality about the modern liberal family - that intellectual, caustic, "progressive," argumentative, often matriarchal nuclear unit with imperfections not unlike the conservative "family values" crew. Selfishness. Materialism. Pettiness. Depression. Noise. Veiled cruelty toward the black sheep of the group, which, in this case, is the one most interested in pleasing his parents.But this movie is not really sincere about the realities of such a family - it's serious about it, all right, but not sincere. It is a Christmas family mosaic where everybody gathers round the twelve-seat dining table of a nine-bedroom house for a seven-course meal to assume their roles and pick on The Prodigal Son's new girlfriend. It is also a button-pushing, shameless picture that insists we like that shrill, pushy Diane Keaton persona more or less because her character is dying of cancer. Keaton plays one of those "full of it" moms - falsely hip, falsely sage,  constantly yelling and hugging and pitching fits and hogging the stage - so accustomed  is she to this domestic tyranny that when the girlfriend calls her on it, we get a scene I couldn`t quite believe.Back to that in a minute. "The Family Stone" assembles a large cast for its tale: Keaton is Sybil; Craig T. Nelson is husband Kelly; Dermot Mulroney is the parent-pleaser Everett, Luke Wilson is the laid-back  Ben; Ty Giordano is the gay, deaf Thad. And Rachel McAdams slums (just a little) as mommy's academic daughter Amy, who sincerely (yet inexplicably) dislikes Everett's  straight-laced fiance Meredith (Sarah Jessica Parker) as much she will eventually like Meredith's sister Julie (Claire Danes), who arrives midway through and enraptures Everett, who`s 16 years older."She does this thing with her throat," Amy says of Meredith's phlegm-clearing tic. Meredith cannot  relax, and the Stones' idea of hospitality is to let their guest know how hospitable they could be - if only she would make herself at home. Sybil and Amy take their snarky turns on Meredith. Sybil stares wistfully out the window awaiting the mid-movie revelation that she's dying. Mulroney puts on his Mulroney Face - think Stallone in mild anguish - while Everett wrestles with it all. Kelly and Ben eat marijuana brownies at the high school football field. Ben looks at Meredith as if he'd like to see if she loosens up drunk. Three potato chips if you've guessed she loosens up drunk.It leads to and falls away from that moment at the dinner table when Ty's homosexuality is thrown around for some tired, liberal humor. Ty and his boyfriend (Brian White) intend to adopt children, and Meredith asks a sincere question of nature vs. nurture, which Sybil bombastically turns into a mini-skit on how she wished all her sons had been gay, a plenty-ignorant thing to say, deliberately said for effect, which Meredith misses. Thus Meredith's second question: "Do you really mean that?"What Bezucha writes next is fascinating, if brutal and unfair. The entire family dives into Meredith - it climaxes with Sybil literally cursing the girl to hell - while Ty, a saint by now, mists at the notion that maybe he, a deaf, gay man, has had a life he may not have wished on his brothers. Meredith is a stiff and suit, sure, but that "The Family Stone"  actually brings her back into the fold after such a humiliation speaks of its intention to preach and convert.Of what? Hard to say. That gays should adopt children? That blowhards are better than the sincere because they`re dying and judgmental in the right ways? That all can be forgiven with, fittingly, an old photograph of the mother in her ninth month of pregnancy? That we should worship at the altar of human imperfection? That the movie is really a veiled tribute to the mother Bezucha either had or wished for? If so, well, I did not have. And I do not wish
so-so. I never cared much for the soundtrack aside from a few tracks. this Film was wack the Acting,Directing. but the Story Line was cool. in fact if someone knew how to put this together with a stronger Cast this Film would have been interesting.this Film flip flopped Time Periods&it hurt it's cause.I will give Prince Props though for being a Black Film Director back at a time when it was really rare&truth be told in 2004 it ain't that much better on a whole
Should be forgotten. As along time fan of Paddy Chayefsky, I found "Altered States", his first novel, terribly disappointing. The film was, in my view, utterly dismal. The only reason I would recommend it, would be as an example of "hack movie making". If it were the only criteria to judge the talent of either Chayefsky or Russell, both would be relegated to obscurity
Not good, but what other choice do you have. First of all, I would like to start off by saying that this movie sucks.  Here are a few of the things that supports my decision. 1. Dacascos does not know Capoeira. He played the berimbau (an insrument used in Capoeira) wrong, he pronouced many of the terms incorrectly, and he had no flow to his movements.  2. The acting was horrible.  While watching this, you kind of get the picture that the director wanted to finish this movie a soon as possible.  Most of the lines were just stupid.  Dacascos character had no real history.  apparently had this mysterious past you really could care less about because the plot was so predictable. 3. The fighting was laughable at best.  Capoeira is the only martial art that was outlawed for being so violent and unstoppable.  You don't need corny fight scenes to show it's usefulness.  Most of the fight scenes where repeated movements that were shot at different angles.  Dacascos was doing meia lua's (a spinning kick in which both hands are on the ground as you strike) that were knocking out three people at once.  In one ridiculous scene, Saverio (the drug lord) pointed to where he wanted Dacascos to stand so that he could miraculously appear behind him and perform and unchallenged jumping kick to the back of his head.  I wish an experinced Capoeirista would have done the fight scenes.  Although this movie was horrible, it is the only movie in which Capoeira is suppose to be the main artform used. While watching this movie, one can only hope that this poor performance dosen't hurt Capoeira's chances at being the cornerstone of another movie.
Good but not great. I guess I expected more out of this movie but I confess I was mildly disappointed in it. At first, the movie seems to be having a hard time making up its mind whether to be a comedy or a drama and the resulting mish mash is a bit unsettling. Still, it was a great cast; Dean Martin was particularly adept at westerns, much more so than Frank Sinatra, who pretty much plays Frank Sinatra in this one. It is fun to see the two of them compete for the ladies, in this case, Anita Ekberg and Ursula Andress. The bad guys are well represented by Victor Buono and Charles Bronson. A fun movie but not particularly memorable.
a convoluted mess. did not like this movie,except for the acting which was it's only redeeming quality. this movie jumps all over the place and after a while i just gave up trying to follow it,although i did watch it to the end,hoping it would end up making sense.boy was i wrong.was never so happy to see end credits roll. i do not recommend this movie unless you are one of those people who can keep track of ten things at once.if you are,you'll love it.otherwise don't waste your time
I couldn't even finish it. I love Alice, and I love low-budget works full of heart, but this production was so relentlessly mediocre that I just couldn't bear to finish it. The songs are lifeless and as poorly paced as the rest of the performance, and the script lacks any spirit; overall this production adds nothing new to the story, yet fails to convey the charm of the book (or, for that matter, nearly any other production I've seen). As another reviewer mentioned, the DVD itself is unimpressive - the chapters are, as near as I could tell, either random or simply timed, without regard to content. If this production is a familiar favorite from your childhood, it may be worth something (unless the DVD transfer is as disappointing as it seemed to me); if you're looking for something new, look elsewhere.
to much bark, not enough bite. i had heard of cannibal ferox for quite some time before watching it. i heard that it was the most violent film ever made. i enjoyed umberto lenzis eaten alive and thought this would be even better. i was dead wrong. cannibal ferox is a boring, unpleasent film that definatly doesnt live up to its infamous reputation. im not saying that cannibal ferox isnt gory or violent but i cant see how it was ever banned in 31 countrys. the few gore scenes are pretty effective, but that dosnt make up for the films many many flaws. if it was for giovanni lombardo radice[one of my favorite italian horror actors] starring in it, cannibal ferox would only earn 1 star.
This Waiting Waiting Waiting is Tough. At the end of this film Gene Hackman's character, strung out thanks to his surveillance heavy lifestyle, finally snaps and pulls apart his house in search of a mythical bug. This scene concludes an examination of the psychological toll that surveillance takes not only on the listen-ee but also the listener. Hackman plays Harry Caul, a surveillance expert who is at the top of his field. He gets assigned a mysterious conversation that he has to piece together throughout the film. More interesting to me was to see all the little ways that his job affected his life. He staunchly defends privacy, even though it is his job to invade it. He refuses to open up to people because he is paranoid that anything he says will be used against him. I know that today it is very fashionable to criticize Bush and his wire tapping program but this film only piles on. The chilling affect we watch take place in the world of Harry Caul is a microcosm for what is happening in our world today. Simply because you are aware of Bush's spying ways causes you to engage in self-censorship every time you send an email or talk on a cell phone. Harry deals with the reality of his situation by descending into madness, and while that may not be healthy I'm not going to be the one to say that he is handling it the wrong way.While there are lessons here that deal with living in Bush's America, this still isn't a very good film. This is a much smaller scale than Coppola usually deals with and it doesn't seem to be a very good fit for him. The script was original and unpredictable. However, it was also slow and filled with nonsense. I watched the film twice and still don't have a firm grasp on what happened at the end. Also, the scene in which we visit Harry's twisted dream was a total miss for me. The purpose was to show just had mad he had gone. To me it looked like Coppola losing control of his script and inserting a scene which only served to take the viewers out of the film. Hackman gives a good performance which was the norm for him pre-"Unforgiven."  A dashing Harrison Ford is trotted out to remind us of just how old he has gotten. Still, this film falls flat.Most of the film involves Harry trying to figure out the entire conversation. The tools he is using look downright quaint compared to what we know Big Brother is using today. I liked the way this film reminded me of "Rear Window." As in that film we watch as a lonely man has his imagination run away from him. It is a theme that affects us in our daily lives. Every story we hear has holes and lies in it. We have to fill those holes and sort out the BS to come to a perceived reality. But what if we're wrong? Nobody likes being called paranoid and nobody likes to be asleep at the wheel. If for no other reasons watch this film to explore these ideas. Then think about whether your communication behavior is paranoid or ignorant, and whether your Ok with your cell phone coming with a built in bug. **1/2
Watch the Original. An EXACT copy of Ang Lee's wonderful &quot;Eat Drink Man Woman&quot;.  Frankly what annoyed me here was I watched this one first.. I just finished watching Eat Drink.. it took me about 15 minutes to realize I was watching an exact copy of something I'd already seen a couple years ago. Anyway, I was annoyed because while I could predict events in Eat Drink because I'd seen Tortilla Soup, Eat Drink was clearly the better movie -- so unfortunately it spoiled some of the pleasure of Eat Drink for me. If you haven't seen either, see the better of the two (exact same stories): Eat Drink Man Woman
My House in Umbria. DVD would not play. DVD stuck and would not go forward
Dissapointing. This DVD is a complete rip off, the performance is more focussed on Bonos sunglasses, with a camera in his sun glasses of all things, keep it simple and exciting, that means proper editing. Its oviuous this editor should'nt be editing any shows what so ever and needs lessons as to how to tell a story to an audience. We are not at the show, so stop trying to create an atmosphere, of swishing shots, because the atmosphere for the viewers is the flaming living room, and your job is to bring something into the room, not try and pull you in, with disasterous effects - what? A great big switch of OFF on the remote and a $13 dollar cash in at the second hand store. Thnak you very much - for Nothing
Dismayingly bad. It's not just that If lucy Fell is a bad film. 90% of what comes out of Hollywood is uninspired, formulaic dross just like it, and usually you can just shrug it off and forget about it. What makes this movie memorably, remarkably bad is writer/director/star Eric Schaeffer's nauseatingly immense sense of self-regard, which arises from every frame like the stench of yesterday's roadkill. The mere fact that the photogenically-challenged Mr. Schaeffer should have the likes of Elle MacPherson tell him he's "cute" speaks volumes
Spend a couple hours of your life with 7 vile people. Of all the hateful self-centered characters and idiotic plot lines in this movie, the one I found most offensive was the one involving Emilio Estevez/Andie MacDowell.  Isn't stalking hilarious?  And isn't Kirby the cutest obsessed stalker you've ever seen?  I bet stalking victims everywhere wish their stalker was a lovable as little Kirby.I also loved at the end when Ally Sheedy tells Andrew McCarthy and Judd Nelson that she just wants them "all to be friends".  To which they both reply the classic cinema line, "Ehhhh... ok."  Wow.  Now that's drama.
Children, lend me your ears. "Children of the Corn" had some potential: a "corn" cult for children with a charismatic adolescent as its leader takes over a rural town in Nebraska. Based on a short story by Stephen King, this is a fairly interesting and unusual concept. Unfortunately, some very weak execution is what mars the movie. Its director, Fritz Kiersch, sometimes works as "Alan Smithee," the pseudonym for directors who don't want to attach their real names to movies they know are turkeys. This movie doesn't quite warrant that, though it isn't very good either. There is scarcely anything more pathetic than a movie that claims to be frightening, yet simply is not. Most egregious is the use of hokey, faux sacred music. Aside from Linda Hamilton, John Franklin and Robbie Kiger, the performances are pretty weak. It doesn't help that some of the dialogue is laughably bad and that some of the special effects are cheap and look awful. Isaac Chroner (Franklin) instructs the children of the town to murder all but one adult, who is apparently needed to warn potential visitors against entering the town. His advice nearly prevents Vicky and Burt Stanton from seeking medical help there, but darker forces prevail and the couple finds itself fending off attacks from the kids. If the excessively dramatic acting and cheesy effects at the climax do not make you laugh, the incredibly lame final scene certainly will. That is not to say this movie is all bad, however. Though never scary, there are a few effective moments throughout. (I don't want to reveal any of them because they would be the only reasons for watching the movie)  Die hard horror fans might want to check out this 1984 release, though fans of good movies will probably want to steer clear. This Anchor Bay DVD is anamorphic widescreen with good picture and sound, though this is not the director's cut.
Didn't work. I downloaded the player and this episode as part of a promotion that gave a free episode. Not only did I get charged, but when I cancelled the download to contact about the charge - I was told I had to finish downloading before they could refund. Once it finished downloading, it didn't play anyway. I gave up.
terrible. This movie was terrible doesn't begin to explain it.  It's a vampire movie that follows none of the rules.  They don't have to be asked to let in.  No attacking them with silver or stake through the heart.  Just shoot em up.  Also the plot seems to randomly occur.  I would give it 0 stars if possible
fading, fading, gone. This movie is great if you want to go to sleep and you ran out of boring books. Ethan Hawke leans to heavily on Kris Kristofferson's performances not to mention Jeff Tweedy's music. As a matter of fact the only gleaming light in the movie is the music. It is written interestingly enough, but the visuals look like there wasn't enough money in the budget to clean up the cheap video that it was shot on. The best way to watch this movie is in the background. You don't need the visuals, and if you dare watch them you will get dreary eyed and fade away
Cigarette commercial. This movie is slow, boring, and poorly acted and even worse it was a constant stream of every actor in every scene talking about and smoking CONSTANTLY!! It was so distracting that I could not even finish the movie. I mean I am pretty sure the novel did not have pages and pages of characters smoking- I realize this is a timepiece but come on- who financed this movie? Phillip Morris!!??
For die hard Kutcher fans only. The movie starts off very slowly, with childhood episodes from Ashton Kutcher's character.  It's at least 1/2 an hour before we see the adult Kutcher, although he does appear at the very beginning for a brief scene.  The premise is good, and it has some good momentum in the middle, which is why I gave it two stars.  The shifting situations of his life and the lives of his friends are interesting and well done, but the overall story line is very weak, and the ending is dreadful and not supported by most of the rest of the story.  Also, the movie has too many tongue-in-cheek references to Kutcher's real life circumstances -- such as the reference to "tighty-whities."  They distract from the story, and make the movie more of a vanity vehicle -- which is too bad -- If you are not a Kutcher convert and are just looking for a movie, skip this one
over edited, and badly too. This show is probably a thousand times better in person, than on video.  I couldn't say if I agree that the dancing is good, because I never got to see enough of it at once to know.  There are so many changes in camera angle, from feet to face to distance and back again and from all areas of the stage, that I got a headache.  It's too bad; I bet if this had been done properly it'd be great viewing
Do not waste your time or money, see the original. Do not waste your time or money, see the original. Once in awhile, a remake of a movie from another culture works; for example, Seven Samurai becomes "Magnificant Seven" -- Most of the time, the remake is trash. The original "La Femme Nikita" is a great movie: exciting with a strong political viewpoint; this version is simply Hollywood pablum
What about the missing episodes. Why should one buy this series? What about the missing episodes? Are they going to be added later, or this is it? I cannot believe this. Would you buy a bicycle with a missing wheel? Or a keyboard without the C and R keys? I'd like Amazon to explain its customers what it plans to do..
What about the missing episodes. Why should one buy this series? What about the missing episodes? Are they going to be added later, or this is it? I cannot believe this. Would you buy a bicycle with a missing wheel? Or a keyboard without the C and R keys? I'd like Amazon to explain its customers what it plans to do..
Stupid, dumb , idiotic and vulgar!. This is the all-time WORST movie I've ever seen! I can'tbelieve how stupid it was! How some people think this is greatfilm is WAAAAAAAAAAAAAY beyond me! It's a total snore-fest!Plus it had way too much sexual humor!Don't waste your time on this awful movie!
Zurian. Good Grief...I know this is supposed to be a classic and all but is this the best the producers could do? Maybe I'm missing the point but I've seen better "C" category movies...what's up with the one robot mass invasion? How did they get here? What shot down the military planes? I could even see the eyes of the person inside the tin foil outfit...the characters seem to stay neatly cleaned and pressed throughout, or maybe that's part of the fun...well ha ha...
DEATH OF COMMON SENSE. It's hard for me to believe that so many people think this is a brilliant and startling film.  How could you not know that eating so much fast food is unhealthy?   If this film is considered groundbreaking then I fear for our Republic
I GIVE IT ONE STAR ONLY BECAUSE RALPH FIENNES IS IN IT. This movie has been terribly hyped-up, for reasons unbeknownst to me, perhaps politically, I presume, in the usual Hollywood fashion.  It has got to be one of the most slow-moving, boring, uninteresting movies I have had the pain of having to waste my time on ~ while attempting to sit through it.  However, the one and only good thing about it is that Ralph Fiennes is in it ~ but that is all.  Don't waste your money and time on this dud, as I'm sorry I did
Bad porn. The setting of this film is in the late 70s, just before adult movie theatres were driven out of business by the invention of the VCR and the subsequent explosion of pornographic VHS tapes.  Burt Reynolds plays a porno director who has the effrontry to try and be "artistic" in his craft.  Heather Graham plays his psycho-starlet, and Mark Wahlberg plays a porn star who is....well.....let's just say, endowed.Wahlberg's character quickly becomes a huge hit and encounters success he would have never dreamed of. Wahlberg's character seems to be a sort of oblique allusion to John Holmes, although I don't know if the film-makers would admit as much.   At any rate, he becomes arrogant and begins to believe that he is loved for factors other than his "package."  This hubris leads to his un-doing as the world of porn coalesces with the world of drugs and LOTS of shady characters.This sounds like it would be the framework for a good movie.  Well, it could have been, but all the way through there seems to be something missing.  There are times the film "seems" to try and convey a message, but I'm not really sure.One thing I do know is that I quickly remembered why I've never cared for Wahlberg.  He has all the screen presence of a bowl of yogurt.   Also, I was expecting a LOT more skin than what the film delivered.  Given the context of the film, one would think that it would be an excuse to parade miles of topless women.  That's simply not the case.In the end, however, the biggest problem of this movie isn't Wahlberg or the lack of nudity.  The difficulty is that it's just plain boring.  I have more than a passing interest in the history of porn, and yet this flick failed to grab me
Not Much Plot & Poor Editing - Avoid. Avoid this one. The bad reviews are not kidding. The plot is almost non-existent. The action scenes are not enough to make up for the poor editing. The writing has drawn the characters very thinly. Sadly, a reason to watch this movie is to be amused at how badly it is put together
Age inappropriate. Opera is intended to be seen - a true multi-media art. But a fascinatingly perfect stage setting aside, this is one production better heard than seen. Sonically, the performances please, but this rates as one of the more visually disturbing casts I have witnessed.A 58-year-old Plcido Domingo is simply unconvincing as a young soldier. Aprile Millo, as a well-fed version of the Ethiopian slave girl (in ridiculous black face), Aida, defies the costumers' best attempts to provide a waist line. And Dolora Zaijick mirrors a middle-aged matron more than the Egyptian princess Amneris.A fine performance by the ballet troup only draws attention to age and fitness disparities. Like an emperor, the Metropolitan Opera stands as a respected authority. Perhaps this is the impetus behind overenthusiastic curtain calls which prolong the end of each act, but the emperor has no clothes - or at least they need ironing.These are the type of miscastings which turn neophytes off to the idea of opera. Huge fans of these performers who can suspend disbelief may well be pleased, but those craving contextually appropriate performances will find this one age inappropriate
Poirot should have detected this remake really Sucked. Really rushed and other than Suchet ... the acting was terrible by most of the cast.
Great movie, lousy DVD. While this is a great movie, this DVD reproduction does it severe injustice. The sound track is out of sync and the production quality of the DVD is marginal
bunch of rich middle aged white people whining. hey get real people, the worl isnt the way you want it? get over it. I am in my late thirties, going to night school, taking care of elderly relatives and worrying about the bills. Wish i was rich so i could whine about unfair life i
Terrible. This movie was all action and no story..worst movie I have seen in years
a poor man's above the rim. Fredro Starr is a good actor.in fact what ever happened to the group Onyx? but this film is cliched and Predictable.Rhea Perlman looks out of place.this is a 2nd tier Above The Rim
The Constant Gardener. I'm starting to appreciate John LeCarre novels more than I did when he was all over the bestseller list. This film version of one was acted well, but in 30 minutes there just wasn't anything to engage my interest. Not its characters and not its plot. A good cause worth building a story around, but not this story. I quit watching, so I guess I could be wrong, but I doubt it.
Big Bird too whiney. I bought this DVD for my daughter who is from China and though I think Xiao Foo is adorable, I am disappointed by Big Bird's behavior. Not only does he seem frustrated every time the slightest thing does not go his way, but he tells Barkley at one point to "sic" the Monkey King and then later, again frustrated, tells the Monkey King to put his dukes up (as if to fight to resolve the issue). I am appalled by this.  Big Bird is also somewhat demeaning to the Chinese people he encounters--they don't understand him because he is speaking English and rather than explain the language barrier, he just gets upset. I love Sesame Street, and although I will keep this DVD to hear Xiao Foo sing in Chapter 7 (our daughter just loves her), I feel I will need to use Big Bird's behavior as an example of how not to act
Corny, Predictable, Blah..... Don't bother with this unfunny, predictable, boring, pedestrian, fingerpainted drivel.  The piggy stole the show
weird translation. as I remember when i watched the original chinese version, although it wasnt any big deal but I did like it as I remember, but this version is totally destroy that feeling, something about the translation is just bad to the core makes the movie like a piece of crap, especially some sound effect. Why don't they put the original track in it I hard can understand. if u can find some asian version and rewatch it u would agree with me. it worth my 3 stars with the original trac
Post - war propaganda. This film was probably made not to entertain the audience, but more to show as much as possible the reality of the terrible agresion on Bosnia. But it does so for a small part only, showing the Bosniaks and Serbs living together peacefuly before the agresion. With the begin of hostilities this film leaves its half-folkloral nature and becomes a pure propaganda movie of serbian nationalists. Its attempt to blind the viewer, hoping he never watchs news or read a newspaper, is amaturelike and fails not only through its fake of reality, but also through poor cinematografic form. The dialogs are poor and the actors definitely not worth the theme of the movie. Handfull of interesting phrases and few fleshes of situation are by far not enough to save the movie from the abyss. The handling shows several onlogical moments. And as a concept of &quot;we all suffered and we Serbs did not start the war&quot; it only makes a serious and average informed viewer laughing. This movie does not entertain at all, and shows the events as unrealistic as any B - movie about Vietnamwar. And about facts it shows only that there are very unserious and nationalistic directors and producers in Serbia. My rating is absolutely thumb down. Comparing with, for example, No Man's Land this motion picture is failing in everything that makes movies about war a potential time window about occurences in former Yugoslavia. Instead to jump into the minds of people that participated the war, You can only get an idea of dogma that the director is trying to spread by making this underaverage movie
Yikes and eww... I have friends who might be into this stuff, if only because they like the old and the strange. Me, I'm just like -- Is this "It's a Wonderful Life"?I think I might have enjoyed this more if it was a novel or maybe if I picked up the script. As it is, this just barely seems to translate into a movie, and--forgive me for I have my own opinion--"City of Angels" was a good movie. Too bad if you don't like all this "contemporary nonsense." I feel like it worked.My opinion: it's long, it's boring, it's hard to hear. Even if it has a message, I just can't relate to it. So maybe that's my problem.Your opinion: your own. keep it. you're lucky I gave it two stars
i would go lower than i one if it were possible. this may easily be one of the dumber movies made in the last hundred years.  and there were a lot of them.  this definitely ranks up in the 10%-tile
This is Horrible. I love the Avatar and I was so thrilled that amazon allows people to download it except the only problem is I've been trying for the past days and darn it all, it's not working!!! It's not as if I'm downloading it for free. I am willing to pay and yet it just wouldn't go through!!! I think it's better to just buy the dvds...I think it's absolutely horrible to tease customers like that..
Same Thing. The Dane Cook episode is the same one that it on his "Harmful If Swallowed" c.d. The c.d. also has the uncensored version of this routine that is over 1 hour long. The one star rating is not based on the content. It is based upon Amazon not sharing this fact with customers
NOT THE JAPANESE SERIES. I just would like to thank the person from Seattle, WA who discovered that this DVD is NOT the one that airs on the Food Network, which is what my husband and I LOVE.  Like the reviewer from Seattle, I agree that Amazon should provide more information regarding DVD because I would have been seriously upset to receive what I thought was the Japanese version only to see William Shatner - yuck
Survivor Rip Off. I have bought 2 seasons of Survivor on unbox and both of them are not complete. Very dissapointing. Guatemala  episode 11 is from a completely different season and it is missing the last 2 episodes and the reunion show. Just leaves you hanging. Exile Island is missing the final episode it just goes from the competition between Danielle and Cirie for a spot in the final 3 to the live reunion show
I WAS FOOLED BY THE DVD ART!. Ok though I can't find the actual version of this DVD on amazon.com that I own I'm going to warn you anyway..So I am at the local pawn shop and I see a DVD titled GRAVEYARD TRAMPS and it's all colored with black and purple HOT TOPIC style fonts and a very attractive goth girl on the front standing in a graveyard.Now don't get me wrong I knew I wasn't picking up a piece of cinematic gold.. but I did not get what I expected.. I expected a modern cheezy low budget film about maybe zombies or just psycho girls in a graveyard.. GOTH GIRLS in a graveyard.. as the cover art depicted..I knew it would be low budget I knew it would be [...].. but oh well I have an addiction for sexy young goth women.So I get home put the DVD in and to my dissapointment I have a 70's cheese fest about naked better homes and garden type housewives sexing men to death..I have yet to watch it past the first ten minutes.. and that was pretty liquored up.. so I can't judge if this movie is good or not..maybe I'll get comatose and make it through the whole thing..I can say the visuals remind me of the original STEPFORD WIVES.sooooo don't be fooled by stock photos and creepy goth cover art.. I guess that's the moral of this story!
boring, overrated. I never saw this film in the theater, so I can't be completely sure that this is how it's supposed to look. But, assuming that the DVD transfer is accurate, I find all the praise for Kore-eda's "painterly" visuals completely undeserved. The film is shot entirely with natural light; so, in the daytime indoor scenes, the glare from windows and doorways blots out or silhouettes everything; and in the nightime indoor scenes, everything is murky and underexposed. It all looks horribly amateurish. The outdooor scenes come off somewhat better, but slightly grainy overall, almost as if they had been shot on a digital camera.Cinematography (and possible bad transfer) aside, there's also the matter of Kore-eda's excessively static direction. I can appreciate the still, quiet camera work of Ozu or Jarmusch, but Kore-eda takes this style and pushes it to ridiculous lengths. His camera NEVER moves, not even for an occasional cut or panning or tracking shot. It just sits there, dull and inert, while the scenes drag on and on and then abruptly end, almost arbitrarily. I guess this technique is supposed to impart a contemplative effect to a scene, but again, it just seems amateurish.The performance by fashion-model-turned-actress Makiko Esumi, as the grieving young widow Yumiko, reflects the director's numb, soporific visual style. Instead of being quietly torn by grief, she comes across as merely affectless. Maybe the director wanted to use a zombie-like non-actress and comatose camera work to convey the numbness of grief, but the result is far from edifying or moving or even interesting. The ultimate effect of this movie is only stupefying boredom.
Super-awful. It gets two stars for the unintentional comedy. Other than that, it's one of the worst of the ultra-cheesy, predictable, low-budget horror movies from the early nineties. The FX are funny at first, but then they just go on and on and on and the sucking takes over from the comedy. The acting is uniformly terrible, and one has to image that the typically enjoyable Barrymore is just glad to have this ridiculous part of her career well behind her
Survivor Rip Off. I have bought 2 seasons of Survivor on unbox and both of them are not complete. Very dissapointing. Guatemala  episode 11 is from a completely different season and it is missing the last 2 episodes and the reunion show. Just leaves you hanging. Exile Island is missing the final episode it just goes from the competition between Danielle and Cirie for a spot in the final 3 to the live reunion show
Not the best of John Carpenter. This film is really sad. Sad because if you look at it closely you can find a lot of good ideas ultimately ruined by poor delivery. And knowing this is written and directed by John Carpenter, I have to wonder why it isn't any better.In a Mars of the future, a team of police are going to a mining village to get a prisoner and escort him back to civilization for trial. Upon arriving they find the village mysteriously empty. Investigating further they find corpses hanging from the cielings, weird objects. As they try to do their mission they realize that some strange force has overtaken the miners, who have begun killing people, wearing their flesh, and having savage, native-like tendencies. The force controlling them? Weird ghosts released from an ancient tomb, ghosts that go into the human body to control them. Killing the person will only release them to go into another.Wait wait wait...a weird alien force that possesses people and turns them against the heroes and when the person is killed it goes into someone else? That's "The Thing!" And wait...a drugged up force of psychos attacking people in a building? That's "Assault on Precint 13!" John Carpenter - you're ripping off yourself!One problem I had was some serious miscasting. Pam Grier was wrong for this role - it's not that I don't think she can act, I just think she's unbelievable as the leader of a combat squad. Natasha Henstridge was another bad choice, because I really could not believe her as a strong heroine. Hollywood needs to realize really skinny women with model-bodies generally cannot do much in a fist fight. In "Species" it was OK because her attractive exterior was just that - and exterior - but here we're supposed to believe as she (quite often very laughably) beats up all these people five times stronger than her. If you still disagree with me, try to imagine Calista Flockhart beating up the Rock.I also have to say that John Carpenter's filmmaking, usually fitting to the subject matter, is in this incredibly annoying. For one, whenever characters are walking down a hallway or approaching something they will dissolve between different points of the scene - what was the point? Also, consider that this story is essentially one big flashback, told by Natasha; some parts are still taken from other character's perspective as told to Natasha's character - some parts still are taken from accounts from accounts told to Natasha's character! That's right - some parts of this movie are flashbacks within flashbacks within flashbacks. Also, the "ghost p.o.v" was just ridiculous: imagine taking normal film and giving it a weird, wavy red tint.Besides all this, there were some little moments of "ingenuity," and I've composed a list detailing them.* Mars has a weaker gravity than Earth, being smaller than our own planet.* Women are supposedly the dominant gender now. Then why do all the male characters still act egotistical? Shouldn't men be subservient and the women forceful now?* While looking at a vehicle with a struggling man inside, Pam Grier hears a noise, yells "Who goes there?" and walks off. Natasha Henstridge doesn't notice her leaving and doesn't see where she goes...even though she's like FIVE FEET AWAY FROM HER!* We find out Ice Cube has taken the shotgun from one of the rookies, who claims he was "too fast." Ice Cube was like ten feet away from him - did he move with super sonic speed?* During the Jericho flashback, when he goes to find Pam Grier, he takes a few steps from the vehicle and sees a crazed native carrying Pam Grier's head. This means within the minute and a half that happened between Pam walking off and Jericho looking for her, a native ambushed her, cut off her head, and all RIGHT BY THE SCENE!* In a stand-off between miners and the police, the miners say, "Drop your guns!" and the police, despite outnumbering them and having superior firepower, do so. This is the classic "Drop 'em!" rule of movies: whoever says "Drop your weapons!" first, the other group HAS to do it.* I find it amazing in movies that no matter how far in the future you get, radios are still crappy, never go far in distance, and are always easily clouded by a dust storm or any other large form of nature.* Here's great military strategery: you're outnumbered by a larger enemy and your route of departure is late, so instead of defending your only way out you charge into your larger enemy allowing yourself to get surrounded and your route cut off.* A guy crawling on the ground grabs a stick of dynamite, and when it blows up it propels him forward headfirst in the air...wait what?* If the ghosts take over the bodies of whoever attacked its host, then how come when Ice Cube and Natasha Henstridge are taking out like thirty of the possessed humans there aren't thirty ghosts coming after them?* Ghosts can't go through doors and walls, by the way.* The film gives a cliche plot turn: "Let's go home." / "No. We have to go back and kill them all." Uh...wouldn't it be simpler to go back to your superiors, tell them what happened, and have them bomb the place instead of doing it yourself? Oh wait, then the film would be over.* Is it just me or do a lot of characters get hit by spears and sharp objects and the weapons don't actually STICK into them?* Why is it everytime a grenade goes off near someone, the resulting blast makes them hop? Yes, HOP.I'm having trouble believing this was done by the same guy who did "Big Trouble In Little China," "Escape from New York," and "Halloween." I hate to say it, but "Ghosts of Mars" has the look and feel of a Sci-Fi Channel original film. At the same time I want to like this because I've always been a John Carpenter fan, because I like how a lot of these sets seemed traditional instead of poorly done CG, and as previously stated I liked a lot of the ideas. Its sad to see the movie come out like this, but it just goes to show you that everything that looks good on paper can be undone by a bad script
Ah..... huh??. What the ----.  "A tale of revenge"?  Why does everyone in their review say that?  B/c it's written on the box cover??  This is an interesting and compelling movie, but w/ a very odd, abrupt ending that leaves you hitting the "REWIND" button and saying, "what a minute, is it OVER??  Did I miss something??"Afte watching this, I scoured the internet, Wikipeida, and Amazon...still no reviewer seems able to say what was meant by the ending of this film.  My takeaway on it -- she is going to hang, and die (go to heaven);  he is going to stay on Earth..but maybe when they meet again (heaven), they can get married.  ??????How come no one else can come up w/ a definitive meaning to the end of this film?  Subtlety is great, but not if it's so damn ambiguous that NOBODY in the universe seems to be able to define or explain what this film was all about.  It was NOT about revenge.  Maybe it was about love and obsession and sadness and the silliness of despair.Sorry, can't really recommend this one!
Cant watch. I downloaded this program and it was garbled and video as if played in slow motion.  This is the first of two downloads that didn't play.  I know it was not my computer because I did download three that played ok
Really Really Really Bad. Off-hand, I can't think of a worse movie. (And I think Nicolas Cage has done some truly awesome work in other films--hey, he's making a buck, here.) That's all. 1/32 star, if possible
Trite. The Fridays gang steals some diamonds.  Mike Epps is not Chris Tucker no matter how hard he tries to be.  His constant whinning is enough to ride my last nerve.  Plus, everything about the movie is just campy and just wholly unbelieveable that I don't know where to begin.  Whatever you do don't buy or rent this garbage-wait to catch it on TBS or something
Confused. I like Japanese films, and really wanted to like this one. However I must say there are a lot of confusing parts to the plot. Now I have read this is going to be part of a trilogy one day. If that is true I might give it a higher rating. As of now however, there are just a lot of things that don't make sense
Heartburn  or  Men..beware ! Most women only want to breed !. This movie made me sick to my stomach. Here we have a woman like Nora Ephron, a woman with professional job skills and talent and when she marries, she turns into a needy, desperate women whom evidently believes her own self-worth is determined by having babies, one after another. I ususally love all of Meryl's movies, but I could not stand seeing her turn into a needy, always pregnant &quot;homemaker&quot;. If I were a man, I would have run awary screaming, too
UnBox video not yet working. Will not play once video was downloaded. I get the error message:  "can not play file, please try again later. error# 0x80040273" I made the exlusive give me call me back feature but the UnBox department was already closed, I was told the UnBox Saturday and Sunday 6-5 hours. I have to say I am impressed with the Call back feature. I downloaded the Unbox Beta now and am recieving email assistance to try to resolve the problem. Thanks Amazon UnBox! I will Update again - Feb. 10,200
DVD PUT IT ON DVD. I DONT WONT TO DOWNLOAD IT I WONT IT ALL ON DVD THIS IS WASTE MONE
WARNING: Wrong Episode!. This item is supposedly titled "UFOs: The First Encounters." It is, however, an episode about reincarnation. It is incorrectly labeled. DO NOT PURCHASE unless you are looking for an episode on reincarnation
BORING. We read this book in ILA and it was so boring! The character had no emotions and it was very slow moving with no excitement. I almost fell asleep. DON'T READ THIS BOO
to the writer of the review entitled "an especially prescient film". The many toubled, undemocratic areas of Africa don't have leaders that have sworn to stop at nothing until the United States is destroyed.  Whether or not he actually had the capability to do so, the leader of Iraq did so swear and he did lead the world to believe that he had such capability.  But thanks for commenting.As for the film, I know it won a couple Oscars and all, but I just didn't like it.  I thought the editing was poor, that the scenes were long and often unnecessary.  Although the story was good, a modern director would have put it together a lot better
good movie, bad copy!. good movie, bad copy!I ordered it because it was cheap.However, picture quality is POOR; fuzzy, washed-out, blurry.It looks like it's recorded in superlongplay.The shortness of the tape would seem to confirm this
Warning Incomplete Episode!!!. The episodes in this series have an average running time of 50 minutes. This one happens to be only 18 minutes. This mean sthat the file abruptly stops right in the middle. Even though it only cost me $2 I still got jipped.  Let's hope Amazon can iron out these kinds of problems before they get this service farther underway. Be careful enough to sheck the running times to be sure they seem accurate before you buy them
Beware of Unbox!!!. Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for
Not Bruce's best movie. I really like Bruce Campbell and his movies like Army of Darkness. But this movie is not in the same league. First of all the plot is slow and boring. Bruce does not have the same rouge character that he is so good at. Instead the movie is filled with frankly depressing scenes of him in bed or limping around barely able to move. This really hampers the action aspects of the movie. The dialogue aspect is not much better.If you like Bruce, my advise is to get his other movies or try to get a hold of the TV episodes of  "Jack of all trades" episodes. It is a lot more fun and has the "real" Bruce
"Who would want to kill the sweetest ****** woman in the world?". I knew I was in trouble with FOUR BROTHERS when I saw that Josh Howard (of SPORTS NIGHT fame) was scowling hard, trying to be a tough Detroit cop. Not believable for a nanosecond. And then it got worse when Marky Mark said, "Why don't you two cops get some doughnuts and coffee?"The rest of the film veers along in that kind of lame and clichd rhythm. Almost every scene in this thing is a howler. And watching it, I remembered I hadn't forgiven Tyrese Gibson for the travesty that was 2 FAST 2 FURIOUS. Still, Tyrese is better than Garrett Hedlund, who looks like he's a refugee from THE OUTSIDERS.But the movie's not a total wash; after all, it's got a GREAT soundtrack
Bruce Campbell fan. I love Bruce Campbell's work; even have the whole Brisco County, Jr. set, but this movie was a big disappointment . .
How low can Hollywood go?. In my experience, seeing the words "National Lampoon" in any film title is a bad omen, indicating tastelessness and a dearth of actual comedy up ahead.  National Lampoon's Gold Diggers manages to take the series to an all-time low - which, sadly, is no mean feat.  Will Friedle and Chris Owen act as if they are auditioning for a future installment of Dumb and Dumber, and the plot suffers from a definite "ick" factor - and, sadly, those are actually the movie's strengths.Calvin (Friedle) and Leonard (Owen) grew up together in an orphanage and are now trying to make their mark on the world as young adults.  They certainly don't want to have to work for a living, so they take up a life of petty crime.  They are pitiful failures at this and wind up in jail.  Then, two old ladies they accosted on the street bail them out and invite them for a visit in their impressive home.  The guys (by which I mean Calvin, as he's the only one really capable of actual human thought) think their hosts are rich, and so it is that they devise a plan to marry them, wait for their imminent deaths, and then live large on their inheritances.  Doris (Louise Lasser) and Betty Mundt (Renee Taylor) may be heirs to the Mundt prophylactics fortune, but they are in fact cash poor (thanks to their insane uncle, who is in charge of the Mundt estate).  They make their own plans to marry the two young men, purchase sizable insurance policies on them, and then kill them.  The double wedding takes place, the marriages are consummated (do I hear a Yuck!?), and about a month passes.  Calvin finds that married life with buxom, not-dead-yet Doris is driving him insane, so he and Leonard begin setting "accidental" traps for their wives; naturally, the women are finalizing their own murder plans at the same time.  Mr. and Mrs. Smith, this ain't - but that goes without saying.I won't lie and say I didn't laugh or smile a time or two because I did, but National Lampoon's Gold Diggers aims low - really low - and cannot begin to escape the black hole of stupidity upon which it is built.  And I think I speak for the vast majority of human beings when I say that we just don't want to see senior citizen women prancing around onscreen like Victoria's Secret models.  There's crude and then there's National Lampoon's crude, and Gold Diggers is as crude as it gets.  This film should by all rights be a career killer for anyone involved with it - although Nikki Ziering may emerge relatively unscathed given the fact that her screen time is severely limited
Profoundly unfunny and completely unwatchable film. Completey and utterly unfunny performances by Oldman and Roth. Stoppard may be a brilliant playwright but a filmmaker he is not, having botched a great potential for his play on the big screen. We get instead a literal and utterly uncinematic treatment of his much-touted play. Watching the first fifteen minutes of "heads, heads, heads, heads, heads, heads, heads, heads, heads," is colossal torture, like status elipticus. It's suited to the stage maybe but can never play well on the big screen. Having hopes it might pick up, that was dashed as the entire film seem to lack any momentum or any type of cinematic sensibility whatsoever. A classic blunder of failing to recognize two different mediums. Don't take my word for it, watch it yourself and see.
"YAWN BORING" DEBBIE DOES SALLS IS MUCH BETTER. I HATE THESE TITILATING MOVIES, BIT A PUBE, SOME T+A.DO YOURSELVES A FAVOR, EITHER TRY AND GET HOLD OF THE OLD 70S PORNOS LIKE DEBBIE DOES DALLAS, JADE PUSSYCAT, GOOD GIRLS OF GODIVA, TABOO. THESE OLD MOVIES HAVE A STORY PLUS LOTS OF HARD CORE THRILLS.
Defective Filmmaking. Willy Wonka meets Dr. Strangelove in this one-of-a-kind cinematic disaster. Barry Levinson's longtime "dream project" emerges as a garish nightmare. The impressive production design wears out its welcome after five minutes while a talented cast sinks in the big-budget quagmire. Another unfilmable concept that somehow received the Hollywood green light
Gunfight with a weak script..... I don't think this is regarded as an American classic, it's noticeable because it teamed two actors who played off each other quite well even though they only did about four or five movies together.  The movie is longon being melodramatic, weak on script, and sometimes Burt and Kirk kind of over act their scenes.  The whole story has very little to do with history, it's more hollywood and I do not think the guns or the costumes were really around for the period that this movie was dealing with.   The real Doc Holiday and Wyat Erap might have been more grey chaarcters rather then heroic, and you have read a lot of books on the American West, then you will likely spot tons of historic inaccuracies left and right.It's for that reason and the others why I do not care for this movie
Worst movie ever?. Please note -- this movie receives one star ONLY because Amazon does not offer a zero star (or, more appropriately for this film, negative) rating.Recently, Entertainment Weekly compiled a list of the "25 Worst Movie Sequels" ever.  How "An American Werewolf in Paris" avoided its rightful place on this list is now one of the great mysteries of my life.Like everyone else drawn to this unfortunate attempt at a film, I watched because I am a fan of John Landis' original "American Werewolf."  Watched, that is, 15 minutes...which was more than enough time to establish that this 'sequel' should have been stillborn during pre-production.  I was almost tempted to follow this 'film' to its conclusion, to see exactly how bad it could get, but I simply could not subject myself to such torture.  The only thing that could make this a worse movie?  Viewing the original "Werewolf" first, which will emphasize even more the tragedy that was "American Werewolf in Paris."So, why was this such a terrible movie?  I should have taken the DVD case description as a sign -- it explained that I would be watching a (I'm paraphrasing...but pretty close) 'rockin' horror film with a 'hip, up and coming group of young actors,' and, even better, I would be treated to 'a soundtrack complete with the hottest of today's music.'Umm...no.  I challenge you to find more blatant lies than the ones offered by the movie's promoters.To wit, a sample of several idiotic scenes and plot devices:(1) Tom Everett Scott wants to prove his courage by bungy jumping off the Eiffel Tower...which would be fine, except, given the shape of that particular structure (going out from top to bottom), our young hero would be jumping into the tower itself.  That might be a problem, but one he never seems to consider.  Can we really like a protagonist this stupid?(2) Just before he is ready to leap, a young woman throws herself off the ledge.  T.E. Scott jumps to save her (despite the fact that his rope is not yet harnassed), and gracefully nabs her just before she becomes another splatter on the sidewalk.  She runs off, he (hey, I was right!) bangs his head on a beam and is put in hospital.  After waking, his concern for her is understandable...but why, in any rational universe, would he suddenly be infatuated with a clearly suicidal woman?  He says something to the effect that she is 'different' or 'sophisticated' or some other garbage...despite the fact that their relationship at that point comprises all of eight (wordless) seconds.  (Here, I'm also a bit nitpicky...because I can't for the life of me fathom why he would Julie Delpy even remotely attractive; mental instability is bad enough, but her looks hardly negate those problems).  Anyway, for absolutely no lucid reason, he suddenly decides that this is the girl of his dreams...the entire movie is based on his inexplicable admiration, a flaw symptomatic of the entire plot structure.(3) The classic scene: the young lovers' first date...in which he 'accidentally' pulls out a handful of condoms, and to subdue her anxiety about his intentions, he is forced to pretend they are actually pieces of gum.  Yes, this is the level of sophistication clearly rampant throughout the movie.Those are the high points of the first ten minutes, and I'm fairly certain the rest of narrative is downhill from that atrocious beginning.
Bad Device. I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service
Painful!. Ken Russell is a gifted director, as his erratic career has proved, but even the great Vanessa Redgrave can't save this one. "The Devils," a gaudy, loud attempt to blend period detail with stark surrealism, went painfully awry. Grisly images of plague victims, quack cures, peculiar enemas, and Oliver Reed being burned at the stake were doubtless meant to provide realistic detail--unfortunately, they are merely stomach-turning. A stocky, wild-eyed Oliver Reed is sadly lacking in erotic appeal as Father Grandier, the womanizing priest of a seventeenth-century French town, and most of the other characters are so unlikable that one wishes the entire town had been burned at the stake. Gemma Jones is one bright spot as Grandier's innocent love interest, and Ms. Redgrave gives her all to the thankless role of Sister Jeanne, but the film as a whole is unpalatable and disturbing. Not for the faint of heart
once again a king story is ruined on film. in the short story collection night shift, mr.king gave us some of his best short stories and spawned at least 6 movies that i know of(this mess,trucks( twice once by king as "maximam overdrive" and once as a t.v. movie),night surf,the boogyman(not the new one),graveyard shift,the mangler,and maybe more and not one has been done right! this one misses by a mile as it tells of the cult of kids who kill all the adults in a town and serve "he who walks behind the rows"more like "we steped in something behind the rows" and we steped in this flameing piece of junk!!! skip it!!!!!!
old documentary!. Please think this DVD is recorded in 1986. More worse, this is recorded as a documentary. Sound quality is worst. After I bought this and DVD of &quot;Company&quot; (same, worst sound quality DOCUMENTARY), I suspect the word &quot;concert&quot; or &quot;soundtrack&quot; in DVD title
Cant watch. I downloaded this program and it was garbled and video as if played in slow motion.  This is the first of two downloads that didn't play.  I know it was not my computer because I did download three that played ok
Hahaha!!!. Well, what can I say? I'm usually not very picky about "seamonster"-movies (especially when there's a shark involved). And though it didn't surprise me, "Red Water" (hm..!), whatever you do don't believe the cover of the dvd. That shark (!) looks frightening, and looks to be a Great White. The shark in this movie however is a Bull Shark, and very "plastic" in a non-Hollywood-sence.There is plenty of shark in "Red Water", some reviewers here mean that you hardly see the shark, but that's not the problem. The problem is that you see the shark TOO many times, and as mentioned; it's not much to look at! The effects (?) are something between Jaws 3 & 4, and that explains a lot if you are familiar with those. The acting is what you'd expect from a b-movie, ok at its' best, the script is paperthin -but it could've been more "watchable" if "more story, less shark".I doubt that I will watch "Red Water" again. B-movies like "Anacondas" and "Lake Placid", well, at least the effects are somewhat believable.I didn't expect much, but got less...
BORING, TACKY. Watching this movie is about as much fun as having your wisdom teeth pulled. Boring and tacky even by horror standards, the only fun comes from seeing the psychic kids' future wicked stepfather being eaten by the monster that lives in his closet, hence the title. I've seen far worse, but those worse movies were more &quot;enjoyable&quot; than this. The following morning you probably won't remember having seen it. If only the monster had eaten this movie's negative, then we would all be spared
Memories of Midnight. This movie was terribly dissapointing.  The Other Side of Midnight is one of my all time favorites and I could not wait to see this movie.  The characters and story line are weak and unsophisticated compared to OSOM.  I loved Jane's business attire, she dressed to the T in this movie and the scenery in Greece and Venice were lovely and that's about it.  I would not watch this mini series again.  Jane Seymore was wonderful in &quot;Somewhere in Time&quot;
"Die, GD it, die!  Die!". Thus, with the quote from the film above, goes the movie Shark Attack 3.  All of the negative feedback about this film is true.  Rather than go on about what has been stated well already, though, here are what I believe are the most memorable lines that make this film uber cliched:"You're extinct, F-er!""My lawyers will have a field day with you.  THEY are the real sharks.""I'm really wired.  So why don't I take you home and eat your _____."(after destroying the megalodon) "Mega-la-who?" (laughter) "Hey, where are the cocktails?"This is the kind of dialogue you can expect from the film.  These are the highlights.  Of course, I am not pointing out all the excellent grunting and 'roaring" that the sharks expel, but I don't want to give everything away.  Well, one more thing: audiences find out that boats are commonplace within a prehistoric shark's diet.Why would you, dear viewer, want to watch this
good music, too hard to follow for beginners... I will admit that Paula is inspirational BUT she doesn't give you enough time to "learn" the move before putting you in full gear. I loved the music and Paula's upbeat personality but felt it moved way too fast. This video will definitely get your heart a pumpin'
Please not another season of this!. Ok so I have always thought Courteney Cox should not be allowed on screen due to lack of acting talent and this show just proves it. It really is the most boring show Ive seen in a long time. If you thought she was bad in scream...and friends..dont watch this...there are other actors in this show who do redeem it somewhat but could never save it. Hopefully this show will be scraped
HORRIBLE!. I was forced to watch this movie for college.  It was the most vulgar, unnecessary piece of junk I have ever seen.  This is a perfect example of the demoralization of America
Missing episodes. This series is being sold with missing episodes, like many others here in Unbox. Do they think their customers are so dumb? Would you buy a DVD series with a missing DVD? What sense does this make? What a disappointment this service is..
Land of Oprahisms. Having avoided seeing this film, I found that the mistake of sending my partner to the rental store on his on, brought "Tuesday..."unbiden into our home.My aversion to Oprah and her ilk, does not cloud my dislike of this film. A bad film is a bad film.Devoid of any real plot and hampered by some very poor acting on the part of all concerned, and directionless directing, this film should not be seen by anyone who values the aforementioned,To me a reasonable premise should move a story forward. Something should occur, my interest should be engaged. This film takes reams of pre-packaged aphorisms and greeting card verses, and attempts to build the plot from words alone. It is as if someone picked up the telephone book and said, "Hey,this book is full of words, lets make a movie."In a way a movie about the different lives of those listed in the telephone book would be more interesting.To be honest, Jack Lemmon was not very good in this film. He played the same character he always did. Just older. Hank Azaria was just awful. He talked as if his mouth was filled with stones, and was wooden and expressionless. Maybe he was too embarrased to be there. As to the other actor's; well they filled up the space nicely.The look of the film was cheap and of the movie of the week quality. The sprayed on snow in a winter scene looked as fake as it was. They even covered the green leaves on the trees. Some better acting, some good R rated dialogue, and maybe some nudity would have spiced up this film. As it stands,however, it will only be of interest to fans of Oprah and Dr.Phil, etc. The purveyors of our national state of pity and feeling soory for ourselves.It is seldom that we find car keys under our chairs, but films such as this perpetuate the myth that a few nice phrases, a good cry, and a genial talk-show presenter will somehow make it all better.I,for one, think that a nice cuppa is more beneficial. Then pull the finger out, and just get on with it.(To the grammar and form police: I did have this in paragraphs, but the editing process scrunched it all together. Sorry
Beware of Unbox!!!. Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for
Wonderful program, but flawed files... Okay, so to catch up on this exciting new series, I decided to try this revolutionary downloading program - Amazon Unbox!  I selected the first 10 episodes and hit Purchase.  Minutes later, I was watching the first episode, it came quickly, sounded great, and looked wonderful... however the second one was missing a few minutes at the end.  Forgiveable, until... whole episodes starting arriving incomplete or had missing video, making it incredibly frustrating and disappointing.But, this IS a good concept... unfortunately, Amazon has yet to verify all their own files for both audio and picture quality!  So, until the issue is fixed and paying customers recieve completed files or refunds... DO NOT try and download Season 1, Episodes 2, 4, 5, 6, and 7!!!  1, 3, 8, 9, and 10 were the only ones that were 100% complete for me
waste of money. Dont purchase episode 5 of season 2, it's 7 minutes long and you dont get any of the Charlie Murphy Prince story.  WTF!!!  Can someone fix this and refund or offer the entire episode for re-download!!!
Wonderful program, but flawed files... Okay, so to catch up on this exciting new series, I decided to try this revolutionary downloading program - Amazon Unbox!  I selected the first 10 episodes and hit Purchase.  Minutes later, I was watching the first episode, it came quickly, sounded great, and looked wonderful... however the second one was missing a few minutes at the end.  Forgiveable, until... whole episodes starting arriving incomplete or had missing video, making it incredibly frustrating and disappointing.But, this IS a good concept... unfortunately, Amazon has yet to verify all their own files for both audio and picture quality!  So, until the issue is fixed and paying customers recieve completed files or refunds... DO NOT try and download Season 1, Episodes 2, 4, 5, 6, and 7!!!  1, 3, 8, 9, and 10 were the only ones that were 100% complete for me
Cant watch. I downloaded this program and it was garbled and video as if played in slow motion.  This is the first of two downloads that didn't play.  I know it was not my computer because I did download three that played ok
Great for the Zen Vision. At first I didn't realize that you have to use Amazon's software to load onto the Zen.  Once I figured that out (actually my husband figured that out) the show played perfectly and it was very easy to do.  I wasn't able to edit the stars.  If I could I would give this 5 stars.  If you have tried some other sites for the Zen, they are much more difficult to use. Amazon's Unbox is great for the Zen
Same Thing. The Dane Cook episode is the same one that it on his "Harmful If Swallowed" c.d. The c.d. also has the uncensored version of this routine that is over 1 hour long. The one star rating is not based on the content. It is based upon Amazon not sharing this fact with customers
to much bark, not enough bite. i had heard of cannibal ferox for quite some time before watching it. i heard that it was the most violent film ever made. i enjoyed umberto lenzis eaten alive and thought this would be even better. i was dead wrong. cannibal ferox is a boring, unpleasent film that definatly doesnt live up to its infamous reputation. im not saying that cannibal ferox isnt gory or violent but i cant see how it was ever banned in 31 countrys. the few gore scenes are pretty effective, but that dosnt make up for the films many many flaws. if it was for giovanni lombardo radice[one of my favorite italian horror actors] starring in it, cannibal ferox would only earn 1 star.
Missing episodes. This series is being sold with missing episodes, like many others here in Unbox. Do they think their customers are so dumb? Would you buy a DVD series with a missing DVD? What sense does this make? What a disappointment this service is..
Survivor Rip Off. I have bought 2 seasons of Survivor on unbox and both of them are not complete. Very dissapointing. Guatemala  episode 11 is from a completely different season and it is missing the last 2 episodes and the reunion show. Just leaves you hanging. Exile Island is missing the final episode it just goes from the competition between Danielle and Cirie for a spot in the final 3 to the live reunion show
OH DEAR!!!. Oh Dear!! When a reveiw starts with Oh Dear then you just know the movie went bad. I waited and hoped  this film would be released, I'd heard so much about it. This was one of the most horrific  movies banned under the video nasty craze. I think it was banned because it was plain rubbish. DO NOT BUY, Its pretty bad but if your like me your gonna buy it anyway. Get some beer and watch it if you have to
UnBox video not yet working. Will not play once video was downloaded. I get the error message:  "can not play file, please try again later. error# 0x80040273" I made the exlusive give me call me back feature but the UnBox department was already closed, I was told the UnBox Saturday and Sunday 6-5 hours. I have to say I am impressed with the Call back feature. I downloaded the Unbox Beta now and am recieving email assistance to try to resolve the problem. Thanks Amazon UnBox! I will Update again - Feb. 10,200
Why does Jet Li star in Wong Jing films?. This film has been re-released as "Meltdown."  There are a few reasons for watching this movie: 1) Jet Li.  2) Chingmy Yau (the reporter).  3) Wu Ma (Frankie's dad)  4) a decent fight scene at the end.  Jacky Cheung is also not as aggravating as usual.   That's it.  Jet Li has appeared in three or four films directed by Wong Jing, and, just as Chow Yun Fat does in God of Gamblers and Jackie Chan does in City Hunter, he does what he can.  The direction of the film, however (as well as GOG and CH), stinks.  The plot copies Die Hard and Speed, with some broad satire aimed at Jackie Chan, but that is not the problem.  Put simply, Jackie Chan knows how to direct a film.  Wong Jing does not.  If you want to see Jet Li, go see Fist of Legend, Once Upon A Time in China, or just about anything else he has done.  If you want to see a good Hong Kong action movie, watch films directed by John Woo, Ringo Lam, Tsui Hark, Jackie Chan, and Sammo Hung.  Jet Li is fun to watch, but go watch everything else he has done before you get to this
dont mess with classics. I give the original 5 stars, but why is disney taking all its classics and adding new songs to it? i was so dissapointed when i rented this and there were new scenes in it. i dont want "new and improved" i want the original, the one i watched when i was younger
Great Book - Bad Movie - Good Actors. My view is skewed.  I was in VA-196 and flew with Steve oonts a few times as a B/N.  His book captured our collective squadron stories and placed the A6A Intruder into the public eye.  People would tell me about their experiences while reading the book...they did not know my connection to it.  Steve wrote so well that they could smell the cockpit and sense the adrenalin.  While the movie paralleled our actual experiences at sea and in port, it did not convey the excitement of the book.  So, I was disappointed in my expectations and give the film a good try.W. Stewart Tittle, Lt USNR 1966-71
Poor Jayne, What A Waste!. The Las Vegas Hillbillies is a terrible bad movie which stars Jayne Mansfield, Mamie Van Buren and Ferlin Huskey. It appears to be a low budget film due to the photography, acting and settings. If you are a Jayne or Mamie fan, you will find yourself fastforwarding to their scenes only. One highlight of the film is Ferlin Husky's dream sequence of Jayne singing "That Makes It." Air time of Jayne is very small. Trivia: the Siamese cat in the film, which Jayne is holding, belonged to Jayne's friend May Mann.
The absolute worst. This movie is a total waste of time.  Even Audrey Hepburn can't save it, but she didn't have much to work with.  She drifts about the whole movie dressed in what seems to be a long flour sack and bare feet, putting curses on her grandfather and making eyes at Anthony Perkins, who is supposed to be from South America but has no accent at all.  Even the locales are confused, with part of the movie looking like it was filmed in the Amazon and part in the desert southwest.  I love Audrey, but I wouldn't own this movie even if I taped it for nothing off AMC or Turner classic
Didn't work. I downloaded the player and this episode as part of a promotion that gave a free episode. Not only did I get charged, but when I cancelled the download to contact about the charge - I was told I had to finish downloading before they could refund. Once it finished downloading, it didn't play anyway. I gave up.
It's been forgotten for a reason. This film is painfully outdated -- and it was never good to begin with. I suppose you would have to call this a "romantic thriller comedy." And it fails on every one of these fronts. The thriller portion is preposterous, nothing but a convoluted story from a 60s TV show. It's not particularly funny either -- oh, but it tries to be. The romance portion probably comes across the best, but this is only because of the excellent actors in the leads.No, what "Into the Night" has going for it is a quirky, unique premise that it never delivers on. Landis seems more concerned with jamming the scenes with pointless cameos and in-jokes. This film, which could have been regarded as an underground classic, has none of the substance to garner such praise. And it does not receive it. "After Hours", which came out the same year, is vastly superior.The best thing about "Into the night" is watching a young, gorgeous, pre-Catwoman Michelle Pfeiffer, some LA landmarks that have since been demolished (Ships diner) -- and the original one-sheet poster is very, very cool
The worst ever?. This is surely one of the worst movies ever made, and may indeed take the title.  No one can act, the plot (was there a script?) is absurd, the music is dreadful, and the director must have been high much of the time.  This comedy/horror film is neither funny nor slasher-enjoyable.  It's simply stupid.  Have we as a people actually reached the point of cultural degradation symbolized by this film?I saw this in prime time on the Independent Film Channel.  It has permanently forfeited its reputation
Infested, or a sharp stick in the eye? Take the stick. Infested (Josh Olson, 2002)It's really kind of impressive that a movie this bad doesn't get shelved somewhere along the line. And yet here it is, in all its painfully cheesy glory, on my screen, daring me to turn it off. I almost gave in to the temptation, but I kept watching. For you, dear reader, so I can give you a full account of the true horror to be found here-- the ninety minutes of your life that you will never be able to get back if you rent this movie and sit down to watch it.The story, what there is of it: A number of friends show up at the estate of one of their high-school buddies, who's killed himself. There's all the post-funeral bonding stuff, and everything's looking remarkably Big Chill when things go horribly, horribly wrong thanks to vicious, genetically-altered flies that possess humans and turn them into soulless murderers. Yes, you got that right.As usual, the only reason to watch a movie like this is the cheesecake factor. Any Jo Johnson plays the dead guy's girlfriend (well, ex, I guess), and there is an obligatory scene where she shows a whole lot of skin. It is not, however, an out-and-out nude scene. Sorry, guys. There is also the gorgeous Lisa Ann Hadley (General Hospital/Port Charles), who's really starting to look like Kate Hodge. (This is a good thing. A very good thing.)You're certainly not watching for the special effects, (amateur even by microbudget-indie standards), the acting (atrocious), the script (even worse), the direction (competent at best), the cinematography (ditto), the soundtrack (cheesy early eighties pop that should have faded into obscurity years ago), or, really, anything else. So it's gotta be the cheesecake. And that's all well and good, but you can do that on fast-forward. I strongly suggest that route. At least you'll waste less time on this. (half
Pointless film!. When you decide to adapt a classic film you should take warning several aspects: Has the story aged? How has the suspense's concept altered for the new audiences?We know about the professed sympathy of Cimino for Rourke. We saw him in The year of the Dragon. And somehow Mickey doesn't look credible as the distorted mind criminal. He is too rational and cold to represent that hard character. The illumination is another serious problem. The whole drama looks extremely theatrical: Anthony Hopkins looks uncomfortable with the role and Mimi Rogers is inexpressive. Elias Koteas is simply out of context and perhaps that's why the insipid dialogue. Maybe David Morse shows certain wild tendency. There is a rigidity in the dialogue. Obviously you assist to the common places: the internal disagreements in the policy procedure. Lindsay Cruise is assertive in this role. But the initial sequence of the getaway is terrific. It looks too artificial and the viewer' adrenaline simply is not emanated. The sumptuous photography saves the film of the collapse. The music didn't help to maintain the suspense. It is not easy to readapt a classic film of the fifties. Something similar happened with Cape fear `s remake.The question might be around the new approach of the suspense and the new technologies. Bogart looked extremely old for the role and Rourke looked too elegant to be a convincing ex con.Good entertainment for teenagers in a pop corn rainy weekend.
Dont get "Fiji" final week ... Dont dwnld " Survivor, "Thunderstorms & Sacrifice" ". Its my fault for not reading the whole thing. you would think that the last episode would be the finale , but NO, its just a 10 minute recap going to the finale 4. I didnt even get a full 45 minute episode. No finale. I got rippped off. $1.99 dwnld not well spent. Dont bother dwnldng any episode of fiji if you dont know the ending. Because they dont have that episode, not even the reunion show
Movie is great, but Unbox is uncooked. Movie got 2/3 through and just quit. No problem, this is Windows right? Just reboot and start where you left off. Only for whatever reason I can't restart this movie from anywhere but the beginning. I'm not going to watch this moving over from the beginning just to see if it fails in the same place again. Only a couple bucks, but definitely not worth it
What about the missing episodes. Why should one buy this series? What about the missing episodes? Are they going to be added later, or this is it? I cannot believe this. Would you buy a bicycle with a missing wheel? Or a keyboard without the C and R keys? I'd like Amazon to explain its customers what it plans to do..
Unfunny and stupid. I'm going to weigh in on these dreadfully unfunny films.  These films are both stupid and terribly dated.  I can't understand how even a contemporary audience, back in the 1920s, could enjoy this unfunny nonsense.  I wanted to stay til the end, but I found myself fast forwarding because I just couldn't take it.  There is absolutely nothing funny about Buster Keaton or either of these terrible waste of time flicks
turn it off. if pac was still here now he would never ride with ja nah nah nah nah nah na
UnBox video not yet working. Will not play once video was downloaded. I get the error message:  "can not play file, please try again later. error# 0x80040273" I made the exlusive give me call me back feature but the UnBox department was already closed, I was told the UnBox Saturday and Sunday 6-5 hours. I have to say I am impressed with the Call back feature. I downloaded the Unbox Beta now and am recieving email assistance to try to resolve the problem. Thanks Amazon UnBox! I will Update again - Feb. 10,200
Painfully dull. You know the feeling...that feeling of "Oh my gosh, how did I ever spend money on this movie and when is it ever going to end?"  Well, that's what unfortunately accompanies this dull and somber film.   Unfortunately, because of its all-star cast, although this wouldn't be the first time in movie history where an all-star cast is wasted.  Aside from an interesting peek into the world of Yale's secret Skull and Bones society, a delightful cameo by Joe Pesci and a few too cute-by-half zingers, this movie has little or nothing to offer.  It doesn't keep one's attention and by the time you try to care enough about what is going on, you realize that you don't even care about the characters.  Matt Damon's skulking and scowling leading role lacks rhythm and chemistry, especially with the beautiful Angelina Jolie, and he is laughably miscast as a father.  In fairness however, with the script he's been given, it's hard to see how Damon could have done much better.  The pacing of the film is extradinarily slow and one can just imagine people walking out of the theater before it ends.  A huge disappoinment especially since director DeNiro is such a talented actor.  Skip it
2 stars because it made me laugh. The absurdity of this movie made me laugh quite a bit. The sets were cheap, the plot (if you can call it that) was clunky, and the direction stank. A lot of people who have reviewed this already are railing on the actors, and the only reason I don't is because I have seen most of the main cast (the ones on the front cover) do very well in other roles. It is evident that they really weren't given much to work with.If you're looking for a horror flick to laugh at and make fun of in Mystery Science Theater 3000 fashion, this would be a good one to pick up. If you're looking for good sci-fi/horror, look elsewhere
Is this really what most "normal people" call erotic?. This is one of the most boring films I ever watched. There is nothing erotic in it. The whole story is perverted with a poor, innocent but very stupid woman submitting to the sadist fantasies of various "lovers" she is introduced. I put inverted comas in lovers because none of them have a single tender erotic moment with her, but instead they brutally beat her and rape her in the presence of others, who seem to be totally oblivious to the proceedings
2 1/2 stars - I'm sure it was more exciting in the early 70's. I guess I missed the point. I can see how this film could be considered a horror "classic". I'm sure the violence was ground breaking in 1972... in fact, one of the comments in the "making of" on this dvd was that teenagers were actually throwing up in the theatres. I don't think it's a well done film overall... it's lacking in story, music, direction, and suspense. The acting is not too bad, but could have been more intense and believable in some scenes. If I was craving some good 1970's horror, I'd rather watch "I Spit on Your Grave" or "The Texas Chainsaw Massacre"
One of Elvis' worst movies. I've seen all of Elvis' movies, most several times.  This is one of the worst.  Only Stay Away Joe and Harem Scarem are worse.  I usually watch every Elvis movie every time it comes on TV, but not these three
Didn't work. I downloaded the player and this episode as part of a promotion that gave a free episode. Not only did I get charged, but when I cancelled the download to contact about the charge - I was told I had to finish downloading before they could refund. Once it finished downloading, it didn't play anyway. I gave up.
AMAZON SUCKS. I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!
A young Vanity - nude - weird movie. This is a very bizarre movie.  Some Ape creature becomes friends with Vanity on an island where only she and her lover are.  Her lover becomes jealous and then later the Ape creature and he battle over Vanity.  Appears to be a dream.  Vanity is cute and nude in the movie, but she hardly looks like herself.  Very odd movie, if you are looking for Vanity nude, you are better off getting a copy of 52 pickup a better movie or Action Jackson.  She shows skin in both.  Here she does have a full frontal scene, but it is not all that long anyway
Outlaw all post-release editing. This is truly one the most spectacular films ever made, not suffering for having been made during the silent era. However, as correctly stated by another review of the film, the DVD version runs to 139mins as oppossed to the VHS 155mins. This is not due to DVD faster frame rate, but rather because the DVD version has had a huge portion of the film cut for no obvious reason. At one point, the Hero (Fairbanks) has fulfilled the prophecy of the princess and has been the first to touch the rose-tree, the next minute he is seen explaining to her (in an intimate scene) that he is not what he seems. Having seen the VHS a number of times, I can confirm that the DVD version has been brutally cut. Do not buy the DVD version, as it is a let-down with those scenes missing; thus the reason for my one star, which would otherwise have been 4 1/5 (5 stars with the Rimsky Korsakov soundtrack). You have been warned
What about the missing episodes. Why should one buy this series? What about the missing episodes? Are they going to be added later, or this is it? I cannot believe this. Would you buy a bicycle with a missing wheel? Or a keyboard without the C and R keys? I'd like Amazon to explain its customers what it plans to do..
Beep Beep. Chuck Jones continues to entertain new audiences with the Road Runner and Wile E. Coyote. Chariots of fur is an blend of his final cartoon with the duo. I found it to be very exciting. If you have Road Runner vs. Wile E. Coyote The Classic Chase from Warner Bros. Golden Jubiliee 24 Karat collection, this video might not be for you. The other five cartoons actually appear on that video; Zip N' Snort, Operation: Rabbit, Hook, Line and Stinker, Beep Beep, and Ready, Woolen and Able. Otherwise this is an very nice cartoon video collection for kids of all ages
DVDs a MUST. I am giving this one star ONLY because it is on VHS and not DVD.  I don't even own a VCR anymore and had to watch it at someone elses house!!  The day that they come out with all ten seasons on DVD I will buy them all and really wish I could now!  I just bought the pilot episode on DVD and am hoping that this will sell well and that they'll go on to put all the seasons on DVD already.  I know there is still a huge worldwide fan base who would purchse them!!
For Jarheads. I too wasn't very impressed with Jarhead.  I thought half way through that Jarhead seemed more like an insider movie for those who actually experienced the Marines, and perhaps other branches of the military.  For those of us who haven't I just don't think there was enough direction to keep a lot of us interested.  As someone else mentione.  I too thought it was going to be a more modern version of Full Metal Jacket, but afte the first few minutes it was obvious it wasn't..
But Why is it Called Belly?. The American Dream is an appealing myth, no doubt. The idea that anybody can come from anywhere and strike it rich in America sounds great. The problem, as George Carlin put it, is that you have to be asleep to believe in it. So instead of representing opportunity for everybody it has become code for greed at all costs. And that is where "Belly" comes in, an ode to thug live and all the riches that come with it. This urban drama stars DMX (perpetually rapping), Nas, and Method Man and they would have you believe that they earned their cash by selling drugs and pimping as opposed to selling out to record companies. The story barely exists and seemed like a burden for the director who just wanted endless shots of people having sex and smoking drugs. When the plot does poke its head up I picked up on a criminal enterprise that moved shop from Queens to Omaha. Once there the cops get involved and people start getting shot. One couple tries to escape to Africa, but find it easier said than done. And Tommy (DMX) is sent on a mission to kill a minister. But really this film is about selling a lifestyle that doesn't even exist. Come on now, I've known drug dealers in my day, and they didn't live in large gaudy mansions . . . rap stars do. Rather they live in shacks or their parent's basement.If my response to the film seems lukewarm it is because it is. The directing by Hype Williams isn't that bad. He is able to capture some beautiful images and uses a few creative camera tricks. The lighting never seems quite right, but I'm gonna let that one slide. As a man who has always called for more sex and drugs in films I can hardly complain about their presence here. There people are living life to the fullest and are certainly not being weighed down by bourgeois conventions. All that said this film still fully deserves the big no vote that I am going to give it. As the most nihilistic person I know I am surprised to report that this one really seemed lost. Any image they could flash on the screen that would appeal to the wannabes in the audience was used. The N and F words are used to comedic proportions. Their palaces that represent their gluttony are turned into war zones and destroyed for no good reason. And then, on top of it all, we have to listen to the characters wax philosophical on how leading this life somehow places them on a higher plain than the rest of us. Sorry man, but just because you sell drugs instead of stocks doesn't make you any less slimy than those Wall Street hacks. You're still a businessman. This film is not worth watching. Any social point that is made is made accidentally, and any filmmaking skills the director may have are lost under his love fest for all things gangsta. **1/4
Explain the phenomenon!. Maybe it's just me, but I really don't see the appeal of this movie. It's an incredibly small production (3 actors comprise nearly the entire film), with very low production values. Norman Reedus gives by far the weakest performance as the hitchhiker, but Alan Rickman and Polly Walker are not at their finest, either. (And I am an Alan Rickman fan just like anyone else who would even consider watching this movie.) If you are an Alan Rickman fan, chances are you've already seen your fair share of horrible and incomprehensible movies that leave you wondering why an accomplished actor would choose them. And Dark Harbor is just one more of these. Don't let the promise of a "nude scene" convince you to buy this movie - honestly, Alan Rickman is better appreciated with his clothes on. As far as the movie is concerned, the plot is unoriginal and not particularly engaging. It is a very dialogue-heavy film and the dialogue is not well-written enough to carry it off.
So awful I turned it off. I saw this film on TV several years ago, and started watching it because William Hurt is one of my favorite actors.  I got as far as the monkey man scene and turned it off, it was so ridiculous and just plain bad.  I can probably count on one hand the number of movies I have not watched all the way through (I even suffer through the bad and boring ones).  I couldn't take another minute of this one, however
Stick with Suspiria. I already knew before buying this movie that I wouldnt like it, atleast it comes with Phenomena wich is alot better IMO. Inferno is not one of Argento's best at all and doesent even deserve to be known as a sequel to Suspiria. I like all of his films espesially the gallio ones but this just doesent hold up to his other work. It does have all his imagination but not his style. Pick it up with Phenomena and maybe youll like it but I doubt it
Taboo porn. This movie has nothing to do with a house. Its really just a low budget rape porn. I tossed it in the trash about 20 minutes into it.
so boring, it gets bored with itself. There are just two rules when you create a thriller with a pretty lead: 1) The lead (the delectable Ashley Judd) had better show some skin. 2) Thou shalt not be boring.Twisted utterly fails on both counts.  Basically, Judd is Jessica Shepard, a messed up cop who specializes in hunting serial killers.  She's fond of bedding men she meets at late night bars, because she's self-destructive.  Only Jessica looks fabulous all the time, even when she's been on a bender (which is apparently every night).  How she maintains her good looks without stinking up the place is just another part of cinema magic.Jessica is mentored by John Mills (Samuel L. Jackson).  For a second there I thought Jackson was going to play an understated version of his usual maniacal self.  I was wrong.Things take a turn for the strange after Jessica discovers that every man she sleeps with is murdered.  And she keeps having these weird blackouts every night.  The victims wash up on the shore the next day with a single cigarette burn on their hand.  Poor Jessica is haunted by her parents' murder/suicide and wonders...since her father went on a mass-murdering spree before he killed himself, could she too have the "serial killer gene"?Jessica is paired with Mike Delmarco (Andy Garcia), an Italian goomba who is alternately creepy, lecherous, and like everyone else in this ridiculous movie, wants to get into her pants.  Mike follows her around an awful lot...could HE be the killer?  Or maybe it's the ex-boyfriend cop, Jimmy Schmidt (Mark Pellegrino).  Or maybe it's...actually, I figured it out in the first ten minutes.Being something of a true crime fan, and having read a bit on the subject, this entire premise is absurd. You don't wake up one day and become a serial killer; if anyone actually got a good look at the life of a serial killer, it screams DANGER from day one.  Pretty Jessica has none of those problems in her past, except for a vague "suppressed rage" that manifests itself in kinky sex and kicking people in the face.  Her cherubic face shows no signs of hardship, and neither does the rest of her. Although the script wants us to believe she's a haggard cop, the camera is only too happy to zoom in on her rear end.  Not once, but twice.  And it's not a naked rear end either.So we have a gorgeous female cop who sleeps around, yet there are very few bedroom scenes.  We have a serial killer plot that is connected by red herrings (Who is that lady across the street?  Why does Jessica fiddle with a cigarette but never light it?).  On one hand, the cops are strictly by the book; they make a big deal out of the fact that Jessica kicks a serial killer in the face.  On the other hand, nobody pulls Jessica off the case when she's a prime suspect, nor watch her home when the serial killer is obviously following her around.Neither sleazy or highbrow, gritty or moralistic, Twisted is so boring, it gets bored with itself
Ridiculous ending, not worth watching!. This movie was captivating and interesting for the first 3/4ths of it.  It is a psychological thriller/mystery and you obviously want to find out the big explanation at the end that resolves all your questions.  Well, the ending was so incredibly far-fetched and crazy that I can't believe that anyone who read the WHOLE script actually wanted to work on this movie.  It ends up being a stupid "sci-fi" type ending.  So, if you want to get all into a movie, only to have them resolve it with the most ridiculous scenario possible, buy this one!! ....or....DON'T
Great Acting but unbelievable story line. This movie has such wonderful reviews from both professional critics and Amazon customers that I was expecting great things. While I agree the acting (especially the girls playing Christy and Ariel) is excellent the story is just too implausible and I got that impression from the minute we see the family crossing from Canada to the US (yes they are Irish but for some reason they have to sneak in to the US from Canada). Anyway why on earth would an apparently intelligent couple enter the US with their two kids illegally, without jobs or much money to settle in the most expensive city in the country?  I know the dad is an actor but couldn't he have settled the family in one of the less expensive boroughs and taken the subway in to Manhattan? The mom is a teacher but can't find a job but no wonder if they are in the country illegally. Yet there is money for private school, fixing up the dump of an apartment, an expensive camcorder, betting the rent money on an ET doll etc.  I can't imagine any parents moving in to an apartment building known as the "drug house" with two young girls and then letting the girls wander about as they please.  Mind you the parents are a couple supposedly almost crippled by the guilt they feel over a third child - a son - that has recently died.  I kept expecting someone to call Social Services.   And the medical situations with both Frankie and the mom and new baby are not well thought out or researched. The symbolism between Mateo, the new baby and Frankie is very heavy handed. Though the film is told through the oldest daughter's eyes  because of several scenes and elements the movie is not suited at all to children.  And there are also several scenes that are really not connected with the oldest daughter at all.   Maybe if I had taken it more as a fable I would have "gotten" this movie more but I was expecting a straight forward drama and was disappointed.
Awful!. I rented this movie from Netflix recently, expecting a wonderfully campy, cheesy horror film. WRONG. Its just an hour and a half of boring film.The plot is lacking, the characters are annoying, especially Duane.Its simply a ridiculous film
plot holes. The first half hour of this 90 minute movie is actually quite good.  In fact, it is enthralling and has an interesting twist in that we don't know the real fact behind whether a young woman was violated by her boyfriend while unconscious.  According to the rumor (the rumor being a school experiment conducted by three roommates) she was, however, but we the audience don't know that.  However, the young woman is quick to think she has been raped.  Why there is no attempt at a physical exam, is unexplained, especially since the young woman involved has the reputation of being a professional virgin, however it turns out she isn't, so that's why the movie lasts longer than 30 minutes.  Fortunately, we're not dealing with unwanted pregnancies, either, so this doesn't turn into a soap opera.  However, we do have the dreamboat "hero" who dreams up the rumor about her being raped, and who exhibits unlikeable traits throughout. But that's true of the three leads - the roommates are all unlikeable, being insufferably full of themselves.  The last half of the film, 'dreamboat' takes the turn as lead character, and it's his story we're following, whereas his female roommate had the first half of the film, and basically it's her introduction to the audience of all the characters. Turns out 'dreamboat' and the young woman victim have a history together; which means issues they have to work out, and everyone else (in a way, the entire student body and its faculty and local law enforcement) is sucked into their story and mutual thirst for truth, though the characters don't have the same truth in mind - it's about vengeance; not justice.  And vengeance when it's not the comic book variety, isn't fun for an audience, it's just distasteful.  In other words, the man and woman should have been shut up together in a room so they could have worked it out for themselves, and left the rest of us alone.  So from a brilliant first half-hour - and btw how does the roommate penniless art student have the dollars for all that tech equipment? - we degenerate into a constantly weaving pattern of lies and deceptions that seems more pointless than clever.  There is merely too much story, so it becomes ridiculous.  A basically good premise is ruined.  If you are a fan of any of the stars involved, it might be worth viewing, if only once, but the film as a whole will probably leave a vile taste in your mouth.  Perhaps that's the ultimate message on a film about the dangers of spreading GOSSIP, or in this case deliberate lies, is that what goes around comes around, and also it will leave you feeling sick to your stomach.  I almost recommend you watch the first 30-45 min then quit midway, but anyone will watch all the way thru at least once, just to be sure where this is headed
UnBox video not yet working. Will not play once video was downloaded. I get the error message:  "can not play file, please try again later. error# 0x80040273" I made the exlusive give me call me back feature but the UnBox department was already closed, I was told the UnBox Saturday and Sunday 6-5 hours. I have to say I am impressed with the Call back feature. I downloaded the Unbox Beta now and am recieving email assistance to try to resolve the problem. Thanks Amazon UnBox! I will Update again - Feb. 10,200
Soundtrack intolerable. I found the singing in the soundtrack so utterly intolerable that I had to quit watching this after about 20% of the video. The movie seemed like it would have been nice otherwise (about a 4). The sound of the singing was very grating & harsh to my ears; since it was almost continous it made watching the video impossible. It also seemed to add little to the film in terms of content. The photography & art direction were exquisite
"Matrix" wannabe. This movie tanked in the theaters and with good reason-the story and special effects are lame
Disappointing. I've been a Timothy Dalton fan ever since I saw Jane Eyre, but this movie is difficult to take even for the most devoted.  Please do not  waste your money
Okay, But Could've Been Better. This movie was kind of disapointing to me. I thought it could've been a lot funnier than it was. The performance of Britnay Murphy was okay, she could've been better. The Performance of Dakota Fanning was ecxellent it was so good. She's a good child Actress. One of the best i've ever seen. The story of the movie was okay, it was slow and boring. thats why i didn't like it.Plot. Molly(Murphy) is a daughter of a dead rock star who is living of his fortune, one day her accountant runs away with the money and there is only one thing she can do, and have never done. Get A Job. This would bee a new experince for her. She becomes a nanny of a Spoild brat named Ray(Fanning) who thinks the whole world Is A Germ Infested place. There is only one thing diffrent between the two. Molly is 23 and acts like a kid, Ray is 10 and acts like an adult. Can ray show molly how to become an adult?If you liked this movie check out the soundtrack
Doris Horror. The DVD cover artwork clearly says, "Doris Day and Cinemascope never had it so good!", and what do Warner Bros give us? A pan-and-scan version of the film, which means we lose exactly HALF (!!!) the film. (Cinemascope is 2.66:1, pan-and-scan is 1.33:1). Shame on you, Warners, shame
UnBox video not yet working. Will not play once video was downloaded. I get the error message:  "can not play file, please try again later. error# 0x80040273" I made the exlusive give me call me back feature but the UnBox department was already closed, I was told the UnBox Saturday and Sunday 6-5 hours. I have to say I am impressed with the Call back feature. I downloaded the Unbox Beta now and am recieving email assistance to try to resolve the problem. Thanks Amazon UnBox! I will Update again - Feb. 10,200
The Lisbon Suicides. Therese, Lux, Mary, Bonnie and Cecilia make up the five Lisbon girls, ages 13, 14, 15, 16 and 17. Cecilia, the youngest, lives in her sisters shadows because they are all older and of much more interest to their male neighbors. As a cry for help, she slits her wrists and lays down in the bathtub, she survived the incident. After a psychiatrist highly impresses upon the strict Mr. and Mrs. Lisbon that it would be benificial for Cecilia to be exposed to environments which have boys her own age, Mr. and Mrs. Lisbon decide to allow the girls to throw the one and only Lisbon party. Some of the neighborhood's boys are invited over and while the party is in session, Cecilia is pretty inanimate, sitting on the couch while her sisters flirt, talk and laugh. Midway through the party, Cecilia asks to be excused and Mrs. Lisbon - though somewhat reluctantly - allows it. Cecilia goes up to her room (on the second floor of a two-story house) and jumps out the window, landing on the spiked fence on the front lawn of the Lisbon house. In this way, Cecilia Lisbon commited suicide. Only four girls remain.The act which Cecilia committed did not go at all unnoticed. The father saw her immediately, the party ended there and all of the boys went home rather glum. Four of the Lisbon's neighbors, four young boys, suffered a rapidly growing obsession with the Lisbon girls, who were beautiful and a total mystery to the outside world. They got hold of Cecilia's diary and tried to explain why she committed suicide. The eldest decided Cecilia was a dreamer, and she did not think she would fall when she jumped out her window, she thought she would fly.With their youngest sister gone, the remaining Lisbon girls grow closer to each other, stranding themselves further from the outside world. When school starts again, they attempt to go on acting as if nothing happened, not ever mentioning their youngest sister. The run-of-the-mill awkward act is taken part by the rest of the school however. The usual profuse apology to the mention of the word "death" and the like.Trip Fontaine is the most popular guy in school, the object of desire to all of the girls at school... Except for the Lisbon girls, which is of no importance to Trip until he sets eyes on Lux. Trip cannot help but be enchanted by her flawless beauty. In the beginning, he is unsuccessful in his quest to even catch her attention for she bluntly shows she's not interested. But after his consistent courtship, Lux falls for his charming ways. Trip then attempts to convince Mr. Lisbon to let him and three of his football team pals take the Lisbon daughters to Homecoming. After Mr. Lisbon talks to his wife, he agrees to Trip's request, knowing nothing but Trip's sincerity and claimed honorable intentions, on the understanding that Trip have all of the Lisbon girls returned to the house by curfew.After Trip explains the situation to his football peers, he gives in to those who bribe him the most handsomely. Meanwhile, the Lisbon girls are picking out fabric for the dresses they shall wear to the Homecoming Dance. Though one pattern is used for all four dresses, each dress looks unique when concentrating on detail. Once they pick up the girls, they stop midway to the Homecoming in order to smoke, Lux being the only girl volunteering to smoke.They then drive to the dance. Trip and Lux sneak away and sneak swallows of alcohol. Another one of the Lisbon sisters and her date follow, but leave soon afterwards, not being as wild nor daring as Trip and Lux. At the time they all decided to meet back at the car so they could make the girls curfew, they are all there... Except for Trip and Lux, who at that time were alone in the middle of the football stadium field. Deciding they must make their own curfews, Therese, Bonnie, Mary and their dates leave without them. After fooling around, the intoxicated Trip and Lux fall asleep in the middle of the football stadium. Trip awakens in the middle of the night and leaves Lux there alone. When Lux wakes up early the next morning she is confused as to why Trip is not there. She takes a taxi home and her parents were worried sick (of course). But they take measures as far as pulling the girls out of school and stranding them inside the Lisbon residence.The girls, in a desperate attempt to hold onto a connection to the outside world, begin using morse code to interact with the four boys who so closely follow their lives. One of which boys lived across the street and the rest which came over daily after this in order to contact the girls. Soon following, the boys begin talking to the Lisbon girls via phone. One day, the girls invite the boys to come over once Mr. and Mrs. Lisbon are asleep. The plan being that the boys were to drive the girls somewhere, the boys hastily agree. They sneak over and Lux invites them to wait inside for her sisters and Lux goes to wait in the car. The boys wander down to the basement while waiting for Therese, Bonnie and Mary, verbally expressing their hopes for the night. But then they realize they have stumbled upon one of the sisters. She had hung herself. The boys, scared to death, run all the way home. Time passed, things changed, girls came and went... But no matter what, those four boys NEVER forgot the Lisbon suicides.Ultimately, the movie was nothing short of queer. When trying to sum up the story in a few lines (such as "Follow the lives of the Lisbon sisters and how they connect to their neighbors. A story full of obsession, gossip, lust, love, desire and isolation.") the story sounds quite unique and intriguing, but the story fell short of that for me personally. Partly because the Lisbon sisters really committed suicide for a reason not much deeper than isolation. The movie, in places, is also extremely flawed. I do not believe Mr. and Mrs. Lisbon could've removed their daughters from school for so long without their daughters being taken from them by social services. In many parts of the movie, they should've used upbeat music to fill the deafening silences. The whole movie was filmed in a style that I can truthfully say makes me rather bored. I would only suggest this film to, perhaps, people who like movies such as "Elizabethtown" which Kirsten Dunst is also in. But I personally disliked this movie which was not very tasteful and will not be watching it again in the future
Dismayingly bad. It's not just that If lucy Fell is a bad film. 90% of what comes out of Hollywood is uninspired, formulaic dross just like it, and usually you can just shrug it off and forget about it. What makes this movie memorably, remarkably bad is writer/director/star Eric Schaeffer's nauseatingly immense sense of self-regard, which arises from every frame like the stench of yesterday's roadkill. The mere fact that the photogenically-challenged Mr. Schaeffer should have the likes of Elle MacPherson tell him he's "cute" speaks volumes
You get what you pay for. This is practicly a made for TV movie.  It was obviously filmed in the 1970s because of their clothes, cars, and lifestyles.  Don't be fooled like I was; the review said there was lesbian sex in the movie; not even close.  I got it because I'm one of those guys that like to watch lesbian sex and I was gravely disapointed.  It has pretty women in it, but you never see much.  Sigh, I didn't waste too much money
maybe a good film but not a true story - warning, spoilers!. There are so many reviews saying this is a true story I have to point out that while the war and the deployment were real (obviously), about everything else is dramatized (including the mission objectives: SCUD hunting on foot, which is a joke to anyone who knows how wars are fought today). McNab has essentially written Tom Clancy genre fiction. The book Bravo Two Zero differs in details with another book written by a second member of the patrol, Chris Ryan, called The One That Got Away. However, both are convincingly debunked by a third SAS memeber in a book called The Real Bravo Two Zero, also available on Amazon, though only the UK Amazon site (which you can still order from in the US). In it, an SAS member who can actually speak Arabic retraces the patrol using both books as guides and talks to all the people McNab and Ryan supposedly killed and gets their side of the story. Most importantly, he manages to restore, without a doubt, the reputation of Vince Phillips, blamed by Ryan for getting the patrol discovered by the Iraqis and a couple members eventually killed. Contrary to what you may expect, I would recommend seeing this, in fact I recommend getting and comparing all three books: B20, The One That Got Away, and The Real B20
ugh, what drivel. I'm a big Mann fan, and i even enjoy his not very good non noir or western films, thunder bay for instance. a great director, but this one stinks. i can't even get up the enthusiasm to criticise i
Resuscitating a Classic Movie with a Lacking, Lethargic Sequel Three Decades Later. There are moments in this inconsequential 2005 comedy when I can see a bright future for Jennifer Aniston's light comedic talents, even though this movie does not stretch her much beyond her likeably insecure "Friends" persona. She plays Sarah Huttinger, a likeably insecure New York Times obituary writer going home to Pasadena to attend her younger sister Annie's wedding. Sarah is picture-pretty, 33 and engaged to a nice, unflappable guy named Jeff who accompanies her. At the same time, she's unhappy about her career and wondering why she always feels out-of-sorts with her well-to-do family. A ray of light comes from her only kindred spirit in the family, her feisty, tart-tongued grandmother Katherine, who tells Sarah about her late mother's pre-wedding tryst in Mexico that gives rise to questions about Sarah's paternity.All the domestic shenanigans that ensue would probably be enough to fill this comedy's blessedly brief 96-minute running time, but screenwriter Ted Griffin hangs it all on the idea that Sarah's family may have been the inspiration for the Robinsons in Charles Webb's 1963 novel, "The Graduate", which of course, is the basis of Mike Nichols' classic 1967 movie. The tie-in must have sounded like a creative idea on paper, but something happened on the way to the screen that has taken most of the comic invention out of it. In fact, there is a pervasive lethargy throughout this movie, and director Rob Reiner is unable to overcome it because Sarah's dilemma of choosing between adventure and predictability never feels that emotionally resonant. The dialogue never feels sharp, perceptive or funny enough to pull off the inevitable comparisons with the earlier film. Moreover, the story is set rather arbitrarily in 1997 to make the timelines make sense with the stars' ages.Beyond Aniston, a strong cast has been set adrift. Playing Katherine like an even more embittered variation on Aurora Greenway, Shirley MacLaine crackles with aplomb as the possible inspiration for Mrs. Robinson, even when her lines are not as snappy as she thinks they are. As the aging but still magnetic Benjamin Braddock doppelganger, a high-tech mogul named Beau Burroughs, an overly sedate Kevin Costner barely registers in a smallish role. When he does, there is an insinuating, almost creepy quality in the way Beau's relationship with Sarah evolves. Until the end, Mark Ruffalo has little to do as Jeff but wait patiently for Sarah to resolve her personal dilemma. Richard Jenkins and Mena Suvari have even less time to make an impression in the underwritten roles of Sarah's passive father and bubbly sister, respectively. The 2006 DVD provides the original theatrical trailer (which gives away most of the plot) as its sole extra
NO ENGLISH SUBTITLES. There are NO English Subtitles as it says there are in the DVD Features. I would think subtitles would be a pretty standard feature in DVD movies these days - Artisan Entertainment is just lazy I guess...
Lordy. At its outset the update film version of Golding's classic novel is creepy and cinematically mysterious. We see the commotion as the boys try to make it to the island while many of the adults are apparently dead or clinging to life, all trying to swim towards shore after the plane went down. In this version, the boys who make it to the island are from an American military cadet school instead of being English. The early stages of the film really do keep the impact of the story alive, but as the film wanes, so does the mystique of the tale.It's really hard to know who to blame, the child actors who played these characters ineffectively, or the screenwriters, for putting in a slew of profanity and inane parts to the movie. The children who played these characters for the most part did what they could with this script. For what it is worth, I really liked how Simon was personified in several of the scenes, especially the one with the "monster" (the "beast" in the other movie version). You really get a sense that he is like the character in the book, as he connects with nature and seems to not fear what the others do: the mysterious "creature" in the cave. Ralph's character was depicted in an appropriate way also for the most part. However, Jack's character was just way too one-demensional: he seemingly never had a chance to grow into the antagonist because he was already one when the movie started. It probably didn't help that Jack's character had profanity-laced tirades aimed at Ralph and Piggy for a good deal of the film, and these moments seemingly killed any originality that the movie could have had. Lines from some of Jack's "servants" were kind of asinine also: "The Chief has spoken."Perhaps this film could have also done a better job of building the momentum of the story. It seemed like events were happening too quick. One minute they don't know how to hunt; the next they are experts. They could have also built up the character conflicts between Jack/ Roger and Ralph/Piggy a little better. They are seemingly friends one minute and enemies the next.If you completely forget that this is Lord of the Flies, or even related to it, and take this movie as just a modern survival story you will be better served. For what it is worth, I am not a big fan of the other version of Lord of the Flies either, although it is better than this one.  Maybe they can update the novel one more time and get it right.2 1/2 stars
Not the Worst Movie Ever Made. First of all, this is NOT the worst movie ever made, nor even the worst movie ever made that was given a budget and some name stars. The worst movie ever made was "Autumn in New York", but that is a different review.No, this not a great movie, but it is very interesting. And for once, thank God, it doesn't end with everything tied up in a pretty Hollywood bow where everthing works out for everyone. It has a gritty sort of realism that transcends the walk through performances of the stars of the movie. And the scenery works well for the overall feel of the movie, bleak.More interestingly for me and others of my generation who grew up with the brat pack, this marked the end of these actors forays into trying to do the teenager thing. For Molly Ringwald, she didn't do anything of note again until "The Stand" six years later, and for Andrew McCarthy, well it could be argued that he still hasn't starred in anything of note again (although he probably made some money from "Weekend at Bernies" I & II).Anyway, probably better to rent than buy, I am only buying it to complete my 80's collection.
More proaganda than documentary. Bottom line...1. If you liked Gore, you will love it and visa versa.2. It is one-sided, plain and simple.3. Nobody considers the poor inept voter who failed to comprehend a simple ballot, or the responsibility of a voter to unsterstand at least enough English to distinguish "GORE from BUSH".  Democrats wanted quantity, and the lack of quality also extended into the indecisive and ambiguous recount procedures that hundreds of lawyers just couldn't get right.
SUPER TEEN. Having been a teenager once, I can certainly understand the inner turmoil and angst teens experience.  However, in PUMP UP THE VOLUME, the movie's attempt to martyrize teens and make all adults look like uncaring morons only serves to underscore why so many adults look with disdain on teens.  The teens in this movie seem to have little respect for authority and their assignation as to being tortured and misunderstood is vanquished in their juvenile behavior.  Even our hero (well played by Christian Slater) cannot communicate with people on a one to one level; he instead decides to become some kind of salvation to his teens by using his pirated radio shows to cause some kind of uprising among them.  As a proponent of truth, he is a vapid antithesis of truth: he fakes masturbation to arouse the youths; he doesn't use his real name or voice; and on a call with a potential suicide victim, he treats the caller as someone who isn't serious and never really offers any kind of consolation.  The suicidal teen says he is lonely and we automatically assume he is lonely within his familial structure, but isn't he just as lonely with the peers who mourn him after his demise?  The adults are played almost as caricatures and the teens as misunderstood heroes.  Sorry, folks, been there done that...living at any age requires a commitment to better yourself and do what you feel is right.  Questioning authority without any viable alternatives, as none of these teens do, merely escalates the generational gap, and movies like this are merely attempts to exploit the so called misunderstanding of youth
Much Ado About Nothing. Despite of having the hand of a true great director at the helm and a multi-star cast (including a top-notch soundtrack by U2), the movie lacks the rhythm and charisma needed to live up to its expectations, with great performances lost in a bad script. It's just a wanna-be art movie, and nothing else
Medicore at best. I really felt like I had to give some real insight to the people who are wondering whether they should watch this or not.You people writing the reviews are being waaay to generous to this movie.With how slow the movie started off you would think that the relationship between the two main characters would slowly and steadily build up-from a close friendship to a romantic relationship.The guys don't even display a close friendship at the beginning, how are they gonna jump from "a guy you see during soccer practice and around your building" to "hot and heavy can't live without each other love"?It's not believable, and doesn't make for a good coming of age love story that this movie tries to be.The movie just hits you with an abrupt and sudden love scene, and from there they are suddenly in love and everything.In fact,there is no indication that either character is gay until that scene.I mean it would have been nice if the movie showed that one guy was into his neighbor or checked him out from time to time, or even was interested in guys in general but as I said before the movie doesn't display any type of interest the guys may have in each other or just guys in general until the love scene.Don't get me wrong,I enjoyed the movie but the reviewers here aren't really giving an accurate representation of the movie and are HIGHLY overrating it.So if your in the mood for an ok gay teen movie by all means grab some popcorn sit back and enjoy.If you're looking for a masterpiece of cinema involving a gay relationship.Look somewhere else.This is not the movie
For die hard Kutcher fans only. The movie starts off very slowly, with childhood episodes from Ashton Kutcher's character.  It's at least 1/2 an hour before we see the adult Kutcher, although he does appear at the very beginning for a brief scene.  The premise is good, and it has some good momentum in the middle, which is why I gave it two stars.  The shifting situations of his life and the lives of his friends are interesting and well done, but the overall story line is very weak, and the ending is dreadful and not supported by most of the rest of the story.  Also, the movie has too many tongue-in-cheek references to Kutcher's real life circumstances -- such as the reference to "tighty-whities."  They distract from the story, and make the movie more of a vanity vehicle -- which is too bad -- If you are not a Kutcher convert and are just looking for a movie, skip this one
Firefly: Excellent.  But buy it on DVD, not "Unbox"!. Read the Unbox terms of use CAREFULLY before choosing this route over a regular DVD purchase.  It is not your usual set of "blah blah" legal jargon.For example, 3c:"Removal of Software. If you uninstall or otherwise remove the Software, your ability to view all Digital Content you have downloaded to the Authorized Device will immediately and automatically terminate and we reserve the right to delete all Digital Content from that Authorized Device without notice to you."If you ever remove the Unbox software, Amazon may revoke your ability to view the Firefly episodes you paid for and may even delete them from your machine!Amazon, I've ordered literally thousands of dollars of stuff through you and always had a great experience; why did you let Unbox create these anti-customer terms of use??
Women in Prison sleaze Italian style. This Joe d'Amato film takes the Women in Prison genre one step deeper into the abyss of sleaze, bordering on pornography. The plot, or lack thereof, is typical: woman goes into jail undercover to unearth the guards  corruption. To make the film last 80 minutes, Joe d'Amato fills the story  with lesbianism, vile tortures, naked women in rat infested sewers, and  plenty of gratuitous sex. I gave this movie 1 star because there is no  option for a 0 star rating. Even hardcore fans of Euro sex queen Laura  Gemser will find this one a total bore
DON'T BUY THIS VERSION. Don't make the mistake i did by buying this copy of this classic ITALIAN movie.It's a complete disaster with faded colors and grainy images.I can't beleive they put this one on the market.You'll get to see the three sketches  all right, but the transfer is simply amateurish and insulting.No subtitles,not even the original ITALIAN track,no gallery of photos etc.This is the worst dvd i ever bought.Luckily for others,a new version was released in 2005 which has the proper treatment.I just hope that VISCONTI's last movie THE INNOCENT won't fall in this category when they released it someday.Let us pray for the preservation of LAURA ANTONELLI's beauty
An Affair of Love?. Cedric Kahn's "L'Ennui" is the story of a middle-aged man, Martin (Charles Berling) who has just gotten divorced and starts having an affair with a women half his age, Cecilla (Sophie Guillemin). At first the relationship is purely a sexual one. He doesn't care for her and we suspect she doesn't care for him. But soon Martin realizes he may love her but she is a girl to love loved. He thinks she is cheating on him. And thus his world begins to crumble as he tries to catch her in the act.Other movies have dealt with similar ideas. Right now I'm thinking of "An Affair of Love", which was about two people who answer an ad in the paper about meeting for a casual affair once a week. Soon the two fall in love but never confront their emotions. The other movie is "Intimacy". A story about two people who meet every Wednesday for their affair. But soon the man realizes he loves her but finds out she is married and tries to win her over. Both films worked. "L'Ennui" on the other hand doesn't.Martin is a philosophy teacher and boy does he talk a lot! I've haven't becomed this annoying watching a character in a while. The entire film consist of him questioning Cecilla. But I'm jumping ahead, let me explain. Cecilla was seeing a much older man, a painter, who was drawing nude pictures of her. He died while making love to her and when Martin finds out about this he is intrigued by her relationship with the man, hence all the questions. If only Martin would shut-up once in a while and actually listen to people maybe he wouldn't be in the state of mind he is. Even has he is making love he never stops questioning her. And don't think Cecilla is a treat either. Who is she? What does she want? Does she love Martin? Can she love anyone? Who knows, and more importantly, who cares? We don't like either of these people. I don't see how they can even stand each other out. If I sat in room with Martin I don't think I'd last 30 seconds with this guy.What "L'Ennui" needed to do was drop some of Martin's dialogue give him more actions and tells us something about Cecilla. By the end of the picture we have a good sense of Martin, he's a pest and a loser. Cecilla though just seems heartless. But is she really?The movie was directed by Cedric Kahn who also directed the recent "Red Light", a much better film. Kahn is interested in human relations. He likes to put his characters in intense situations and just watch them explode. That sounds fine but you have to give us something to care about. I never cared for these people. I never understood them.Some people may watch the film because they find it erotic. One can't really comment on that because different people find different things erotic. I didn't think it was. But who knows.Bottom-line: Do you feel like watching two annoying people for two hours? This is your movie
Poor History and a screenplay over-dramatic. I'm glad someone knows enough about English History to recognize the pure fiction of this film.  But in addition to points made about historical inaccuracy, I also had to object to the ridiculous portrayal of Mary Tudor.  Over-zealous and fanatic (as was a common religious stance in those times - promoted by both sides of the Protestant/Catholic conflict), she was not insane as the film makes her in the opening scenes.  And throughout the film, there was this emphasis on milking the passions for all they are worth - no objectivity whatsoever.  I was sorely disappointed!If you want to get to know Elizabeth and the period in which she lived, I would recommend the superb BBC series, Elizabeth R with Glenda Jackson.  And if you want even further background, look to the BBC again in the Six Wives of Henry VIII with Keith Mitchell.  Tidbits can be gained as well from the movie Mary, Queen of Scots (although a few historical inaccuracies can be found in it - for example, Mary Stuart and Elizabeth never met, although it was Mary's great desire) and even another title, Anne of the Thousand Days.  Those two more theatrical representations fulfill the desire for the more dramatic while still coming closer to the history of the times.  This film just doesn't cut it
Not Happy. I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?
Did we see the same movie??. Okay, the script is not the most imaginative I've ever seen, but I like the actors (especially Ben's best man) so I was friendly with this movie for the most part.  I didn't even mind the obvious holes in the plot, such as...why do these characters not have credit cards or cell phones? Or at least, why don't they use them?  Oh no, much more plausible that Ben will have to strip dance in a gay bar for $150 to buy a car to drive to NC.  I didn't even mind the fact that the whole "We're married and my husband's a doctor." charade was so predictable. Oh Gee, he's pretending to be a doctor and he's on a tour bus with a bunch of elderly people. D'ya think someone might have a heart attack and "Dr. Holmes" might have to step up?  And uh, they're pretending to be married and Oh! surprise there's the best man and maid of honor! D'ya think they're gonna get busted?What killed it for me was that ridiculous ending.  It was obviously supposed to be a surprise (and it was) but there seemed to be no other reason for it than to pull a fast one on the audience.  I felt cheated. I spent the entire movie getting emotionally involved with the relationship between Sarah and Ben, and I really cared about how they would handle things with the fiance and Sarah's little boy and all that.  I cheerfully became disengaged from the relationship between Ben and Bridget, I totally believed neither one of them was ready to get married or right for each other.  The film spent an inordinate amount of time showing me they're not right for each other and that this wedding was not meant to happen.  RIGHT UP TO THE LAST MOMENT, we think he's breaking it off with Bridget. Instead, what the heck let's just go ahead and get married after all.Huh?  He left Sarah sitting out there waiting for him in a HURRICANE!!! after making her promise that she would still be there when he got back.  This man obviously doesn't have a clue what he wants in life, and I'm expected to believe they lived happily ever after?Not only that, but what does it teach us about taking this commitment seriously?  It teaches us that if our instinct is telling us "don't do it!" and our genitals are yearning for someone else and even Mother Nature seems to be working hard to prevent this marriage, aw heck go on ahead and do it anyway.  It's just marriage. It's romantic! You could get lucky and live happily ever after!It's been my experience, when things aren't feeling just right as you approach that wedding, turn and run. The last thing you should do is close your eyes, grab your balls and take the leap
DUPED!. Duped, duped, duped! I kept readin' stuff about 'you'll like this, if you're into Doc Savage' - well, I like Doc Savage and was NOT into this. It was excruciatingly DULL and probably the hardest film I've ever made myself sit through to get my moneys worth. And, personally, if it had just come on TV and I'd never even heard of it.... I truly doubt I would have made a SINGLE Doc Savage connection. DUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUPED!!!!!!!!!!!
not pialat's strongest picture. I don't know whether Seinfeld creator Larry David had A Nos Amours in mind for the mock Eurotrash film that appears in repeated episodes, Rochelle, Rochelle. There are so many French films that could be described as "a young girl's strange erotic journey from Milan to Minsk" - the sexual activities/awakenings of pretty young teenagers is somewhat of a national obsession. It's hard to pick just one.Maurice Pialat is widely known as "the French Cassavetes" (or, if you are British, "the French Ken Loach") which is the shorthand way of saying he's French, made films on the fringe of the European studio system, imbued his pictures with unsentimental realism, and is well-liked by film snobs who see Pialat's lack of relative mainstream success on these shores as proof of their sophisticated taste. His feature length debut, L'Enfance Nue, was tendered the Francois Truffaut mark of approval (it was produced by the master) as well as a Prix Jean Figo. That award is given each year to a promising French director, generally a young one though Pialat was a forty-four when he got his. He cemented his reputation as un auteur with 1987's Sous le soleil de Satan, which not only won him the Palme d'Or but iconoclast status for life when he flipped off some booing audience members while accepting it. Sounds like a guy I could like.If only A Nos Amours were a better film.The picture stars sixteen-year-old Sandrine Bonnaire as the frequently-nude (not as titillating as it sounds) Suzanne, a confused French teenager wandering from one hollow sexual encounter to the next. She says she's only happy when she's in the arms of one of her paramours and we don't blame her: Suzanne's home-life is at best unusual, at worst fairly grotesque. Dad (played by Pialat himself) flies the coop early on, leaving his son, pudgy tyrant Robert (Dominique Besnehard) in charge of both daughter and half-crazy Mom (Evelyne Ker). Emotional and physical abuse relents only for short passages of awkward conversation, often hinging on some sort of inappropriately sexual subject that tinges everything in something akin to unconsummated incest. Mom calls daughter a slut who trades sex advice with Dad while fielding interminable compliments about her body from her brother who himself has become a surrogate husband to Mom. Everyone in this family (Suzanne included) seeks to make life miserable for everyone else, and in their own creepy ways they succeed.Plenty of women seek the affections of too many men (or too many of the wrong men) to compensate for an absent father - such are the incontrovertible facts that clich is made of. It's the sort of unsophisticated platitude-masquerading-as-wisdom we've come to expect from daytime talk shows, peddled to prostitutes and cheating spouses. In his own quasi-verit manner, I imagine Pialat was seeking to subvert the clich, deconstruct it, transcend it - rarely does it actually come off. The meandering quarrels, beatings, and post-coital chit-chats all have the feel of work-shopping actors being put through an exercise rather than real life, even the life of a sexually-obsessed French person. Pialat never truly gets under the surface of these characters, frquently mistaking the bizarre and cruel for honest characterization (it's no surprise Catherine Breillat is such a fan of a the picture). One hundred minutes pass, and yet we still feel as though we do not know these characters - they remain only our acquaintances, obnoxious ones at that, and if it's all the same we rather wish we hadn't been introduced.Interesting footnote: One of Suzanne's first sexual conquests is an American tourist - we meet him as his has an argument with some French sailors, whom he calls warmongers. This is probably the only time in cinema you will see an American character call a French one a warmonger
Disapointed. I was very disappointed in the quality of this DVD.  I would not recommend anyone buying this DVD until the quality is back to that of a professional recording
0 STARS:  This movie sucks. "Sometimes They Come Back" is a terrible attempt at a horror movie.  I love Tim Matheson and I think he is a very good actor, but this movie is just incredibly lame.  The idea that these four little punks with leather jackets on are supposed to be scary as ghosts simply does nothing for me except make me thoroughly disappointed that I wasted my time watching this crap.  The is movie is a JOKE!!The scene this movie is based on is a sad scene for sure, but to base the whole movie on it is going to far with nothing.  Basically, this whole movie is much ado about nothing.I think the biggest joke and the most terrible thing about this movie are these little leather jacket wearing punks as ghosts are supposed to scare the viewer and it simply does not work!!  The premise behind this movie is flawed and lacking in substance from which a horror movie can be successfully derived."sometimes They Come Back" is entirely ineffective as a horror movie and evokes only laughter from a sophisticated horror movie fan.  The sequel is so bad, it is not worthy of a comment.  Some people call "Sometimes They Come Back" a good horror movie...I just call it rubbish
not as avertised..editted movie. the movie is good except this version has been editted and cut out sceens, very disapointtin
Nice Thoughts. Wooden Acting. A film that many women, who have read the book, with effort and imagination, make enjoyable (apparently from other reviews).Pretty scenery; such as walks along the ocean. The costumes are often exceptional. There is wonderful singing in one scene and over the closing credits.For less imaginative women, those who have not read the book, and men:Characters, including Anne & the Captain, display wooden acting. Poker-faces. Others speak at a clipped pace. The properness of the times allowed for personality, as shown well in "Pride & Prejudice" 1940, 1996 & 2006, but not here. Shyness, plainness, or slowness, may be portrayed likeably, with some personality; but not here.Both Anne & the Captain maintain wide-eyed, desperate, looks, constantly. Many of us do get nervous within romance; but we are compelled, by conversation and activity, to interrupt our nervousness with personality. Thus, Anne's & the Captain's constant, wide-eyed, nervousness is un-natural. All of us at the age of Anne and the Captain, would have refined our nervousness, clearly showing: shyness, or thought, or distance, or hopefulness, or approval, or alarm. Poor directing.You understand the quiet thoughts, because of the story, in spite of the confusing, paralyzed, looks; rather than because of them. You come to like Anne and the Captain toward the end, in spite of the wooden acting, because of the novelist's story.A female reviewer, who liked the film, cites a huge amount of important background from the book that is not shown in the film. A poor script for those who have not read the book. Good period, romance films are so few, and so desired, that many women, who have read the book, work and imagine an enjoyable film; better than it otherwise is. I applaud their positive imaginations. However, they continued their imaginative thoughts into rating the directing of this film.I would like to see this good story idea re-made by a better director.Well-made romance films are: "Pride & Prejudice 1940, 1996, 2006", "Wives & Daughters", "North & South", and "Naughty Marietta 1935 with Jeanette MacDonald and Nelson Eddy". Fairly made is "Under the Greenwood Tree".
UnBox video not yet working. Will not play once video was downloaded. I get the error message:  "can not play file, please try again later. error# 0x80040273" I made the exlusive give me call me back feature but the UnBox department was already closed, I was told the UnBox Saturday and Sunday 6-5 hours. I have to say I am impressed with the Call back feature. I downloaded the Unbox Beta now and am recieving email assistance to try to resolve the problem. Thanks Amazon UnBox! I will Update again - Feb. 10,200
Unforgettable (Unfortunately). This movie survives in my memory for over 40 years as one of the most boring stupid excuses for a comedy ever made.  I use it as a benchmark to compare all other really bad comedies.  They are either worse than this one (rare) or better than this one. As an example: Buffalo '66 is worse.  If you watch both in the same day, you will surely die
SAMUEL JACKSON, A PHARMACOLOGICAL GENIUS. YEAH! SURE!. TALKING ABOUT A MISSCAST. SAMUEL JACKSON CAN PORTRAY A HITMAN, A PIMP OR A THIEF, BUT A PHARMACOLOGICAL GENIUS, YEAH, RIGHT
This one will put you to sleep. This was a big disappointment.  Not worth it!!!!
0 STARS - it's like watching a recruitment video for the KKK (filled with errors). I counted ~15 factual errors (aka lies) during Michael Moore's opening speech.*I stopped shortly after.I'm not going to waste my time on such obviously factually-wrong fiction.  How stupid does Mr. Moore think we are?  I was *there* watching the election unfold, and what he reported is NOT what happened.* Example: He said FOX News pressured NBC, cbs, abc, and cnn to change their minds, and give Florida to Gore, and then Bush.  What a load of lies.  FOX news has no power over the other nets.  NBC, cbs, abc, cnn operate independently, and reached their decisions independently, without influence from Fox.* And furthermore, the other nets did NOT call for bush (as Moore falsely claimed).  They labeled Florida "undecided", and left it that way for several days.* Also, Moore claimed that a recount showed Gore won Florida.  FALSE.  A bipartisan committee counted the votes a few months later, and not only did Bush win, but the recount *increased* his lead from a few hundred to several thousand, because of conservative communities in western Florida.  (Many other non-biased groups found the same result.)This video reminds me of his Columbine documentary, where men's ties kept changing colors in the middle of their speeches (it's called creative editing).   Moore has no ethics.  Propagandist.As far as I'm concerned, he's no better than a KKK member.Same mental disorder & illogic.
Hard to Find DVD. This romantic comedy was charming, funny, and clever. I recommend it to anyone who doesn't have a problem with heavy British accents. (If you do, try it with captions). It was fun, funny, and a nice pick-me-up when one needs a lift
Not remotely as good as the book!. I might have enjoyed this movie more if they hadn't gutted the book, which was a pretty good read. The best character in the book, FBI Special Agent Pendergast, isn't even in the movie, and New York City police Lt. D'Agosta is just a comic caricature of the book's character.Another criticism of the movie is that almost every scene is so dark you can hardly see anything. If the purpose was to create a moody, scary atmosphere, they went way too far.See if you must, but don't expect too much
Not Happy. I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?
BLAH, BLAH, BLAH... this has got to be the WORST film I've ever seen. its not sad. Its not funny, jest over blow mellow dramatic garbage. I don't have any sympathy toward nick in this movie, because he does give you anything to work with or want to keep him. the actor is the worst of all. i cant tell if he's sad in some seens, or angry or jest retarded. I've seen some sad movies but this one jest sucks, I guess its aimed at a different time of homosexuals instead of the present. it probably worked better back in 96'. but this movie is SO SO SO BAD. its embarrassing. do not rent it or buy it or view it on television.NOTE'S: THIS FILM HAD  SOME GREAT TALENTA song from Olivia Newton Jon, and (one of my most personal favorites) Mila AND my favorite comedians Margaret Cho. She's to good but...why this film, she (and Mila ) are to good for some want to be tearjerker movie like this.
What about the missing episodes. Why should one buy this series? What about the missing episodes? Are they going to be added later, or this is it? I cannot believe this. Would you buy a bicycle with a missing wheel? Or a keyboard without the C and R keys? I'd like Amazon to explain its customers what it plans to do..
LAME. Lame! Lame! Lame! Corny sexual humour. No wonder it tanked- if the Amazon.com thing is true. Because it's bad. Don't watch it unless you think e*ections are one of the funniest things in the whole entire world
Unbeliavable. How on Earth Casper Van Diem accept to shoot this film I will never know. IT's a joke, unfortunately not a good joke ... Special effects ? Forget it. Good acting ? THe actors seem to never have heard about it. A plot ? Nosense. What is this, can somebody tell me ? The so called &quot;sharks&quot; don't scare even a three-year old child !
Why the Charge. Curious as to why Amazon would charge for this content when CBS offers it for free on the official Survivor Website.  Yeah, at the CBS site you have sit through 4 commercials, but it is worth it to not have to download any extra programs
Wasted. That should have been the title of this movie as it describes the use that the talents of a high-profile cast & normally respectable director are put to.  Another possible title is "It's All About the Groceries", 'cause I'm hard-pressed to think of a reason, other than money, why anybody involved would've signed on to this project.It starts promisingly, with atmospheric shots of the Golden Gate Bridge rising through fog over San Francisco.  The camera plunges through the fog to hone in on the image of a knife being held to a woman's throat. Once again, Ashley Judd is a victim in jeopardy . . .so it seems.  Then the 'victim' proceeds to open a can of whoop-a** all over the perpetrator and beats him to a bloody pulp.  One starts to think that this might be getting good, especially after Ashley's apparently super-competent police detective is revealed to have anger issues, a pretty hefty drinking problem, a propensity for picking up strangers in bars & having rough sex with them . . .and some grisly skeletons in her closet.  I was interested to see what Judd would do with this opportunity to play a character with a dark side instead of her usual noble victim.  Unfortunately, not enough.  Ms. Judd is a luminously beautiful actress, even with a severe short haircut meant to make her look tough, I suppose. It is not hard to believe that men would be drawn to her like bugs to a flame.  She has not developed the range of emotion to really carry a complex character like Jessica, though, playing it distressingly one-note.  Is she ecstatic?  Depressed?  In a drug-induced stupor?  The way Judd plays it, it could be any, or all, of the above.  I like Ashley Judd, but she is in danger of turning into the female version of Richard Gere--a performer with real potential who keeps choosing flashy junk-food roles that do not challenge her talent.  "Kiss the Girls" was the high-water mark & each subsequent film has been weaker than the last.This movie is worth the price of a rental, but I'd take a pass on purchasing it.  For a better treatment of female-cop-with-dark-secrets-and-Issues, & a stronger movie all-around, I recommend "Murder by Numbers" with Sandra Bullock
Jason Goes To Hell. I bought most the Friday the 13th dvds around halloween time at a discount. Of course i couldn't find this one, even thought it was at wal-mart for a long time before that. In my opinion, this one wasn't very good at all. Compared to all the rest i was Greatly disappointed. It was just so fake, and not realistic at all. Very cheesy. For those who wish to complete the set, this one is part of it.  This one was so awful and far from the other ones.  So Fake it's shameful, bad script, it jumped the shark!!!!Jason -yes that's my real name!!!
Very Dreamy, Very Empty. Theodore Dreiser has never been one of my favorite writers, and his novel AN AMERICAN TRAGEDY, although rooted in fact, always felt too pat and mechanical, but at least the original never stacked the deck as badly as this lumbering, self-important film version does.The heartbreak of the original is that the factory girl that the main character kills in an attempt to achieve his social ambitions is at least as charming, perhaps more so, than the rich girl he covets as his stepping stone to The Good Life.  And in Joseph von Sternberg's early 30's film of the book, that girl was played by the radiant Sylvia Sydney.  The theorem of the story, of course, is that having to be married to her while only making a factory worker's salary would be such a grind and a misery that the pair would be miserable and hate one another in very short order.  Well, maybe the greedy, ambitious quisling at the center of Dreiser's novel, but most men with any common sense would rather spend life in a cold-water walk-up with Sylvia Sydney than life in a mansion with any real-life heiress . . .And the same would probably be true if Shelley Winters were allowed to be her actual, ebulliant self in the same role.  But George Stevens, who directed this version, wanted a shrill, drab harpie who would have driven men away even if she had just inherited several million dollars.  The rich girl, on the other hand, is played by Elizabeth Taylor at her loveliest and most luminous.  This is not a fair fight.And the film cheats in other ways--the protagonist is now played by Montgomery Clift at the height of his soulful handsomeness, and although he could have played his character as cold, weak, and self-absorbed (if you doubt this, check out his performance as Morris Townsend in THE HEIRESS, where he brings the chill of Henry James' novel WASHINGTON SQUARE to the tidied-up proceedings), Stevens and his screenwriters, Michael Wilson and Harry Brown, were apparently having none of this--George Eastman is now a doomed romantic hero, and so his murder of Winters becomes an accident, even though he did mean to kill her but chickened out on it.  And although he and Taylor did achieve a marvellous sort of rapport at times (William Mellor's soft-focus photography didn't hurt), it makes what should be a much more ambiguous relationship into the stuff of adolescent daydreams.  And whatever the faults of the original material, it was much more of a nightmare . .
Great stars and a great story can't prod this sleepy production awake. What ever happened to the tight and taut political thriller movies of the sixties? Remember 'Seven Days in May', 'The Parallax View' . Even the original "Manchurian Candidate". Well unfortunately they find no suitable heir to their tradition in this movie. "The Manchurian Candidate" remake provides a great story line and the original provides a great precedent, they even have a great cast of seasoned actors and stars...But the final result is slow, plodding and whatever tension or mystery is built, and there is not much of that, is plainly dissipated so early that I kept wanting the damn assassination to be over and the hero shot so I could go to bed. I'm not sure if it's bad writing or bad editing to blame but the movie is a real disappointment. I don't think the big name stars will want to remember it either.The only thing worse are the DVD extras. There are a series of short interviews with a selection of 'pundits', discussing contemporary political challenges. With terrorism and civil liberties under threat this should be a lively discussion. Unfortunately the 'pundits' are all wannabe no bodies with absolutlely nothing valuable to say. To make things worse none of them seem capable of making a logical adult sentence. All vibe and no verbs. The pundits all seemed to reflect the same leftoid point of view too. Nothing wrong with that. I use the term 'leftoid' because I think they are hollow shells, pod people, not real leftists. These "pundits" if anything dumb down the left or liberal position so much that it is must be embarassing for genuine liberals or radicals to watch. I can't see these guys persuading anyone. What a waste. Surely they could have got a few talking heads that could actually talk from across the political spectrum. If not, they shouldn't have bothered
Creepy, disgusting script. Harriets adventures include feeding laxatives to her rivals, and her bright friend's big plan is to set off a smoke bomb (incendiary) during a school assembly. Either one will get a kid expelled, arrested, and in the newspapers. Not amusing ! Then there's Golly telling her about the virtues of lying. If there is a lesson that could be drawn (which the movie misses), Harriet's secrecy from her parents manages to create a full blown crisis out of nothing, because she is showing the sort of behavior that (in a kid 2 years older) would be take as a possible symptoms for other bad things like self-mutilation or bulemia, as in the movie "Thirteen.
Super? Ha, Hardly. A glowing ball of weird light that turns people evil.  A computer in love with its creator.  Two people go into a hyperspace pod, one comes out pregnant.  Sphere meets Knight Rider meets some bizarre Star Trek episode.  Waste of time, unless its late night television, even then, try not to think, or you'll be very disappointed
Same Episodes Again!. As most people have stated, this DVD has 2 or 3 episodes that are already available on other Scooby compilations.  We fans have to figure out how to petition Warner if we want to see other episodes released
Wild Orchaid. This movie was NOT good at all. Other than it has beautiful people with real nice bodies,everything else is a waste of money and time
Did not work. The ones that are posted twice do not work. If they are posted once, you can try to download it, but it might not work. The video only worked for about a minute. Shame, since I really like this show and I wanted Amazon Unbox to be cool. The one cent CSI works, go download tha
Flawless victory? I think not !. Three years after the first mortal kombat film, fans couldn't wait for Annihilation to come out. Unfortunately, the sequel did not do well at the box office and after viewing it, I can see why. First, I will start with what is positive about the movie. Kitana had more of a role as did Jax, I preferred Sandra Hess as Sonya a little over Bridget Wilson even though she did a good job with Sonya's character in the first movie, some of the fight scenes (Jax vs. Cyrax, Sonya vs. Mileena, Liu Kang vs. Baraka, Sub-Zero vs. Scorpion) were sequenced good, the dvd bonus features were nice, and the soundtrack was awesome. These positive aspects, however, could not save the overall film from disappointment. So what went wrong? Like the first MK, Annihilation attempted to blend two mortal kombat games into one movie (mortal kombat 3 and ultimate mortal kombat 3). Unlike the first MK, however, the blend was not successful. Too many characters were put into the movie and therefore the character development for most of them was almost non-existent. Aside from that, only three of the actors to my knowledge returned from the previous movie though it is understandable why the other actors did not return. What else went wrong with this sequel? Some of the acting was either over-the-top and/or downright pitiful. Shao Kahn's character along with Raiden's character was poorly resembled. Also, some of the characters didn't even get much screen time at all. One flaw that is immediately noticed at the beginning of the movie is that one of the main characters gets killed off (I won't say who because it is probably obvious). While some of the fight sequences were good, most of them were rushed and some were just flat-out ridiculous. This goes double for the animality sequence. Sadly, MK Annihilation doesn't rank up with the first one. Despite all this, there is some good news. After eight long years of waiting, a third mortal kombat film will hit the big screen with most of the actors returning from the first movie. Plus, the third installment will not only kontinue where the first left off but will also ignore the events of Annihilation
Heartburn is the least of the ills caused by this movie. A slow, loggy movie about a philandering husband (everyone was guessing this was Watergate reporter Carl Bernstein in the Nora Ephron novel on which the movie is based; he was Ephron's husband). Jack Nicholson plays the husband and Meryl Streep the wife, and both are uncharacteristically bland. There is hardly anything to the story: they marry, she gets pregnant, he gets restless and wanders. We finish watching knowing and caring as little about all this as when we started. Very dull
Disappointed!. I ordered your movie "Hometown Legend" from CBD because it was portrayed as an inspirational, FAMILY movie.  Since my 8 year old LOVES football and the most recent football movies at the theaters are NOT for kids I was thrilled to see this movie advertised w/ the Jenkins name on it.  Imagine my surprise when it arrived and I saw that it was rated PG for language.  I searched the internet, however, and everything I read said it had NO bad language in it.  So we watched it.  I guess by today's standards your movie would be labeled "tame", but by God's standards I found it disturbing.  I just can't believe that you spent 108 minutes & who knows how much money to make a Godless movie.  Aren't there enough of those out there?  Sure, God was mentioned, but only in passing and in my opinion quite sarcastically and not as King of Kings & Lord of Lords!  There were only a "couple" swear words, but quite a few places of crude humor as well as a teen love story (need I mention the teen girl's attire?!).  Why?  Were you trying to appeal to the unsaved audience?  Isn't that what's wrong w/ our churches in this country?  Unsaved people don't want to watch movies just like their own.  They want to see a difference!  Why didn't you make a difference?I can't believe that I read review after review parading this movie as a great CHRISTIAN movie.  I just don't see it.  To me it was a lame attempt at making a feel good movie w/ just a tad enough religion so that it could be called "Christian" but just enough of the world that it would appeal to them.  I believe in the Bible that is deemed "lukewarm".  I bought this movie because I believed it would be a movie my son would watch over and over.  However, that is not the case.  I'm saddened that Christianity seems to be watered down in our country and even more sad that the very people I thought were helping the cause of Christ aren't doing that at all.  At least not w/ THIS movie.The bottom line is I expect what I saw from Disney, but not from you.  What a missed opportunity!
Bad Device. I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service
Was this review helpful to you?. Celine Dion is the bomb. How like the bomb in this.  DVF is the bomb. Celine hee!Was this review helpful to you?Well
Stooopid movie. I can't help by not like anything about this movie. The actors seem to be as uninterested in making the movie as I was in watching it.  I returned it so fast it made the cashier dizzy.  Skip this stinker. Trust me.  You'll have more fun at the dentist
If you need to, rent it...but do not waste the money to buy it. 27 bucks? Even used at 17 is questionable. Americans love to elevate certain regular "Others" to superstardom - this is true. I almost died for Derrida watching this film...what was with all the incessant following him around? How many times do we need to see him walk down the street as if being followed by paparazzi? Yes, we got the point but the filmmakers never moved on...probably because, like so many of the other reviewers have said here, they lacked the depth and knowledge to do so....the questions were indeed amateurish and a waste of time...the parallel to Seinfeld was especially embarrassing and I was pleased to see Derrida deflect it by saying that if one was really interested in the matter at hand they wouldn't watch such sit-coms....and I do agree that the narrator's blandness was most unpleasant and contrived....and no this film absolutely did not stimulate my curiosity on deconstructive thinking...it only made me want to deconstruct the flaky, shallow American filmmakers who made it
not for most people. I cannot imagine an audience for this movie.  It is flat, disjointed, with poor production qualities.  It smacks of a film trying to be really artsy, but it fails miserably.  If you enjoy confusion and disjointedness, this is the movie for you.  Otherwise, keep looking
A few slices short of a pie. This one will be brief. The movie is an excuse for young actors to use the "F" word and demonstrate that cannot act. The characters are cheap rip-offs of the original, which is to say one-dimensional. American Pie presents Band Camp certainly does not flesh them out. One final note: Eugene Levy- How much cash had to be thrown at your to take this one on
You have to download Amazon software into your PC... I am never happy when a purchase requires that you install the company's software.  The vid is encrypted so that you need Amazon's player to view it.  Blah.  You're better off buying the DVD for $20 with all the episodes so at least you can watch the DVD somewhere other than your own computer.
He didn't go far enough. Oleanna is about a twisted, vicious young woman's need to bring a man (and by extention, all men) down. John, played by William Macy, is a college professor. Carol, played by Debra Eisenstadt, is one of his students. When Carol seeks help for a failing grade, John goes out of his way to help her personally, on a one to one basis. Carol is more than a little irritating and John becomes more than a little irritated by her seeming inability to grasp the simplist concepts. Playing the good professor, John faults his pedantic self for her failure to understand the material. Days later, John is caught off guard when Carol maliciously levels the charge of sexual harrasment against him - just in time to destroy his bid for tenure. Her earlier need for help has been a set up. Carol has been keeping notes all along - cataloging any word or action she might turn against him. Carol's campaign against John is facilitated by what she refers to as "the group." That is to say, by the usual nest of ideological feminists on campus in which Carol has "found herself" and a place for her sexual neuroses. She comes fully armed with her feminist groupthink about sexual harrassment and rape. Her arguments against John rest on rejecting the evidence of one's own senses in favor of a left wing vocabulary thick with words like "patriarchal," "hegemonic," "classism," and an obvious hatred of men. The director, David Mamet, tests the audiences patience as Carol apes the usual post-modern jardon that would put into question our everyday intersubjective (common sense) consensus about the meaning of our everyday words and actions -- especially the everyday words and actions of men. For Carol and "the group,'" reality is always trapped between parentheses because it is always determined by power and those who have it. Men had it in the past. She and her group have it now. Her "reality" takes precedence over John's. Carol eventually trumps her charge of sexual harrassment with a charge of rape and John, bless his heart, loses his inhibitions about hitting a woman. All in all, this movie held my attention, made me needlessly anxious, and pissed me off just enough to want to write my take on it.
Beep Beep. Chuck Jones continues to entertain new audiences with the Road Runner and Wile E. Coyote. Chariots of fur is an blend of his final cartoon with the duo. I found it to be very exciting. If you have Road Runner vs. Wile E. Coyote The Classic Chase from Warner Bros. Golden Jubiliee 24 Karat collection, this video might not be for you. The other five cartoons actually appear on that video; Zip N' Snort, Operation: Rabbit, Hook, Line and Stinker, Beep Beep, and Ready, Woolen and Able. Otherwise this is an very nice cartoon video collection for kids of all ages
If your a True Iron Chef Fan {FoodTv} dont waste your $!. Do not confuse this with the Real thing. i found teh VHS of this for $1 at a store near me. I was interested so i got it. I watch Iron Chef on the Food Network evey night, and this dosent even begin to hold a candle to it! The one commentator is a failed comedian, and the other is a culinary half wit!I never heard more ussless facts in a 90min span b4 in my life. The chefs in the first baattle were, for lack of a better term dissrespectful, i mean come on how are you gonna have a cell phone on you and answer it During a Cooking battle?!? They kept cutting away from the cooking to show interview clips with the chefs. The Cooks were pretty good, they had a decent talent but we didnt get to see as much of it here as you do on the real show. There Flour reporter keeps bugging them thru out the whole thing, asking questionspassed down from the dumb announcer.They kept tryign to play shatner off as a culinary genius but come on we all know that he is nothing but a medeocore actor....out side of star trek or wat ever he was on. The only you see shatner is when he is talking about clearly prewritten statements that sound kinda incoherant lol. All in all i give this 2 stars, and that purely gose ot the merit of the chefs, not to the shows them selfs. Unless your a shatner Fanatic, or sone won thats just kinnda like "its cooking, I'll watch it" but be warned. Its not as good as it could be. Glad i only spen $1 on it bc its truely not worth more
David and Bathsheba. As we know this is famous Bible move. I had seen this very long times ago when I was young. I wanted to see this again. I hope to say just this old move
Cant watch. I downloaded this program and it was garbled and video as if played in slow motion.  This is the first of two downloads that didn't play.  I know it was not my computer because I did download three that played ok
Larry Garfield is compared to?. When Danny Devito's plays Larry Garfield he is like Taxi's Louie De Palma of Wall Street
Forgettable Western!. This film has some good actors in it but the plot is pretty shaky and hard to follow at times.  It is not comparable to other great Westerns made during the sixties.  Eli Wallach is good but confusing--who and what is he after?   The color is good and it sounds like a Sergo Leone picure but it isn't.  What a shame!!!  It could have been made better--less comedy and more plot and of course --action and suspense!!!!  Buy or rent on your own if you dare----I wouldn't
Not very good... ...But it gets one star for the brief moments that Ricky Jay has in the film and another for portions of Alec Baldwin's performance.  Overall this is a stinker.  Mamet is not a good director.  He should stick to writing
Heartburn is the least of the ills caused by this movie. A slow, loggy movie about a philandering husband (everyone was guessing this was Watergate reporter Carl Bernstein in the Nora Ephron novel on which the movie is based; he was Ephron's husband). Jack Nicholson plays the husband and Meryl Streep the wife, and both are uncharacteristically bland. There is hardly anything to the story: they marry, she gets pregnant, he gets restless and wanders. We finish watching knowing and caring as little about all this as when we started. Very dull
DO NOT buy this movie~ worst ever!. This is seriously the worst movie ever.  The last time I saw it was in the theater, and I still can't get over how bad it was.  In fact, it ruined a perfectly good date with a perfectly good guy.... We didn't speak for six months after we saw it together!  I too wish I could give it no stars.... And obviously people aren't looking for this movie since the last review was in 2002!  I can't believe you can even buy it on DVD
Parents, Think Twice!. The only thought in my mind throughout this whole movie was the Natalie Holloway case, about the girl last summer that went on that school trip, went off with a boy and disappeared. In this movie, Hilary Duff's character is on a school trip to Rome, meets a guy there and then fakes sick to get away from the school group to follow this guy around Rome. I felt so bad that Disney had made this movie showing a young girl going off on her own with a boy she did not know on a school trip because it rang so close to home from that tragic dissappearance of Natalie Holloway. In this movie the only repurcussions the character gets for doing such completely unsafe acts was that she was grounded..and they didn't even show that part. Young girls are very impressionable and will jsut see the glamour in the movie. Hopefully they will be brough up by good parents that will teach them right to know better than to go off with a stranger in a strange place
Flat "acting", no energy. Poor casting, poor acting, unconvincing characters. The leading lady had no energy. There was no excitement, sexual or otherwise. Boring. One of King's worst. In contrast, I found King's "Swimming Naked" (Red Shoe Diaries) to be enjoyable. The acting wasn't great, but the stories were mildly entertaining and the nude scenes very pleasant
quite boring.. the young actor is great in this movie, but the film itself is non-exciting and a bit boring.**
Did not work. The ones that are posted twice do not work. If they are posted once, you can try to download it, but it might not work. The video only worked for about a minute. Shame, since I really like this show and I wanted Amazon Unbox to be cool. The one cent CSI works, go download tha
Not Happy. I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?
could not be viewed!. i downloaded it and i couldn't view the video paste the intro. then i RE-downloaded it thinking that maybe it was a corrupt file, but it again it only had sound and not video. this one is a waste of money
Missing episodes. This series is being sold with missing episodes, like many others here in Unbox. Do they think their customers are so dumb? Would you buy a DVD series with a missing DVD? What sense does this make? What a disappointment this service is..
Skip this and go for something harder. Reading some of the reviews, it's hard for me to believe that we are all referring to the same movie;  Some decent soft-core stuff, but the overall acting/plot completely sucks.  The action was tolerable, but you'd be better off skipping this and going for something harder if you want better satisfaction and/or follow-through
He was fired from GM for calling off and showing up late. what a joke...people believe the stupidest things...do some research and you will see that this is a joke.  I hated it
boring. I used to think this film was okay but it's really lame. He's going home only cause he wants a car, shows you how greedy people in america are about christmas. They only care about the material goods they get out of the overrated season
I would have picked zero stars but it wasn't an option. First of all, the only reason I started watching this movie was because my roommate got it and we're both lovers of the Romantics. The only reason I kept watching this movie after the first 5 minutes was because I could already tell it was going to be completely and totally awful and would make for a few good laughs between the two of us.Beyond some very basic facts about the party of writers, this movie is not grounded anywhere in reality. The acting is way overdone and quickly becomes grating. There is no plot whatsoever to speak of and the movie lacks any sense of clear direction or purpose -- it is simply a collection of random, inexplicable, and nonsensical events filled with frenzied sexuality, animalism, and vaguely-defined hallucinations. While I'm sure the actual experience was not entirely tame and prudish, I find it hard to believe that this is anywhere close to being accurate. Even when it tries to delve into pseudo-philosophical discussion about the nature of love, fear, poetry etc., that you would expect to emerge among these great literary figures (which, strangely, does not happen often)it utterly fails to make any understandable conclusions or statements and their real views, beliefs, and visions become hysterical ravings rather than the passionate philosophies that they were.The film does not deal fully at all with Mary's creation of the Frankenstein story, nor do any of the other characters write ghost stories as Byron challenges them and as really took place. The idea that the story was born out of Mary's personal fears is an interesting one but this too spirals out of control and has almost nothing to do with Frankenstein.The premise behind this disaster of a movie is a good one and I think with the right script, actors, and director it could be an amazing exploration of authorship, literary exploration and exchange, and this fascinating group of writers. That is not, however, what this film is.P.S. If you do get seduced by the other reviews, pay particular attention to the scenes in the billiard room...I didn't know they had light bulbs in 1816!
The Lisbon Suicides. Therese, Lux, Mary, Bonnie and Cecilia make up the five Lisbon girls, ages 13, 14, 15, 16 and 17. Cecilia, the youngest, lives in her sisters shadows because they are all older and of much more interest to their male neighbors. As a cry for help, she slits her wrists and lays down in the bathtub, she survived the incident. After a psychiatrist highly impresses upon the strict Mr. and Mrs. Lisbon that it would be benificial for Cecilia to be exposed to environments which have boys her own age, Mr. and Mrs. Lisbon decide to allow the girls to throw the one and only Lisbon party. Some of the neighborhood's boys are invited over and while the party is in session, Cecilia is pretty inanimate, sitting on the couch while her sisters flirt, talk and laugh. Midway through the party, Cecilia asks to be excused and Mrs. Lisbon - though somewhat reluctantly - allows it. Cecilia goes up to her room (on the second floor of a two-story house) and jumps out the window, landing on the spiked fence on the front lawn of the Lisbon house. In this way, Cecilia Lisbon commited suicide. Only four girls remain.The act which Cecilia committed did not go at all unnoticed. The father saw her immediately, the party ended there and all of the boys went home rather glum. Four of the Lisbon's neighbors, four young boys, suffered a rapidly growing obsession with the Lisbon girls, who were beautiful and a total mystery to the outside world. They got hold of Cecilia's diary and tried to explain why she committed suicide. The eldest decided Cecilia was a dreamer, and she did not think she would fall when she jumped out her window, she thought she would fly.With their youngest sister gone, the remaining Lisbon girls grow closer to each other, stranding themselves further from the outside world. When school starts again, they attempt to go on acting as if nothing happened, not ever mentioning their youngest sister. The run-of-the-mill awkward act is taken part by the rest of the school however. The usual profuse apology to the mention of the word "death" and the like.Trip Fontaine is the most popular guy in school, the object of desire to all of the girls at school... Except for the Lisbon girls, which is of no importance to Trip until he sets eyes on Lux. Trip cannot help but be enchanted by her flawless beauty. In the beginning, he is unsuccessful in his quest to even catch her attention for she bluntly shows she's not interested. But after his consistent courtship, Lux falls for his charming ways. Trip then attempts to convince Mr. Lisbon to let him and three of his football team pals take the Lisbon daughters to Homecoming. After Mr. Lisbon talks to his wife, he agrees to Trip's request, knowing nothing but Trip's sincerity and claimed honorable intentions, on the understanding that Trip have all of the Lisbon girls returned to the house by curfew.After Trip explains the situation to his football peers, he gives in to those who bribe him the most handsomely. Meanwhile, the Lisbon girls are picking out fabric for the dresses they shall wear to the Homecoming Dance. Though one pattern is used for all four dresses, each dress looks unique when concentrating on detail. Once they pick up the girls, they stop midway to the Homecoming in order to smoke, Lux being the only girl volunteering to smoke.They then drive to the dance. Trip and Lux sneak away and sneak swallows of alcohol. Another one of the Lisbon sisters and her date follow, but leave soon afterwards, not being as wild nor daring as Trip and Lux. At the time they all decided to meet back at the car so they could make the girls curfew, they are all there... Except for Trip and Lux, who at that time were alone in the middle of the football stadium field. Deciding they must make their own curfews, Therese, Bonnie, Mary and their dates leave without them. After fooling around, the intoxicated Trip and Lux fall asleep in the middle of the football stadium. Trip awakens in the middle of the night and leaves Lux there alone. When Lux wakes up early the next morning she is confused as to why Trip is not there. She takes a taxi home and her parents were worried sick (of course). But they take measures as far as pulling the girls out of school and stranding them inside the Lisbon residence.The girls, in a desperate attempt to hold onto a connection to the outside world, begin using morse code to interact with the four boys who so closely follow their lives. One of which boys lived across the street and the rest which came over daily after this in order to contact the girls. Soon following, the boys begin talking to the Lisbon girls via phone. One day, the girls invite the boys to come over once Mr. and Mrs. Lisbon are asleep. The plan being that the boys were to drive the girls somewhere, the boys hastily agree. They sneak over and Lux invites them to wait inside for her sisters and Lux goes to wait in the car. The boys wander down to the basement while waiting for Therese, Bonnie and Mary, verbally expressing their hopes for the night. But then they realize they have stumbled upon one of the sisters. She had hung herself. The boys, scared to death, run all the way home. Time passed, things changed, girls came and went... But no matter what, those four boys NEVER forgot the Lisbon suicides.Ultimately, the movie was nothing short of queer. When trying to sum up the story in a few lines (such as "Follow the lives of the Lisbon sisters and how they connect to their neighbors. A story full of obsession, gossip, lust, love, desire and isolation.") the story sounds quite unique and intriguing, but the story fell short of that for me personally. Partly because the Lisbon sisters really committed suicide for a reason not much deeper than isolation. The movie, in places, is also extremely flawed. I do not believe Mr. and Mrs. Lisbon could've removed their daughters from school for so long without their daughters being taken from them by social services. In many parts of the movie, they should've used upbeat music to fill the deafening silences. The whole movie was filmed in a style that I can truthfully say makes me rather bored. I would only suggest this film to, perhaps, people who like movies such as "Elizabethtown" which Kirsten Dunst is also in. But I personally disliked this movie which was not very tasteful and will not be watching it again in the future
Big Deal, Mr. Director. Taking gratuitous advantage of inner city poor seems a cheap shot for a wealthy white man. I have one question for the director: Why don't you make a movie and expose the degenerate aspects of your own people? Exploiting others is no way to make your way in this world. Even though such behavior made your father rich, you should try to be a better man
Can I get a refund for that ninety minutes of my life?. Tangled (Jay Lowi, 2001)Shawn Hatosy has been doing the character-actor thing in Hollywood for a long time. Lowi, in his first feature film, gives Hatosy a starring role, and pairs him opposite established stars Rachael Leigh Cook (Antitrust) and Jonathan Rhys Meyers (Titus), as well as throwing Lorraine Bracco (The Sopranos) into the mix-- and he still can't come up with a good movie.Now, I'll watch Jonathan Rhys Meyers in anything, and I have, and I still had trouble with this mess. The basic idea: David Klein (Hatosy) wakes up in a hospital with a police detective (Bracco) at his side. It seems Kelin's girlfriend Jenny (Cook) and his best friend Alan Hammond (Meyers) are both missing from the wreckage of Hammond's car, where Klein was found. Klein relates the story of the relationship between the three of them to the detective, piecemeal, with scenes from the present intercut.Predictable, boring, cliched, two-dimensional, need I go on? If the ending of Jodi Picoult novels comes as a shock to you, you may find the big reveal here to be a surprise. No one else will. *
City of Angels was way better!. Save your $3.50 DVD rental fee. If you're looking for a movie that will make you feel like City of Angels made you feel, look elsewhere! Sorry, my vote is for Hollywood. The director of Wings admits that there was no script before shooting began. The extras that came with the Wings DVD, interviews and info on Berlin, were more entertaining than the movie.
Very boring with walk-ons by fmaous people. This movie is very mildly amusing for about ten minutes.  Yes, it is slightly interesting to see the Cannes environment, but not enough to watch this film. It could be a cure for insomnia, though.  Fans who are looking forward to seeing their favorite actors in a satire will be disappointed.  You can count in seconds the amount of time any famous actor is on the screen, and it's really just very boring. All those fans of Johnny Depp: be particularly warned. He may have co-star billing, but blink and you'll miss him
Warning Incomplete Episode!!!. The episodes in this series have an average running time of 50 minutes. This one happens to be only 18 minutes. This mean sthat the file abruptly stops right in the middle. Even though it only cost me $2 I still got jipped.  Let's hope Amazon can iron out these kinds of problems before they get this service farther underway. Be careful enough to sheck the running times to be sure they seem accurate before you buy them
Dont get "Fiji" final week ... Dont dwnld " Survivor, "Thunderstorms & Sacrifice" ". Its my fault for not reading the whole thing. you would think that the last episode would be the finale , but NO, its just a 10 minute recap going to the finale 4. I didnt even get a full 45 minute episode. No finale. I got rippped off. $1.99 dwnld not well spent. Dont bother dwnldng any episode of fiji if you dont know the ending. Because they dont have that episode, not even the reunion show
Bad Device. I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service
Trite. I agree with other reviewers that all the supposedly deep and thought-provoking issues presented in this film (will machines ever think and become self-aware? Will they have emotion? Should they then be considered living beings and have the same rights as humans?) have been done before -- with the character Data on Star Trek, as one of many examples. There is nothing new in this movie.And it's not done well. The humor is forced ("How does one 'ush'?" asks Andrew. Just hilarious. I thought after 16 years of learning, he would have absorbed common English words). The dramatic moments were anything but (it was supposed to be a big deal when Andrew said "I will..." instead of "One will...". How hard is it program him to say "I" from the beginning? The "One" business was extremely irritating).In the end, this film was mostly a collection of sci-fi and pseudo-sociology, and it was not saved by Robin Williams' okay -- but hardly great -- performance.Instead of recycling these old, tired themes, the filmmakers could have addressed a much more real and disturbing question: When robots are built that are capable of performing many tasks currently done by humans (and that day might be approaching with frightening rapidity), how tremendous will the economic and social shockwaves be?
Skip this one, get the original!. Over half of this movie consists of scenes taken  from the original 1939 classic film directed by Zoltan Korda. Even those scenes can't disguise the remake's network TV-movie quality. Beau Bridges is generally a good actor,  but he is terribly miscast on this film. Go rent both versions of The Four  Feathers and see it for yourself
Stick with import. Why American production make HK movies look so cheap? First of all, they cut off so much scene, second of all ruin it by making look acting so dumb by English Dubb. For ANY of HK movies, ALWAYS stick with ORIGINAL LICENSED HK RELEASE. Be careful with cheap imports, boots though
The end of a great show begins. THE TRANSFORMERS gets my vote as the worst movie of the 1980's.  It pains me to say this for I am a fan of the series.  It was a travesty to see Optimus Prime (the greatest of the Transformers) fall in battle and pass on the Matrix of Leadership to a successor (Rodimus Prime) who proved incapable of leadership.  Galvatron was a pathetic reincarnation of Megatron--he lacked the malevolent cunning of Megatron and behaved like a raving lunatic.  Why would a Decepticon warrior follow him into battle?  As for the new generations of Autobots and Decepticons introduced in the movie, they were forgettable.It amuses me that "fans" are raving about the movie now yet they did not pay to see the movie when it was released twenty years ago.  THE TRANSFORMERS failed at the box office and I am glad it did.  As a fan, I was insulted.  Perhaps these other "fans" have allowed nostalgia to blind them to the ugly truth of this outrage.
For the Cover, Not the Film. I watched both "Seven Brides for Seven Brothers" and its documentary "Making of ..." and was impressed by the dancing and the dancers (particulary the incredible Tommy Rall).  Looking for a film that showcased any of the dancers in that film I came across this and after having read the reviews of the dance sequences both on this website and on imdb, I decided to purchase the film.Then I noticed the cover.  I thought "Is this what I think it is?", and clicked on 'see larger image'.  YIKES!  It is!I have children at home and thought that this is not an illustration that is positive or educational, to say the least (after just having placed "Hands Are Not For Hitting" on my wish list!).  If Warner Bros decides to change the illustration on the cover, then I'll consider buying it.  Until then, for those of you who are concerned with the images your children see, I suggest you view the 'see larger image' of the cover before you decide to buy
Cant watch. I downloaded this program and it was garbled and video as if played in slow motion.  This is the first of two downloads that didn't play.  I know it was not my computer because I did download three that played ok
Direct to video potboiler re-tread that never should have been made. This direct to video "sequel" is actually more of a re-tread of the original 1998 guilty pleasure erotic thriller/film noir potboiler, and another of the countless, and pointless, direct to video sequels to come from Sony/Comlumbia/Tri-Star as of late (Cruel Intentions 2 & 3, Starship Troopers 2, shall I go on?).  Wild Things 2 focuses around a rich girl (Susan Ward) whose stepfather mysteriously dies, and the only thing standing in her way of inheritance is her high school rival (Son of the Beach's hot Leila Arcieri) who claims to be the man's true, biological daughter.  Naturally, just like in the original, there are plot twists aplenty, as learned by an insurance investigator (Isiah Washington, giving a somewhat inspired performance), and naturally, there are double crosses, murders, and a redux of the first film's threesome, only it's not as erotic as the original's.  Wild Things 2 isn't just a cardboard copy of the original with none of it's good points, it's a solid waste of film that even fans of the original film will hate.  Is it worth seeing?  Depends how much you liked the first Wild Things, but for the rest of us, just watch the original and forget this ever happened
Wonderful program, but flawed files... Okay, so to catch up on this exciting new series, I decided to try this revolutionary downloading program - Amazon Unbox!  I selected the first 10 episodes and hit Purchase.  Minutes later, I was watching the first episode, it came quickly, sounded great, and looked wonderful... however the second one was missing a few minutes at the end.  Forgiveable, until... whole episodes starting arriving incomplete or had missing video, making it incredibly frustrating and disappointing.But, this IS a good concept... unfortunately, Amazon has yet to verify all their own files for both audio and picture quality!  So, until the issue is fixed and paying customers recieve completed files or refunds... DO NOT try and download Season 1, Episodes 2, 4, 5, 6, and 7!!!  1, 3, 8, 9, and 10 were the only ones that were 100% complete for me
UnBox video not yet working. Will not play once video was downloaded. I get the error message:  "can not play file, please try again later. error# 0x80040273" I made the exlusive give me call me back feature but the UnBox department was already closed, I was told the UnBox Saturday and Sunday 6-5 hours. I have to say I am impressed with the Call back feature. I downloaded the Unbox Beta now and am recieving email assistance to try to resolve the problem. Thanks Amazon UnBox! I will Update again - Feb. 10,200
save your $, read the book. one of the last of the biblical epics, this was a bomb in its initial release, and deservedly so.  the movie doesnt know whether it is de mille or italian realism, and most of the sequences (adam & eve, tower of babel) are either laughable or langorous (george c scott & ava gardner as abraham & sarah).  yet stuck in the middle is a fine half hour sequence of the story of noah, with director john huston casting himself in the one strong sequence in the movie: replete with the right mix of humor and awe.  that half hour isnt enough to recommend buying or renting the dvd, but if you can catch it on tv some day, its worth a half hour of your life.
Disappointed. This will only please the most ardent vampire fans.  Why?  It's exceedinly poorly written.  I figured when I watched it it would either be a decent movie or so bad that it wouldn't matter.  Sadly it was neither.  Don't get me wrong, it was bad, but in all of the wrong ways.  For example the writing, plot dialog, character development is basically not there...well they are they're just about as interesting as chalk.  Unfortunately the acting's not bad.  This results in what must be the worst kind of bad movie.  You can't laugh at the bad dialog because it isn't bad enough, it's just flat.  And you can't laugh at the poor acting because for the most part it's acceptable.  It's got gore and blood, but it isn't the least bit scary.  In general my accessment is it is bad in the most painfully mediocre and forgetable way.if you want sexy evil wait for the remake of Amityville Horror to be released.  Ryan Reynolds may not play a vampire, but that movie had more development in it's credits than this had in it's entirety
Quote for Never Die Alone. Theres ups and downs in this movie. To me mostly downs.When I first seen it in theaters i loved it. So when Igot the DVD ,iloved it.3 months pass i get sick of it.For 3 reasons First The picture looked blury even on DVD.Second iz the actin iz the same. Third just lookin atDMX abusing 3 women by getting them addicted to coke and heroin.And him abusing his own son, what is wrong with that man.I think this movie make X alot Crazyer.I wouldn't reccommendthis movie for relegous people, HELL NO!!!! If you worshipthe devil andU want to die,And like looking at people being killed ,then it's strongly reccommended 4 U
Why the Charge. Curious as to why Amazon would charge for this content when CBS offers it for free on the official Survivor Website.  Yeah, at the CBS site you have sit through 4 commercials, but it is worth it to not have to download any extra programs
Bad. This movie is just plain bad.  It never should have been released for public consumption.  I honestly cannot think of one good thing to say about this movie.  It makes no sense that it would have 3 1/2 stars with 39 reviews.  Something fishy is going on here.  Enough time wasted on this one
The cell phone is the main character. The most interesting part of this action movie is the centrality of the cell phone. The movie is a Nokia product placement, highlighting what awful danger you are in if you are not connected and, conversely, what a phone can do for you if you have one. The plot centers on Jessica (Kim Basinger) who is abducted because the bad guys think she has something that they need. Mystery #1: What is it?After lots of running/driving in various parts of L.A. the bad guys round up Jessica's family, while on the other end a pretty guy turned superhero and a would-be day spa owner cop are trying to help them. Mystery #2: how will the cell phone save the day?Mystery #3. Watch for the credits at the end of the film. They show up on a...? Yep, you got it
POINTLESS. Eric Maibus and Scott Bairstow have become fine young actors, and even their adequate performances cannot save this dismal, pointless, lurid and sadistic movie.  Dee Wallace Stone should be ashamed for participating.  Maibus plays the hypnotic leader of a teenage devil cult, with no conscience, morals, or regard for anyone but himself; Bairstow plays the usual &quot;misunderstood&quot; teen who looks to the group for acceptance.  The script is laden with offensive four letter words in every other sentence; enough is enough.  If this is the way teens talk, then steer me clear, folks.  There is no heart or soul in this movie, and no reason to rent or buy.  NO STARS.  C'MON AMAZON, WHEN YOU GONNA GIVE US THE 0 STARS OPTIONS??
Just terrible. The acting was terrible, there was basically no plot. If this movie represents a woman's view of the Conan movie genre, then that's just very sad. Red Sonya was better
The Product has not reached me yet. This is bring to your notice that the product that i have orderd has not reached me yet. I request you to do the needful.Thanking youPrince Georg
Zero stars for the worst western ever made. This has to be a joke! How could've stars like Brando and Nicholson agreed to appear in such rubbish is beyond comprehension! Brando with the worst irish accent you'll ever hear, and Nicholson trying to play the clarinet!!Do the fans a huge favour and delete this horrible movie
What about the missing episodes. Why should one buy this series? What about the missing episodes? Are they going to be added later, or this is it? I cannot believe this. Would you buy a bicycle with a missing wheel? Or a keyboard without the C and R keys? I'd like Amazon to explain its customers what it plans to do..
stick with the classic "the bad seed" instead. this must have seemed like a great idea at the time,"cast culkin against type as a killer child and show his range as an actor". the problem is his range is all the way from a to b.this movie never explains how or why the boy turns killer and asks us to except one too many "chance" happenings. in the end all we get is this "thriller"(and i use the term very loosely)that thinks just the idea of culkin as a killer is thrilling
My disc was defective too, and the movie wasn't worth it... I actually bought this DVD over a year ago but just decided to watch it.  I'm a huge fan of Sidney Lumet, and I like Richard Gere, Gene Hackman, and the other stars in the film.  About 30 mins. into the movie the picture started distorting, and after that it would skip large chunks of the movie.  There was nothing visibly wrong with the DVD itself.  But, I saw enough.  Even before I reached the defective part, it was like watching a foreign film without subtitles.  I had almost no clue what was going on, and didn't really care after a while.  I can usually watch almost anything, most movies have some redeeming quality - for example, maybe an exotic, interesting locale.  This is largely set in New Mexico.  No offense to New Mexicans, but skip this.  I threw it away
waste of money. Dont purchase episode 5 of season 2, it's 7 minutes long and you dont get any of the Charlie Murphy Prince story.  WTF!!!  Can someone fix this and refund or offer the entire episode for re-download!!!
Forsake your dearly departed or you'll be sorry. B Grade movie, really poor script.Bulk of movie is boring, superficial, stereotypical.Real purpose of movie is Baptist condemnation of the supernatural.Story line.The wife of a couple deeply in love dies in a boating accident during a beachhouse visit. The husband feels a deep loss for two years during which he is frequently visited by the ghost of the wife.On the second anniversary of the accident relatives and friends gather at the beachhouse and push the husband to come to grips with his grief and refocus his energy to move on with his life.Overtones.The leading man is depicted as unstable, self-centered, reckless, irresponsible, and fantasy-prone.before and during the two year period. When revealed to the those assembled, the spirit contact with his wife is universally condemned. His "giving up the ghost" is seen as a great relief and the first sign of maturity he has displayed in his life.The daughter has dream sequence with the mother in which the mother coaxes her into a head-on crash with a car.leaving her frightened and distraught.Media Messages.The film illustrates the creation and reinforcement of a cultural taboo.1. Spirit contact is dangerous, selfish, and emotionally unhealthy.2. The personal grieving journey of another should be co-opted by peers.3. Condemnation is the only acceptable response to spirit contact. There should be no expression of curiosity or investigation like "What did she look like?" "What kinds of things did she say?"4. Messages from loved ones in dreams should not be trusted.In short the movie creates a set of automatic responses all of which mitigate against a common sense acceptance and appreciation of the value of spirit contact with loved ones..In life our conduct is about building bonds of love and trust with those around us. In passing over these ties endure and can be building blocks for a link to the beyond. When William Blake's brother passed, he appeared and taught the skill engraving thus providing humanity for centuries thereafter with icons known to all.Many near-death experiencers have wisely learned that they must keep their wisdom to themselves. The inner teachings are sacred and must not be diluted and defiled by small minds. The same is true for after-death communications largely because of media images that create a cultural storyline like that in this film
IT NEVER HAPPENED!!!. I can fix this! This movie never happened. Now we need to make Starship Troopers 2. I will contribute a few bucks. If we all contribute, we can get an actual director to come along, preferably the one from the first movie, get us some big time sponsors, and make us one heck of a Starship Troopers 2! There, I have repaired the terrible tear in all our souls that this fake Starship Troopers 2 caused us all
Belongs in a Litter-Box!. When I watched this stinker, I felt like sniffing it and covering it up.This is just another attempt to cash in on nostalgia.  Obviously the producers of the film were aiming at parents fond memories of the Dr. Seuss classic childrens book and tried to exploit it into an updated version. It fails miserably. It is another example of Hollywood dumping tons of money on the look of a movie instead of the script. Dont get me wrong, this movie looks great. It has awesome costumes and set design but the problem is, it seems like they whipped the screenplay out in 20 minutes. Even the kids think this movie stinks.Do your child a favor, avoid this film and instead sit down and read your child the original book. They will appreciate it way more.
a disgrace to the film industry. In simple words, Easy Rider is probably the most morally detestable film  I have ever seen. My impression of Hippies before seeing this movie, was that they were more or less just lazy(but peaceful)people. Now Hippies kinda disturb me. In the beginning of the film when they stopped for some food at the commune it was clear that the director wanted me to sympathize with the hippies. I  personally, however, could not have felt anymore different. There were kids running around everywhere not being watched, while adults irresponsibly thought only of themselves, wether that meant engaging in immoral behavior such as taking a swim naked or doing drugs. The odd thing is though that while drugs are never exactly glamorized (though done frequently by the heros of this), swimming naked is treated as if were innocent children's play. That seriously grossed me out. How could something so lustful and dirty, be thought of like that? Hippies are  just plain creepy.Also its kind of hard to get around thae main characters. These guys were nothing more than no good drug smuggling degenerates. And yet they are the sad excuse the movie has in the place of heros. The director or one of the cast members I believe, on the making of Easy Rider, compared the two main characters to John Wayne. But If John Wayne ever played a hero as lowesome as these one,s the movie would just simple not be any fun.Another problem in this movie was the South. They were potrayed as nothing,but lowesome biggots. Their hatred for the hippies unrealistically comes out of no where. Now I'll admit there are people like this, but to  generalize the entire south, is unfair.Ultimately though I would have to say the worse part of this movie, was where they had LSD trip and the Apostles Creed(a Catholic prayer) was being recited. As strong practing Catholic, this could not have been more offensive. I had to leave the room  after about half way through the scene it disturbed me so much. I returned once it was over, though Frankly I wish I had never seen it in the first place. Everything from this scene represents what I hate about society. The hatred for Religion expressed is not very peaceful or loving. Long story short, this movie is about as immoral as they come.P.S. I dont think I can ever look at my Steppenwolf CDs or Records in the same way again
Wasting space on my DVD shelf... I was recommended this movie by a friend here at college, and because he spoke so highly of it, I thought I would just buy it instead of rent it. I definitely regret that decision. If you're thinking of buying it - rent it first. It was dull and obnoxious, not to mention weird. The only entertaining part of watching this film was making fun of it with my roommate (which is why I gave it 1 star instead of 0). However, if you're still interested, definitely rent it, you might enjoy it.
Survivor Rip Off. I have bought 2 seasons of Survivor on unbox and both of them are not complete. Very dissapointing. Guatemala  episode 11 is from a completely different season and it is missing the last 2 episodes and the reunion show. Just leaves you hanging. Exile Island is missing the final episode it just goes from the competition between Danielle and Cirie for a spot in the final 3 to the live reunion show
WATCH OUT FOR THIS TITLE!. For those of you looking for more Eva action after seeing the original series take heed. DON'T BUY THIS DVD! The Death part of the DVD, part 1, is nothing but a terrible rehashing of scenes from the regular season, and the second half, Rebirth, part 2, is new stuff, very good, BUT! If you buy 'The End of Evangelion' you get Rebirth AND a much better and easier to understand ending to the whole series in completely new material. So, don't buy 'Death&Rebirth'. Buy 'The End of Evangelion' instead
Poor support. This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet
Great for the Zen Vision. At first I didn't realize that you have to use Amazon's software to load onto the Zen.  Once I figured that out (actually my husband figured that out) the show played perfectly and it was very easy to do.  I wasn't able to edit the stars.  If I could I would give this 5 stars.  If you have tried some other sites for the Zen, they are much more difficult to use. Amazon's Unbox is great for the Zen
Please not another season of this!. Ok so I have always thought Courteney Cox should not be allowed on screen due to lack of acting talent and this show just proves it. It really is the most boring show Ive seen in a long time. If you thought she was bad in scream...and friends..dont watch this...there are other actors in this show who do redeem it somewhat but could never save it. Hopefully this show will be scraped
1 star to many. Wow was that ever awful! I'd write more but Im busy cleansing my DVD player after loading that steaming pile!!
This is a comedy?. Seriously, I didn't even think that this was a comedy until I came here and saw people saying "it wasn't funny."  I got it as part of a boxed set of Cary Grant films (purchased here), and it's the only dud of the lot.There was one scene that, I will grant you, was light and entertaining.  Not laugh out loud, but funny enough (I won't spoil it by saying which one).  Aside from that, the film struck me as a rather unbelievable farce about infidelity.Most of all, you could almost feel the very talented cast trying to keep this elephant airborne.  Grant and Simmons, in particular, are strong - but their efforts are ultimately squandered.  Bob Mitchum is OK, but generally miscast, and Kerr's beauty and talent are basically wasted.  No amount of acting would allow you to believe that anyone could act as impetuously and stupidly as she does here.  She goes from happily married to tramp in about 5 minutes, for no discernible reason.Overall acting: C (Grant/Simmons: B)Directing: FWriting: D-I understand that this film caters more to English tastes, and that's fine, but I found it most un-satisfying
Exploitation Versus Art--Ingmar Bergman's Oscar Winner and Wes Craven's Shocker Tell The Same Tale. There is an interesting comparison to be made between Ingmar Bergman's classic "The Virgin Spring" and the grisly exploitation shocker it inspired, "Last House on the Left" by Wes Craven.  They share identical plots, feature graphic rape scenes, and before it's all over turn average men into murderers.  And yet one is considered to be a bona fide classic and 1961's Oscar-winning Best Foreign Film--and the other appreciated only in underground circles, but largely reviled as cheap gruesome exploitation.So just how different are they?  Not as different as you might imagine--but as different as art and exploitation."The Virgin Spring" is easily one of Bergman's most accessible films.  Telling a simple story in a straightforward fashion, he exposes a frankness and brutality people weren't accustomed to seeing.  A young girl venturing through the woods encounters two men and a boy.  Though they initially seem helpful, their actions quickly become violent.  After a graphic (for the time) rape, the girl is murdered.  Later, the wrongdoers happen upon the girl's home and seek shelter from her family--both groups unaware of who the other is.  Suspicions start to arise and vengeance is sought.It is a powerful tale of love, loss and the depths people can be driven into--where they become unable to stop themselves from betraying their faith and moral code, where savagery and rage take over.  Bergman's film benefits greatly from a stellar lead performance by Max von Sydow as the father.  Real conflict and raw emotion burn up the screen.  Add the beautiful cinematography and haunting score and it's a winning combination.  But what endures in the story of "The Virgin Spring" is how strong a component faith becomes--when there is nothing left to believe in, can you still believe?  A classic in every sense, "The Virgin Spring" still has the power to shock but there's something very redemptive about the film."Last House on the Left," however, is probably more notorious than acclaimed.  The plot, as I've said, is identical.  Coming 12 years later, in 1972, Wes Craven was at the beginning of his career and sought to retell this tale.  It is a shocker, and the scenes of rape and murder clearly foreshadow the "torture cinema" of today.  It is brutal, uncompromising and graphic--and the film was championed in the underground horror market.Working with a small budget, the film lacks the artistry of "The Virgin Spring."  While it still packs a visceral punch and has the power to shock--what it lacks is depth and subtlety.  The characters aren't particularly drawn out so their actions don't have the emotional resonance of the earlier film.  Without contemplating faith and moral choices, what we're left with is straightforward revenge.  And the film, ultimately, has no redemption--no uplift.  It's violence for the sake of violence.  It remains a historically significant precursor and influence on other shock films without being a particularly good movie in it's own right.And therein lies the difference between art and exploitation.   KGHarris, 11/06
Don't waste your precious lifetime on this. One of the worst sci-fi movies ever. Pitiful scenario, a shoot'em with no joy stick
IT IS HARD TO GET MUCH LAMER THAN - The Stan "Tookie" Williams Story. This movie is the BIG LIE logic attempting to prove itself again.  Most despotic criminals use a BIG LIE concept to manipulate those in society with the weakest minds a lame too often used mold from which Stan "Tookie" Williams is cut.  This DVD is nothing more than a BIG LIE! that ranks right up there with NAZI BIG LIE era Triumph Of The Will.  Like any monster Tookie spent his life hating the nasty reprobate aspects that defined his hearts core while hurting others to cover up the fact he lacked strength to confront and overcome demons who likely at birth began consuming his black heart.This DVD should be brought so you can look directly into the face of a demon and see how BIG LIES told on a grand scale can most effectively prevert truth beyond recognition infecting minds hearts and souls.Even if Stan Tookie" Williams is just responsible for "Helping Create" the Crips gang that in itself is enough to earn him the one way trip on the needle express in my book.  That he writes a few lame anti-gang kiddie books and played his con-game to perfection on 60 Minutes, "convicing soft headed bleeding heart liberals that he is, redeemed" is of no consequence whatsoever.  Tookie was a heartless murderer of whole neighborhoods.  Tookie by helping create his gang murdered the dreams of countless thousands of innocent children made victims of drive by shootings.  Tookie helped to utterly destroy thousands of urban inner city poor families usually those most ill prepared for the assult he used to lay waste what little they had.Tookie raped minds and whole communities holding each hostage at gun point to his perverted twisted desires and whims and a few good deeds no matter how heartfelt do not de-fang this monster of the first order.  Tookie Williams was nothing more than a domestic terrorist superimposed on a gangsta thug dope dealer's reality.  In the end Tookie Williams got what he deserved a needle ride to Hell's Gate if there is any enternal justice.Buy this Redemption - The Stan "Tookie" Williams Story DVD if you want to see the modern day media formula for exploiting weak minds at work.  I look at Stan Tookie William's and all I see is just another a weak minded pathetic monster who underwent his "caged creep conversion" but in truth the gang of thugs he spawned go on their merry murderous way.When I saw this DVD on Stan "Tookie" Williams he reminded me of Ernst Rohm) (1887-1934), German army officer and Nazi official who founded the SA (Brown Shirts who like the crips were just gangs of common thugs who murdered as much for fun as profit.)  This is a good DVD because Jamie Foxx captured the heart and soul of what it means to be an unrepentant psychopathic, self absorbed social parasite in Redemption - The Stan "Tookie" Williams Story.  If Tookie gets a Nobel Prize I think he should be forced to share it with Ernst Rohm) (1887-1934), German army officer and Nazi official who founded the SA (Brown Shirts) as they were in essentially the same business of neighborhood destruction, child killing, weak mind exploitation and death for fun or profit
What about the missing episodes. Why should one buy this series? What about the missing episodes? Are they going to be added later, or this is it? I cannot believe this. Would you buy a bicycle with a missing wheel? Or a keyboard without the C and R keys? I'd like Amazon to explain its customers what it plans to do..
overrated. Transit station letter-writer-for-hire, Dora (although she writes letters she never sends) is relatively closed off from the world around her but is forced to open up when she is begged to write a letter for a woman to her young son's long lost father. As Dora witnesses this mother get hit by a bus in the next moment, she realizes the young son is basically orphaned for the moment. So she opens up, but not in the feel-good, maternal-instinct-to- spare way American viewers might expect. No, Dora is keen to exploit this find, and tries to sell Josue (the little boy) for a television. Eventually, though, Dora forms a kind of bond with Josue and goes out searching for the boy's father. Unfortunately it seems too easy for Dora, who is obviously hardened to life and all its sensitivities, to break down all these carefully formed barriers. Her emotion somehow does not seem authentic toward the boy. As a result, the performance is nowhere near the triumph most reviewers have claimed, and the film lacks a certain credibility. Sure, the film is watchable and somewhat interesting, but it was overrated.
Kids only. Amazing how Walsh, after having filmed such great classics, could have fallen so low. This is a film for young TV audiences. If you have absolutely nothing to do on any given afternoon you may find it tolerable too. Predictible dialogues, exaggerated stereotypes...  Plays better with the sound off
Disgusting and pointless. "Listen, Bunuel. What are we going to do? The witch has quit. Says: too much nudity. Who does she think she is - Mother Theresa?""I am a little busy, JP (Quiet, babe! Can't you see? I am talking to my producer here!). Just get another broad for the role: anybody, only with a good front.""But, Maestro! We'd have to re-shoot half of the movie. Fernando is already talking of another engagement. In any event, with his rate if we use him again, it will be twenty years before we see any money from this flick. We might as well scrap the whole thing.""Don't worry, JP. We'll keep shooting as if nothing happened. That's what being Great Director all about. They are morons, or why you think anyone would pay cash to see such garbage. Most won't even notice that the face is different, and those who do, will find a good explanation for it. Subliminal, surreal, existential, women are alike - all that nonsense, you know. Relax and have a drink."
Risky material for its time. Horrid entertainment for the 00's.I read mixed reviews for this flick, but I bought the DVD out of admiration for Billy Wilder, and a respect for the humor that Dean Martin generally lends to a role. Oh man, was that ever a mistake.Before I get into the part about this being the worst movie I've ever seen, my family was in the theater business when I was a kid, and I asked my dad why I'd never heard of this flick before, all he said was "it was banned....too controversial for the time." Well I should have listened to him, by "controversial" I thought maybe he meant that this Wilder film was ahead of its time, avant garde sort of stuff and like that. haw haw haw But what he was actually talking about was the theme of marital infidelity that is at the core of the script.OK, well other comedies of the 50's & 60's addressed the issue of infidelity too, but as far as I know only another Wilder project, "The Apartment", actually provided a vehicle where anybody was SUCCESSFUL at it! But thats not why this movie is so bad, and I'm no angel but a premise where a Vegas singer shows up at your house and expects to hose down your wife during his stay just because he's there is sort of disquieting...OK, that pisses me off alright.But the real A Number 1 reason this movie sucks sooooooo bad is Ray Walston. Now, Mr Walston was a fine character actor and had some theatre to his credit, but he is the central character of this flick and as such he occupies the camera too much. He's annoying. He's irritating. He only has one speed...frantic, and he aint that easy to look at for 2 hours at a time. And if he wasnt bad enough, Kim Novak shows up with a cold, a Brooklyn accent, and at least 20 extra pounds which I suppose is what hookers in Nevada were supposed to look like before HBO.Somebody with a little star power like a Jack Lemmon could have saved this turkey, but if all that wasnt bad enough, this thing was actually produced in Black and White. Yes, its 1964 and they are still making movies in B&W. That surprised even me.   You've been warned. 1 Poached Eg
Movie is great, but Unbox is uncooked. Movie got 2/3 through and just quit. No problem, this is Windows right? Just reboot and start where you left off. Only for whatever reason I can't restart this movie from anywhere but the beginning. I'm not going to watch this moving over from the beginning just to see if it fails in the same place again. Only a couple bucks, but definitely not worth it
UnBox video not yet working. Will not play once video was downloaded. I get the error message:  "can not play file, please try again later. error# 0x80040273" I made the exlusive give me call me back feature but the UnBox department was already closed, I was told the UnBox Saturday and Sunday 6-5 hours. I have to say I am impressed with the Call back feature. I downloaded the Unbox Beta now and am recieving email assistance to try to resolve the problem. Thanks Amazon UnBox! I will Update again - Feb. 10,200
Larry Garfield is compared to?. When Danny Devito's plays Larry Garfield he is like Taxi's Louie De Palma of Wall Street
Feedback from Real Apache "Calculus Wiz". I saw a few scenes and couldn't even continue watching.  I like a lot of Charles Bronson's movies.  Examples include "Death Hunt," the 80s "Death Wish" series, and "the White Buffalo."  But his acting in this movie is unrealistic.  He does not act like a real Apache.  Bronson seems to overdo it on being "stoic."  A relative and I watched a few scenes and just switched channels.  Bronson is out of his element in trying to portray a real Apache.  Paul Newman does a much more realistic job when he portrays an Apache-raised white man in "Hombre," which I purchased on Amazon.  I do applaud Bronson in trying to portray a movie more sympathetic to the plight of the Apaches trying to avoid reservation confinement in the 1880s.  Given the time period, perhaps Bronson should have hired Roman Gabriel instead.  He does a realistic job of portraying a Cherokee Indian in the "Undefeated," which was also released around the same time (give or take a couple of years)
Missing episodes. This series is being sold with missing episodes, like many others here in Unbox. Do they think their customers are so dumb? Would you buy a DVD series with a missing DVD? What sense does this make? What a disappointment this service is..
Large disappointment. Showgirl is mistakenly taken to Paris to perform for diplomatic relations, accompanied by Bolger. Wanna guess the ending? Everything from the songs to the plot are unconvincing and so very predictable. Not to be seen twice
Whatever. Nazi's secretly in LA with a blimp and a whole army?This guy has a jet pack that shoots fire out of it, but it never burns him; it burns other things though.Totally stupid and wierd.There is this super tall guy who is like soooo strong he bends people in half.Jetpacked Germans taking over USA.Give me a break.
Forsake your dearly departed or you'll be sorry. B Grade movie, really poor script.Bulk of movie is boring, superficial, stereotypical.Real purpose of movie is Baptist condemnation of the supernatural.Story line.The wife of a couple deeply in love dies in a boating accident during a beachhouse visit. The husband feels a deep loss for two years during which he is frequently visited by the ghost of the wife.On the second anniversary of the accident relatives and friends gather at the beachhouse and push the husband to come to grips with his grief and refocus his energy to move on with his life.Overtones.The leading man is depicted as unstable, self-centered, reckless, irresponsible, and fantasy-prone.before and during the two year period. When revealed to the those assembled, the spirit contact with his wife is universally condemned. His "giving up the ghost" is seen as a great relief and the first sign of maturity he has displayed in his life.The daughter has dream sequence with the mother in which the mother coaxes her into a head-on crash with a car.leaving her frightened and distraught.Media Messages.The film illustrates the creation and reinforcement of a cultural taboo.1. Spirit contact is dangerous, selfish, and emotionally unhealthy.2. The personal grieving journey of another should be co-opted by peers.3. Condemnation is the only acceptable response to spirit contact. There should be no expression of curiosity or investigation like "What did she look like?" "What kinds of things did she say?"4. Messages from loved ones in dreams should not be trusted.In short the movie creates a set of automatic responses all of which mitigate against a common sense acceptance and appreciation of the value of spirit contact with loved ones..In life our conduct is about building bonds of love and trust with those around us. In passing over these ties endure and can be building blocks for a link to the beyond. When William Blake's brother passed, he appeared and taught the skill engraving thus providing humanity for centuries thereafter with icons known to all.Many near-death experiencers have wisely learned that they must keep their wisdom to themselves. The inner teachings are sacred and must not be diluted and defiled by small minds. The same is true for after-death communications largely because of media images that create a cultural storyline like that in this film
Am I hard of hearing?. The sound quality on the DVD was atrocious.  Too bad, given the great Burt Bacharach score
Damaged Package for DVD. DVD came in the mail ripped up.  DVD lose inside package
IT NEVER HAPPENED!!!. I can fix this! This movie never happened. Now we need to make Starship Troopers 2. I will contribute a few bucks. If we all contribute, we can get an actual director to come along, preferably the one from the first movie, get us some big time sponsors, and make us one heck of a Starship Troopers 2! There, I have repaired the terrible tear in all our souls that this fake Starship Troopers 2 caused us all
The Rock and  Vaughn stole the show. Thankfully I watched this movie having recorded it on my DVR so I could fast forward through most of the scenes with Uma Thurman and John Travolta.  Their scenes and dialogue were so horrible that fast forward was the only way to get through the movie.  Besides, this is not the kind of movie that you really need their dialogue to understand or enjoy it.As usual, Uma's acting is simply dreadful. I tend to avoid any movie with her in it because I know it will be bad.  How she became a "star" in Hollywood is beyond me.  She is not attractive nor can she act.  She could have been replaced by a nobody and it wouldn't have changed the movie one bit.  I think when they need an actress who doesn't mind playing drivel roles, they call her. John Travolta is not much better.  His version of "cool" just doesn't do it for me. His diction is becoming more slurred as the years go by that I hate to hear him speak.  And someone please tell Uma and John that nobdody wants to see them dance so please just stop finding reasons to do so.The ONLY reason I gave this movie 2 stars is because of The Rock and Vince Vaughn.  Their roles were priceless and had me laughing all throughout the movie.  I never grew tired of Vaughn pimping and The Rock primping.  While I fast forwarded through Uma and Travolta's scenes, I tended to rewind during Rock's and Vaughn's scenes; they were so funny I had to see them again.  Cedric the Entertainer was also pretty good.
even worse than the 7th heaven remake. this is my vote for 3rd worst movie ever made.its dumb, theres no violence hardly, no blood and i actually got a headache from renee [now i look chinese] zelwack-broad screaming for 90minutes and watching how bad the acting is.this is like a drug that doesnt work and now i want my 3 dollars and 90minutes of my life back.
You have to download Amazon software into your PC... I am never happy when a purchase requires that you install the company's software.  The vid is encrypted so that you need Amazon's player to view it.  Blah.  You're better off buying the DVD for $20 with all the episodes so at least you can watch the DVD somewhere other than your own computer.
Oh, God, I want the last three hours of my life back!. I cannot vouch for the accuracy of this film, because it lost my full attention past the opening scene.  After five minutes, my significant other was asleep.  Always a bad sign, he'll watch anything.  The movie is about the last two months of Van Gogh's life, and it feels like the viewer is watching each day pass by; each scene draws out innocuous, tedious details, e.g., a scene Van Gogh examined by his physician sucks up a good ten minutes of the time; physician chats with his cook, his son, yada, yada; Van Gogh undresses; cook snaps green beans; physician walks back into the room; more small talk; silence.  There's lots of scenes of people tending to their personal hygiene, eating dinner, and making small talk.  In subtitle.  This is just an example of the pace of the entire movie, and this sucker is l-o-n-g.  It's like watching the last of the "Lord of the Rings" trilogy, only infinitely less interesting.  If you feel you absolutely must watch this film, plug it in your DVD player, grab a good book, your cell phone, and your laptop so you can net surf.  This film just Will. Not. End. Ever
Too true to Life. I read the book when it was first published and then a friend had a son diagnosed with leukemia and went through the same thing as the Mom in the book. Fortunately he had a lot of advocates that pushed him to ignore the insurance company and his son finally found a donor match but it was too late. So I feared that this movie would not be up to the book. My fears were unfounded, the casting was brilliant and I loved this movie, even though it is tough to watch, I still catch it in reruns on the satellite occasionally and "must watch". That is how good it is
Very Very Funny. This is one of the funniest movies i have ever seen a must see so bad it is funn
WHATEVER . . . This is an incredibly bad, laugh out loud zombie flick that makes no sense at all. Bad acting, bad dubbing, bad but gross special effects and a bad storyline (oh wait, there is none, it's never explained why the dead are walking again).We have slow walking zombies chasing after even slower running people who predictably make the dumbest choices in survival.  In one scene they bash in the heads of the zombies with rocks, successfully killing them.  Then in another scene they completely forget how successful the head bashing is and decide to shoot the zombies with guns until, OH NO! someone is gobbled up in a gross mess of red goo and chicken livers.  I kid you not.Then, in sudden displays of dexterity, these sluggish zombies move quickly enough to expertly impale their victim with a lawn spike, lop of heads with tree trimmers, chop down doors with axes and, in the most incredible display of dexterity and teamwork I have ever seen in any zombie flick, they band together to use a battering ram to knock down the front door.About the only creepy thing in this entire film is the freaky bug eyed boy and he's not even a zombie. Burial Ground is a stupid yet midly entertaining film that you should view with a group of friends enjoying a few beverages and/or other refreshments while you catcall at the screen.I give it two stars only because it takes about 10 minutes before the zombies start wrecking havoc
negative 92 stars. If I could I would give this movie -92 stars, for each minute of my life I wasted on it. Such a disappointment for fans of the original Starship Troopers. It pretty much comes down to being a bad slasher movie. The only decent special effects scene was RECYCLED from the first Starship Troopers. The first scene in the movie is comical it is so bad. For fans of the first Starship Troopers who are curious about this movie I'm saving you the suspense and valuable hour and a half of your life.
PI. When a movie producer in 1998 foregoes available spectrum of colors and technology opting to feed his audience grain-black, white and jittery gray, the result had better be good. That fraction of members of the technicolor-drunk general viewing audience who will even stipulate to watch such a thing do so at decided perils of time and money, push Play alongside Mr. Benefit-Of-A-Doubt and strain to see if it works. Thus begins the argument of effect and more specifically, that of color. The problem with a black and white movie is that very few movies that resort to that, despite some grand intention, DO NOT WORK, or, in the alternative, DO NOT WORK AS WELL. Citing two examples - SIN CITY which is near-tolerable acting paired with an absurd choice of black and white, tantamount to robbery, and GOOD NIGHT AMERICA which is all and about the same. The dilemma with black and white productions is that regardless of how well it comes together, there seems always a thread of an argument in the back of one's mind that if one must resort to black and white to make one's point, one might be better served as a charcoal artist. Color is the medium of life. From a budgetary perspective, black and white films save money as the 'challenges' of color, which, in a good feature, can be excessive, are thus eliminated. Yet complications arise - for instance - I wasn't sure if that was blood or motor oil dripping from that guy's hand. Similarly, the entire cast in SIN CITY could have been wearing hot pink, in shades of course, and we would never know. Yet of course this is no excuse to dislike a movie - or is it? One wonders, however, that, if PI production would have had more money, would they have opted for color? Moot point. It's done.Notwithstanding the obvious that I don't prefer black and white movies and incidentally don't know lots of people who do, PI, although a courageous artistic attempt with significant merits ranging from creative camera work, clever symbolism and high-octane guts, seems to lanquish for other reasons. Despite PI's visceral intensity which is delibertaely hot-wired throughout, spinning out scenes that sizzle the nerves, after Max's third or fourth headache it gives up the ghost. As as result, the movie stays earthbound, weighted down by a mediocre revolving-door plotline (obsessing man chases number grail looking for key to life while beset by outside forces including the recycling feeds of his own troubled mind), unremarkable narrative with a gem here and there, failing repetitive effect and thin, uninspiring 2-D support cast, leaving the movie wanting for depth and intelligent character interplay. Unresolved imagery and scenes lent the impression that this creative endeavor was a bit out of control and ad-hoc which is no fatal flaw in and of itself but in this case was signficantly detractive. Despite a reasonably decent stockpile of cinematic victories the battle wasn't won. The themes inspiring PI have excellent potential however this movie trafficked the runway like an antiquated flying machine - airborne one second, belly down the next. As a fine creative exercise, the creators are praised for their effort and bravery - PI is as bodacious as a skunk engaging rush-hour traffic and commands the watcher's attention until that undefined moment when boredom sets in. Contains subterranean theme seedlings which likely served as brain fertilizer for the subsequent more advanced spin-off -  "A Beautiful Mind"
UnBox video not yet working. Will not play once video was downloaded. I get the error message:  "can not play file, please try again later. error# 0x80040273" I made the exlusive give me call me back feature but the UnBox department was already closed, I was told the UnBox Saturday and Sunday 6-5 hours. I have to say I am impressed with the Call back feature. I downloaded the Unbox Beta now and am recieving email assistance to try to resolve the problem. Thanks Amazon UnBox! I will Update again - Feb. 10,200
Movie is great, but Unbox is uncooked. Movie got 2/3 through and just quit. No problem, this is Windows right? Just reboot and start where you left off. Only for whatever reason I can't restart this movie from anywhere but the beginning. I'm not going to watch this moving over from the beginning just to see if it fails in the same place again. Only a couple bucks, but definitely not worth it
I've been cheated by Amazon. It really sucks, tried to download but it's not able to be viewed in pc's outsided the united states. Crikey.I'll have to wait for reruns to watch it on the telly.Whatta shame amazon dot com. Let's send a CSI to yer headquarters
This version is a very bad "remake" of a very good film. Greetings to one and all.  Just wanted you to know that if you are looking for a pretty good film called "The Desperate Hours," this is NOT the one you want to watch. You want to watch the 1955 version with Humphrey Bogart and Fredric March. This is the 1990 "remake" with Mickey Rourke and Anthony Hopkins. The original is a taunt drama in which a man discovers that his home has been invaded and his family taken hostage by a trio of gangster escaped from prison and focuses on his desperate attempts to save their lives. This remake is exercise in terror in which the sadistic violence of the criminals becomes the driving force of the story and the goal is to see how far they will go before they are finally stopped. On paper you would have thought Anthony Hopkins could do a marvelous job in the role of the father, but the script pretty much makes that impossible. Turning the bad guy into a major league psychotic just destroys the psychological chess game that made the original so compelling. Rourke is simply the wrong choice for the role, always coming across as a sick punk rather than a criminal menace, but then few actors are going to be able to play against Hopkins, even when he is in low gear. I cannot believe anybody would watch this film twice; I only watched it because I was interested to see how they updated the original, the ending of which I just watched again on television. Of course the ending would be more violent, but it was the elegance of the ending of the original, as the hero saves his family with an unloaded gun, that made it stand out. This one is just a splatter flick dressed up a bit to fool you. Go check out the original because like Rourke's character, you do not want this in your house anywhere near your family
Could have been worse, but not much. *warning* spoilersWhat an awful adaptation. The worst part was the music. Saxophone muzak and synthesizers playing in a story set in the early 1800's?????? The only character that didn't bore me to sleep was Robert Hardy's General Tilney. I had to fight to keep my eyes open on this one, and I love Jane Austen movies usually. I didn't even rent it, I borrowed it from the library. They should have paid me to take it. I don't quite understand how Catherine and Henry managed a passionate kiss at the end when throughout the movie they had no chemistry or indication whatsoever that they cared for one another. Isabella and her brother were way overdone; it was no secret to me immediately that she and her brother were the "bad guys" and part of the excitement of Jane Austen movies is the discovery that who you think is good, isn't. This is probably on my list of the ten worst movies I've seen.
Was expecting much more. I enjoy watching teen movies because I'm ever so curious about how the director sees this particular age group and the misconceptions present in his view as much as in the teens' view of things.This movie is unlike most teen "romantic comedies" I've seen, and not necessarily in a good way. First of all, the main characters are unlikeable and don't represent actual categories of people in real life:We have the good looking rebel who's actually not so rebellious after all but then gets back to his old ways (stupid twist if you ask me), the nerd who can't get any (they picked the worst possible guy to play the nerd; he's actually pretty good looking and a funny guy...), the nerdy girl who hasn't grown up yet (ends up hooking up with the rebel but they break up), the gay guy (I have no idea what his role in this movie was), the aggressive victim of child abuse (...), the freaky nympho with a tint of lesbian (what the hell were you thinking Daniel Waters?) and finally the rebel's childhood best friend who falls in love with him and is rejected (the film focuses about 5 minutes of its total 88 on this character... I don't know why she's even here, she has no obvious role and her situation doesn't reflect at all in the real world).Next up, I think the director is sexually obsessed or something. Ok, I know sex is an important part of a teenager's life but this movie is about lame 13 year old girls aching for sex and even lamer 19 year olds who have nothing else better to do. If I wanted to see hormonal imbalance, I would go watch Discovery Channel. There are more important things in life than sex, and this "masterpiece" definitely doesn't illustrate them. The characters' thoughts and actions are limited to the camp itself and the director focuses too much on useless stuff and tries to create stereotypes, but fails miserably. Most teen movies have a moral side to them, they teach the audience certain values, unlike "Happy Campers". This movie only taught me that it's so cool to be obsessed about sex, it's cool for 12 year old girls to think they're oh-so-hot women, that only the absolute best looking guys hook up (not true in the real world) and more [...]. Also the director makes completely ridiculous situations seem normal, such as the camp leader getting hit by lightning and then acting completely weird, the counsellors buying 47203 boxes of condoms (there's only so much sex you can have in 40 days...), the whole "Don't-touch-me Todd" thing, and so on and so forth.This movie isn't worth the $2 I paid to rent it. Those who think this is better than the American Pie series should go out more. American Pie was a work of art, this is a piece of [...]
Thirteen Year Old Janey is a Victim of Sexual Abuse. This is a film that literally sees little wrong with child molesting.  And no, I'm not even slightly exaggerating.  It is also bizarre that I am the sole reviewer to point this out.  Janey is only a 13 year old teenager.  She is indeed rather mature for her age.  Nonetheless, Janey is too young to legally allow a fully grown man to have sex with her.  Such an adult male (or female) is clearly breaking the law.  Janey is the daughter of a woman who is selfish and undisciplined.  The father is being played for a fool.  This dysfunctional family seems doomed.  Janey's younger brother needs her love and protection.  Is she capable of handling this responsibility?  Will matters finally get out of control?  "Rain" is morally bankrupt.  The story line takes place in New Zealand. Perhaps the people associated with the American TV program "To Catch a Predator" and "Perverted Justice" should visit this country.David ThomsonFlares into Darknes
Charlotte's Webb. The voice on the tape is not very engaging, however the story as always is great.  Better to read it to a younger child than to play the tape.  An older child may be better able to follow the story on audio cassette
What's up with that?. I wish I had read the other reviews first.  Though the quality of the episode and the video are top notch, the episode cuts off after 22 minutes.  Obviously, I already know the ending of "The Black Death", but I still wanted to see the full show
and the point is???????. I just didn't get it. The movie was painfully boring. The only remotely redeeming aspect was some interesting cinematography.
A slow paced drama!. Despite the some edition problems and the presence of lagoons in the script, the story retains its interest. A disturbed woman in his early twenties, who has suffered sexual abuse of his own father and maltreats of his husband finds casually, a man in the middle of the road who eventually will help to dig in her life and face her demons.
THE WORST MOVIE THAT VAN DAMME HAS EVER STARRED IN. A MAN SEEKS VENGEANCE AGAINST A GANG THAT STOLE HIS MOTORCYCLE. STRAIGHT UP PREDICTABLE AND UNDENIABLY BORING. VAN DAMME LOOKS SO TERRIBLE IN THAT BEARD, I HOPE HE NEVER DOES A MOVIE WITH HIS BEARD LIKE THAT AGAIN. THE MOVIE IS STUPID, THE PLOT IS SO LAME, AND THE ACTION IS SO BORING. I DON'T EVEN UNDERSTAND HOW A DIE- HARD FAN OF VAN DAMME COULD LIKE THIS! THIS IS A MOVIE THAT DOESN'T EVEN DESERVE TO BE IN STORES. THIS DEFINITELY AIN'T WORTH ONE CENT OF ITS PRICE. IF YOU ARE A VAN DAMME FAN, DO NOT WASTE YOUR HARD EARNED MONEY ON THIS MOVIE. A WALK IN THE WOODS IS MORE EXCITING THAN THIS. IF THIS MOVIE REALLY DOES APPEAL TO YOU, THEN YOU OBVIOUSLY DON'T KNOW YOUR ACTION MOVIES TOO WELL
Don't waste your money!. Unfortunately I didn't read the reviews below before I bought this DVD.  It's a travesty of the DVD medium.  Perhaps Fox Lorber took the story of the movie too seriously:  they've produced a disk with the picture and sound quality of a bootlegged copy.  Don't waste your money on it
Pathetic excuse for comedy 0/5 stars. This movie was even more ignorant (in a bad way) compared to that other movie THE STUPIDS and I thought that movie was ignorantly bad as well. The name of the movie (dumberer) explains how retarded and unfunny this movie really is. The old dumb and dumber movie with jim carrey and jeff daniels is way better than this sorry excuse for comedy + it was part of a classic comedy which made lots of people laugh. Don't waste your money on this sorry excuse for comedy if you like dumb and dumber go for the unrated never before seen film of the old dumb and dumber instead it's worth every penny for comedy fans
Sucker Punched. Boy do I feel like chump. I bought this DVD based on the reviews here and because of it's overall 4 star rating. Holy Crap was I ever sucker punched in the back of the head by this wretched little pile-o-lizard spittleI love cult films and I also love films that are so bad they are good etc. and I guess that's the main reason why I fell for these reviews hook, line & sTinker!I could not even find it in my heart to finish this movie after about an hour I couldn't take it no more, so back in the case and into the garbage disposal crunch crunch Bye Bye. Aaaarrrggghh one can only wait so long for something/anything of interest to happen or be said.Please don't end up a chump like me and stay away from this one, because I can assure you the people who wrote these great reviews are not going to get together, take a collection and give you you're money back. Bitter? You bet.
DVD PUT IT ON DVD. I DONT WONT TO DOWNLOAD IT I WONT IT ALL ON DVD THIS IS WASTE MONE
It scared me too--42 years ago!. I just read Doug's review of "First Man into Space" and I just had to write respond.  I was seven years old when I saw this movie. As I recall (though my recollection here may be faulty), it was double-billed with "Tom Thumb."  One of my good friends had a birthday party and we all went to the movies.  "First Man into Space" scared the bejeezus out of us. We were so scared we couldn't stop crying. They had to take us out of the movie in the middle--sometime after the car was pulled over by the state trooper.  I thus never saw its conclusion. A few years ago I found the video of the movie and I triumphantly brought it home to show to my teenagers. Needless to say, they made fun of me throughout the movie: "Dad, you were scared by this?!" :-
Survivor Rip Off. I have bought 2 seasons of Survivor on unbox and both of them are not complete. Very dissapointing. Guatemala  episode 11 is from a completely different season and it is missing the last 2 episodes and the reunion show. Just leaves you hanging. Exile Island is missing the final episode it just goes from the competition between Danielle and Cirie for a spot in the final 3 to the live reunion show
Defective Filmmaking. Willy Wonka meets Dr. Strangelove in this one-of-a-kind cinematic disaster. Barry Levinson's longtime "dream project" emerges as a garish nightmare. The impressive production design wears out its welcome after five minutes while a talented cast sinks in the big-budget quagmire. Another unfilmable concept that somehow received the Hollywood green light
Utterly Forgettable Thriller / Drama: Very Dull Indeed. Melanie Griffith, Rachel Leigh Cook, and Hugh Dancy star in this straight-to-video film about one female transporter, who gets into trouble because of someone plotting against her.  Well, that's all about it, apparently, but the film tries to give something unique to the otherwise unoriginal plot.I mean, the slightly original character of Sarah by Melanie Griffth, who plays that smuggler in trouble.  Given a special job by Malcom McDowell with his customary 'I-could-be-very-baaaad' smile, Sarah agrees to carry a pack hidden in her bag.  But as you know, someone also wants that package, and ... well, that's nothing new, but she is attacked on the way.DON'T EXPECT ANY THRILLER, however.  The film's focus is not about that; it is the relations about Sarah and Jack (Dancy) who live together in a fancy Paris apartment.  But while Sarah is away from Paris on business, Jack is attracted to a younger lady Jenny (Cook) who also falls for him.Thus the film makes an effort to include both love and crime.  Nice try, considering this interesting point about the character of elder lady Sarah, but if the factor is taken away from the film, the end result is nothing but a flat, tired suspence -- suspence as to its relations and its crimes alike.  Either way, the film is emotilnally very void.OK. two fatally bad things: one, too incredible characters.  See, Sarah is a professional courier who must know the rules of the job, which could be dangerous.  But instead of renting a car (and it's Europe, where that could be pretty easy),  she takes a train (and a night train!) in which she becomes an  easy target.  In this way, the film misses every chance to make it more suspenceful.  When some character(s) must die, they die like characters in old video games -- they fall, that's all.The other one; acting.  Let me be honest.  It was painful to watch the one-dimentional performance of Melanie Griffith, who was very good in 'Another Day in Paradise.'  Maybe she is not the greatest actor, but certainly she can act.  But as far as 'Tempo' is concerned, no, I don't think so.Only the location of Paris saves this film from utter forgettableness.  Forget about this one.
Not one of Sellers' best. Sorry to disagree with all those reviewers who loved this movie, but Peter Sellers did many better films than this. "Dr. Strangelove" was the masterpiece.  "Being There" is an underrated and understated sendup of how things happen in Washington.  "The World of Henry Orient" (AT LAST on DVD!)is priceless but virtually unknown, with delicious performances from Sellers and especially his teenage tormentors.  Finally, the "Pink Panther" series is much better slapstick than "After the Fox," which has many famous, talented participants but is mostly silly, unfortunately not as hilariously and frenetically silly as Clouseau & Co. One irritant was the repetition and prolongation of gags and situations, as if we might not notice them otherwise. I agree with other reviewers that Victor Mature does as well as possible with the role he is allotted, and Martin Balsam does okay with his stuff, too. When watching this film, I kept thinking the same thoughts as when attending a mediocre restaurant -- I could have cooked up something better than this myself for a lot less money
DVD PUT IT ON DVD. I DONT WONT TO DOWNLOAD IT I WONT IT ALL ON DVD THIS IS WASTE MONE
Missing episodes. This series is being sold with missing episodes, like many others here in Unbox. Do they think their customers are so dumb? Would you buy a DVD series with a missing DVD? What sense does this make? What a disappointment this service is..
Sentimental and fake. Having enjoyed LOST IN TRANSLATION, I thought I might like this one, which seems to have some sort of cult reputation-- why I can't fathom. The entire plot is self-serving, shallow, and unrealistic. I guess it's supposed to depict the horror of repressive religious values, and while I don't condone those, the film lacks clear characters or any motivation. A lot of people have buttoned up parents who don't get it, and it doesn't mean they kill themselves-- because they were grounded!?Since the writer-director gerw up in Hollywood, she may not be aware that you can't keep your kid home from school without a very good reason-- social workers and what not come after you. So the entire premise is false.Romanticizing mass suicide by having a bunch of soft focus young blondes do it-- after which they supposedly ascend to erotic eternity in the imaginations of their boyish peers-- could actually encourage the act. It's not caring, not real, and not responsible.But I guess that wouldn't bother the rich, overfunded daughter of a Hollywood genius out to make a name for herself.
Dreadful, Dull, Disappointing. I didn't care for this version at all. I thought there was no chemistry between the two leads, and there should be at least some smoldering of repressed emotions. The story was so abbreviated so as to seem just a conventional, brief story of thwarted love--the character development, especially of Jane, was missing in action. No heartbreak, no horror, no sense of Jane's virtue, tough interior and self-reliance, which helped her overcome so many of life's obstacles. Not even much atmospheric scenery. This Mr. Rochester, played by the usually-excellent Ciaran Hines, is utterly forgettable, weak, and miscast. He doesnt have to be handsome, but he does have to be powerful, passionate, sexy, and seething. After all, he keeps a mad wife locked in the attic and he tries to keep that secret while almost commiting bigamy.Instead, try the Timothy Dalton version which is excellent though now a little low-budget looking,  or the 2007 even sexier and faster-paced version with Toby Stevens and Ruth Wilson, which is outstanding and the best yet. It moves right along, and yet it keeps all the story essentials.
garbology. Main Line, Main Line.... those Main Liners.... You like to look at those Main Liners, don't you Ginger... I mean Kitty?  You the suffragette who just got offa the suffragette wagon...  the same wagon that was seen rolling by in The Story of Vernon and Irene Castle... wait a minute... that was the exact same footage!  I guess the makers of this fine movie assembled it out of stock footage.  In fact Wynn, the MAIN LINER seems to be assembled out of stock footage of Bill Clinton.  Did you know allabout the MAIIINNNE LIIIIINNNEEE????  Seems the whole worl knows about the MAIIIIIIINNNNEEE LIIIIIIINNNNNNEEEEEEE "Philadelphia Aristocracy"  See, in Philadelphia, they're old skool, dig.  They even got a Queen of Pennsylvania, who sits on a throne and stuff.  Played by Margaret Dumont when she's not getting scandalized by Groucho Marx.  And I believe there is a duke and duchess of Bakersfield.  And just the other day I had tea and crumpets with the Viscount of Compton.  Of the Night Train...  I mean Wild I... I mean Yeah, he was drinking Ripple back when Redd Foxx was merely the Duke of Cornwall.  He was in line to the throne... or was that waiting for the mens room... See, over here in the States we take our aristocracy just as seriously as our Prussian counterparts.  We are always to be seen marching around with those spiky helmets on, saluting the statue of Kaiser Bill's moustache
Poor Jayne, What A Waste!. The Las Vegas Hillbillies is a terrible bad movie which stars Jayne Mansfield, Mamie Van Buren and Ferlin Huskey. It appears to be a low budget film due to the photography, acting and settings. If you are a Jayne or Mamie fan, you will find yourself fastforwarding to their scenes only. One highlight of the film is Ferlin Husky's dream sequence of Jayne singing "That Makes It." Air time of Jayne is very small. Trivia: the Siamese cat in the film, which Jayne is holding, belonged to Jayne's friend May Mann.
"I'm the guy in the frozen food section dialling 911.  I swear.". Peter Segal's "Anger Management" is a film with nothing going for it.  It is best described as boring, annoying, and devoid of laughs.Mild-mannered Dave Buznik (Adam Sandler) is sent to anger management counseling after an unfortunate misunderstanding.  He immediately develops a problematic relationship with Buddy Rydell (Jack Nicholson), the self-help expert leading the sessions.  As the two men spend more and more time together, Buznik starts to wonder if his counselor is the one who should be undergoing counseling."Anger Management" just does not get as much mileage out of its premise as it would like.  It is essentially a one-joke film that wears out its welcome very quickly.  Sandler and Nicholson are saddled with a script that fails to produce even a snicker.  Furthermore, the parade of cameos throughout the film add nothing to the story and just feel like a lame attempt to squeeze in as many recognizable faces as possible into the proceedings.  Truth be told, "Anger Management" is one of those projects that was green-lighted because of the talent involved and not because of its quality.
Good basis. This film is an integral one in the study of film adaptation of Jane Austen's most popular novel, Pride and Prejudice.  It represents the beginning of a serious love affair between film and Austen novels; however, it is not great in terms of adaptation.  If you love Pride and Prejudice and have never seen this film, skip it.  It will only anger you.  If you're studying film adaptation of Austen novels, you MUST see this one as it has influenced everything that came afterwards.  AND--it's Laurence Olivier, afterall
plot holes. The first half hour of this 90 minute movie is actually quite good.  In fact, it is enthralling and has an interesting twist in that we don't know the real fact behind whether a young woman was violated by her boyfriend while unconscious.  According to the rumor (the rumor being a school experiment conducted by three roommates) she was, however, but we the audience don't know that.  However, the young woman is quick to think she has been raped.  Why there is no attempt at a physical exam, is unexplained, especially since the young woman involved has the reputation of being a professional virgin, however it turns out she isn't, so that's why the movie lasts longer than 30 minutes.  Fortunately, we're not dealing with unwanted pregnancies, either, so this doesn't turn into a soap opera.  However, we do have the dreamboat "hero" who dreams up the rumor about her being raped, and who exhibits unlikeable traits throughout. But that's true of the three leads - the roommates are all unlikeable, being insufferably full of themselves.  The last half of the film, 'dreamboat' takes the turn as lead character, and it's his story we're following, whereas his female roommate had the first half of the film, and basically it's her introduction to the audience of all the characters. Turns out 'dreamboat' and the young woman victim have a history together; which means issues they have to work out, and everyone else (in a way, the entire student body and its faculty and local law enforcement) is sucked into their story and mutual thirst for truth, though the characters don't have the same truth in mind - it's about vengeance; not justice.  And vengeance when it's not the comic book variety, isn't fun for an audience, it's just distasteful.  In other words, the man and woman should have been shut up together in a room so they could have worked it out for themselves, and left the rest of us alone.  So from a brilliant first half-hour - and btw how does the roommate penniless art student have the dollars for all that tech equipment? - we degenerate into a constantly weaving pattern of lies and deceptions that seems more pointless than clever.  There is merely too much story, so it becomes ridiculous.  A basically good premise is ruined.  If you are a fan of any of the stars involved, it might be worth viewing, if only once, but the film as a whole will probably leave a vile taste in your mouth.  Perhaps that's the ultimate message on a film about the dangers of spreading GOSSIP, or in this case deliberate lies, is that what goes around comes around, and also it will leave you feeling sick to your stomach.  I almost recommend you watch the first 30-45 min then quit midway, but anyone will watch all the way thru at least once, just to be sure where this is headed
Land of Oprahisms. Having avoided seeing this film, I found that the mistake of sending my partner to the rental store on his on, brought "Tuesday..."unbiden into our home.My aversion to Oprah and her ilk, does not cloud my dislike of this film. A bad film is a bad film.Devoid of any real plot and hampered by some very poor acting on the part of all concerned, and directionless directing, this film should not be seen by anyone who values the aforementioned,To me a reasonable premise should move a story forward. Something should occur, my interest should be engaged. This film takes reams of pre-packaged aphorisms and greeting card verses, and attempts to build the plot from words alone. It is as if someone picked up the telephone book and said, "Hey,this book is full of words, lets make a movie."In a way a movie about the different lives of those listed in the telephone book would be more interesting.To be honest, Jack Lemmon was not very good in this film. He played the same character he always did. Just older. Hank Azaria was just awful. He talked as if his mouth was filled with stones, and was wooden and expressionless. Maybe he was too embarrased to be there. As to the other actor's; well they filled up the space nicely.The look of the film was cheap and of the movie of the week quality. The sprayed on snow in a winter scene looked as fake as it was. They even covered the green leaves on the trees. Some better acting, some good R rated dialogue, and maybe some nudity would have spiced up this film. As it stands,however, it will only be of interest to fans of Oprah and Dr.Phil, etc. The purveyors of our national state of pity and feeling soory for ourselves.It is seldom that we find car keys under our chairs, but films such as this perpetuate the myth that a few nice phrases, a good cry, and a genial talk-show presenter will somehow make it all better.I,for one, think that a nice cuppa is more beneficial. Then pull the finger out, and just get on with it.(To the grammar and form police: I did have this in paragraphs, but the editing process scrunched it all together. Sorry
Not happy. This is only a portion of this episode.  It cuts off in the middle of a sentence
oh God, why?!!!!. I remember this movie being really, really fun and great when I was 9. My wife wanted this for our video collection and I hate myself for buying this movie. All I need to know is why she wanted this today! If you have kids, which we do, they'll enjoy this for the first time, but after words they'll be as bored with it as I am. If you are looking for nostalgia, this is the movie, but if you are looking for a good dust collector, buy it quickly
Oh the humanity!. There are bad movies, and then there are BAD movies. "Universal Soldier: The Return" is a cosmically bad movie, a movie so poor in every aspect of its execution that one would have to look to "Manos: The Hands of Fate" for comparison. The first "Universal Soldier" film was a moderately entertaining shoot 'em up flick starring action stars Jean-Claude Van Damme and "Rocky" refugee Dolph Lundgren that essentially accomplished what it set out to do: people perished in violent ways, stuff exploded, and Van Damme and Lundgren beat each other into bloody pulps at the end of the film. Even the presence of the charming Ally Walker as Van Damme's female sidekick greatly helped the film. The movie garnered enough attention and fans to merit the release of a special edition DVD some time back. It unfortunately also garnered enough attention and fans to merit this unredeemable piece of trash sequel. The second, and one hopes final, installment in a franchise that should never have become a franchise achieves such heights of utter banality and stupidity that I sat in open-mouthed awe watching it. I think I can safely say I am less of a person for having sat through this atrocity. Expect to spend a few days in a coma after the credits roll.Van Damme returns as Luc, the reanimated soldier who triumphed over the forces of government sponsored evil in the first film. On this outing he now works for Dr. Dylan Cotner (Xander Berkeley), a scientist who reconstituted the universal soldier program with the help of his supercomputer S.E.T.H. Luc, with his female sidekick Maggie (Kiana Tom), helps design and run training missions for a new batch of super soldiers. The film opens with what the filmmakers hope is a pulse-pounding jaunt up a river, a jaunt filled with explosions, stunts, gunfire, and the briefest glimpse of Tom's incredibly fit form. As the mission grinds to a halt we learn several important things: Kiana Tom is incredibly hot but can't act her way out of a paper bag, Luc has a daughter named Hillary (Karis Paige Bryant) who you just know will get into trouble at some point, and the only soldiers we must pay attention to are Romeo (Bill Goldberg) and the one played by Michael Jai White. Frankly, turning off the film immediately after glimpsing Tom's amazing physique is probably a good thing. Everything that follows is dull, predictable, and so full of plot holes as to defy description. "Universal Soldier: The Return" feels like eighty minutes of dental surgery rather than an action film.Sure enough, Cotner's computer goes on the fritz and unleashes the killing power of the universal soldiers. In the resulting conflagration S.E.T.H. implants its consciousness in Michael Jai White, Luc and his loved ones flee from the compound, and the military swoops in to contain the problem. An extraordinarily untalented actress named Heidi Schanz also pops in as nosy reporter called Erin who is interested in exposing the government's latest shenanigans. Predictably, Van Damme and Schanz team up to track down...er...well, track down something to defeat the supercomputer. I think they need some code to shut the system down, but in the meantime the film takes them all over the place so that a wisecracking Romeo can follow them around while absorbing all the abuse Luc can hand out. Even throwing in a few scenes set in an adult's only club can't make this turkey fly. It's dull, folks, and painfully so. By the time the film grinds to its inevitable showdown between Luc and S.E.T.H. back at the shattered compound--with an injured Hillary's life balancing precariously in the background to serve as motivation for an overwhelmed Luc (Geez, what a surprise there!)--I knew I just wasted far too much of my life with this car wreck. How bad can it be, you ask? Read on...Plot holes in this film are innumerable, as uncountable as grains of sand on the beach or acne on a teenager's face. For example, Luc explains to Erin that he was once a universal soldier just like Romeo but Cotner "cured" him by restoring him to life; he no longer needs injections or ice or any of the other devices used by the soldiers. What the heck are we doing marveling at this amazing supercomputer when Cotner just performed a miracle of biblical implications? He brought someone back from the dead! How exactly did he accomplish this feat? We don't find out from Van Damme, who simply smirks his way through a few lines of dialogue that simply boggle the mind with their monumentally idiotic implications. I could go on, but let's discuss the performances instead--or the lack thereof. I should say I adore Kiana Tom; she's a drop dead gorgeous babe with a body that could stop the earth's rotation, but watching her stumble through dialogue is like having your appendix taken out through your mouth. Another problem is the lumbering Bill Goldberg, whose "funny" lines are anything but. And the more I think about Heidi Schanz, the less I think of her. You have to wonder about a film where Jean-Claude Van Damme is the best thespian in the cast.You might think a movie this foolhardy shouldn't contain any bonus features on DVD. You would be wrong. Trailers for this film, "The Return," "Double Team," "Desert Heat," "Knock Off," "Maximum Risk," and "Nowhere to Run" showcase the dubious career of Jean-Claude Van Damme. A making of feature, a Van Damme career retrospective (Ha!), a Michael Jai White feature, and talent bios round out the disc. My advice to those viewers thinking of renting "Universal Soldier: The Return"? Run, my friends, run far, far away and don't look back.
Same Thing. The Dane Cook episode is the same one that it on his "Harmful If Swallowed" c.d. The c.d. also has the uncensored version of this routine that is over 1 hour long. The one star rating is not based on the content. It is based upon Amazon not sharing this fact with customers
OVERLONG TV MOVIE!!. The movie doesn't have any good acting (all mediocre) and Bergin (who I liked in &quot;Lost World&quot;) isn't very good as the doctor.  I'd get it though for the really fake (but hillarious) cat-snake
Denzel saves this from running Out of Time. Denzel Washington (The Manchurian Candidate, Man of Fire) plays a police chief in Banyan Key, Fl where he is sleeping with Sanaa Lathan (Brown Sugar) who is married to Dean Cain (Tv's Lois & Clark, Rat Race) and bascially Lathan finds out she's dying and she has some many months to live, which then she gives Washington part of the money if she dies. Soon after, Lathan goes missing, maybe dead and that's when the big kickaroo happens when someone frames him, so Washington goes around trying to correct things, trying not to be caught for something he didnt do. He also has a sexy cop partner, played by Eva Mendes. Some fun in this, including a hilarious John Billingsley (Tv's Angel, White Oleander, High Crimes) as Washington's beer drinking buddy and Washington saves this from being a complete disaster, there's also a nice sequence where Washington falls out a window onto a balcony as it comes apart and he has to climb back up. Mendes is hot but she doesnt show anything here and casting Lathan as the femme fatale was a big miscasting. Also starring Nora Dunn (Three Kings, The Hebrew Hammer). Sweet locations help to but the plot is weak
Did not work. The ones that are posted twice do not work. If they are posted once, you can try to download it, but it might not work. The video only worked for about a minute. Shame, since I really like this show and I wanted Amazon Unbox to be cool. The one cent CSI works, go download tha
Painful to watch... Another product of Hollywood's "Karaoke Culture".  In an age where we see cinematic remakes of every kind, we have in "U-571" an outrageous attempt to borrow from the success and acclaim of "Das Boot".  But instead of a gripping war drama that reveals the tragic waste of war, we get a cheap flag-waving pile of Hollywood propaganda. The lighting, camera angles and claustrophobic set are obviously inspired by DB. But the bigoted innacuracies (German submariners machine gunning helpless sailors) and absurd scenarios (an incredibly lucky stern shot sinks a destroyer in hot pursuit) put this ridiculous movie in its own category. U-571 is just another thin, over-promoted, throw-away movie you'll forget the day after you see it
Movie is TOP - DVD is a FLOP!. This DVD gets only 2 stars because the 4:3 TV screen format of this DVD production is really ridiculous.But the movie is one of my favorites, number 4 on my all time best movies list.The feel of the movie is more like that of a typical 70's sci fi movie (like 'Andromeda') than of a 60's movie. Austere and unemotional (like Colossus himself), quietly and punctuously narrated, minimalistically acted and with minimal action - a movie for the brain, as befits a movie about a giant electronic brain taking over control of the world. I like the outdated look of the technology in the movie - black-and-green screens, LED displays, printout terminals etc. Really gets you the feel of the dawn of the computer age in the 60's. And captures- then reasonable-appearing - fears of computers surpassing human beings. ATTENTION! SPOILER! The movie has no happy end, the supercomputer maintains control of the earth in the end. Just as it is in D.F. Jones' novel 'Colossus' on which the movie is based. And that's another reason why I like the movie so much - one of the few movies WITHOUT a forseeable and boring happy ending. The absence of a happy ending is not the absence of an ending, by the way, contrary to what has been supposed by a previous reviewer.This movie almost has the quality of a Kubrick
Snore. Don't let the cover fool you, this film isn't half as fun as you may hope it is. Maybe it's my own fault, but I was expecting something more like "Groove", or at least something interesting to watch. And it's not for my lack of knowledge of the bands, I often listen to Joy Division/New Order/Happy Mondays, and more from that scene. However, this seemed much more like the story of Tony Wilson and The Factory, than it did about the music, and almost came-off as a documentary. I almost stopped watching it out of boredom, but saw it through anyway. Now I wouldn't call this bad, it had it's good parts, just not many.
Did not work. The ones that are posted twice do not work. If they are posted once, you can try to download it, but it might not work. The video only worked for about a minute. Shame, since I really like this show and I wanted Amazon Unbox to be cool. The one cent CSI works, go download tha
Why the Charge. Curious as to why Amazon would charge for this content when CBS offers it for free on the official Survivor Website.  Yeah, at the CBS site you have sit through 4 commercials, but it is worth it to not have to download any extra programs
I found it...tiresome.... My advice is to watch this in French, which is less painful especially if you don't speak French.  In English, its unbearable.Slow?  At one point the DVD froze and I didn't realize it for several minutes
Classic Sam Peckinpah!. It's been 30 years since I've seen this film on cable.  I decided to re-visit this obscure film and see if I missed anything in the initial viewing.  As it turned out, I didn't miss anything.  It's pretty much the same, routine Sam Peckinpah film, filled with lots of blood, guts, bullets and slow-motion action.  It's also a long, tedious film that is not one of his best, but will satisfy those who enjoy ultra-violence in their movies
Features One Seriously Sweaty Slasher. "He Knows You're Alone" isn't exactly an apt title considering most of the kills take place when the victim has at least one other person close by, but I guess "He Knows You're Somewhat alone with Other People in the General Vicinity" doesn't have quite the same ring? Right off the bat we learn the identity of the killer, so there is no mystery, which is fine if we are looking at a flat-out slasher with a high body count. But "He Knows" doesn't really come off as a straight slasher flick, it feels more like a mystery film. The body count is low, the special effects are limited, meaning very little gore. Quite a bit of the film is taken up by Don Scardino and the guy who played the principal in "The Breakfast Club" trying to find out when and where the ever-sweaty murderer will strike next. I would have been more generous in my review if there had been either a higher body count, or if we got to see more of the red stuff flow. My guess is, if this came out in theaters today it would have a PG-13 rating instead of R.I thought the acting was pretty good for a B-Level flick. The comic relief ex-boyfriend/morgue attendant guy was not annoying like most 80's slasher comic relief guys. And I am sure I am dating myself here, but when one of the actresses in the movie puts on these huge headphones and settles down on the floor to jam to some tunes with some.....refreshments. That took me right back to my High School days. I remember doing the same thing many times...only my head didn't later end up in the fish bowl. So for nostaligic reason I had to give this at least 2 stars
Yawn. I'm no expert on film, much less French New Wave. I just like to explore a bit. So I picked this up because I heard it was considered to be influential, and because the idea of Richard Crenna being in something like this struck me as amusing. I liked the ocean/siren bit at the beginning quite a lot, but the ultra-slow pace lost me soon after that. It's also a bit difficult to watch the train/helicopter bit at the end with an unjaded eye. It just didn't captivate me
Same Thing. The Dane Cook episode is the same one that it on his "Harmful If Swallowed" c.d. The c.d. also has the uncensored version of this routine that is over 1 hour long. The one star rating is not based on the content. It is based upon Amazon not sharing this fact with customers
disappointing. i had never known that there was a movie made about the life story of one of my very favourite singers patsy cline.well they needn't have bothered as it was a very much by the numbers story something definetely not above anything that you would see as a midday movie on any weekday.i liked both of the main actors,jessica lange and ed harris.the problem for me was that there was no attempt at conveying any real depth to the characters.whilst i appreciate that there has to be some element of fiction in most bio-pics anyone watchimg the movie and not having heard of patsy cline would be none the wiser for her motivations and driving forces.the only saving grace for me was that patsys singing was used in the movie to at least try to convey the quality that others saw in her singing
could have been better written. Could have been better written, better acted, better photographed. Way too many flashbacks.This whole thing is kind of a mess, really. Lacks cohesiveness.Premise is interesting enough and a truly gifted director might have made a great film out of it.The guy who directed this is no Akira Kurosawa, that's for sure
Survivor Rip Off. I have bought 2 seasons of Survivor on unbox and both of them are not complete. Very dissapointing. Guatemala  episode 11 is from a completely different season and it is missing the last 2 episodes and the reunion show. Just leaves you hanging. Exile Island is missing the final episode it just goes from the competition between Danielle and Cirie for a spot in the final 3 to the live reunion show
Historically inaccurate, but served its purpose at that time. Good special effects for that time period.  Served its purpose to boost the morale of the American public during 1943.  The heroic acts by those in the U.S. military at that time should always be remembered.  Outgunned and outmanned they held their own, and then some on Wake Island and in the Philippines.However, the writers and producer play it pretty loose as far as historical accuracy was concerned.  No B-17s ever flew from Hawaii to Wake Island and on to Clark Field in the Philippines after the attack on Pearl.  I believe it is common knowledge that no B-17s ever sank the Japanese fleet advancing on the Philippines.  Remember Colin Kelly?What was laughable was the scene where the Mary Ann makes an emergency landing on Maui instead of Hickam Field on Dec 7th.  Upon landing they're fired upon by local island Japanese.  Throughout the movie there are references to sabatoge committed by Japanese Americans in Hawaii on Dec 7th 1941.  Upon landing at Hickam Field ("because the Japs on Maui were shooting at us") a colonel goes on about Japanese vegetable trucks driving onto the runway at Hickam and crashing the tails of rows of P-40s before the attack.  Never happened.  In truth, there were no acts of sabatoge committed by the Japanese population in Hawaii.This movie only serves to perpetuate the common belief that Japanese-Americans were disloyal and unpatriotic citizens during WWII, when in fact this was not the case.  It should be noted that a good number of Japanese-Americans (many of whom were thrown into prison camps after Dec 7th) died fighting for the United States during WWII in order to prove their loyalty to this country.May I suggest people watch the movie "Go For Broke" after watching Air Force to educate themselves on what "really" happened in WWII
Top 10 or top 5 ? (worst ones). One of the worst films ever. Absurd. The whole story.In adition, tring to be an "important, deeply movie". Just pathetic. Don't even try to rent it, don't even try to talk about it. The sex scenes are awful too. Nothing to save, nothing to see, nothing...really, a full horrible experience
Why waste the cash. This is a poor excuse of a movie. The actors are less than right for these rolls. I will be selling this movie used if anyone wants to waste the cash...
"Where's the brains?"  !!!!!!!  (imgaine this said by the wendy's old lady.). Yeah, that's how I felt when I noticed the lack of gore and the lack of development in the characters.  Even the zombies are the same thoughout the picture.  How can a zombie go from one part of town to the next in what would take a serious muscle car at least an hour?Regardless, it's worth owning to have the scene where they rise out of the cemetery.  The kid is downright annoying but, when I was a kid I liked him!  Suppose it's not time to have kids yet, aye?  Regardless it could have been better.  Flawed  but, if you viewed this before the first one... don't let it stop you from getting the first!  The first one rocked.  I thought the 3rd one was produced much better than this as well... but they just keep killing this series as part 4 and 5 I once again heard were terrible
Ugh. This actually could have been a very watchable movie; Anthony Hopkins would be excellent anytime.  Micky Rourke is better than usual.  Mimi rogers is great.  two things make it not so good.  Comparing this to the original; there just isn't a comparison.  &amp; Lindsay Crouse...oh man, she's painful in this one.  she has a very, I mean very, bad southern accent &amp; it ruins the film
Spinal Tap goes folk... 'A Mighty Wind' seems to be 'This is Spinal Tap' done in a folk medium. Unfortunately, the gags and cliches in this film seem to be lifted, as another reviewer stated, from most of Christopher Guest's previous efforts. To put it mildly, halfway through the film I was half-asleep and wishing a dwarf would crush Stonehenge
Bad Device. I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service
Missing episodes. This series is being sold with missing episodes, like many others here in Unbox. Do they think their customers are so dumb? Would you buy a DVD series with a missing DVD? What sense does this make? What a disappointment this service is..
Star Trek:  City on the Edge of Forever. My favorite show of the Trek series but there's no way I'd buy another individual program from Amazon.  It will ONLY play on their downloaded player ...won't burn to DVD so can't play it on my television.  Don't bother buying this ...just go for the Trek collection on DVD
Great film, horrible DVD. The video is geometrically distorted, interlaced, has blown out contrast, almost no detail at all, and horrible sound. TransFlux Films should be ashamed for putting out such poor quality work, yet including a featurette on the cover designer.Everyone should avoid this DVD and go for the BFI double feature with L'Age D'Or, which has a watchable Un chein andalou for a change.
Kathy Smith fan... I have several Kathy Smith videos & never minded the outdated clothes, hair, or music because of the quality of the workout. I've tried newer more popular videos every year & found the instructors prissy and their routines contrived. I'm a big fan of Kathy's style and she never failed to deliver a truly effective workout that left me soaked w/sweat & ready to do it again the next day. Having said that, this video SUCKED!! When I got pregnant I immediately sought out Kathy's video among all the other pregnancy fitness choices and was sorely disappointed. I think my grandmother could handle this routine on fast-forward!! I get more worked up doing my dishes than this video!! I've resorted to just doing my favorite Kathy Smith step video without the step instead
Nick Cage in a bad role. Nicky Cage was not very good in this cinematic decomplishment, as he turns  in a horrible acting job in this dull and boring movi
Like All Gossip: A Lot of Talk About Nothing!. A very boring and stupid film about college freshmen with a kindergarten maturity level. The movie is horribly slow to get to the point and is riddled with nonsense dialogue: I've heard better lines in 'Fast Times At Richmond High' thank you.Altogether a very forgettable film that has a lot of talk about nothing. Don't believe the great reviews about this film: the film might appeal to the 14-17 year-old crowds fantasizing about how 'cool' college life might be with all the 'cool' people and 'parties.' If you're not in that category, skip this boring film and save both your time and your money.
Oy Vey. Oh, dear...this movie was an abomination.  Why must directors insist on picking up books and deciding not to read them and make a movie out of them instead?  I can see why they would change a few plot and character points to make the book's storyline more marketable to the target moviegoers.  But honestly...there are many elements in the book that would have translated well to film that they left out and replaced with something cliched and unoriginal.And the film design!  Bleh!  Maybe it would be appealing to 5-year-old girls...but to me it looked garish, cheap, and...really fake.  The costuming was slightly better than our high school plays, and the sets looked frighteningly bright and animated.I felt so much dumber after watching this movie.  I feel like I need an IQ test...or a good book.  Speaking of good books, Ella Enchanted is one of my favorites.  I don't know why I thought of that book just now.  I guess this movie vaguely reminded me of it...but not much
Why the Charge. Curious as to why Amazon would charge for this content when CBS offers it for free on the official Survivor Website.  Yeah, at the CBS site you have sit through 4 commercials, but it is worth it to not have to download any extra programs
Beware of Unbox!!!. Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for
See Arthur Lake as an Elevator Boy and a Bellhop. Cary Grant and Constance Bennett go out for a drive when suddenly a tire blows out and they go off the side of the road.  When they come to, they both realize they individually have turned into a ghost.  They decide to cause all kinds of havoc with the people around them.   Billie Burke is in this film.  Two years later she played The Good Witch (the one who appeared in the big pink bubble) in The Wizard Of Oz (1939).  Hedda Hopper, who spoke of celebrity gossip on radio and newsreel, plays &quot;Mrs. Stuyvestant&quot;.  Arthur Lake has funny scenes as a nervous Elevator Boy and then later as a Bellhop.  The next year, Arthur Lake became &quot;Dagwood Bumstead&quot; and played that character for the next 12 years in the &quot;Blondie&quot; film series from 1938-1950. This was the first film to be computer-colorized, a horrible technique that was used in the 1980's.  This was Not restoration.  The computer only had pale colors, such as, yellow, brown, green, pink, light blue, light green.  The computer would chase the colors onto an item or person.  This is why you see the flesh tone of someones face moving around. Which may not be the true flesh tone of the actor.       It is like putting tinted plastic wrap on the screen itself.  Computer-colorization did improved somewhat with other black &amp; white films and some are quite watchable.  There is more interest and detail in watching a computer-colorized film that was originally black &amp; white.  However, let me make something perfectly clear, When you see on VHS or DVD that a film has been RESTORED and DIGITALLY REMASTERED, that is a different process.  That means the actual negetive or master of the film has been carefully restored to its original deep, rich colors and  brightness. The film has been preserved for many more years. All scratches and pops are gone. But to get back to this version of TOPPER, this is only the computer-colorized version that I have written this review for
See it for Drew only!. The best part of this movie is Drew Barrymore. I really liked her character, Nina, who was so colorful, fun, flirty and a little schemer. :)This film tried a little too hard to be an &quot;indie&quot; film, told from two sides. It didn't work for me, but maybe it'll work for you
Go Figure... The title of this movie perfectly describes the acting.  Even The Little Giants had better actors than this, and those kids were only like 4 or 5 years old.  Ok, so they were probably 12...that's not the point.  Second String tries to use those inspiring lines that all football movies have (you know, the ones meant to give you goose bumps), but they don't succeed at all.  In fact, they fail with flying colors.  When I first saw this movie, I decided that I'd rather be the sunblock boy at a senior citizen's nude beach than watch it again.  Needless to say, I haven't seen it since
My husband didn't like it. He said that it is mostly filled with advertisements for boats and fishing equipment and rambling talking by his director
What was this. Bride with the white hair had hardly any action and really disappointed me.  I like the story line and everything and it's pretty sad, but I wanted to see more fight scenes.  Don't get this movie is you are expecting action
I Know Fred twoo. The personality of a Nazi brownshirt was one of a heightened need for acceptance.  Fred Leuchter was painted as such by many people, some who knew him(and I'm guessing knew better) and as we may be witnessing others who didn't.  Brownshirts insult, assault, rather than intellectually confront and expose objections to their popular ideas.Maybe a major lesson of the Holocaust is that the brownshirt mentality can live in any culture so long as a popular movement of idea is available for them to cling to.  So long as the need for acceptance outweighs the need for a competition of ideas.  There must be someone to hate for the brownshirt to exist, so that they may prove their allegiance to the group.  Maybe a great contribution one can give to their group is sincere dissent, as dissent does not equal disloyalty...except in a Nazi state.There was a great free press in Germany in Nazi times, so long as that free thought was constrained within the preset boundaries."Mr. Death" is not representation of Fred Leuchter.  Fred Leuchter is representation of Fred Leuchter.  Might I suggest NOT suggesting a collection of articles by many of the same people in this documentary.  That's not clarification, that's reinforcement of one idea.  Rather go and find Fred and speak to him.  Get his view.  If you don't have a preformed agenda (like Van Pelt or Morris), you may get him to respond like I did.  I found a different Fred(and a much much different story) than I was given by director Morris and others.The question is not whether German gas chambers were used to murder people, the question is whether someone will be allowed to think contrary to that, or any other idea.  That is, without having his house firebombed, a concerted effort to ruin him financially take place, have his reputation ruined, or any of the other stuff happen.  If Fred's ordeal is any indication, the brownshirts are alive and well, but I don't think Fred is one of them.The one fact I would alter in my previous post is Rabbi Bauer's support for "no gas chambers".  Bauer supported Fred's methods, not necessarily his conclusion.  I tried in vain to contact Bauer, on where he differs with Fred.  Fred has high regard for Rabbi Bauer.  The Polish forensic investigation(which came soon after Fred's!) did not come to the same conclusion as Fred, but did essentially duplicate Fred's data collection methods and results.There was testimony at the Nuremburg trials by both inmates and German staff that homocidal gassings took place in those camps in Germany.  In 1960, physical and chemical tests showed that no gassings occured there.  It took 16 years(1976) for Simon Weisenthal to admit that no gassings took place in those German concentration camps.  A former inmate at Auschwitz has said that no homocidal gassings took place there.  But all this isn't to say that the Auschwitz gassings didn't occur, but rather to simply say that some may think they didn't occur and for that they shouldn't be condemned...unless the idea is to create an enemy out of sincere people like Fred
TRUTH. this film was funded by the centeral intelligence agency in the 1950s and was maipulated to suit the need of a capitalistic propoganda machin
A disaster. This film has many, many interesting ideas in it. I think it has an original cast of characters. I admire Brian DePalma for making his own brand of films.Unfortunately, "Femme Fatale" is one of those films that will do ANYTHING to twist the plot in an alternate direction --disorienting the audience and supposedly giving the film depth. Alas, you need a strong plot in order to do this (see Memento) effectively. What's worse, other than the major twists (the biggest of which is just GOOFY), there are way, way, way too many coincidences and visual gags which just pollute things further.DePalma has had this problem with many of his films. One that comes to ming is "Obsession". Twists work best when there are 1,2, maybe 3 -- such as in "Dressed to Kill".The set-pieces themselves do not approach his best work, and Stamos is unendearing, almost irritatingly vulgar and nasty at times. In order to be a "Femme Fatale" she should be able to work both sides flawlessly
Snore. Don't let the cover fool you, this film isn't half as fun as you may hope it is. Maybe it's my own fault, but I was expecting something more like "Groove", or at least something interesting to watch. And it's not for my lack of knowledge of the bands, I often listen to Joy Division/New Order/Happy Mondays, and more from that scene. However, this seemed much more like the story of Tony Wilson and The Factory, than it did about the music, and almost came-off as a documentary. I almost stopped watching it out of boredom, but saw it through anyway. Now I wouldn't call this bad, it had it's good parts, just not many.
Stick with Suspiria. I already knew before buying this movie that I wouldnt like it, atleast it comes with Phenomena wich is alot better IMO. Inferno is not one of Argento's best at all and doesent even deserve to be known as a sequel to Suspiria. I like all of his films espesially the gallio ones but this just doesent hold up to his other work. It does have all his imagination but not his style. Pick it up with Phenomena and maybe youll like it but I doubt it
What shark??. I watched this movie, seeing that it was a "shark" movie. But where's the shark?? The plot is these people are hostages. The shark is just there so us shark fanatics have a reason to see this awful movie. But I was watching going, "okay, they're in the water, where is the shark???" Even JAWS 3, (which sucked) has more sharks. If you like hoatage movies, see this. (on second thought, don't...) But if you like sharks, see something else
no *'s. "Hey lets put Hugh Grant on the cover and maybe people will buy it." Well I didnt buy it for Hugh however, I did buy it because Fangoria holds it up pretty high. My curiosity got the best of me and, I wanted to know why they liked it so much. I still wanna know! The movie was plain boring! The script introduces one annoying character after the next. Its a huge mess, with bogus effects and, a major lack of suspense or terror! I wanted to find something good I may be able to say about this movie but, the only thing that comes to mind is that atleast it ends. Obviously there are those that get it and those that dont.. I am proud to say... I dont.
Please not another season of this!. Ok so I have always thought Courteney Cox should not be allowed on screen due to lack of acting talent and this show just proves it. It really is the most boring show Ive seen in a long time. If you thought she was bad in scream...and friends..dont watch this...there are other actors in this show who do redeem it somewhat but could never save it. Hopefully this show will be scraped
Watchable... Albert Pyun is my absolute least favorite director. I hate his guts. His direction ruined &quot;Cyborg&quot; and was murky in &quot;Omega Doom.&quot; This is his best flick, and it's not that good. In fact, it pales in comparison to the so-so original. Sasha Mitchell is highly entertaining in this sequel that is certainly watchable, but highly forgettable. The villain from the first, Tong Po, has returned after killing the Sloan brothers from the first movie. Now, he's out to redeem his honor by fighting little brother David Sloan. Standard martial arts fare. Some choppy fight scenes, but an interesting main character saves this picture from otherwise becoming complete dreck
Disjointed, Erratic and Confusing. My impression of this movie is that it seems to have been a six-hour mini-series that was cut down to 116 minutes, and not too successfully.  The only plausible reason I can see for its utterly confusing and disjointed scenes would be that they were trying to create the uncertainty one would feel in a society recently disrupted by some cataclysmic event.  If there is any sort of plot, it is the attempt of a young man to try to care for the orphaned children.  He wants Emily to help him in this endeavor; however, it seems that every time they get together they engage in sex, even when the little kids are in the room with them!  Then, they sort of break up when the guy wants to take in some feral children, or at least children who live like they were brought up by some wild animal.What the Victorian scenes have to do with the story is anybody's guess.  Some would suggest that it is some sort of fantasy Julie Christie is having.  Whatever the purpose of the Victorian scenes, twice they resort to nakedness.  Once is with a decidedly unsexy middle age, heavy woman stripping completely naked.  The second is when four-year-old Emily is sleeping, and her night gown has risen up; she turns over on her back, fully exposed from mid-chest down, and some man, presumably her father, covers her up.  If they needed to show fully naked children, it would seem to me to have been much more understandable to have a group bath of the filthy urchins that joined the children's group.  Little Emily coming uncovered, and being tucked in by a loving parent isn't anything any parent of a preschool daughter hasn't had naturally happen; it is that it just didn't seem to have anything to do with the catastrophe of the movie.My conclusion is that this movie is too disjointed and erratic to be of much use in raising any personal or social issues that could be discussed.  After watching the movie one is much more likely to be asking what was that all about instead of discussing or thinking about some edifying issue it raises
Sliding Scales. This is the first movie I have seen whose rating slipped further the longer it played."Eight Women" is the story of, well, eight women, who are trapped by a snowstorm -- all 5 inches of it. The man of the house has been murdered in the night. Young and old, black and white, of different classes, the women must try to determine who the killer is. "Eight Women" is also a movie about secrets, of which everyone seems to have several. The plot has more twists and turns than an Alpine road on the Tour de France. Yet the first 2/3 of the film is tolerable, funny and even a bit interesting. The characters are self-interested and fun. There's dotty old grandma, a prissy, hysterical virgin aunt, the dead man's vampish sister and coltish young maid, two daughters, a somber yet elegant wife (Catherine Deneuve) and a black cook. Plenty of class and age tension to make three movies.Did I mention the music? Every twenty minutes or so, one of the characters breaks into song. These are always those stereotypical French songs -- full of longing and sadness and references to sleep and springtime -- that are tedious to American ears. And bizarre. While one character sings, the rest do slow little dances. Strange.By the 2/3 mark, I was going to give this quirky film 4 stars. But soon, the plot line spun out of control, getting more and more manic until it finally derailed completely with a tragic ending. Definitely not recommended unless you are desperate need of a bizarre experience.
Not the same... When Pokemon first debuted, I thought it would rock, and Misty, Brock, and Ash would stay together as a gang forever, and Ash would love it to just be walking around the world, earning badges, etc., and that's the way it would stay. Maybe even Ash and MIsty would fall in love! But, nope. The dudes who are creating these movies are sucking kids in with exclusive Pokemon cards, and the animation is just getting cheaper. This movie is totally different from the original movies and the TV series, and it sucks. I'll hold on to the older series and DVD's, but, nowadays, Brock and Misty are gone, and it's just boring without them. For those who agree with me, get the message out there that Pokemon is going down the tubes and it stinks. Bring back Brock and Misty!!! IT WILL SAVE THE SERIES! Oh, and I'm only giving this movie two stars because they went so far as to make a movie about something so ridiculous, with so much change, and so little things the same. :-( Boo
The cover and the title make you think you're in for more than this movie delivers. As fans of 'Starship Troopers' know, the very name 'Starship Troopers' implies a galaxy-sweeping epic with lots of violence, gore, heroism, humor, drama and tons of big-budget special effects.This one is limited to one location, his lots of gore but  little in the humor, drama and big-budget special effects department.One has to wonder at the thought processes in Hollywood. 'Starship Troopers' was a big success. Sure, it was expensive, but it is also a regular staple on cable TV and it continues to sell well (#2500 or so on Amazon in DVD sells as of today - which isn't bad for a 10 year old movie).One would think that a Starship Troopers 2 would have been in the works for a long time - perhaps a final push to the bug home system. Instead, according to the director's commentary track, the special effects director of the original Starship Troopers came up with this simple, low-budget plot that he wanted to direct.  Somehow sold it to the powers-that-be at Sony and they backed it, provided that he slash his already bare bones budget even more.So, what do you get when you give Starship Troopers 2 a budget that is only 5% (yes - five percent!) the size of the original movie? A bad movie full of special effects tricks that you are most likely to see in 50s sci-fi cult classics. The movie's premise changes from being a war epic to being a haunted castle movie, a premise that the producers and director freely admit to on the director's track. They also admit to it being a "B movie" and that it was intentionally filmed to go straight to DVD. Some reviewers have made comments about it being a poorly-lit movie. That was also intentional - poor lighting means that the movie's special effects can be of lesser quality. Unfortunately, one of Tippett's other compensations for a low budget is to add more blood to every scene in the last half of the movie. It gets silly after a while, rather than dramatic.The movie is derivative of several other movies and TV shows including:-Star Trek: TNG. Remember the plot that Picard uncovered in which aliens were physically inserting themselves into the brains of high-ranking members of Star Fleet? Well, I hate to write a spoiler, but...X-Files. Same as a aboveAliens - there's a scene that just steals from the one in which the Paul Reiser character drops an alien into Ripley's sleeping quarters.Alien - the dark sets with a creepy monster about.John Carpenter's 'The Thing' - the premise of being an outpost cut off from the rest of humanity while an alien takes people over one by one. The scene where the General is chased into the base steals from the one in which the dog in 'The Thing' is chased to the Antarctic research lab by the helicopter.Brenda Strong comes to this movie as a familiar face, but not as the same character. Her character in the original Troopers was a fleet captain who died a horrible death. In this one she is an army sergeant. No one is quite sure why they felt the need to have a face from the first mivie but she does a good job and on the director's track they credit her with making this movie shoot a positive experience on a lot of levels. That makes it all the more bizarre that her name is not listed on the cover of the DVD or on the back cover credits. Too bad - her character was just about the closest thing that I found to believable in the whole movie.I give this two stars rather than one because I found the director's/producer's track to be quite fascinating. Maybe it should only be watched with that track playing.I give this one a D-. It fails to deliver on the promise of the original in so many ways
waste of money. Dont purchase episode 5 of season 2, it's 7 minutes long and you dont get any of the Charlie Murphy Prince story.  WTF!!!  Can someone fix this and refund or offer the entire episode for re-download!!!
I've been cheated by Amazon. It really sucks, tried to download but it's not able to be viewed in pc's outsided the united states. Crikey.I'll have to wait for reruns to watch it on the telly.Whatta shame amazon dot com. Let's send a CSI to yer headquarters
Why the Charge. Curious as to why Amazon would charge for this content when CBS offers it for free on the official Survivor Website.  Yeah, at the CBS site you have sit through 4 commercials, but it is worth it to not have to download any extra programs
dissenting view on Pippi. Even as a kid, I remember getting bored with Pippi quickly. Unless I'm not recalling correctly, each chapter stands alone, so there's no real plot as such. The other thing that bothered me was that the author bothered to create a defiant, irreverant, spunky girl hero, yet her two friends are stereotypically male and female, to the extent that they don't even have personalities--they're just cardboard cutouts, foils for the main character. Not only is Annika fearful, hesitant, afraid of risking adult disapproval, and not wanting to get her dress dirty, but she's not in the least influenced by Pippi to be more adventurous. Lindgren sold lots of books but to my mind didn't accomplish much. Unlike Caddie Woodlawn, this protagonist is too far out in left field to truly inspire girls
Say no to dubs. Even though fans of HK cinema have as a whole come a long way since HK films were generally only seen in the states on Saturday afternoon television, some studios are still refusing to provide buyers with the option of seeing HK films in their original language with subtitles.  This film is available from Columbia Tristar only in a dubbed format, and for that reason I won't be getting the Region 1 release of this film
There are worse things than forgetting!. When I first saw the previews, I thought that it looked very interesting and could be a good movie...of course, I thought the same about White Noise.  I guess the lesson here is that Hollywood has trouble making a good movie from beginning to end (like The Sixth Sense).  I think Hollywood is more interested in making a good TRAILER than they are a good movie so they can make a lot of money in the box office.  The Forgotten is no exception.  The first half an hour or so is very good and Joseph Ruben creates a creepy atmosphere with good performances from Julianne Moore and Dominic West.  However, the movie quickly begins to fall apart (like White Noise) and becomes less and less believable.  I was hoping for a logical explanation, especially since the box of the movie read: "The biggest jaw-dropper since The Sixth Sense."  However, the explanation is flimsy and unrealistic and my jaw only dropped at how ridiculous it was.  Nothing at all like when the ending came for Sixth Sense.  I bought this movie for $2 so I can't complain but so much, but am still amazed at Hollywood still struggles to make an entertaining, cohesive movie without so many holes.  The only thing that is "forgotten" is I have forgotten when creepy, psychological movies were good
AMAZON SUCKS. I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!
Attack of the 50 Ft. PMS Woman. Not as good as the original but at least it is in color! This was not one of Daryl Hannah's finest moment. Some of the special effects were laughable especially the miniaturization of the city. Over all, the cast wasn't that good. However, if remakes of old classics are your bag this might be for you.  Now we wait for the Wasp Woman to be remade!
Should be on the list of worst movies of all time. I would give this -5 stars.  After sitting through about 20 minutes, I gave up on seeing anything remotely entertaining
disney,  why are you editing & censoring?. the complaints about this dvd release are all correct. great movie, low qaulity release. yet i'm surprised no one has mentioned the thing that angered me most, the self censorship. the bataan race scene where ustinov swaps the bataan for a bottle of beer. we're ok to witness a pirate being drunk, but a sports commentator saying a teenager is running with a bottle of beer is beyond appropriate?  what are the execs at disney thinking? if they need to put out a disclaimer by leonard maltin befor showing such "questionable" material as they did with many of the vault collection... fine, but stop chopping up the movies. our ten year old children are not buying these movies, many of us were actually alive to see the originals and no we're being ripped off. stop angering a loyal fan base with this ignorance. keep this in mind when you contemplate the inevitable release of a cleaned up widescreen version of this title
Why?  What's the point?. There are enough reviews of the main movie story so I don't need to add anything in that regard.  But, what on earth does a lesbian sub-story (in both regards) have to do with the story as a whole?  Nothing.  So, we have another movie that would be great to introduce the whole family to blue-grass music and the Appalachian way of life that, instead, heads for the trash bin
What about the missing episodes. Why should one buy this series? What about the missing episodes? Are they going to be added later, or this is it? I cannot believe this. Would you buy a bicycle with a missing wheel? Or a keyboard without the C and R keys? I'd like Amazon to explain its customers what it plans to do..
One of the dumbest movies that I've ever seen. Back in the early 90's, Jane March made a big splash internationally with her uninhibited performance in the sexually explicit The Lover. Granted, the role didn't give her much to work with, but from a physical standpoint she made a big impression on a lot of filmgoers, including me. The movie garnered her a lot of notoriety and she had every opportunity to use that as a spring-board into a legitimate movie career. Unfortunately, choosing the unbelievably stupid Bruce Willis vehicle Color of Night as her follow-up probably killed any chance at a career that she had.I've always found erotic thrillers to be quite a dubious genre. Most of the ones that I've seen, while sexually explicit, aren't really erotic. Nor are they thrilling in any way. This movie was following on the heals of the tremendous success of Basic Instinct and almost every studio was chomping at the bit to come out with something similar. As a result we ended up with some terrible films like Sliver, Jade, Body of Evidence and this film, Color of Night.The plot goes something like this. Bruce Willis is a psychiatrist who has a patient dive out of his office window, going splat on the sidewalk below. He is so traumatized by the incident that he loses the ability to see the color red(!). He decides to take a break by visiting his psychiatrist friend played by Scott Bakula and hanging out with Scott's therapy group. He hopes that he might be able to make some sense as to what has happened. Scott's group is a motley crew of screwed up people, from a woman who is nymphomaniac, to a weird androgynous young boy. Bruce ends up meeting a beautiful young woman played by the delectable Jane March and he quickly falls in love with her. We get treated to explicit scenes of the two of them screwing in the pool, the bedroom, the bathtub and the shower. Meanwhile someone murders Scott Bakula and starts to wreck havoc with Bruce. He tries to figure out if it's someone in Scott's therapy group and on and on and so forth.The movie is really quite laughable due to the fact of how serious Bruce Willis was apparently taking this movie. Virtually everyone else in the movie seems to have their tongue planted in their cheeks with their performances, but Bruce seemed to think that this might be an Oscar contender. Add to the fact that the plot is absolutely atrocious and contrived beyond comprehension, and add way too many red herrings, and the movie quickly becomes a chore to watch.About the only thing this movie really had going for it was the explicit, but decidedly unerotic sex scenes. They really come across as more silly than anything else.The only thing that I enjoyed was getting to see a slightly older Jane March in the buff and looking better than ever. What a smoking body!But, like I mentioned before, she got a lot of the blame along with Bruce as to why the movie turned out so terrible and as a result, she has appeared in very few movies since. I still think that if she had been given the proper chance, she could have been a great actress, but people have all but forgotten about her by now.It's really surprising that this movie didn't kill Bruce Willis' career. But I guess if he could survive Hudson Hawk & Bonfire of the Vanities, he could survive anything.BTW, the version I watched was listed as being the "R-rated director's cut" with 17 additional "steamy" minutes added back into the film. Since I never saw the original cut I couldn't tell what might have been added back into this version. There is some fairly explicit sexual content and a shot of full frontal Bruce Willis nudity in the pool scene but nothing that's too strong.Avoid this movie like it was herpes.Color of Night is rated R and contains strong sexual content, nudity, graphic violence and strong language.
Beware of Unbox!!!. Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for
Bad Device. I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service
could not be viewed!. i downloaded it and i couldn't view the video paste the intro. then i RE-downloaded it thinking that maybe it was a corrupt file, but it again it only had sound and not video. this one is a waste of money
Relaxing viewing time. A DVD of clear good photography and quite pleasant to watch but a little embarrasing in family company.  Really only suitable for watching in private
The Itsy Bitsy Problem. By the time you see the ending, you'll already be wishing that you hadn't watched this movie
WARNING: Wrong Episode!. This item is supposedly titled "UFOs: The First Encounters." It is, however, an episode about reincarnation. It is incorrectly labeled. DO NOT PURCHASE unless you are looking for an episode on reincarnation
What about the missing episodes. Why should one buy this series? What about the missing episodes? Are they going to be added later, or this is it? I cannot believe this. Would you buy a bicycle with a missing wheel? Or a keyboard without the C and R keys? I'd like Amazon to explain its customers what it plans to do..
The Firm. Great movie but CD not perfoming in the last few scenes.  It gets stuck or restarts itself.  Very frustrating and more frustrating to have to return new CD
SUCKS EGGS!. What, another stupid sequel to a crappy horror mess? I did not know that studios were this desperate for some lousy cash. This franchise needs to be destroyed. Skip this and look at another product
UnBox video not yet working. Will not play once video was downloaded. I get the error message:  "can not play file, please try again later. error# 0x80040273" I made the exlusive give me call me back feature but the UnBox department was already closed, I was told the UnBox Saturday and Sunday 6-5 hours. I have to say I am impressed with the Call back feature. I downloaded the Unbox Beta now and am recieving email assistance to try to resolve the problem. Thanks Amazon UnBox! I will Update again - Feb. 10,200
Beware of Unbox!!!. Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for
Not moved. I'm going to assume the book "I Captured the Castle" is better than the movie.  The cinematography is excellent, and the acting is decent all around except for the lead character played by Romola Garai. In her most dramatic scene, a confrontation with her father, she played out her emotions in an over-slow, melodramatic manner like a bad, bad stage play.  I'll give her a break because this is one of her first films, but thank goodness Bill Nighy carried the rest of the scene. The funny thing is when you listen to Romola during her interview in the special features, you think "Why couldn't we get this part of you in the film"?  She's an intelligent and witty woman, but her performance as the lead character was just underwhelming. That's a horrible shame.  The lead always sets the tone for the film. This would explain why the movie seemed to drag.I found this film to be a bore despite the wonderful talent.
UnBox video not yet working. Will not play once video was downloaded. I get the error message:  "can not play file, please try again later. error# 0x80040273" I made the exlusive give me call me back feature but the UnBox department was already closed, I was told the UnBox Saturday and Sunday 6-5 hours. I have to say I am impressed with the Call back feature. I downloaded the Unbox Beta now and am recieving email assistance to try to resolve the problem. Thanks Amazon UnBox! I will Update again - Feb. 10,200
Overlong and forced, feels like an imposter. This didn't feel like an authentic Seuss, just as another reviewer has pointed out... The narrative is stiff, the rhymes lacking fluidity and humor, and the story is just plain dull. Although I have no problem at all with presenting anti-war and anti-arms-proliferation sentiment in a format suitable for a child, I don't think that this book does it well. The overall impression I get is that of a message being sent in the style of Seuss, with rehashed elements, rather than a genuinely entertaining Seuss book
Clear cutting of Sherwood Forest. Video quality could be better and the appearances of featured 'star'were fewer than expected
Monotone, mediocre instruction. The level of detail in the instuction varies widely; some asanas are almost painfully dissected, others seemingly glossed over. Also, instruction is delivered in a very serious-sounding monotone. I would recommend the Yoga Zone tapes over these
I love Christmas movies, but this one was both depressing and annoying. From the back cover:Miracles do happen!Award-winning actress Mary Steenburgen (TV's JOAN OF ARCADIA, HOPE SPRINGS) gives a solid performance as Ginny Grainger, a young mother who rediscovers the joy and beauty of Christmas, thanks to the unshakeable faith of her six-year-old daughter Abbie (Elisabeth Harnois) and Gideon (Harry Dean Stanton), Ginny's very own guardian angel. Ginny's wonderous experience will touch your heart and warm your soul in the timeless tradition of past Disney favorites. ONE MAGIC CHRISTMAS fulfills all your most treasured Christmas fantasies. Share it with those you love.And my review:I'm such a sucker for Christmas stuff. I probably own more Christmas books and movies than regular ones. So this review is not from a "Bah Humbug!" Scrooge. And I don't expect all of my Christmas films to be "happy happy joy joy" all of the time. My absolute favorite of all time is IT'S A WONDERFUL LIFE, which can be very dark in places.First off, I don't think that the acting was bad in this movie. And the cinematography was pretty good as well. I made my judgment based on the content and the storyline, which, in my opinion, flopped.What I really found annoying was the way Ginny, the heroine, was constantly being villified. For example, let me paint you a picture of her life: her husband was laid off and hasn't worked in six months. They have two young children. She's making minimum wage, and they're barely scraping by. They've also been evicted from their home (since it's owned by her husband's previous employer) and are forced to move in with her father-in-law. They have very little saved in the bank, and yet her husband wants to take out $500 to buy Christmas presents for the kids. She understandably balks at the idea. First of all $500 is way too much to spend on presents for just two kids, even if you're rich. Unless you want your kids to become spoiled! (Remember, this movie was originally made in 1985, so that number is even more outrageous. Plus, they have only one meager paycheck to live on and no house of their own. I think that she's being reasonable. But she's painted as the bad guy for not blowing a bunch of their savings on toys.Then her husband wants to sink what little money they have into his own bike shop, and possibly go into debt to own his own business. Again, she's villified for being the only responsible one, and telling her husband that he needs to get a steady job with a steady paycheck. After all, they may need their savings to survive. This is not the time to be blowing it on dreams that may never pan out (and usually don't, since most small businesses fail in the first year). But no, she's shown to be a mean, cold-hearted witch for saying this. Grr. It was just so irritating. Yes, you want to give your kids a magical Christmas, yes, the husband has always dreamed of owning his own shop, but you have to be responsible, especially when you have children to feed the clothe. I don't think she was being a Scrooge for wanting to be a responsible adult (she did buy her kids resonably priced gifts, after all), but the film painted her as such.And this film was so depressing. It felt like the world was constantly kicking this family while it was down. The happy ending was a long time in coming.Also, I'd be very hesitant to show this movie to impressionable young children. I certainly wouldn't want one of my children to think that they can constantly disobey me, run away from home in the middle of the night, or talk to creepy-looking strangers in trench coats. That's how kids end up abducted or killed! Not really realistic.I really expected better from Disney, especially when I really loved one of their other Christmas movies, THE SANTA CLAUSE. There are way better Christmas movies out there. See my list "Christmas movies that I watch every year" for movies that are worth your time and money. I don't recommend ONE MAGIC CHRISTMAS. If you're still determined to watch it, try to rent it first, or you might find yourself upset that you wasted your money, like I was.
The usual Cardone fare. The Forsaken (J. S. Cardone, 2001 )I should probably know better by now. And yet I still subject myself to J. S. Cardone movies.In this one, Sean, a guy (Dawson's Creek's Kerr Smith) hired to drive a car from Los Angeles to Miami picks up a hitchhiker, Nick (Final Destination's Brendan Fehr) in the middle of the desert. The two of them encounter Megan, a sick girl(Coyote Ugly's Izabella Miko) when they stop for the night in town. Nick insists she come with them, saying he knows what's wrong with her, and eventually tells Sean that the group have vampires on their tail. (Well, the word "vampires" doesn't exactly crop up seriously, but come on, you know what they are.) The rest of the movie can be summed up with "things blow up."Cardone is one of the straight-to-Sci-Fi-Chanel directors who fills his movies with young-and-beautifuls who have limited (if any) acting ability, but are relatively easy on the eyes. (In their defense, this is not a new tactic; witness the brilliant film career of, say, Farrah Fawcett.) Smith is a bit above the average y-n-b in acting ability, though the other two here are right on the mark. The minor characters don't have much to go on, either, as the script came straight out of a "write your first screenplay in twenty-one days" kind of book. Which could make a passable film if you had a really original, or even a really good, fast-paced plot. Alas, no such thing exists here.This movie deserves a mercifully quick slide into obscurity. About the only was I can imagine it having any longevity at all is if it's somehow turned into a drinking game. *
Amazon.com likes to take my money. this is another story that I don't know if I like it or not because Amazon.com never sent it too me.  this has happened about 4/5 times.  While usually I have no problem getting movies, sometimes I do.  sending them e-mails doesn't seem to work.  If they didn't have the best prices for movies, I'd leave
Duped IS the word!!!. Believe it or not, we watched this movie from beginning to end--just to see if there's ANY redeeming feature. What a waste of time! We've enjoyed all sorts of movies, from the serious to the ridiculous--but this movie is totally pointless. Pointless doesn't even begin to describe it. What a cheap piece of #%$&@%! If you have any appreciation for the art of movie-making, for a good story, for good acting, for provocative ideas, for a good laugh, or even for the sheer entertainment value of the ridiculous, don't spend any money on it. And please, if you have seen it, add your 2 cents here so that fewer people get duped
The worst of the worst. As a Will Ferrell fan I will go easy.  This was one of the worst movies I have ever seen.  Had I seen this in the theaters I would have demanded my money back.
WARNING: Wrong Episode!. This item is supposedly titled "UFOs: The First Encounters." It is, however, an episode about reincarnation. It is incorrectly labeled. DO NOT PURCHASE unless you are looking for an episode on reincarnation
One of the dumbest movies that I've ever seen. Back in the early 90's, Jane March made a big splash internationally with her uninhibited performance in the sexually explicit The Lover. Granted, the role didn't give her much to work with, but from a physical standpoint she made a big impression on a lot of filmgoers, including me. The movie garnered her a lot of notoriety and she had every opportunity to use that as a spring-board into a legitimate movie career. Unfortunately, choosing the unbelievably stupid Bruce Willis vehicle Color of Night as her follow-up probably killed any chance at a career that she had.I've always found erotic thrillers to be quite a dubious genre. Most of the ones that I've seen, while sexually explicit, aren't really erotic. Nor are they thrilling in any way. This movie was following on the heals of the tremendous success of Basic Instinct and almost every studio was chomping at the bit to come out with something similar. As a result we ended up with some terrible films like Sliver, Jade, Body of Evidence and this film, Color of Night.The plot goes something like this. Bruce Willis is a psychiatrist who has a patient dive out of his office window, going splat on the sidewalk below. He is so traumatized by the incident that he loses the ability to see the color red(!). He decides to take a break by visiting his psychiatrist friend played by Scott Bakula and hanging out with Scott's therapy group. He hopes that he might be able to make some sense as to what has happened. Scott's group is a motley crew of screwed up people, from a woman who is nymphomaniac, to a weird androgynous young boy. Bruce ends up meeting a beautiful young woman played by the delectable Jane March and he quickly falls in love with her. We get treated to explicit scenes of the two of them screwing in the pool, the bedroom, the bathtub and the shower. Meanwhile someone murders Scott Bakula and starts to wreck havoc with Bruce. He tries to figure out if it's someone in Scott's therapy group and on and on and so forth.The movie is really quite laughable due to the fact of how serious Bruce Willis was apparently taking this movie. Virtually everyone else in the movie seems to have their tongue planted in their cheeks with their performances, but Bruce seemed to think that this might be an Oscar contender. Add to the fact that the plot is absolutely atrocious and contrived beyond comprehension, and add way too many red herrings, and the movie quickly becomes a chore to watch.About the only thing this movie really had going for it was the explicit, but decidedly unerotic sex scenes. They really come across as more silly than anything else.The only thing that I enjoyed was getting to see a slightly older Jane March in the buff and looking better than ever. What a smoking body!But, like I mentioned before, she got a lot of the blame along with Bruce as to why the movie turned out so terrible and as a result, she has appeared in very few movies since. I still think that if she had been given the proper chance, she could have been a great actress, but people have all but forgotten about her by now.It's really surprising that this movie didn't kill Bruce Willis' career. But I guess if he could survive Hudson Hawk & Bonfire of the Vanities, he could survive anything.BTW, the version I watched was listed as being the "R-rated director's cut" with 17 additional "steamy" minutes added back into the film. Since I never saw the original cut I couldn't tell what might have been added back into this version. There is some fairly explicit sexual content and a shot of full frontal Bruce Willis nudity in the pool scene but nothing that's too strong.Avoid this movie like it was herpes.Color of Night is rated R and contains strong sexual content, nudity, graphic violence and strong language.
I Know Fred twoo. The personality of a Nazi brownshirt was one of a heightened need for acceptance.  Fred Leuchter was painted as such by many people, some who knew him(and I'm guessing knew better) and as we may be witnessing others who didn't.  Brownshirts insult, assault, rather than intellectually confront and expose objections to their popular ideas.Maybe a major lesson of the Holocaust is that the brownshirt mentality can live in any culture so long as a popular movement of idea is available for them to cling to.  So long as the need for acceptance outweighs the need for a competition of ideas.  There must be someone to hate for the brownshirt to exist, so that they may prove their allegiance to the group.  Maybe a great contribution one can give to their group is sincere dissent, as dissent does not equal disloyalty...except in a Nazi state.There was a great free press in Germany in Nazi times, so long as that free thought was constrained within the preset boundaries."Mr. Death" is not representation of Fred Leuchter.  Fred Leuchter is representation of Fred Leuchter.  Might I suggest NOT suggesting a collection of articles by many of the same people in this documentary.  That's not clarification, that's reinforcement of one idea.  Rather go and find Fred and speak to him.  Get his view.  If you don't have a preformed agenda (like Van Pelt or Morris), you may get him to respond like I did.  I found a different Fred(and a much much different story) than I was given by director Morris and others.The question is not whether German gas chambers were used to murder people, the question is whether someone will be allowed to think contrary to that, or any other idea.  That is, without having his house firebombed, a concerted effort to ruin him financially take place, have his reputation ruined, or any of the other stuff happen.  If Fred's ordeal is any indication, the brownshirts are alive and well, but I don't think Fred is one of them.The one fact I would alter in my previous post is Rabbi Bauer's support for "no gas chambers".  Bauer supported Fred's methods, not necessarily his conclusion.  I tried in vain to contact Bauer, on where he differs with Fred.  Fred has high regard for Rabbi Bauer.  The Polish forensic investigation(which came soon after Fred's!) did not come to the same conclusion as Fred, but did essentially duplicate Fred's data collection methods and results.There was testimony at the Nuremburg trials by both inmates and German staff that homocidal gassings took place in those camps in Germany.  In 1960, physical and chemical tests showed that no gassings occured there.  It took 16 years(1976) for Simon Weisenthal to admit that no gassings took place in those German concentration camps.  A former inmate at Auschwitz has said that no homocidal gassings took place there.  But all this isn't to say that the Auschwitz gassings didn't occur, but rather to simply say that some may think they didn't occur and for that they shouldn't be condemned...unless the idea is to create an enemy out of sincere people like Fred
Beware of Unbox!!!. Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for
AMAZON SUCKS. I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!
Depressing and unrealistic. The Virgin Suicides starring Kristen Dunst, Josh Hartnett, Kathleen Turner and James Woods lacks depth and a convincing storyline. This film is directed by Sofia Coppola (Lost in Translation), I really tried to like this movie but I was fooling myself, you would think this movie would be a hidden gem because of the Coppola legacy but just because your father is Frances Ford Coppola doesn't mean you belong in the same category as best director of all-time. Sometimes magic does not stirke twice. How can all five sisters end up killing themselves, their homelife wasn't that unbearable, a lot of parents are religious, but that doesn't mean you'll wind up with thoughts of impending suicide. Kristen Dunst just gets on my nerves, her acting is the same in every film. Don't believe the hype, The Virgin Suicides is not a groundbreaking, poetic film
not big on mixing musical with fantasy. I never saw this movie until i was 16. The girl i was dating at the time loved this movie. The rocky horror picture show was number one on her list so i tend to compare this one to that one not that the storys are similar in any way. But they do have one thing in common they are both horrible movies. I did give this movie two stars because it had some slightly entertaining moments, well so did fraggle rock! fraggle rock got cancelled for a reason! everyone burn your copies now
Old and out-dated. This tape was a total waste of time.  Everything about this tape is out-dated. The year is currently 2006 not 1960.  I was bored and my 20 month old daughter was bored and not interested.Please do not waste your money or time buying this product. If I could give this product a zero star I would
Classic film - Horrible DVD!. "Raise the Red Lantern" is justifiably recognized as one of the great films of the Nineties and one of the most visually striking movies of all time. Unfortunately this DVD release by Razor Digital Entertainment is a travesty. The colors are dull and washed out and the English subtitles are poorly translated, ruining the stately mood of the movie.  This is not how a classic film should be watched! Hopefully a legitimate DVD company like Criterion will decide to release the movie with a properly done transfer. In the meantime, avoid this hideous DVD at all costs
Disturbing-To say the least. I saw this recently and was to say the least, very disturbed by the video surveilence of Kell KILLING Blackmon. It is a very sad true life story of one very disturbed individual.Troy Kell comes from Nevada, he has, now, no life..he has not had one since he was 17. He was incarcerated for a BRUTAl murder of a Man who was "stalking and harrassing" his childhood friend, "Sandy".He committeda brutal crime, shot a man 6 (SIX) times in the head at close range. This documentary shows the real inside of prison life, allbeit through the eyes of a very disturbed young individual. Kell is articulate and comes across as highly intelligent. But is he really?, he is now on Death Row.Very good documentary but also very disturbing
Cuckoo!. Many bright, talented artists (and Mel Ferrer) came a cropper with this inert misfire.  Hudson's novel was probably unadaptable during the studio-bound 50's -- perhaps now, with the current emphasis on location and a suitably ethnic cast, a more satisfactory version could emerge, though in any period the mystic aspects of the narrative would be tricky to manage properly.  But the MGM treatment, while a labor of love for the Ferrers, produced one of Hepburn's few flops, seemingly doomed from the start -- any film that prominently features Anthony Perkins, Audrey Hepburn, and a fawn is just too twee for most mere mortals.  In fairness, Hepburn gives Rima the old college try, but (as in THE UNFORGIVEN) her refined diction does her in.  Between her finishing school vowels and her innate chic, this child of the jungle would fit perfectly in Mayfair.  Even Audrey's simple linen shift, on her, looks like the hautest couture.  Dorothy Kingsley's dialogue doesn't help much -- this is the kind of movie where savages, noble or otherwise, don't seem to have yet discovered contractions.  Throw in a wasted supporting cast (although Hayakawa and Henry Silva frequently lend their native hut the air of a particularly louche bar in Tiajuana), futile attempts by Katherine Dunham and Villa Lobos to elevate the proceedings, a strong contender for Most Ludicrous Title Song Ever, warbled by Perkins, and you've got a real curate's egg.  Too earnest for camp, perhaps GREEN MANSIONS' main point of interest for today's Hepburn fans is that, in many of the more successful moments of her work as Rima (her speeches to her late mother and her final love scene with Perkins, for instance), you can get a pretty fair idea of what her Tony-winning Broadway turn as Giradoux's Ondine must have been like.  Audrey's ever enchanting, but this time, as part of the problem herself, she simply can't rescue a dud
TERRIBLY MADE. I have no idea why I saw this movie in the first place, perhaps it was because The Jungle Book is a fascinating story. However I was realy dissapointed not only is the film boring but it is very silly(in a stupid way).The action scenes were terrible. I recommend this movie to 6 year olds who dont care about the quality of movies.
The usual Cardone fare. The Forsaken (J. S. Cardone, 2001 )I should probably know better by now. And yet I still subject myself to J. S. Cardone movies.In this one, Sean, a guy (Dawson's Creek's Kerr Smith) hired to drive a car from Los Angeles to Miami picks up a hitchhiker, Nick (Final Destination's Brendan Fehr) in the middle of the desert. The two of them encounter Megan, a sick girl(Coyote Ugly's Izabella Miko) when they stop for the night in town. Nick insists she come with them, saying he knows what's wrong with her, and eventually tells Sean that the group have vampires on their tail. (Well, the word "vampires" doesn't exactly crop up seriously, but come on, you know what they are.) The rest of the movie can be summed up with "things blow up."Cardone is one of the straight-to-Sci-Fi-Chanel directors who fills his movies with young-and-beautifuls who have limited (if any) acting ability, but are relatively easy on the eyes. (In their defense, this is not a new tactic; witness the brilliant film career of, say, Farrah Fawcett.) Smith is a bit above the average y-n-b in acting ability, though the other two here are right on the mark. The minor characters don't have much to go on, either, as the script came straight out of a "write your first screenplay in twenty-one days" kind of book. Which could make a passable film if you had a really original, or even a really good, fast-paced plot. Alas, no such thing exists here.This movie deserves a mercifully quick slide into obscurity. About the only was I can imagine it having any longevity at all is if it's somehow turned into a drinking game. *
AMAZON SUCKS. I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!
Syri-Sucka... This film is boring, so much so that I could only take 35 minutes of it before I was forced to push stop. This is a soap opera about politics & oil companies. It's weird jump around style is confusing & pointless...do yourself a favor and don't bother w/ this garbage
Beware of Unbox!!!. Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for
senseless and absurd. sorry, can't finish this garbage movie. is this girl retarded  or what? watching her father been killed in cold blood and got no feeling or emotion at all. how and why the garbage collecting, turned cow feeder young guy, would then have turned into a cold blood stone cold killer? there's no enough logic and explanation why he would have turned into a psychopath. the girl didn't look a bit retarded but acted and behaved like one is also a not quite well developed character. the whole movie just looked too deadbeat and senseless. what? life was too boring then what? started becoming natural born killer? give me a break. bone chilling? you can always say that again, but won't make me care a bit more.
Better on VHS!!!. This is the WORST transfer to DVD I've ever seen!!! I think the VHS copy looks and sounds better, do NOT waste your money!!
watch "Kentucky Fried Movie" instead. I love these whacky kind of comedys, and when I heard about this one I tried to track it down for about 2 years. Finally after it's release here for under $5 aus. I was highly disapointed by waiting in anticipation for what I was sure was going to be histerical 'cause of what other reviewers wrote about it..It was a complete bore for about 30 minutes. I didnt think what they where doing was funny at all. The only funny bits where a couple of the sketches Chevy Chase was in and an amusing puppet. But the 4 or 5 laughs I had during this movie didnt save it.I'd recomend you watch Kentucky Fried Movie instead of this snore fest. Even it's attempt a stoner humour failed. Beleive me, i love these kind of movies, but this is by far one of the biggest piles of $#!% I have ever seen that so many have said is a classic. It doesnt compete with goof satire movies like...- Kentucky Fried Movie- Airplane / Flying High 1 & 2- Naked Gun 1, 2 & 3- Repossessed- Silence Of The Hams- Spaceballs- HotShots 1 & 2- Loaded Weopen- Scary Movie- History Of The World- Young Frankinstein- Anything by Monty Pythoncheck out one of those instead
A disappointment: fails to live up to promise. I'm not a Civil War scholar, so I'll defer to reviewers with greater knowledge about the accuracy of what is portrayed in the film.  As a film, however, this one is lacking in many ways, from hyper-melodramatic voice-overs to noticeably poor editing.  When combined with inaccurate history, the disappointment is doubled.  Andersonville was directed by John Frankenheimer, who created many good or great films, one of which, The Manchurian Candidate, is a masterpiece.  With his resume, I have to believe that the intentions of the movie-makers were good, but the end product (a made-for-TV movie) reflects an inferior medium.  A story as naturally powerful and important as Andersonville deserves a greater commitment to realism, and the drama should have been derived from historically accurate fact.Instead, the drama was manufactured--history was dramatized. It's a film that deserves to be made again, re-written by someone with a commitment to accuracy and produced by a company more interested in the best available version of the truth than in pandering to an audience of supposed dullards with second-rate pap.  When stories like Andersonville are not told with excellence, the fall into mediocrity is precipitous and leaves me feeling that the story should not have been filmed at all
So sleazy you actually giggle at some points!. Sleazy 70s exploitation film with some panache                                 features super-agent Ginger chasing down white slavers.                                 Ample sex and violence will please certain contingents  while                                 semi-feminist heroine, campy dialogue  will satisfy others
Poor support. This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet
DVD buyer beware. Viewers hoping to see the controversial &quot;pistol&quot; scene, in which McGillis's character is forced by her jealous husband to open her legs for his gun will be disappointed to find that it has been cut from the R-rated DVD version.  For that, you'll apparently have to stick with the unrated VHS tape.  Other than that, the movie is a decent if unspectacular B thriller, and the digital transfer is pretty good
The book is so much better!. I picked up the book at a yardsale without knowing much about it, and absolutely loved it! It is so smart, funny, and heartbreaking, without ever being sappy. So, naturally, I was curious about the movie too. I figured that because Ephron had written the screenplay too, not much could go wrong. And while the story line followed the book more or less, the movie turned out terrible. I could not have been more disappointed!! First of all, Jack Nicholson is completely miscast, because he essentially plays himself (as usual), not the *interesting* guy that Mark is supposed to be. He is the opposite of charming, funny, tender, lovable, i.e. somebody that the character of the wife (Rachel) would fall so deeply in love with and trust so completely. You suspect all along that he is a cad; therefore, Rachel's utter shock at his betrayal doesn't make sense. Besides, he is too old for the role! Meryl Streep is annoyingly twitchy, but much better in her role as Rachel. Still, she can't carry the movie alone, and her love scenes with Nicholson are flat; there is no spark there. I wonder how happy Ephron was with the movie adaptation of her novel, and whether she really did write all the scenes. The wedding scene, where Rachel has doubts about marying Mark and spends what feels like 5 hours in a room alone agonizing, while the wedding guests wait, is out of place, not to mention boring, not to mention heavy handed. A total dud
Amazon download does not work. After downloading the file, i have not been able to view the movie, it keeps ont trying to get a license, much simpler using movielink or vongo
5-star flick but zero-star digi-download service. I'm thankful Kenneth Branagh's Hamlet is available in digital format, given all the years it's been stalled out available only in VHS format.  But geez, what a hokey way of making it available.  As another reviewer points out, the Amazon "Unbox" video player required to access the movie on the PC demands that it be able to scan your system for whatever, and it likes to take it's own sweet time to be able to do it.  Just what we all want, another service dominating our system resources for it's own exclusive purposes.  If you're running with portable devices, add Amazon "Unbox" to the list of services that want to get sync'd up to your device.  And, unfortunately, despite the sys-requirements indicating compatibility with Windows Media Center, my hopes that the XBox 360 could access the video through the Media Connect back end did not pan out (despite the XBox 360 recognizing the video, it was locked out by Amazon's protection of the video).  Despite all this exclusive lock down of the content, they do make it possible to obtain one copy on your portable device.  So, I did the download (took a day!) got it running with Amazon Unbox on the PC, and sync'd up with a Zen Vision M, and then uninstalled all the Amazon Unbox stuff and now am able to only play it on the Vision M (and connected video devices).  Not optimal, but a somewhat improved over VHS copy playable until a high-def release comes out and we hopefully get sorted out on all the DRM quandry
A must view for Sophia Loren fans. Even though I am not a Sophia Loren fan, I thoroughly enjoyed her perfomance in these 3 different short stories about 3 totally different women. Anyone born before 1940 should enjoy them as well
DVD PUT IT ON DVD. I DONT WONT TO DOWNLOAD IT I WONT IT ALL ON DVD THIS IS WASTE MONE
Firefly: Excellent.  But buy it on DVD, not "Unbox"!. Read the Unbox terms of use CAREFULLY before choosing this route over a regular DVD purchase.  It is not your usual set of "blah blah" legal jargon.For example, 3c:"Removal of Software. If you uninstall or otherwise remove the Software, your ability to view all Digital Content you have downloaded to the Authorized Device will immediately and automatically terminate and we reserve the right to delete all Digital Content from that Authorized Device without notice to you."If you ever remove the Unbox software, Amazon may revoke your ability to view the Firefly episodes you paid for and may even delete them from your machine!Amazon, I've ordered literally thousands of dollars of stuff through you and always had a great experience; why did you let Unbox create these anti-customer terms of use??
"All animals are equal, but some animals are more equal than others. ". I know this film has some historical significance being the first British feature-length animated film and all, but to the modern viewer who has never had the privilege to read Orwell's masterpiece this film is a watered-down injustice due to the added humor in the story (I don't remember anything about a playful baby duck) and the tacked on "happy" ending.Some other things that I found bothersome were the slow pace and the distracting humming sound.  Read the book instead, it's short and won't take you too long.  MTV will still be there when you get finished.
I am so angry!!. I was livid when I saw this movie after reading the book. It is barely on course with the book. They could have done a much better job with that story. What a waste of good actors like Denzel and Salli Richardson.
Please not another season of this!. Ok so I have always thought Courteney Cox should not be allowed on screen due to lack of acting talent and this show just proves it. It really is the most boring show Ive seen in a long time. If you thought she was bad in scream...and friends..dont watch this...there are other actors in this show who do redeem it somewhat but could never save it. Hopefully this show will be scraped
I've been cheated by Amazon. It really sucks, tried to download but it's not able to be viewed in pc's outsided the united states. Crikey.I'll have to wait for reruns to watch it on the telly.Whatta shame amazon dot com. Let's send a CSI to yer headquarters
John Voight must have needed the paycheck. His Tom Landry impersonation is worse than Geno Hackman's 'Replacements', And Gil.... Bellows is supposed to be Doug Flutie?That's who this movie was originallysupposed to be about. I hear Flutie-ball got a paycheck on this one too.They stole the money. Since it's sortof about Douglas Richard Flutie, I'llgive it a merciful ** out of fivesince amazon.com's rating scale islamost as liberal as Hitlery Clinton
Fantasy, not to be confused with facts. This telplay is supposedly based on the possibility of an asteroid hitting the earth. That possibility is real, and many people take the issue seriously. One commercial film, Deep Impact, also included some real effort to "get it right". However, there is nothing in this film that relates to the real concern about asteroid impacts. This is pure fantasy and thus a turn-off to anyone who has thought seriously about this issue
worth watching. The movie is not good but a lot can be learned by watching it through, even though it drags. The 1950s 'babe' played by Jayne is a period piece, but having lived in Las vegas for the past five years, I can tell the readers of this review that the type is alive and well in this city. The  film is about a certain niche, created by men and probably by religion too,  and into this niche women step and become stigmatized. The whore or babe is  like the witch in the medieval period - something demonic and devilish. I  assure you, the values in the film are not out-of-date. The movie also is  an interesting source of info about ethnicity and regionalism - espec.  Italian and the NYC area. And you see in this a connection to Las Vegas  too. The film, if it teaches anything, teaches us that we are far less  emancipated, liberated, rational, liberal, etc. in regard to sex and to  women than we thought we were. Again the parallel to witchcraft is a good  one: naive liberals thought the witch-hunting was over in the early 1700s.  In fact, witches were burned in all major European ocuntries into the late  1700s. And 1950s babes a la Mansfield are not only the adult identity of  many, especially in Las Vegas, in the year 2000, but are probably the  role-models of 6 and 7 year olds. ...
Bad...Very Bad. This is not a good Tornado disaster movie by any stretch of the imagination. The worse thing about the film is the horrible, unconvincing special-effects! The scene where the family in the car trying to outrun the tornado in the town and the mom shrieking &quot;It's coming closer!&quot; is badly done and also Dan starting to fly out the window and his dad attaining super-human strength pulling him back into the vehicle is incredibly stupid and not dramatic in the slightest. I know, however, a guy named Mike and 2 robots who would probably have to endure this terrible B-grade movie (Actually F-grade) If you want a good, entertaining tornado movie that doesn't include bad acting, bad &quot;Special&quot; FX, bad script and dumb actors check out &quot;Twister&quot
The Nadir of Many A Career. Movie: *1/2  DVD Quality: ****  DVD Extras: ***Don't be fooled by the pedigrees of the distinguished cast and crew members; "In Dreams" is without doubt THE career low for director/screenwriter Neil Jordan as well as actors Annette Bening, Aidan Quinn, Stephen Rea, and even Robert Downey, Jr. (who's made a handful of turkeys throughout his rollercoaster career).  The film aspires to be a psychological mystery-suspense-thriller in the vein of "Psycho" and "The Silence of the Lambs", but is completely undone by a cut-and-paste script filled with unlikeable and unbelievable characters; uninspired direction; shallow performances; choppy editing; and a grossly ineffective musical score.  Only one scene in the movie is played convincingly, and that's the one in which Annette Bening finally begins to go over the edge mentally; pitching her voice in a lower tone and undergoing swift changes of emotion, Bening gives a brief and tantalizing glimpse of what she might have been able to achieve with a similar character in a better movie.  Unfortunately, that one scene does not make the chore of sitting through the other 97 minutes of pretention and tedium worthwhile.In terms of technical quality, the DVD presentation of this bomb is more than acceptable.  Picture quality is clear and sharp; the sound is a bit fuzzy in one or two spots, but that may have been the intent of the filmmakers - I was so bored and so eager for the movie to be over that I didn't stop to replay the bits of dialogue in question.  The DVD extras are so-so: thumbnail cast and crew Biographies that mention much better movies; several lackluster screens filled with "Production Notes"; and finally, the Theatrical Trailer, which is probably the best thing on the disc because it's short and features quick flashes of the film's visual highlights.  "In Dreams" is not recommended viewing, even for those viewers who enjoy bad movies for their camp value
too bad Friday the 13th wasn't lucky for this movie. Let's understand two things about slasher horror from the 1980's: first of all, they had a legacy of saturating their own market, and secondly, they were simple stories born out of the twilight of an ever changing world.With this in mind, it would be easy to point out what is wrong with Jason Goes to Hell: The Final Friday- however for the sake of time, it might just as well be easier to point to what's right about it. The answer to that is: NOTHING! All you ever wanted to know about Jason is revealed, and once you know the dark secret, it will haunt you- except for a small matter of cosmetics, the "dark secret" is the same as the lemon revealed a short time earlier in New Line's bad "finale" to the Nightmare movies. Of course, the only nightmare about that film was having to admit that you paid to watch it- much the same with this piece of total garbage.Jason, it would seem, is not merely a specter capable of regeneration with a great rage at those who he feels are responsible for both his own and his mother's demise. Oh no, the dark secret is that if you can find someone who shares his father's blood line (cause lets face it, his mother was not born a Voorhees), then you can see Jason finally put to death, or you can see him re-born. Guess what happens here.Except the rebirth is anti-climatic because he is nothing more than the same twisted mass of flesh that he was before he was blown apart by bombs and bullets at the beginning of the movie. And apparently genetics has a preference for certain types of clothing, and a certain mask because he is reborn with both.In one laughable sequence, you would be forgiven for thinking "Jason" (or as I'd like to refer to him as...the Imposter) being reborn meant the world would end, however a mere 10 minutes or so after he was "reborn," he is also summarily killed again with an ancient dagger (who were the camp counselors who ignored Jason as he died...some ancient Sumarian or Egyptian people or something? What's with the dagger that must be used? Why does it look like an artifact?) supplied to his niece (oh, this is a long story, and is too tedious and boring to go through right now) who finds the Linda Hamilton in her to terminate the 'terminator.' You'll be in for your just desserts if you think this repulsive piece of junk is worth even five minutes of your time. Of course, there is plenty of blood and gore (as the Friday films always seem to have), and there is also plenty to gross you out- but if you think or feel anything towards the horror icon that made these films successful, you ought to take a pass on this one
Bad Device. I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service
Supernova in the classroom. Does anyone know if there is a real PG-13 version of this film?  I've been told it came out as a PG-13 and then was changed to an R film.  Pretty strange way to deal with a science fiction film that kids would want to see..
SUPER TEEN. Having been a teenager once, I can certainly understand the inner turmoil and angst teens experience.  However, in PUMP UP THE VOLUME, the movie's attempt to martyrize teens and make all adults look like uncaring morons only serves to underscore why so many adults look with disdain on teens.  The teens in this movie seem to have little respect for authority and their assignation as to being tortured and misunderstood is vanquished in their juvenile behavior.  Even our hero (well played by Christian Slater) cannot communicate with people on a one to one level; he instead decides to become some kind of salvation to his teens by using his pirated radio shows to cause some kind of uprising among them.  As a proponent of truth, he is a vapid antithesis of truth: he fakes masturbation to arouse the youths; he doesn't use his real name or voice; and on a call with a potential suicide victim, he treats the caller as someone who isn't serious and never really offers any kind of consolation.  The suicidal teen says he is lonely and we automatically assume he is lonely within his familial structure, but isn't he just as lonely with the peers who mourn him after his demise?  The adults are played almost as caricatures and the teens as misunderstood heroes.  Sorry, folks, been there done that...living at any age requires a commitment to better yourself and do what you feel is right.  Questioning authority without any viable alternatives, as none of these teens do, merely escalates the generational gap, and movies like this are merely attempts to exploit the so called misunderstanding of youth
UnBox video not yet working. Will not play once video was downloaded. I get the error message:  "can not play file, please try again later. error# 0x80040273" I made the exlusive give me call me back feature but the UnBox department was already closed, I was told the UnBox Saturday and Sunday 6-5 hours. I have to say I am impressed with the Call back feature. I downloaded the Unbox Beta now and am recieving email assistance to try to resolve the problem. Thanks Amazon UnBox! I will Update again - Feb. 10,200
Great Stars, Good Idea, Mediocre Execution. A comedy featuring four sexy stars as representatives of Heaven (Fanny Ardant, Victoria Abril) and Hell (Gael Garcia Bernal, Penelope Cruz) battling over the soul of a Mexican boxer is promising, but this attempt at satire, full of symbolism (Hell is represented by English-speaking executives, for example), is clumsily executed, only rarely amusing, and the superb Fanny Ardant is not given anything to do.  What a waste! You'll be better off watching any of the other movies each of these stars has done for more talented directors.
will this horror ever end?. Is it generally a rule that miniseries based off books have to suck so badly?  I've seen a million TV miniseries based off novels that have sucked so horrendously, but NONE like this.  Get this straight before I continue: I LOVE the book version of The Tommyknockers; it's my alltime favorite Stephen King novel (second-favorite: The Girl Who Loved Tom Gordon... review to come later) and I liked how it took the time to reveal key things about the plot: how Haven got started (and the "sowing and reaping" the itinerant preacher got on with the virgins in the cornfield), how Gard and Bobbi originally got to be such good friends (more than that actually; they dated for some time), and what actually went on in the woods that unleashed the evil.  Here... bulls**t.  Utter bulls**t.  Here is why I think the movie sucked:- The series is only 2 hours long... what the f**k?  A novel the size of The Tommyknockers can't possibly be fit into a 2-hour long series.  What about the minor stuff that, although minor, can't be taken out without a serious loss in credibility?  Like Hilly.  There wasn't much of him or his disappearing act with his little brother David, and there certainly wasn't enough of his tenure at Altair-4 or their frantic search for his body.  And what about Gard and how he opened up the hole to suck in his conniving ex-poker buddy after getting cheated on a poker game?  That scene would have been amazing in the movie.  But no.  None of it.-The changes the authors made in the plotline.  Seriously. Get some things at least partially right, then change what you have to in order to fulfill whatever sick and twisted purpose you had in mind when changing the original.  But they take it too far.  Example: in the novel, Gard and Bobbi's teeth originally fell out because of their "becoming"; now, nothing.  And, the aliens themselves have a full set of teeth (that part in the novel)... so why the (insert obscenity here) did they change it?!?!The only reason I gave this particular hellfest two stars is cause the original was made by Stephen King.  No other reason.  If you are looking for a good time, buy the damn book.  It's the real thing- unlike this piece of s**t.Overall: 2 starsWhy: for failure to be entertainin
Not quite as good as Plan 9 From Outer Space. Sadly this movie doesn't qualify in any category, not even "worst sci-fi movie of all time."  At least Plan 9 contained scenes to make you laugh; this movie just makes you cringe from start to finish.  It combines bad plot with wooden dialog, bad acting, tired direction, and an overall story-line that is riddled with cringe-making errors and stupidities.  This is the kind of movie stoned teenage drop-outs would make if someone was foolish enough to give them the resources.  Even the title is flat.  My own party-game (dreamed up in order to survive the movie, which my children wanted to watch until they too gave up in disgust) was to invent better titles referencing older sci-fi classics.  My favorite: The Day The Bowel Movement Stood Still.  Runner up: Clueless Encounters of the Turd Kind.In short, avoid this movie unless you want to know up-close how it must feel to have an aneurism
Why the Charge. Curious as to why Amazon would charge for this content when CBS offers it for free on the official Survivor Website.  Yeah, at the CBS site you have sit through 4 commercials, but it is worth it to not have to download any extra programs
Unfortunate Edition. This particular DVD edition of Nosferatu is an excellent example of the importance of music in setting a film's mood.  I'm not sure when this "score" was "written", although it is far from effective in depicting the time period of the film.  Nor does it convey the proper mood in many points during the film.  With this edition's music, I got confused at times between what I saw and what I heard, and the whole thing became an unaffective joke after a while.  If you want an affective, edge-of-the-seat experience out of Nosferatu, I reccomend another edition.
Star Trek:  City on the Edge of Forever. My favorite show of the Trek series but there's no way I'd buy another individual program from Amazon.  It will ONLY play on their downloaded player ...won't burn to DVD so can't play it on my television.  Don't bother buying this ...just go for the Trek collection on DVD
disjointed... Sadly, it could have and should have been something...instead it is nothing more than a mess.Joe Unger and  the actor who played the perverted gas station attendant with the white film over one eyeare very good. This, however, is hardly enough to recommend the flick.
Poor support. This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet
DON'T SUPPORT BOOTLEG EDITIONS. This is an excellent video but any true fan of X will refuse to buy it because the company producing this DVD and has the legal rights to the film are not allowing ANY PROCEEDS TO GO TO THE BAND! VHS version and Laserdisc versions are available online. The band is trying to reacquire their rights to this production. Support the band, not bootleggers
Superman Returns... but to do what exactly?. I can understand why everyone would want this to succeed, but there are three reasons why it didn't. First of all, you would think Warner Brothers would learn from the reinvention of the Batman franchise they nearly killed. I always thought the target audience should be adults, and then would eventually make it down to kids. This kind of campy storytelling will not be tolerated by the public at large anymore.Secondly, I felt there was some sentimental value attached to this film due to the passing of Christopher and Dana Reeve to not allow a more objective critique of the film. I'm not coming down on Brandon Routh at all. I think he did a wonderful job taking the Superman mantle. Aside from a few poor casting choices (Bossworth and Posey). The cast carries out very good performances. Not surprising was Kevin Spacey's marvelous performance as Lex Luthor. While clearly differing from Hackman's performance. Spacey offers a more jubulent take which adds more depth to the character.And third, what made this film lose its cohesiveness was the direction of the story. Bryan Singer did a great job of re introducing the characters. But after that failed to take the movie in a clear direction. So in truth, you only need to see the first half of the film. After the second half you might end up scratching your head.A shout to the people at Warner Brothers. You boys clearly don't have a clue wether you have a good thing or a bad thing so I'll make this real simple. Either hire a competent writer to tell a good story or sell the rights to make these movies. Superman is a good character with a wealth of material in the mythos to use. And it shouldn't be butchered by the likes of you. Take notice folks, Donner's films are going to out gross this one too.
Pan and scan mockery of a comic book classic. This edition of the film sucks and sucks again. The wide screen version of this is a Masterpiece - without the widescreen ratio this edition cannot be true to the comic book sensibility that Bava intended.  Each shot was carefully composed(and not intended to be butchered) - this edition is a travesty -- especially when it's purported to be put out by fans - do you're homework. There are also scenes missing from this print, scenes that are important and add to the overall ambience. Hey I thought the folks behind this were enthusiasts -- instead its just sloppy and self indulgent. Look for the earlier laser disc edition ........... as for the extras do we really need the - it's great because I used it in my video slop .... and it's great because I did a bad homage/rip-off slop. The documentary in the extras takes great pains to point out that this film was intended to look like a comic book and that's what was great about it. Then when you watch the film what you get is less than a third of the original image! Strikes me a total scumminess. All in a all a fabulous opportunity wasted ... by a few lazy lard-asses with a quick-fix mentality.
What's Love got to do with it?. Women in Love is a well acted film mostly about people who are difficult to like doing things difficult to approve.  To its great credit this Ken Russell film is faithful to the D. H. Lawrence novel upon which it is based
Big Rig, Big Mistake, Big Shark. The Worlds biggest and safest oil rig is ready to drill on unstable ocean floor in the Arctic.  Bad move.  In a scene from Deep Star Six, the drilling opens up a huge cavern that is teeming with life that has gone extinct elsewhere 60-70 million years ago.  One life form is a megalodon which leaves the rich feeding ground of the cave for the more barren waters of the Arctic (would you like a bridge with that?).  Actually the first shark evidence, a shadow, does not appear until 47 minutes into the movie.  The rig and the small cast are now at risk from a powerful predator.Mistakes abound in this film in unexpected ways.  I am used to these film getting the extinction dates wrong but this one got it right.  However, it does play heck with a lot of other details.  Imagine a body at 5,000 feet down that does not suffer from the pressure.  Imagine and elevator and subs that travel the 5,000 feet from surface to ocean floor in a matter of minutes.  Imagine a shark that has no internal organs (it is solid like a statue).  Imagine planning rescue boats that have to be dropped bow first sixty feet to the water (and have wounded aboard).  Watch visitors get invited to a dinner with no food and everyone leaves at the start.The disk is very barren.  Just play movie and a chapter selection.  No trailers, commentary, behind the scenes (although it is credited in the credits), no nothing
Extremely Annoying. If you like action flicks with absolutely no intelligence this movie will appeal to your deepest of hearts, but for those of you who prefer a plot and something that makes at least a little sense....skip it.A sports camera crew sets out to find the most daring of extreme sports heroes so that it can film an action movie in the Alps. They recruit a couple of crazy snow-boarders, helicopter pilots willing to outrun avalanches and then they toss in a pretty and dainty Olympic skier for good measure and some eye candy. The entire film consists of the frilly skier competing with the fearless snow boarders for attention and film time. They get thrown out of helicopters at high altitude without any oxygen and wearing barely any clothes but they never freeze...funny how that happens in movies! The real amazing feat is how they ski downhill in front of a major avalanche and can still talk to one another...have you ever heard how loud an avalanche is? Thank goodness for those sub-atomic hearing aids!! Eventually European terrorists enter the picture and a few automatic weapons (something has to encourage those slow moving avalanches). Well you know how it goes.The action is great and if you like skiing some of the stunts are literally unbelievable but other than that I wouldn't recommend this film to anyone with half a brain because you will just be frustrated with all of the impossibilities and missed reasons for people to die. I only watched it because I was forced into it by a couch potato with a remote.
Didn't work. I downloaded the player and this episode as part of a promotion that gave a free episode. Not only did I get charged, but when I cancelled the download to contact about the charge - I was told I had to finish downloading before they could refund. Once it finished downloading, it didn't play anyway. I gave up.
Did not work. The ones that are posted twice do not work. If they are posted once, you can try to download it, but it might not work. The video only worked for about a minute. Shame, since I really like this show and I wanted Amazon Unbox to be cool. The one cent CSI works, go download tha
Typical rom-com for genre/bullock/affleck fans only. If you've seen one you've seen them all. Uptight guy by chance meets quirky girl, she brings him out of his shell.Well, I bought this for like two dollars, and maybe it was worth it. I watch it like once a year. No special features on DVD worth mentioning.Ben Affleck is getting married, he has to fly down to the south from NY for the wedding. But things keep getting in his way. Forces of Nature. Also, he keeps running into, and can't seem to get away from, some weird chick (Bullock). Are these signs? Should he stop being so uptight, and go with this free-spirited chick? Or should he be an adult and get married and accept his Vanilla lifestyle?The acting in this movie is "meh", meaning Sandra has the same personality that she has in every movie; and Affleck sucks, as usual. The other small parts are well done, for the most part.The script is formulaic, and the cinematography at times is interesting. It's just another rom-com where the whacky girl brings the uptight guy out of his shell. The movie opens with a stripper scene, no nudity. There is also a pot-smoking scene in this movie. There is also a scene where Affleck strips at a gay bar. Just thought I'd throw that in, in case you're considering buying this for your teen daughter or something, and that kind of thing bothers you.You only need to buy this is you are a rom-com fanatic, or a big fan of either Affleck or Bullock. Otherwise this is completely forgettable.
Dont get "Fiji" final week ... Dont dwnld " Survivor, "Thunderstorms & Sacrifice" ". Its my fault for not reading the whole thing. you would think that the last episode would be the finale , but NO, its just a 10 minute recap going to the finale 4. I didnt even get a full 45 minute episode. No finale. I got rippped off. $1.99 dwnld not well spent. Dont bother dwnldng any episode of fiji if you dont know the ending. Because they dont have that episode, not even the reunion show
great cast no logic. We have a lawman who for no explained reason starts to investigate the cause of death of a man with 500,000 on him and it all goes down hill from there. There is no rhyme or reason to the story. I gave it two stars because the landscape is great
Pointless. A film about filmmaking of no interest. Almost 2 hours long. A film about filmmaking. A narcissistic view of the movie business. The film is about a film being shot, and ends when this is accomplished. We see what goes on in the daily lives of those involved in the work, from the director (the same Truffaut) to the producer, to the cast, to the stuntman. There's a curious lady, a wife to one of the employees, who sits knitting and watching her husband so he doesn't cheat on her during work. Everybody keeps busy working and flirting chaotically, and the only one who does not mix work and pleasure seems to be the director (and maybe the producer). It's supposed to be funny, and even nostalgic. There are visual references to the great classic directors in film history, to how the film industry has changed... One thing to learn from this story is that fiction plays a role in our lives: it serves as a contrast to the frivolity and emptiness of our real lives."Do you think the story of a woman who falls for her father-in-law can still be interesting today?", asks a reporter to the leading star. That question is quite revealing of what our world has become. Sex and alcohol keep these pitiful troupe working like gasoline keeps a car running. Another important moment is when the knitting lady (mentioned before) gets tired of watching so much promiscuity going around and starts yelling at the whole crew. What role does she play? Is she the typical conservative fun-spoiler? Or is she Truffaut's alter-ego? Hard to say. And that's one reason why this whole film is pointless. It just describes what goes on, which is not interesting at all, there's no plot, there are no interesting characters, only adults acting as children acting as adults.In another scene the director's assistant, another sexy gal, after one of the female workers runs away with the stuntman and leaves her lover, says "I could leave a man for a film, but never a film for a man", which doesn't make her any more likeable to me.At least if it had been only 60 or 80 minutes of film I would have given it 3 stars. A film as empty and pointless as its characters.
Aaron Kwok gives a great performance in this silly cop movie. Kwok is on fire in this movie with maybe his best physical performance ever. He looks like a pop star but his acting is actually very good. Unfortunately, his performance is completely wasted in a movie this bad. I won't explain the story, it is cops vs. drug dealers. There is a beautiful fighting female, good car chases, big name stars, and good fights. How did this movie go wrong? Well, Stanley Tong is a decent director, but he is a stuntman, screen fighter, and martial arts choreographer at heart. He tries to make this an American movie but he disregards everything that gives feeling to movies. I cracked a smile more than a few times but this is the most mindless modern day film I have seen in a long time. Usually, I am able to get past all of this since I am a sucker for good fight scenes, and this movie does have a few. Highlights to watch for are Ken Lo vs. Marc Dacoscos and Dacoscos vs. everyone in the final fight. The thing that ruins this movie is that the real final fight never finishes, but instead it moves on to a totally ridiculous fight to finish off the movie. 'Cradle to the Grave' has a better end fight! Stanley Tong must have been out of his mind because in the finale, Coolio ends up as the main opponent. Not Ken Lo who is the leg fighter that faces Jackie Chan at the end of 'Drunken Master 2', and not Marc Dacoscos who is one of the very best modern day martial arts actors, but Coolio.I honestly thought this was a good cheesy movie, but the final fight sequence is just horrible. Stanley Tong comes up with a great idea having the actors fighting on a huge piece of glass hundreds of feet in the air and they have to keep their balance while they fight. It is just too bad Coolio had to ruin it. 2.5/5DVD from Dimension Home Video has good sound and picture quality. No special features except the outtakes in the credits which was a much more satisfying end to the movie.
What's up with that?. I wish I had read the other reviews first.  Though the quality of the episode and the video are top notch, the episode cuts off after 22 minutes.  Obviously, I already know the ending of "The Black Death", but I still wanted to see the full show
Wonderful program, but flawed files... Okay, so to catch up on this exciting new series, I decided to try this revolutionary downloading program - Amazon Unbox!  I selected the first 10 episodes and hit Purchase.  Minutes later, I was watching the first episode, it came quickly, sounded great, and looked wonderful... however the second one was missing a few minutes at the end.  Forgiveable, until... whole episodes starting arriving incomplete or had missing video, making it incredibly frustrating and disappointing.But, this IS a good concept... unfortunately, Amazon has yet to verify all their own files for both audio and picture quality!  So, until the issue is fixed and paying customers recieve completed files or refunds... DO NOT try and download Season 1, Episodes 2, 4, 5, 6, and 7!!!  1, 3, 8, 9, and 10 were the only ones that were 100% complete for me
Wonderful program, but flawed files... Okay, so to catch up on this exciting new series, I decided to try this revolutionary downloading program - Amazon Unbox!  I selected the first 10 episodes and hit Purchase.  Minutes later, I was watching the first episode, it came quickly, sounded great, and looked wonderful... however the second one was missing a few minutes at the end.  Forgiveable, until... whole episodes starting arriving incomplete or had missing video, making it incredibly frustrating and disappointing.But, this IS a good concept... unfortunately, Amazon has yet to verify all their own files for both audio and picture quality!  So, until the issue is fixed and paying customers recieve completed files or refunds... DO NOT try and download Season 1, Episodes 2, 4, 5, 6, and 7!!!  1, 3, 8, 9, and 10 were the only ones that were 100% complete for me
Unremarkable and uninformative. Here's what I learned from this movie:  Oscar Wilde was gay.That's it.Never mind that he was a brilliant writer, an astute observer of society's foibles, a witty convesationalist, and a darn interesting guy.  Because he was gay, and apparently that's the only thing that anyone should care about.Sadly, the film doesn't explore any other aspect of Wilde's life.  I wonder if he'd been heterosexual if the filmmakers would have felt the need to subject us to so many graphic and pointless sex scenes.  Doubtful.  These scenes are not distasteful, just unnecessary.  How many times must I watch Oscar fondle a young boy before it just becomes redundant?  Ironically, while making a solid case that Wilde was a victim of a rigid, unforgiving society, the film itself falls victim to its own good intentions.  Where once Wilde was villified for his sexual preferences, here he is nothing but his sexual preferences.I wanted more.  I wanted to experience Oscar Wilde as a full human being, not just a gay man.  Even this falls flat.  His relationship with his young male lover is surprisingly shallow and uninvolving.Oh, well, Oscar.  Maybe they'll make another movie in a hundred years, and we'll all be uninterested enough in who Wilde was having sex with to actually learn something about his life.
What about the missing episodes. Why should one buy this series? What about the missing episodes? Are they going to be added later, or this is it? I cannot believe this. Would you buy a bicycle with a missing wheel? Or a keyboard without the C and R keys? I'd like Amazon to explain its customers what it plans to do..
Cant watch. I downloaded this program and it was garbled and video as if played in slow motion.  This is the first of two downloads that didn't play.  I know it was not my computer because I did download three that played ok
I found it...tiresome.... My advice is to watch this in French, which is less painful especially if you don't speak French.  In English, its unbearable.Slow?  At one point the DVD froze and I didn't realize it for several minutes
no *'s. "Hey lets put Hugh Grant on the cover and maybe people will buy it." Well I didnt buy it for Hugh however, I did buy it because Fangoria holds it up pretty high. My curiosity got the best of me and, I wanted to know why they liked it so much. I still wanna know! The movie was plain boring! The script introduces one annoying character after the next. Its a huge mess, with bogus effects and, a major lack of suspense or terror! I wanted to find something good I may be able to say about this movie but, the only thing that comes to mind is that atleast it ends. Obviously there are those that get it and those that dont.. I am proud to say... I dont.
Just not gripping. Admittedly the film is clever and the acting is good and it has it's moments of entertainment, BUT overall it's long and pretty boring.  It seems it would have been better suited as a play, which apparently it was originally.  I had just finished re-reading Romeo and Juliet when I rented this, thinking I was still in a Shakespeare mood, but this didn't do it for me.  I suppose if I had just finished reading or watching Hamlet, it would have been better.  My favorite parts are Oldman's silent scientific discoveries, completely amusing.  Couldn't wait for the movie to end, honestly
[Two and a half stars out of five] Average from the word go; musclehead Bill Goldberg, the ex-Pro DLm ends his movie career here. I know, Goldy got another movie later,but here we see why he ISN'T THE next'Rock'. Supoorting cast is pretty badand belgian kickboxing Champ Van Damjust isn't Schwarzenegger (that saysa lot!) and movie night filming doesn'thelp! Props and fake US army set uplooks like something out of a Returnof the Living Dead set! Not really any-thing to right home about unless you'reinto Bill Goldberg, "Next stop, intensivecare...", just like Van Dam and B.G.'scareers after this movie. Can you beleiveVan Dam did (another) sequel?!
Unwatchable. I recorded this from TV, and tried to watch it.  I even tried to just watch a little each day, to see if there was anything remotely funny in it. I finally gave up yesterday, and erased it. I actually felt sorry for Peter O'Toole, that he had to do the unfunny things he had to do in this movie. Life is too short to sit through this thing. Amazing that some people think it's great. Unbearably bad
Dissapointed. Ella Enchanted has been my favorite book for years and when I heard that they were going to make it into a movie, I was estatic. I marked the movie release date on my calander, got my tickets in advance, and waited on pins and needles on the way to the theater.The movie was a huge dissapointment. While I wasn't expecting the movie to be just like the book, I certainly wasn't expecting that. While the movie itself was funny and an overall good movie, I hated it because it was absolutley nothing like the book. The only common thread I found were the names of the characters and the fact that Ella was cursed from birth.I suggest that you go and read the book if you enjoyed the movie, it is far better with an increadible story line and an ending that still brings me to tears, despite the fact that I've read it over 100 times
"Wild Orchid " please more like "Withered Orchid". After Two Moon Junction and 91/2 Weeks I expected a lot when I watched Wild Orchid last night. Unfortunately I was extremely disappointed. I don't mean to imply the movie is totally awful or the worst movie ever made. It's not. But the movie had nothing unique about it at all and lacked a certain something. The expression "When you got it you got it" holds true to movies and "Wild Orchid" didn't have it.It's not Mickey Rourke or Carre Otis fault. Their both attractive people who seemed to try hard with the material on hand. But the material just wasn't interesting. It lacked subtlety. The worst part of the film is the horrid, trite dialogue; 'I'm afraid if I touch you you'll disappear', 'If you want me, come and hold me right now'; you've *got* to be kidding me!! Zalman King should learn to quit while he's ahead (take a look at the Red Shoe Diaries, for example: the same story recycled multiple times, shamelessly using David Duchovney to draw viewers because it wouldn't attract a single one without him (or, at least none out of high school and not desperately looking for some late-night nudity...)This film is the same, it uses 9 1/2 Weeks, and Mickey Rourke, to draw viewers even though it can't stand on its own feet because it's so unoriginal and poorly written...never mind the acting (what was Bruce Greenwood *thinking*???)Wild Orchid held neither the fascinating complexities and characters of "91/2 Weeks" or the dreamlike imagery and compelling mystery of "Two Moon Junction." It was just sex. It held none of the sensuality of the above mentioned. It's too bad because there was a lot of potential there. It was very much a letdown, in this case what you see is ultimately exactly what you'll get. Just don't expect anything more then that, again I wish this movie had been made differently, the main word that comes to mind when viewing wild orchid is "typical".
rediscovering my folks. this is a film that teachs you about  not only being a father but how to become a son, about being truthful to your roots and your futur
hORRIBLE QUALITY - bLACK SCREEN WITH ONLY VOICES. tHE SHOWING OF dORA GOES TO A BLACK SCREEN SHORTLY INTO THE SCREENING.  tHIS WAS A WASTE OF MONEY.  i WILL NEVER DOWNLOAD UNBOXED ITEMS AGAIN AS THEY ARE NOT GOOD QUALITY.  dON'T EVEN BOTHER.  JUST BUY THE dvd
too close to a caricature. Be advised that after 45 minutes of the movie my 8 year-old son and I gave up. Goodman seems to have been given the license to "go for broke" with a "larger than life" approach, that leaves little for the viewer to consider of Ruth's actual life.  With the broadest of strokes, Goodman  plays Ruth self-consciously; the mis-en-scenes are without any surprises and Hollywood-predictable.Too little was shown to give us the sense of Ruth-as-athlete and the milieu of early 20th century baseball, a fascinating story that awaited telling but missed the opportunity here
Oy vey!. Most of the criticisms levelled against this video are valid, with the glaring exception of the one directed at Nico Castel.  Will there never be a quality DVD version of this opera, or of one of Menotti's other fine works, "Goya"?  Does anyone still actually use the VHS medium
It watched it on fast forward!. Except for two cuties: William Zabka and Dana Ashbrook! Especially Dana who constantly having a hard-on
Only rent if you really must see it. The plot had some potential, but unfortunately we ended up with this instead. It's not cheesy, it's lame. This is one of those films where characters make really dumb decisions that make no sense, or do really stupid things in the name of trying to create some tension. So much so that the movie is more tedious and boring then anything. However, because the plot wasn't bad and the effects were pretty decent I gave it 2 stars. That said, I would have to say your not missing anything by passing this one over.
Exploitation Versus Art--Ingmar Bergman's Oscar Winner and Wes Craven's Shocker Tell The Same Tale. There is an interesting comparison to be made between Ingmar Bergman's classic "The Virgin Spring" and the grisly exploitation shocker it inspired, "Last House on the Left" by Wes Craven.  They share identical plots, feature graphic rape scenes, and before it's all over turn average men into murderers.  And yet one is considered to be a bona fide classic and 1961's Oscar-winning Best Foreign Film--and the other appreciated only in underground circles, but largely reviled as cheap gruesome exploitation.So just how different are they?  Not as different as you might imagine--but as different as art and exploitation."The Virgin Spring" is easily one of Bergman's most accessible films.  Telling a simple story in a straightforward fashion, he exposes a frankness and brutality people weren't accustomed to seeing.  A young girl venturing through the woods encounters two men and a boy.  Though they initially seem helpful, their actions quickly become violent.  After a graphic (for the time) rape, the girl is murdered.  Later, the wrongdoers happen upon the girl's home and seek shelter from her family--both groups unaware of who the other is.  Suspicions start to arise and vengeance is sought.It is a powerful tale of love, loss and the depths people can be driven into--where they become unable to stop themselves from betraying their faith and moral code, where savagery and rage take over.  Bergman's film benefits greatly from a stellar lead performance by Max von Sydow as the father.  Real conflict and raw emotion burn up the screen.  Add the beautiful cinematography and haunting score and it's a winning combination.  But what endures in the story of "The Virgin Spring" is how strong a component faith becomes--when there is nothing left to believe in, can you still believe?  A classic in every sense, "The Virgin Spring" still has the power to shock but there's something very redemptive about the film."Last House on the Left," however, is probably more notorious than acclaimed.  The plot, as I've said, is identical.  Coming 12 years later, in 1972, Wes Craven was at the beginning of his career and sought to retell this tale.  It is a shocker, and the scenes of rape and murder clearly foreshadow the "torture cinema" of today.  It is brutal, uncompromising and graphic--and the film was championed in the underground horror market.Working with a small budget, the film lacks the artistry of "The Virgin Spring."  While it still packs a visceral punch and has the power to shock--what it lacks is depth and subtlety.  The characters aren't particularly drawn out so their actions don't have the emotional resonance of the earlier film.  Without contemplating faith and moral choices, what we're left with is straightforward revenge.  And the film, ultimately, has no redemption--no uplift.  It's violence for the sake of violence.  It remains a historically significant precursor and influence on other shock films without being a particularly good movie in it's own right.And therein lies the difference between art and exploitation.   KGHarris, 11/06
Poor support. This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet
Alice in Wonderland... So I saw this one live action Alice in Wonderland movie and it sucked!!!! But I'm confused this isn't the same girl in that movie so this another live action movie, I think it is. I'm not sure if I want to risk boring myself with other crap... so will I watch this verison ever... who knows
Didn't work. I downloaded the player and this episode as part of a promotion that gave a free episode. Not only did I get charged, but when I cancelled the download to contact about the charge - I was told I had to finish downloading before they could refund. Once it finished downloading, it didn't play anyway. I gave up.
Outlaw all post-release editing. This is truly one the most spectacular films ever made, not suffering for having been made during the silent era. However, as correctly stated by another review of the film, the DVD version runs to 139mins as oppossed to the VHS 155mins. This is not due to DVD faster frame rate, but rather because the DVD version has had a huge portion of the film cut for no obvious reason. At one point, the Hero (Fairbanks) has fulfilled the prophecy of the princess and has been the first to touch the rose-tree, the next minute he is seen explaining to her (in an intimate scene) that he is not what he seems. Having seen the VHS a number of times, I can confirm that the DVD version has been brutally cut. Do not buy the DVD version, as it is a let-down with those scenes missing; thus the reason for my one star, which would otherwise have been 4 1/5 (5 stars with the Rimsky Korsakov soundtrack). You have been warned
This movie is a clunker. Wasted talent.  None of the characters are believable in the roles they are portraying.  Some funny stuff.  Craig Ferguson can do better.  Charlotte Church should stick to singing as acting is not her forte.  Every thing in this movie seems forced and there is no chemistry between the characters
Bad Device. I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service
Ewwww that smell... this stinks...Buy Flying Daggers, [just plain] HERO, or buy Fong Sai Yuk at an online retailer..
Kathy Smith - Pregnancy Workout. I am a big fan of Kathy Smith but this video is quite outdated -- I don't know the date but guessing late '80s.  The workout is fine but wish I bought something more up to date since so much about pregnancy fitness has changed in the last 10 years.  In the middle of the workout, there is an unnecessary pause where Kathy and the others in the video stop to perform a rap song...awfully silly and waste of precious time!
Wasted. That should have been the title of this movie as it describes the use that the talents of a high-profile cast & normally respectable director are put to.  Another possible title is "It's All About the Groceries", 'cause I'm hard-pressed to think of a reason, other than money, why anybody involved would've signed on to this project.It starts promisingly, with atmospheric shots of the Golden Gate Bridge rising through fog over San Francisco.  The camera plunges through the fog to hone in on the image of a knife being held to a woman's throat. Once again, Ashley Judd is a victim in jeopardy . . .so it seems.  Then the 'victim' proceeds to open a can of whoop-a** all over the perpetrator and beats him to a bloody pulp.  One starts to think that this might be getting good, especially after Ashley's apparently super-competent police detective is revealed to have anger issues, a pretty hefty drinking problem, a propensity for picking up strangers in bars & having rough sex with them . . .and some grisly skeletons in her closet.  I was interested to see what Judd would do with this opportunity to play a character with a dark side instead of her usual noble victim.  Unfortunately, not enough.  Ms. Judd is a luminously beautiful actress, even with a severe short haircut meant to make her look tough, I suppose. It is not hard to believe that men would be drawn to her like bugs to a flame.  She has not developed the range of emotion to really carry a complex character like Jessica, though, playing it distressingly one-note.  Is she ecstatic?  Depressed?  In a drug-induced stupor?  The way Judd plays it, it could be any, or all, of the above.  I like Ashley Judd, but she is in danger of turning into the female version of Richard Gere--a performer with real potential who keeps choosing flashy junk-food roles that do not challenge her talent.  "Kiss the Girls" was the high-water mark & each subsequent film has been weaker than the last.This movie is worth the price of a rental, but I'd take a pass on purchasing it.  For a better treatment of female-cop-with-dark-secrets-and-Issues, & a stronger movie all-around, I recommend "Murder by Numbers" with Sandra Bullock
Prom Night. Years ago, a group of children playing accidently kill one of their friends, and decide to keep a secret. Years later when they're all in high school, the girls twin brother exacts bloody revenge against them. Your typical 80s horror film, not very notable other than Leslie Nielsen, and Jamie Lee Curtis. This is one prom, better left unattended
Poor support. This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet
"In Good Company" is not good company. "In Good Company" goes on and on at the end a little bit, and the ending especially is not fulfilling character/plot-wise.  If it had ended 15-20 minutes before it actually did, I would give it three stars instead of two.I admit there were quite a few times when I laughed a bit to myself, but it didn't make me fall off the couch or anything. There were other times when I thought the actions of some characters were weird or forced.Overall it isn't an entirely bad movie, but, like I said, the ending is unfulfilling.  Overall not strong performances coming from Scarlett Johansson or Topher Grace
Revolting. This movie is very difficult to watch after awhile. Its about a psycho boss but its not funny at all. I didn't laugh through any of the movie. I love dark comedies like election, heathers, to die for, etc but this just didn't work for me. I hated it so much I returned it (lied and said it was a gift). Don't even rent it horrendous
A Charming bit of Camp for a Rainy Afternoon. As a fan of Mme. Austen, Thomas Hardy, D.H. Lawrence and other sundry novelists of manner, I freely admit to a hopeless addiction to "period" pieces -- and romances, in particular -- and this weakness clearly plays into the VERY generous aforementioned 2-star rating.  "Northanger Abbey" is a charming bit of camp for a rainy afternoon, but PLEASE don't expect this movie to be anything like the big-money Hollywood adaptations of Mme. Austen's other works.  The acting is over-the-top; the soundtrack, deplorable; and the characters (with the exception of Eleanor) are completely unsympathetic.  Catherine is portrayed as an insipid half-wit, rather than a day-dreamy post-adolescent on the verge of womanhood.  Peter Firth's Henry Tilney vascilates between compassionate, brotherly concern and annoyingly superior arrogance.  By the end of the movie, I had lost all patience with them and was convinced that Henry & Catherine fully deserve the misery they will inevitably wreak upon each other.  (This from a romance buff!) Most will give up before the end of the film, but true Austen fans will enjoy the parade of costumes, witty repartee, and the opportunity to daydream about the Regency culture.  Watch it or don't -- but if you choose to watch, make sure you do so with a sense of humor and forebearance.
Pul-eese. Why did they have to make this movie?. I have only one question about this movie. And that is, Why in the world did they change so many things that were in the book?If you haven't read the book than you don't know what I'm talking about. But if you have, then you do.I can't even begin to explain how good of a movie this would've been if it had been adapted correctly. Half the time while watching this, I felt as if I was watching Teletubies or something, the colors were so bright.If this movie had been placed in the correct time period with correct costumes, locations, characters, and details from the story,then EVERYONE would love it. Not just 5 year olds.It makes me so angry when I watch this movie. Yes, its funny and charming but it is so embarrassing. Everytime I loan someone the book, I have to explain to them that it is nothing like the movie at all. In fact, it is a hundred times better. More even.I am really disappointed. I just don't get how Gail Carson Levine would agree to all the changes that were made. If someone ever gets the courage to adapt the book into another movie, than I suggest they do it right. And if they do, then I'll be very thankful.I just don't get it. The book is soooooooooooooooooooooooooo much better. You wouldn't believe how much better it is.I am truely ashamed that this movie is even related in any way to the book. Next time, please, please, do it right
IT'S THE GREAT GLASS ELEVATOR, CHARLIE. Quick... what's not in widescreen and has no special features?  That's right - MEGALODON!  SIXTY FEET OF PREHISTORIC TERROR - or so claims the box art.  This film may be about a shark, but the production is all about FRANKENSTEIN.  Seen JAWS?  How about THE ABYSS, ALIEN, REPTILICUS, DEEP BLUE SEA, DEEP STAR SIX or LEVIATHAN?  Then you've seen most, if not all, of MEGALODON.  It's all here - the high tech multi-billion dollar drill site, a small, but the "best at what they do" crew, the ill timed major storm (snow and ice), an ill crewman, a lost world filled with lost fish stuffed with lost Magalodons, the standard crew roundtable scar sharing scene, a spunky blond girl reporter and her husky semi-comic cameraman.  Tiny one man (one woman) subs, a helicopter crash, several "tragic" deaths all capped off with a whiz-bang explosion at the end which solves most (but not all) of the problems.  MEGALODON takes no chances by leaving nothing to the imagination.  It simply takes no risks - which is odd since it tries so hard to move in another direction all the time.  There's a good story here blocked by a very large shark.  The Magalodon doesn't come into view until halfway through the film and up until then you may find yourself wondering when they're just going to get on with it - but once the shark does arrive, does get into frame - you begin to realize that there was something more building here.We've seen the destruction of the environment used time and again in these kinds of films - it's a backdrop.  It's something for the creator and builder of the worlds biggest and deepest oil rig to ravage and lay waste to - but here, the head of the COLOSSUS is actually a pretty good guy trying to provide the world with the fuel it needs.  When they stumble upon the lair of the Megalodon there is no talk of drilling for more oil - they all are taken by the wonder of finding a LOST WORLD.  It almost seems as if the story might breakaway here and follow a different direction.  But it never does - the shark swims in, knocks things about, knocks things over, breaks through things, and then gets blown to bits.  We skip into a THREE MONTHS LATER, get our CODA, then our STINGER that there is not one... but two, perhaps more Megalodons now loose in the world's oceans.  Nifty - but dull.There a TON of unanswered questions, and by the end you know the movie has cheated you (can anyone explain why the earthquakes were needed in this film?  Also, was the anchor cable drilled into the ocean floor ever going to break? - they cut back to it at least three times after each quake and I kept waiting for it to snap and the COLOSSUS to tip over - never did).  MEGALODON is what it is - full screen, ready for cable, jammed with a few nifty ideas and stuffed with off kilter CGI (the subs looks fake - but look clean, while the Megalodon itself looks and acts almost exactly like a plastic tub toy shark) effects.  Not the best, not the worst - not JAWS or any of the rest...it's MEGALODON, and it's available for sale or to rent.
Captives. I have seen Julia Ormond in some good movies and she is a great actress. This is not one of them. Senseless subject. The audio is bad, or the language is not what I am used with, so I understood only half of what they said in the movie. Stay away from this one
Warning Incomplete Episode!!!. The episodes in this series have an average running time of 50 minutes. This one happens to be only 18 minutes. This mean sthat the file abruptly stops right in the middle. Even though it only cost me $2 I still got jipped.  Let's hope Amazon can iron out these kinds of problems before they get this service farther underway. Be careful enough to sheck the running times to be sure they seem accurate before you buy them
Didn't work. I downloaded the player and this episode as part of a promotion that gave a free episode. Not only did I get charged, but when I cancelled the download to contact about the charge - I was told I had to finish downloading before they could refund. Once it finished downloading, it didn't play anyway. I gave up.
Stupid. To put it succinctly, Brendan Fraser is a college senior who ends up writing a ridiculously long thesis, which is then swiped by Joe Pesci, the homeless dude who, predictably, is really quite wise.  The problem is that his "wise" sayings aren't really too wise; he's like the guy you know who is always trying to sound intelligent, but doesn't really know that much. Joe Pesci's character is pretty annoying.  That's probably why he ended up friends with Brendan Fraser's character
CAN'T RATE WHAT I CAN'T SEE!!. Brannagh's film version of Hamlet blows away every other version, as well as every other Shakespeare based film. It's an easy 5 stars.Now the DVD is a different matter.  Been hearing about and waiting for this for ages! Every lame-oh shlock film holywood cranks out shows up on DVD and usually big projects like this are milked for every $ they can get with fancy packaging and special editions.I was part of the project through which a small determined group of fans was able to bring the one season wonder "My So-Called Life" to DVD and there must be close to as large an audience for this.WHERE IS IT
Not Happy. I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?
So awful I turned it off. I saw this film on TV several years ago, and started watching it because William Hurt is one of my favorite actors.  I got as far as the monkey man scene and turned it off, it was so ridiculous and just plain bad.  I can probably count on one hand the number of movies I have not watched all the way through (I even suffer through the bad and boring ones).  I couldn't take another minute of this one, however
Embarrassing. Why did they even bother transferring this movie to DVD?  Seriously?  The [...] child of a masterpiece, "The Vanishing" sports some of the most half-hearted performances and sometimes downright hilarious performances of the 90's.This isn't a matter of comparison.  This movie, all by itself, just sucks. If I hadn't seen the original I'd just think, "what a brilliant plot, too bad they decided to bury it (no pun intended) with everything else in the movie". Jeff Bridges manages an unintentional bust a gut type performance as the sociopathic professor; his accent is so forced and ridiculous that one wonders occasionally if this a parody of that great, gut wrenchingly disturbing, Hitchcockian 1988 movie.  Sandra Bullock and Kiefer Sutherland are themselves, which add nothing to the movie.And the ending.  Oh, the ending.  We've been cheated.  Totally cheated.  All the power that this clunker might have had is torn away in a fervor of "It has to be upbeat!" Hollywood cornball syndrome.  Sandra Bullock is RESCUED, the villain is hit with a shovel, and everything is A-OK!  Even though Kiefer Sutherland's original girlfriend has been buried alive and suffocated.  This is [...]of a great movie.
Read the book instead. Just a note to those who were uncomfortable watching this film with their children; movies have ratings for a reason.  This movie is rated PG-13, which tells you up front that it has content that is considered inappropriate for children.  In this case, it is crude humor.What I don't understand is why they made a movie with a story line aimed at a young audience, and then inclduded content that earned it a rating that recommends that a young audience shouldn't see it
Dull overexageration. An even though it's fiction, the incidents seem to fall out of the movies context to become contrived. Boring nonsence on a teen hormone kick
Sentimental and fake. Having enjoyed LOST IN TRANSLATION, I thought I might like this one, which seems to have some sort of cult reputation-- why I can't fathom. The entire plot is self-serving, shallow, and unrealistic. I guess it's supposed to depict the horror of repressive religious values, and while I don't condone those, the film lacks clear characters or any motivation. A lot of people have buttoned up parents who don't get it, and it doesn't mean they kill themselves-- because they were grounded!?Since the writer-director gerw up in Hollywood, she may not be aware that you can't keep your kid home from school without a very good reason-- social workers and what not come after you. So the entire premise is false.Romanticizing mass suicide by having a bunch of soft focus young blondes do it-- after which they supposedly ascend to erotic eternity in the imaginations of their boyish peers-- could actually encourage the act. It's not caring, not real, and not responsible.But I guess that wouldn't bother the rich, overfunded daughter of a Hollywood genius out to make a name for herself.
Super-awful. It gets two stars for the unintentional comedy. Other than that, it's one of the worst of the ultra-cheesy, predictable, low-budget horror movies from the early nineties. The FX are funny at first, but then they just go on and on and on and the sucking takes over from the comedy. The acting is uniformly terrible, and one has to image that the typically enjoyable Barrymore is just glad to have this ridiculous part of her career well behind her
could not be viewed!. i downloaded it and i couldn't view the video paste the intro. then i RE-downloaded it thinking that maybe it was a corrupt file, but it again it only had sound and not video. this one is a waste of money
Beware of Unbox!!!. Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for
Firefly: Excellent.  But buy it on DVD, not "Unbox"!. Read the Unbox terms of use CAREFULLY before choosing this route over a regular DVD purchase.  It is not your usual set of "blah blah" legal jargon.For example, 3c:"Removal of Software. If you uninstall or otherwise remove the Software, your ability to view all Digital Content you have downloaded to the Authorized Device will immediately and automatically terminate and we reserve the right to delete all Digital Content from that Authorized Device without notice to you."If you ever remove the Unbox software, Amazon may revoke your ability to view the Firefly episodes you paid for and may even delete them from your machine!Amazon, I've ordered literally thousands of dollars of stuff through you and always had a great experience; why did you let Unbox create these anti-customer terms of use??
WARNING: Wrong Episode!. This item is supposedly titled "UFOs: The First Encounters." It is, however, an episode about reincarnation. It is incorrectly labeled. DO NOT PURCHASE unless you are looking for an episode on reincarnation
a sorry movie. I wrote a huge review for this and don't know where it is but let me give you the short version.  They don't continue the story, that is until the end of the movie.  AND THAT WAS THE PART TRHAT RUINED THE MOVIE FOR ME. The movie is about this kid from the wudang sword school and he is going to get married.  Enter the Bride.  She of course doesn't want anybody to be happy so...The story is not really worth going over, it is just injected and there are no real emotions.  Except of course for an ending that really PO'ed me.  The only reason this movie gets a 2 stars and almost gets a 3 is for Christy Chung.  Not only is she one of the most beautiful women on earth, she is a great actress.  So I know of 2 movies now that are only worth watching for her, this and Red Wolf.  It may be because the people she works with are so terrible, but to tell the truth, Christy Chung actually made me pop this dvd in for a second time.  Not a big deal since it was only like a 77 minute long movie.
Redneck extravanganza on a ...Budget. This a dreadful example of what Jayne was reduced to play in to feed her children and compensate for the lack of earnings of her deadbeat-husbands/lovers.The only reason to watch it would be because Mamie Van Doren was also in it.But be aware (and i read that in a biography about Jayne) that in their contracts was specified that they would NOT appear together in ANY scene whatsoever.So you see them SEPARATELY in different scenes.Also be aware that if you blink,you will not see either of the 2 blonde beauties.Conclusion:Get this film for a member of your family who is nostalgic for the ways of the ''Ol' South',or someone with a white hood showing his eyes onl
I Want Your Brain!. This is not a George A. Romero project.Directed and written by Ken Wiederman. Film contains profane language, gross bloody effects.Thom Matthews returns as a different character, "Joey", James Karen returns as a different character, "Ed", Jonathan Terry returns as "Glover", Allan Trautman returns as "Tarman". Brian Peck returns as 5 different zombies, "Pussface", "Thriller", "Jaw", "Eye-Pop" and the zombie on the car roof.A truck that is traveling across a bridge is carrying pressurized cases that contain cadavers.  One case falls off the truck and ends up in the water.  A group of kids find the case and triggers the gas inside that spreads across the cemetary.  The living dead return.Also in the cast: Thor van Lingen, Dana Ashbrook, Mitch Pileggi.DVD only contains audio commentary and theatrical trailer
jeremial johnson, a stellar movie. i love nature and cowboy movies.  Jeremiah Johnson was on of the best movies i've seen.  it is unforgetable.  It was my favorite  RobertRedford movie.  He did very little talking talking in this movie, he just acted, his best performance ever.  the movie deals with the american indian also, in a profound and touching way.  this movie is engrossing and based on a true story,  it's simply the best. Don't miss the opportunity to see this movie, it is a classic.  It truly is in a league of it's own.
Easily forgotten. It didn't take me long to forget this film. Once again it stars Jet in a strange role
Redneck extravanganza on a ...Budget. This a dreadful example of what Jayne was reduced to play in to feed her children and compensate for the lack of earnings of her deadbeat-husbands/lovers.The only reason to watch it would be because Mamie Van Doren was also in it.But be aware (and i read that in a biography about Jayne) that in their contracts was specified that they would NOT appear together in ANY scene whatsoever.So you see them SEPARATELY in different scenes.Also be aware that if you blink,you will not see either of the 2 blonde beauties.Conclusion:Get this film for a member of your family who is nostalgic for the ways of the ''Ol' South',or someone with a white hood showing his eyes onl
Warning Incomplete Episode!!!. The episodes in this series have an average running time of 50 minutes. This one happens to be only 18 minutes. This mean sthat the file abruptly stops right in the middle. Even though it only cost me $2 I still got jipped.  Let's hope Amazon can iron out these kinds of problems before they get this service farther underway. Be careful enough to sheck the running times to be sure they seem accurate before you buy them
WHY  AREN'T ZERO STARS AVAILABLE FOR RATING??????. Maybe I should have known better, but hokey and horrible do not have to be the same. This is a four dollar movie in any department store
"In Good Company" is not good company. "In Good Company" goes on and on at the end a little bit, and the ending especially is not fulfilling character/plot-wise.  If it had ended 15-20 minutes before it actually did, I would give it three stars instead of two.I admit there were quite a few times when I laughed a bit to myself, but it didn't make me fall off the couch or anything. There were other times when I thought the actions of some characters were weird or forced.Overall it isn't an entirely bad movie, but, like I said, the ending is unfulfilling.  Overall not strong performances coming from Scarlett Johansson or Topher Grace
Bad Device. I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service
George Mihalka should have got... ...the bullet before compromising Michael Caine into this. But, what else could you expect from trash made for TV (sorry for the redundancy)
From The Desk of John. Dear Quentin,How are things going, man? I heard about the new film with Uma. Sounds great.Did you see my newest film "Lucky Numbers"? I play Russ Richards, the local celebrity weatherman in Harrisburg, Pennsylvania. Russ has adoring fans, his own table and omelet at Denny's, and a snowmobile dealership. Due to uncommonly warm weather, his dealership is about to go under, crumbling his entire financial empire. Out of desperation, he pays a visit to Gig (Tim Roth), the owner of the local strip club. Gig suggests that Russ and his `friend' Crystal (Lisa Kudrow) rig the state lottery. Crystal works at the same station and pulls the numbers out for the lottery. Crystal is all for the idea. She has also been dating Dick Simmons (Ed O'Neil), the station manager and he has been neglecting her. Her share of the winnings will help her break free. Everything, of course, gets complicated.Funny, huh? It has it's moments.Quentin, you know that I like to work with people I know. It makes me feel comfortable. Acting is hard, man. I need comfort to help me create my characters. Nora Ephron directed the film. She and I worked together on "Michael", which was pretty successful, so I was hoping lightning would strike twice.I really enjoyed reading the screenplay. Basically it combines elements of dark comedy and farce. People act weird, some people die, people are mean to one another. But they also act really silly. I haven't done a lot of farce but I laughed when I read the screenplay. My track record with comedy is spotty, but if someone has the $20 million and a decent script, I'm game.Lisa and I are great together. She plays someone that is very different from her well-known persona on `Friends'. Crystal is very different from Phoebe. Crystal has an edge, a determination that makes her very interesting. Crystal has a few moments that also make her seem real, a very important factor in a farce. If the character doesn't have at least a tiny grounding in reality, the farce doesn't work. Lisa gets this and makes it work. I get it, too, and made it work during the scene in the Denny's... In the scene in the snow mobile dealership... In the scene at the television studio when they reveal that someone was killed... In the... Well, I know I made it work somewhere. I'm no film historian, but it works.The supporting characters are top notch. Michael Moore plays Crystal's dimwitted cousin. He is very funny. Tim Roth is good, but doesn't have a lot of laughs. But that's OK. He's primarily a dramatic actor anyway. Actors should play to their strengths. Michael Rappaport plays a local thug. He's all over the place. Hell, most of the supporting cast is all over the place. That's OK, because this is a farce, right?I know reviewers will pick up on the fact that everyone in the film is greedy, unlikable and they really don't like each other. There isn't really anyone to care about. That's OK. These characters are based on real people. They don't need to be likable. They need to be funny. They are funny. Aren't they? Sometimes? Yes. They have some funny moments.Nora is a great director. She has a good hand at comedy, especially farce. Every farce I have ever seen has too many laughs. You're laughing when another joke happens. You can't keep track of it all. Thankfully, Nora has slowed everything down... Quite... A... Bit. Her pacing is glacial. But I like that. I have the ability to laugh at the jokes.Quentin, I'm just not sure. I've had a string of dogs lately. I'm not a good actor. I'm a movie star. I am a persona that draws people into the movies. They shouldn't expect my performance to be subtle or even well-modulated. If I'm playing a local celebrity weatherman, I'm going to play it for all the smarminess I can. I'm going to mug and grin at every character that recognizes me. I'm going to wear the local fame on my sleeve and when things start to go wrong, I'm going to shake, rub my head, run around in circles, really frustrated. I can play characters. But lately, people haven't been coming to the films. "Battlefield Earth" was a disaster, but to save face, I told some news people that I thought it was good and will make a sequel. I am a powerful star, a member of the $20 million dollar club. I can't go back to the under $10 million club. I just can't.Quentin, you are the king of creating comeback vehicles. Can you start thinking of another comeback vehicle for me? I know you can. I think that I may need another comeback in a year or two. Start watching the old videos, OK, pal? For me, Quentin?Thanks, buddy.John
Thaks a lot... I have not seen this movie, but thanks to the review of "A viewer" from July 2001, I don't have to
Please not another season of this!. Ok so I have always thought Courteney Cox should not be allowed on screen due to lack of acting talent and this show just proves it. It really is the most boring show Ive seen in a long time. If you thought she was bad in scream...and friends..dont watch this...there are other actors in this show who do redeem it somewhat but could never save it. Hopefully this show will be scraped
So terribly bad. People desperately wanted to see Olivia and John reunite after the success of Grease.  The dismal Grease 2 sequel came out with no sign of them, so someone had the idea of re-teaming them for something completely different.  TWO OF A KIND is a silly plot about two people who are destined to meet thanks to the good lord above, and through some silly scenarios we are supposed to believe they will.  The acting is absolutely shocking (not just from Olivia). Perhaps the only saving grace is the average single "Twist of Fate". This is not a cult classic, make no mistake.  It is easily one of those "hall of shame" films.  I cannot believe that there are reviewers out there who like this joke of a film
Wolf in Sheep Skin. If you are a Christian, this book isn't for you. It is full of blashphemy, concluding that we must "... forgive God" and that we must love God "... even if He isnt perfect". Kusher even has the will to say that "...God would not be God..." without our love for Him. At one point he reduces God to an aminal saying that in the garden of Eden, when God said "...let US make man in OUR image" he was speking to animals and creation. Kusher explains that God created the world, and in the next paragraph that we came by evolution.Since when was God in need of forgiveness? Isnt it that "... God so loved the world" and it wasnt us that loved God? I have no words in describing this book. It is full of error, because it does not base it self on the Gospel of Jesus Christ. All this book does is frees you from the thought that you are a sinner, and that it isnt your fault, and that actully you are a good person. Why do bad things happen to good people? Wrong question. There are no good people in the world in the first place. " for all have sinned and come short of the glory of God..." The world is in sin. The world DOES NOT HAVE GOOD PEOPLE!! Only by the grace of God, through faith in Jesus Christ you are made righteous. I beg you in the name of Jesus Christ to stay away from this book. It hasnt helped 4 million people, but it lied to them. Kusher, please turn from your ways and come to Jesus, then will you understand the life question "WHY"
Absolute rubbish!. This is by far the worst dance movie I have ever watched. The characters, acting and plot lines are laughable (even for someone who usually loves cheesy dance movies) and what little dancing there is in the film is badly filmed and boring.  If it hadn't been for the hilarious 80's outfits and hairdos (especially the curly mullet sported by the lead character), I would have turned it off. If you like salsa, watch 'Dance With Me'
Same Thing. The Dane Cook episode is the same one that it on his "Harmful If Swallowed" c.d. The c.d. also has the uncensored version of this routine that is over 1 hour long. The one star rating is not based on the content. It is based upon Amazon not sharing this fact with customers
Trite. The Fridays gang steals some diamonds.  Mike Epps is not Chris Tucker no matter how hard he tries to be.  His constant whinning is enough to ride my last nerve.  Plus, everything about the movie is just campy and just wholly unbelieveable that I don't know where to begin.  Whatever you do don't buy or rent this garbage-wait to catch it on TBS or something
Did not work. The ones that are posted twice do not work. If they are posted once, you can try to download it, but it might not work. The video only worked for about a minute. Shame, since I really like this show and I wanted Amazon Unbox to be cool. The one cent CSI works, go download tha
clint runs afowl of the cold war again. maybe it's because he is such a stright shooter(pun ment) or something but clint doesn't do cold war thrillers very well(remember firefox). while well directed and acted this spy thriller is dead most of the way through and while the climbing scenes are good they don't cover up the fact that it was a good book that doesn't watch as good as it read.some may like it but i found it to be a let down
John Travolta and Samuel L. Jackson, again... So the first thing you need to know about this movie is that it sucks. It really does. I'm not sure who their military consultant was, but if Samuel L. has Specialist pins on his collars, you don't call him Sargeant. Women aren't allowed in the Rangers (Nunez), not my rules ladies, Colonel Styles looks a little young to be a colonel (even for the Army), the Army doesn't issue tiger stripe BDU's (Mueller), the list goes on and on. This may not seem that important, but if you're gonna make a movie about the Army, you could at least get some very BASIC (soory, could't resist) things correct.Yes, it's true that there are many twists and turns in this 'plot', but all that really means, at least in this case, is that they can multiply a weak and thin screenplay. Hey, if we tell the same story a couple different ways, it makes the story really interesting, right? Not so much. Oh, and that scene where "Specialist" West is standing on top of that shack with his pancho blowing like a villains cape? Wow, who decided that was a good idea? I don't want to ruin the ending for you, because there's no point in even seeing this movie, and anyone with enough brain cells to operate the remote will figure out the 'finale' long before it makes its belated arrival. By the way, how do you follow someone in an Army Humvee w/out them knowing? Seriously. Please spend these 90 or minutes talking with your kid's, reading a book, excercising, writing a review... I dunno, something worthy of your precious time. You've been warned.By the way, Connie Nielsen looks hot w/ short red hair
Hugely Disappointing. Expecting sexy camp in the tradition of "Beyond Valley of the Dolls" I was really looking forward to seeing this film. Instead I struggled through this tedious, repetitive, and confusing mess of a film. I respect what the director was trying to create, but the end product is nearly unwatchable. It's starts out so well too.... "I tried not to remember why I buried my trumpet." ...but then it quickly dives into a psychosexual pseudo-sado-vampire ghost story that isn't the least bit sexy or interesting. I know this film has a sizeable cult following. It is pretty to look at (sometimes when it isn't in grainy slow-motion) but I just couldn't make it through. Maybe it's worth a look, but I personally wish I had rented it
didn't recieve it. I never recieved this item.  If you could look into it for me  I would like to have it thoug
Creaky. Charles Laughton plays the rotund monarch in a role that was highly praised. But it's lumbering and creaky, with heavy-handed theatrics, typical of the early talky era. I found watching this picture very heavy going
Not Happy. I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?
Bad!. I saw Tarzan the Ape Man on HBO or Cinemax when I was a teenager and it is one of the worst movies I have ever seen. It was stupid and had no plot
Not Really An Apt Title. I remember managing to find a drive-in that was showing the first run ECEG; and I remember my girlfriend not saying a word while we watched. She was too kind. In retrospect, it was so totally wrong for the time that one almost has to respect it. I say almost. It was a numbing experience then and the most one can say for it now is: At least the Elvis impersonators will leave it alone. The story is weak, the co-stars are painful, and the soundtrack so bad, the weakest selling record of Elvis' career managed to kill of the Extended Playing record. But , for all that, it is Elvis, and the true beliver will find something in it worth carrying away. Its just best watched alone.
Same Thing. The Dane Cook episode is the same one that it on his "Harmful If Swallowed" c.d. The c.d. also has the uncensored version of this routine that is over 1 hour long. The one star rating is not based on the content. It is based upon Amazon not sharing this fact with customers
GARBAGE. This movie was really a waste of money. the writing the directin are all very bad. it is also very low budget which i thought would increase the realness but i was wrong safe your money and keep searchin
UNBOX IS TERRIBLE!. If you've ordered from Unbox before, maybe you've had better luck, but mine has apparently run out. I am missing the last 15-20 minutes of the film. I will NEVER download from Unbox again- the film is locked and can't be burned by most programs, the one that did for me produced an incompatible DVD. This service is piss poor, Amazon. I'm very disappointed.
Not Happy. I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?
Profoundly unfunny and completely unwatchable film. Completey and utterly unfunny performances by Oldman and Roth. Stoppard may be a brilliant playwright but a filmmaker he is not, having botched a great potential for his play on the big screen. We get instead a literal and utterly uncinematic treatment of his much-touted play. Watching the first fifteen minutes of "heads, heads, heads, heads, heads, heads, heads, heads, heads," is colossal torture, like status elipticus. It's suited to the stage maybe but can never play well on the big screen. Having hopes it might pick up, that was dashed as the entire film seem to lack any momentum or any type of cinematic sensibility whatsoever. A classic blunder of failing to recognize two different mediums. Don't take my word for it, watch it yourself and see.
Shoudl be 0 stars... There is a reason there are 247 used ones of this book.We used this book in for our men's study group and every one of the men, and every one of the wives agreed, that this was a worthless book.  It was written for a 1950's wife that no longer exists.Now 3 truly wonderful books to help you with your wife are:Discovering the Mind of a Woman by Ken NairIf Only He Knew by Gary SmalleyTogether Forever: How to Overcome Problems and Rekindle the Love in Your Marriageby Anne Kristin CarrollThey are truly inspirational as to how to be a good husband
Nothing to write home about. The review on the cover of the DVD reads "A snappy, sexy thriller..." I must disagree. This was the most unsexy, and unthrilling movie I've seen in a long time. In my opinion Ashley Judd doses not fit this roll, it's almost comedic.Twisted is poorly written and losely held to gether by okay acting. Seems the actors were doing the best they could with what they had. I have no doubt the producers and director felt the story had potential but they failed to realize that with this production.The film's ending holds an interesting twist but too many lose ends are left to the viewers imagination. My vote? Just okay, nothing to write home about
Attempts To Be Provokative, Turns Out Ultra-Violent Gore. The ideas behind 15 minutes aren't bad at all. Take one Robert DeNiro, put him in New York, mix him with some American-dream hunting Eastern Europeans on a killing spree, and try to provoke some emotions, and have a sly dig at the American justice system. Lets see...nothing happened...only repulse.If, like everyone else, you plan on watching this film because DeNiro is in it, you will be dissapointed. He puts in a tired performance, almost as if he knows the film is a load of B.S. The attempt to be hard-hitting goes horribly wrong, instead it's just repulsive over the top violence, and its pointless...naked prostitute gets hacked to pieces, why? There are ways to create provoking films with such violence but they have to have meaning, such as 8mm (the horrible subject of snuff movies, hard-hitting meaningfull film), 15 minutes is far from meaningfull. We all know there are some deranged psychopaths out there doing just that, but when converting it to a film, it needs a deeper meaning, otherwise it turns into melodramatic Hollywood [...].If you like brain-dead gore and violence, lack of plot and cringing melodrama. Go ahead
Wonderful program, but flawed files... Okay, so to catch up on this exciting new series, I decided to try this revolutionary downloading program - Amazon Unbox!  I selected the first 10 episodes and hit Purchase.  Minutes later, I was watching the first episode, it came quickly, sounded great, and looked wonderful... however the second one was missing a few minutes at the end.  Forgiveable, until... whole episodes starting arriving incomplete or had missing video, making it incredibly frustrating and disappointing.But, this IS a good concept... unfortunately, Amazon has yet to verify all their own files for both audio and picture quality!  So, until the issue is fixed and paying customers recieve completed files or refunds... DO NOT try and download Season 1, Episodes 2, 4, 5, 6, and 7!!!  1, 3, 8, 9, and 10 were the only ones that were 100% complete for me
Great for the Zen Vision. At first I didn't realize that you have to use Amazon's software to load onto the Zen.  Once I figured that out (actually my husband figured that out) the show played perfectly and it was very easy to do.  I wasn't able to edit the stars.  If I could I would give this 5 stars.  If you have tried some other sites for the Zen, they are much more difficult to use. Amazon's Unbox is great for the Zen
Another uninspired sequel. Chon Wang (Jackie Chan) and Roy O'Bannon (Luke Wilson) reunite to recover the Imperial Seal of China and avenge the death of Chon's father, the Keeper of the Seal.  They are joined by Chon's sister, the beautiful and equally dangerous Lin (Fann Wong).  The chemistry of Wilson and Chan is as delightful as ever, but that (and the beautiful and talented Wong) is about the only reason to watch this tired comedy.  Even the action scenes are uninspired.  A disappointment
2 out of 10. The Pick-up Artist is a dangerously bad film. There is absolutely no chemistry between Robert Downey and Molly Ringwald. Molly Ringwald may have been of the most iconic 1980's female actresses, and she certainly proves her worth here. Ringwald looks too much of a virgin to me when her character wasn't supposed to be. That marks the moment when the film had lost its believably element. The real joke in this film has to be Robert Downey. His acting is insanely moronic. I often have to wonder if he wears a lipstick. I am pretty sure Robert Downey can make a great drag queen if he chose to. From the start to the end, I was annoyed. I couldn't see how Dennis Hopper and Danny Aiello got interested in this film and lend their hands in it. Harvey Keitel gives a fair performance, but I believe he is much tougher than that. Comparing Harvey Keitel's performance in Bad Lieutenant, Reservoir Dogs, and Mean Streets to The Pick-up Artist, it is enough to make an apparent observation that Harvey Keitel should have applied his talents to a more different film than this. A smaller film that he did rightfully apply his talent was Rising Sun, and he pulled that one off better than he did in this film. Why did they have to call it The Pick-up Artist? Could they give the movie a better title such as The Player
What's up with that?. I wish I had read the other reviews first.  Though the quality of the episode and the video are top notch, the episode cuts off after 22 minutes.  Obviously, I already know the ending of "The Black Death", but I still wanted to see the full show
Missing episodes. This series is being sold with missing episodes, like many others here in Unbox. Do they think their customers are so dumb? Would you buy a DVD series with a missing DVD? What sense does this make? What a disappointment this service is..
Unforgettable (Unfortunately). This movie survives in my memory for over 40 years as one of the most boring stupid excuses for a comedy ever made.  I use it as a benchmark to compare all other really bad comedies.  They are either worse than this one (rare) or better than this one. As an example: Buffalo '66 is worse.  If you watch both in the same day, you will surely die
Texas Chainsaw Crapsacre. This movie is far from being anything great. Some of the characters don't make any sense what so ever with the original cast. Leatherface's role has been mocked. People spend too much time focusing on the other people rather than build up Leatherface. The first TCM is a classic. And the second TCM is great as well. But Leatherface: TCM III, The Next Generation, and the TCM remake have all made the Texas Chainsaw Massacre franchise a laughing stock. I really hate new directors coming into the horror scene just to mess it up. The only thing they do these days is make crappy remakes and fill horror movies up with CGI. Enough is enough.
Star Trek:  City on the Edge of Forever. My favorite show of the Trek series but there's no way I'd buy another individual program from Amazon.  It will ONLY play on their downloaded player ...won't burn to DVD so can't play it on my television.  Don't bother buying this ...just go for the Trek collection on DVD
Kundera was right to object. The movie doesn't at all reflect the original book story in its core concept. If I didn't read the book before I wouldn't be able to guess what is the movie trying to explain. I doubt anybody, based on the movie only, would be able to understand what happend in 1968 in the Czech republic and what was the consequence for the entire society
Don't buy this title!!. This title is the bootleg title for a film called the The Ratings Game. I'm no sure why Amazon is selling this on their web site.The quality of this DVD is terrible, I was suspicious when I got it. The DVD caseand the DVD itself look like they were home made.Having said all this, knockoff or not this is a bad film with a lot of big names in it.It's like they were trying to make something campy and failed big time. I expected more of Danny DeVito.
Supercop. The movie is ok but it is a superior film in Cantonese. The dubbed English is awkward and detracts from the film. I find the &quot;dubbing&quot; very annoying and would prefer the vintage Hong Kong Jackie Chan films marketed in the US be provided in the original language. Argggh
Poor Quality. I'm not going to waste a bunch of my time or yours giving a personally oppinionated review of the movie plot. It's redundant and unnecessary, and whether someone likes the story or not is irrelavent. Only you can form an opinion of whether you like it or not by watching it yourself. Double that with the fact that most movies hardly ever line up with the book that's based on and well...My gripe is the transition from putting the movie in it's original format onto DVD was bad. The soundtrack is about 1/2 to 1 second off from the video part of film, therefore the voices don't sync up with the lip movement.
This is supposed to be a comedy, but where's the proof?. This isn't funny. It isn't well directed or scripted. Perhaps it could have been great, if it had had a decent scriptwriter or director, but it didn't, so it turned out mediocre at best. Unfortunately, I believed all the hype on this website and bought a copy of this for my boyfriend and I to watch. I told my boyfriend that according to most of the reviews I'd read, this was going to be a brilliant, hilarious cult classic. But now that we've watched it, he and I both know better. We know it's dreadful, and I can only imagine all the nice things I'm going to have to do for him to make up for my expecting him to sit through this tedious monstrosity. The only highlight for us was a spirited argument he and I got into halfway through the movie about where we'd seen one of the actors in the movie before. I'm pleased to say I won the argument. That was pretty much the only highlight of the movie for me.In my opinion this is not a 'hilarious cult classic' as others so often describe it. I don't know how drunk I'd have to be to agree with that assessment of the movie, or to find it even a little bit funny, but I suspect I would have to get smashed enough that I'd need a stomach pump afterwards.If you want to see a genuinly hilarious cult sci-fi classic, pick up a copy of Flash Gordon. That has great actors, great sets, wonderfully campy scripts, brilliant humour, and a soundtrack by Queen. Furthermore, it has stood the test of time and is still great today, unlike 'The Ice Pirates', which has dated REALLY badly.Better yet, get hold of some 'Red Dwarf' dvds...seriously, Red Dwarf is sci fi humour at its BEST! It's so good, it will spoil you for other sci fi comedies
Looks like a routine television program. I am amazed and mystified that most of the reviewers herein found the movie to be excellent!! As for me, I made it about thirty minutes into the film before turning it off in dismay. The fault in order of importance: poor screenplay, poor cinematography and poor performance by Pacino, who seems to be vying for the most over-the-top performance. The film was absurd in many ways from the outset: the pans from star to star lasting just short of giving the viewer any purpose for any of the fast camera pans. Close-up after close-up conveying no meaning, Pacino overacting like Jack Palance in one of his not-so-famous European pieces of tripe from the sixties and seventies, an utterly dumb plot with Pacino and company proving at the beginning that they are bumbling cops.First example, they chase the bad guy to a cabin which is on stilts or something like that; then, instead of staying on the ground below and smoking the bad guy out or something at least tactically sound, they storm the stairs and Pacino stands right in front of the door yelling "Police, you're under arrest."They kick in the front door and find that the culprit has escaped through an underground water source. Of course, Pacino follows and dives right into the underwater stream, having absolutely no idea where the guy is or if there are boobytraps of some sort.Cut to Pacino running around in nearly zero visibility fog, glimpsing the guy for a second or two before losing him in the fog. Stumbling around further, Pacino is obviously disoriented until a shot is fired at him from, we must assume, his quarry. Did the screen writer forget that Pacino's colleagues are also supposedly chasing the culprit, too?Inevitably and apparently not, because Pacino spots a figure in the fog and plugs him. As I watched this scene unfold, I became thoroughly disheartened when it becomes clear what I knew already, that Pacino has fired on and killed his partner. It was then that I decided that I had had enough.By the way, the European version, with Stellan Skarsgaard is infinitely superior. Don't waste your money or on-line rental queue on this Hollywood drivel. Ditto for the other Pacino junk I rented at the same time, The Recruit, which I could only stand for about a half hour too
Pretty Bad. Another movie using actresses seemingly straight out of soft porn. It's fun to watch them die onscreen sure, but it's redundant. I'm not surprised to read it's by the Shark Attack people. They're terrible too, but of course if they make a #4, I will rent it knowing it will be stupid. &lt;sigh&gt
One step above truly hideous. I am a Jane Austen fan. I love Pride and Prejudice and there are three very good to marvelous adaptations of that great novel. However, Mansfield Park is Jane Austen's most complex and serious novel, and on the whole it is my favorite. Fanny Price is the most difficult of the Jane Austen heroines, not the wittiest or most beautiful, but the one who knows the difference between right and wrong. She is mentored by her uncle, the righteous and honorable [and I don't use the terms loosely] Sir Thomas Bertram. Somehow, the adaptation of this great novel has twisted Sir Thomas into a sadistic, sexual pervert. Moreover, Fanny is constantly babbling to us in Jane Austen quips that are not part of this novel. They simply missed the point of the book.The acting is okay. The settings are okay. The directing is sad. But the sense of disappointment and betrayal by perverting the essential theme of the book has left a very sour taste
Widescreen Or HD Blueray ?. i have to say i love this movie very well done.but after all these years of it's release why? has it not been put in widescreen format or updated on HD or Blueray or a new 2 disc DVD set the laser dics version is in widescreen format someone needs to get this out in the newer formats so we can really injoy this movie..
Bedlam. The bedlams that greet the current Republican Administration each morning for USA `involvement in Iraq' have actually relegated this DVD to second-rate.It is obvious that the producers of this so called `Documentary' are more likely to be fractious to Mr. Bush in particular than accommodating to the American public at large.It is also obvious that Mr Bush is not the type of person to succumb to self-pity.Mr Moore must be happier receiving ready cash from the other camp though.In the meantime I can still see very long queues moving slowly waiting for the full truth behind 9/11 to unfold.
Tough going. Reading this novel was slow going.  As a guy, I found the lack of action stultifying, and the flashes of humor were too quaint for me to derive any pleasure from them.  The answer to the book's primary riddle--who shall Emma marry?--becomes obvious early on, and everything else is just a tedious pairing off until that riddle is expressly answered.  There's a bit of local and historical color, but rarely does the narrative rise above the description of, say, a summer outing.  Not one of Jane Austen's best
These Video Game Adaptations need to be taken more seriously. To be honest, I never really had much fate in Video game adaptations. Most of them in the past have failed miserably. Here, Resident Evil Apocalyse has made it even worse. A continuation from the first so-so Resident evil film. Umberella have decided to re-open the Hive, unknowingly letting the T-Virus out throughout the city, turning the people of Racoon city into zombies. Firsts of all, I love the Resident Evil video games( especially Resident Evil 4 ). Its what gave me encouragment to see this film. Before I actually saw this film I was thinking that this might be in some way decent. To be honest, it didnt even seem in anyway related to the Resident Evil series.When it comes to bringing these video games to the big screen you need to ask yourself, What makes the actuall game itself such a success? If you take Silent Hill for instance. Probably one of the few video game adaptations that was an actuall success. They have really taken the Silent Hill video game features into perspective and shown us how this is actually done. It actually felt like Silent Hill. But in this case, it looks like the Resident Evil video games where just thrown aside. There is absolutely nothing meaningful from the video games that was put into this film and absolutely nothing atmospheric about it that even makes it feel like Resident Evil environment. And the atmospheric soundtrack from the video games have been replaced by Heavy Metal music. It felt like an absolute joke. It seems that they didnt even take the Resident Evil video games into consideration and without it, this film lost all its perspectives and has no meaning for the Resident Evil title. This is just a pointless action sci-fi. Film makers really need to take these video game adaptions more seriously. This is an insult to the Resident Evil video game series
Poor support. This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet
Warning Incomplete Episode!!!. The episodes in this series have an average running time of 50 minutes. This one happens to be only 18 minutes. This mean sthat the file abruptly stops right in the middle. Even though it only cost me $2 I still got jipped.  Let's hope Amazon can iron out these kinds of problems before they get this service farther underway. Be careful enough to sheck the running times to be sure they seem accurate before you buy them
Not Appropriate for Children!. I agree with Jane!  I bought this video for my four year old son because he's a Spider-man fanatic. Little did I know that this series is not meant for children. When we started to watch with him, I couldn't believe what I was hearing so I flipped the box over to find the rating (never dreaming there was one since I bought this in a toy store right next to a stack of Teletubbie videos!) There is a PGV rating on the back for violence but they don't tell you about the adult language as well as the sexual references. Needless to say we shut it off and tried to distract him with a more appropriate video for his age. I don't know if I'd let my 16 year old watch this
Didn't work. I downloaded the player and this episode as part of a promotion that gave a free episode. Not only did I get charged, but when I cancelled the download to contact about the charge - I was told I had to finish downloading before they could refund. Once it finished downloading, it didn't play anyway. I gave up.
Overproduced and pointless. Shakespeare's play already contains plenty of time-shifts.  Ancient Athens meets fairlyland,  which in turn meets Elizabethan tradespeople-turned-thespians...adding layers of 19th century Italy to the mix,  and bicycles,  and windeup gramophones, and a repetitive recycling of Italian opera's greatest hits on the soundtrack,  just muddies things up.  Lots of money went into this production,  and it does have some nice visuals.  But there is no genuine artistic vision here.  Less would have been more.  The two stars are for the director's concept,  not for author William S., whose best lines are just about impossible to ruin
If you love the book, you'll hate the video. This video is a terrible adaptation of a wonderful book.  All the charcters and their relationships are distorted from the original.  This is done by the same team that animated &quot;the Grinch Who Stole Christmas&quot; -- which is wonderful -- but they strayed far afield from  the original story line this time.  This is apparently to accommodate a few  forgettable Allan Sherman tunes, which unlike the songs from Grinch, take  away from the story rather than improving it.  The second video, if  possible, is even worse.  These 60's revisionist versions of children's  classics should not have been resurrected.  Thumbs down
DVD buyer beware. Viewers hoping to see the controversial &quot;pistol&quot; scene, in which McGillis's character is forced by her jealous husband to open her legs for his gun will be disappointed to find that it has been cut from the R-rated DVD version.  For that, you'll apparently have to stick with the unrated VHS tape.  Other than that, the movie is a decent if unspectacular B thriller, and the digital transfer is pretty good
Low Budget. The plot and its development are extremely weak.  Acting is marginal and special effects are questionable.  What can I say, I love SciFi, have a thing about time travel flicks and enjoy punishing myself with B rated SciFi movies.  If you're looking for quality entertainment, then this is not the choice for you.  If you're a nut about SciFi, go for it Bro
"Wild Orchid " please more like "Withered Orchid". After Two Moon Junction and 91/2 Weeks I expected a lot when I watched Wild Orchid last night. Unfortunately I was extremely disappointed. I don't mean to imply the movie is totally awful or the worst movie ever made. It's not. But the movie had nothing unique about it at all and lacked a certain something. The expression "When you got it you got it" holds true to movies and "Wild Orchid" didn't have it.It's not Mickey Rourke or Carre Otis fault. Their both attractive people who seemed to try hard with the material on hand. But the material just wasn't interesting. It lacked subtlety. The worst part of the film is the horrid, trite dialogue; 'I'm afraid if I touch you you'll disappear', 'If you want me, come and hold me right now'; you've *got* to be kidding me!! Zalman King should learn to quit while he's ahead (take a look at the Red Shoe Diaries, for example: the same story recycled multiple times, shamelessly using David Duchovney to draw viewers because it wouldn't attract a single one without him (or, at least none out of high school and not desperately looking for some late-night nudity...)This film is the same, it uses 9 1/2 Weeks, and Mickey Rourke, to draw viewers even though it can't stand on its own feet because it's so unoriginal and poorly written...never mind the acting (what was Bruce Greenwood *thinking*???)Wild Orchid held neither the fascinating complexities and characters of "91/2 Weeks" or the dreamlike imagery and compelling mystery of "Two Moon Junction." It was just sex. It held none of the sensuality of the above mentioned. It's too bad because there was a lot of potential there. It was very much a letdown, in this case what you see is ultimately exactly what you'll get. Just don't expect anything more then that, again I wish this movie had been made differently, the main word that comes to mind when viewing wild orchid is "typical".
Wonderful program, but flawed files... Okay, so to catch up on this exciting new series, I decided to try this revolutionary downloading program - Amazon Unbox!  I selected the first 10 episodes and hit Purchase.  Minutes later, I was watching the first episode, it came quickly, sounded great, and looked wonderful... however the second one was missing a few minutes at the end.  Forgiveable, until... whole episodes starting arriving incomplete or had missing video, making it incredibly frustrating and disappointing.But, this IS a good concept... unfortunately, Amazon has yet to verify all their own files for both audio and picture quality!  So, until the issue is fixed and paying customers recieve completed files or refunds... DO NOT try and download Season 1, Episodes 2, 4, 5, 6, and 7!!!  1, 3, 8, 9, and 10 were the only ones that were 100% complete for me
not entertaining. First let me say that i am a composer and die hard musician. i just watched this movie to learn what i could about this supposed genius, and i could barely keep from turning it off, actually, i did turn it off. quite unattractive really. turns out Beethoven was an insane jerk and his lifestlye was not intersting to me at all. he may have been a great musician, but that is not really the focus of this movie. in fact, there is no focus in this movie, except that he was a jerk.If you want to watch a great movie about a great man, I suggest the "The Endurance". Enrest Shackleton will make you want to punch people like this Beethoven character.  It will blow you away.
DUPED!. Duped, duped, duped! I kept readin' stuff about 'you'll like this, if you're into Doc Savage' - well, I like Doc Savage and was NOT into this. It was excruciatingly DULL and probably the hardest film I've ever made myself sit through to get my moneys worth. And, personally, if it had just come on TV and I'd never even heard of it.... I truly doubt I would have made a SINGLE Doc Savage connection. DUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUPED!!!!!!!!!!!
maybe a good film but not a true story - warning, spoilers!. There are so many reviews saying this is a true story I have to point out that while the war and the deployment were real (obviously), about everything else is dramatized (including the mission objectives: SCUD hunting on foot, which is a joke to anyone who knows how wars are fought today). McNab has essentially written Tom Clancy genre fiction. The book Bravo Two Zero differs in details with another book written by a second member of the patrol, Chris Ryan, called The One That Got Away. However, both are convincingly debunked by a third SAS memeber in a book called The Real Bravo Two Zero, also available on Amazon, though only the UK Amazon site (which you can still order from in the US). In it, an SAS member who can actually speak Arabic retraces the patrol using both books as guides and talks to all the people McNab and Ryan supposedly killed and gets their side of the story. Most importantly, he manages to restore, without a doubt, the reputation of Vince Phillips, blamed by Ryan for getting the patrol discovered by the Iraqis and a couple members eventually killed. Contrary to what you may expect, I would recommend seeing this, in fact I recommend getting and comparing all three books: B20, The One That Got Away, and The Real B20
Don't let go of your old copy, this is a mixed blessing. 1 star is for the DVD, 5 stars for the movie.  I don't need to say anything about the film; those familiar with Bava's work know this is among his masterpieces.  I'm writing this review to clear up some things about this new "Unslashed" edition.  On the positive side, this version is Anamorphic widescreen and it does present noticeably more picture information on the right and left sides of the frame (the old VCI version was leterboxed a 1.66:1, where as this one is 16 x 9). Now the bad news.  The color and contrast have been boosted/altered to the point that the image appears blurrier, grainier and more damaged than the previous version.  Also, the interior sets (especially in the fashion house) have a putrid yellow/green hue to them not present in the old version.  The soundtrack is horribly remixed, making the dialogue sound like it was recorded in a tin can and it pops quite a bit through the opening of the film.  The French and Italian audio channels are reversed.  None of these audio problems are present on the old version by the way.  To top it off, the dvd menus are gaudy and offputting, trying to make this seem like a bloody slasher pic.  In summution, the extra picture information just doesn't outweigh all of the drawbacks of this edition.  My advice is to hold on to your old release until something better comes along.  Thanks for reading.  -JWH
Poor support. This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet
ehhh, so-so. it's a so-so film with Rourke in the IRA. Some good stuff. Look for Anthony(Stewart Head) as Rupert(note: Anthony Stewart Head portraits another Rupert...Rupert Giles on the TV show Buffy The Vampire Slayer)so, now you know. but this one is so-so like I sai
No need to Suicide. I get the story line but 5 grown women need to suicide!?  The one dare to have a boyfriend and not go home for the night.  Why would that kind of free sprite would kill herself!?!?  It is not matching the character
WARNING: Wrong Episode!. This item is supposedly titled "UFOs: The First Encounters." It is, however, an episode about reincarnation. It is incorrectly labeled. DO NOT PURCHASE unless you are looking for an episode on reincarnation
Whip, Gun and Typewriter. Having read all these reviews presently on line, it was not hard to find a fair number with which I can agree that this is an abysmal film, even despite the surprisingly impressive physical production values, in the attention to detail that was taken to recreate the physical appearance of the death camp at Auschwitz-Birkenau.  Too bad a director with a script telling the truth about the place wasn't there on the set with film and crew to take advantage of it.Many an astutely observed fault has come to be mentioned in a good number of these reviews, as per the really tacky concept of the screenplay itself, the almost adolescent quality to the writer/director's touch; the lack of content in dialogue, the resulting shallowness of characterization for the actors' roles. All of that was well observed, and yet what amounts to the worst fault of all remains without mention, the one thing I had hoped to find which would have obviated any necessity of adding one more, regrettably lengthy review to a long list of them.Okay, so, am I the only one among the whole lot of us here who comes into it sickened by the violent vandalism that has been wreaked  upon the historical record of the actual event by this writer/director? Artistic license is one thing but willful distortion of the public knowledge to a purpose of questionable motivation is quite another.If a viewer of this film is familiar with only so much as what can be learned about the revolt of October 7, 1944 from the official website of the Auschwitz Museum at Auschwitz (see the article "Resistance Movement at KL Auschwitz-Berkenau", a pdf file), then one fundamental fact will be known: that the only non-Jewish Poles who were in any way associated with the sonderkommando, were there exclusively in the capacity of kapos, not as crematorium workers; they were the head-bashing S.S. appointed guards (often imported from Polish prisons) whose duties consisted strictly in serving as foreman and cop, to keep the death machine running smoothly and well greased on the blood of Jewish worker and Jewish victim, alike.Well might one inquire into exactly what is being served by Tim Blake Nelson's intent of assigning every sympathetic role in his script to either a Gentile Pole or the Nazi SS--Oberscharfuhrer (Keitel) who has to stay drunk to do what the Jews are doing comparatively sober? So you have these purely mythical Gentile Polish workers of the sonderkommando who are by far, moral superiors to the Jews (typified by the Buscemi character) who soon reveal themselves to be everything that the Keitel character in his Jew-hatred, only lately gained, has to say of them.And what had this SS-Oberscharfuhrer Eric Muhsfeldt to say, but such things as would be based on strict observation, since having seen now how low a Jew can really go, doing to their fellow Jews, what they would so totally not want done unto them. Yet what the Harvey Keitel character doesn't observe, and what Tim Blake Allen's script does not observe is that these Jews under his whip and gun (and/or typewriter) are doing only the same as this Oberscharfuhrer is doing under nowhere near the force of coercion; not to the Jews alone, but as the SS enforcement arm of the Gestapo, to any decent or dissident German, to the whole world, as a cog in the wheel of the greater Reich's death machine.And so the Keitel character fancies himself to be shocked to learn that Jews, just like any German such as himself, can knuckle under and bow, tremble in fear under the marching boots of tyranny, to the surrender of every shred of human decency for sake of howling "Sieg Heil!" safely going with the flow of society; how shocked he pretends himself to be to discover that Jews are no better than he, that given the worst of circumstances, they like he should become killers, money-grubbing wheeler-dealers showing themselves to be by turns, brutal or calculating murderers--traitors to their own kind.But this is not, alas, what is to be gleaned from the script of Tim Blake Nelson's filthy little movie. Quite to the contrary, if a person is not aware of what actually did occur, historically, as from a book like Filip Muller's "Eyewitness Auschwitz: Three Years in the Gas Chambers", then you well might wind up pinning five Amazon stars on the guy with the thought well implanted, most subliminally, in mind that SS-Oberscharfuhrer Eric Muhsfeldt didn't really have it all so wrong, after all.It's not hard to be tricked. See the fathers and mothers, brothers and sisters of Mozart, Goethe and Schiller, circa 1933.
a classics illustrated comic book would give you a better impression of tolstoy. garbo is radiant but there is no other reason to watch this highly abridged telling of tolstoys novel. while im used to hollywood (by necessityt) removing whole sections of a loooong book, this is incomprehensible to anyone who hasnt some previous acquaintance with the story. even the usually reliable fredric march and basil rathbone (one of the greatest hams ever) cant save it.
Wish they'd make a better version!. I am a teacher who reads this book to my class every year.  I show the movie and this is a terrible version.  They leave out almost the whole story, and change the rest.  It is such a great book and I think they could have done a better job on the video.  I am always hoping a newer and better version is made
This is Horrible. I love the Avatar and I was so thrilled that amazon allows people to download it except the only problem is I've been trying for the past days and darn it all, it's not working!!! It's not as if I'm downloading it for free. I am willing to pay and yet it just wouldn't go through!!! I think it's better to just buy the dvds...I think it's absolutely horrible to tease customers like that..
Not Happy. I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?
Why the Charge. Curious as to why Amazon would charge for this content when CBS offers it for free on the official Survivor Website.  Yeah, at the CBS site you have sit through 4 commercials, but it is worth it to not have to download any extra programs
Embarrasing to watch. I have to disagree with the reviews above and say that I watched this movie on dvd having watched it as a kid twenty years ago. Unfortunately I couldn't find anything about this film I remember enjoying. It's a cross between The Blob, The Thing and a really crap detective movie. Moriarty's character is pretty smooth but the film culminates in a farce reminicent of an 80's kiddy movie. This film is definetly not for intelligent adults and you'll lose interest halfway through I guarantee it. No suspense, few laughs, and way to hokey to watch twice. If you love this movie you need to get out more.
WARNING: Wrong Episode!. This item is supposedly titled "UFOs: The First Encounters." It is, however, an episode about reincarnation. It is incorrectly labeled. DO NOT PURCHASE unless you are looking for an episode on reincarnation
Nothing wrong with movie, but DVD fails. This has always been a favorite film of mine.  The story is old-fashioned yet fun and the cast is divine.  Despite having the VHS, I wanted more and ordered the DVD.Beware!  This DVD claims on its packaging to have Closed Captioning, but it does NOT!!  No subtitles in any language,  no line 21 captioning.Nor does it have anything else.  "Interactive Menus" means scene selections.  This plain vanilla release doesn't even have a trailer. This film and cast deserves better and I see no reason Lion's Gate reissued this DVD with nothing added.Since I bought it online, I can't return it and neither Lion's Gate nor Artisan will take it back despite the error in labeling and false advertising which is not the fault of the people I bought it from
Movie is great, but Unbox is uncooked. Movie got 2/3 through and just quit. No problem, this is Windows right? Just reboot and start where you left off. Only for whatever reason I can't restart this movie from anywhere but the beginning. I'm not going to watch this moving over from the beginning just to see if it fails in the same place again. Only a couple bucks, but definitely not worth it
Should not have had the same title as original. When I heard that Timecop had a sequl coming out I couldnt wait to see it. Then I found out it wasnt John Claude Vanne Damme.Why bother making a sequl with no returning cast members? Especially the star. Vanne Damme is replaced by Jason Scott Lee (Jungle book) as the hero who travels through time to prposly change things around here and there. I saw reveiwa that this was a movie for sci fi geeks to enjoy. I didnt see much on the sci fi side apart from time travel, but it makes me wonder why they didnt just name it something else and make a seperate movie instead of calling it a second installment to a great movie
Unboxed CSI:Miami is Defective by Design. Using this product requires that you agree to turn over the keys to your computer. If you refuse an upgrade, Amazon can delete all of your previous purchases without giving you a refund.This is a quote from Cory Doctorow, who wrote about the Terms of Service for Amazon Unbox (Amazon Unbox to customers: Eat !@#$ and die):Amazon says it respects your privacy, but this clause tells the real story. Click "I agree" and you've just signed away permission for Amazon to wiretap all of your viewing habits, and to search your entire hard drive continuously and report back on all the software you've installed. The entertainment industry can produce a blacklist of legal software that it just doesn't care for -- say, software that lets you take screenshots, or screen-movies -- and refuse to allow your movies to run if you've installed it. In other words, this clause lets Hollywood specify how you must configure your PC.Section 3c. Removal of Software. If you uninstall or otherwise remove the Software, your ability to view all Digital Content you have downloaded to the Authorized Device will immediately and automatically terminate and we reserve the right to delete all Digital Content from that Authorized Device without notice to you.Surprise! If you delete our software, we delete your movies! Imagine if selling your old DVD player gave Jack Valenti permission to come over to your house and take away all your DVDs, too
Poor support. This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet
What about the missing episodes. Why should one buy this series? What about the missing episodes? Are they going to be added later, or this is it? I cannot believe this. Would you buy a bicycle with a missing wheel? Or a keyboard without the C and R keys? I'd like Amazon to explain its customers what it plans to do..
THERE'S ALWAYS JAWS. With the exception of JAWS and possibly DEEP BLUE SEA, you could take all these shark attack movies and lump them together; just change the actors, sometimes the location, but you end up with the same thing:  poor special effects, so-so acting and some occasional laughs and/or thrills.  This entry like the other two SHARK ATTACK movies is generic fluff, with little novelty or variety to distinguish it.  The cast of Thorsten Kaye (as the studly hero), Nikita Alger (the hot diver) and Daniel Alexander (the studly if obnoxious Steve Irwin clone) gamely tries to breathe life, but this is just another movie in which the shark should have eaten the whole bunch
Bad Language. I like Sam Elliott movies very much. This one was BAD!!! A lot of Bad Language. Every couple of words. It should be rated R. I think instead of PG
Bad Device. I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service
Take It Off The Rack And It's Wack Put It Back. I don't know what's up with all of these 4-5 star reviews. This movie was awful. There was no plot and the movie just seemed to drag. Not even the guest appearances by Afrika Bambataa, Melle Mel, and the Rock Steady Crew could save it. I couldn't wait for it to be over with. The "graffiti" throughout the movie was absolutely awful. Ramo and his girlfriend were too white to have a baby that dark with curly hair. Guy Davis was fine back then, but not anymore. Rae Dawn Chong was just annoying. This is one movie I never want to see again
So disappointed. I didn't think I'd miss the Christopher Reeve superman movies (one and two at least) and I really miss George Reeves now!!!!  Those black and white Superman shows were the best!what's her name was a HORRIBLE Lois Lane!!!!  The whole thing sucked - that was the second of two bad movies in a row!  I don't even care about the deleted scenes!  I want to sell it to someone else or at the very least - I'm going to give this one away!Brandon is cute enough but that uniform was soooooo dull!!I remember now that my brother told me I could wait for cable.  I got greedy - someone bought him a DVD that was coded for another country (there was russian writing on it) and it wouldn't work in my DVD player so I got Amazon happy and ordered it from a vendor in Brooklyn.I SHOULDA WAITED FOR CABLE
Contrary to most other reviews here, this is NOT a good film. I actually bought this film without seeing it first, so overwhelmingly positive were most of the other reviews found here.  After watching about the first 15 minutes, both my fiancee and I were asking ourselves, "How could ANYONE think this film is good?" This is one of the WORST films I've ever watched. The opening sequence is great, but the rest of film moved at a snail's pace and the plot was absolutely pointless.  Yes, Mulcahy's style is great as in his other films, but he should have become a Director of Photography, NOT a director of people.  While Dolph is as good as Dolph typically gets in a film, the other actors were grade Z cast-offs (although it was fun to see 'Psycho' from "Stripes" working again, as a security guard), who delivered their lines as if they had memorized them five minutes before shooting.  There is BARELY ANY ACTION during the remainder of the film, and the flashback sequences show a plot which is just as lame as the story currently unfolding.  The female lead was simply not believable as a sniper.  I don't know how anybody was able to receive financing to film so stupid a story, but I guess the direct-to-DVD trade is only interested in making a profit of $-- the same amount of money I paid for this film at Wal-mart.  I was very disappointed, because I was all set to see a great Lundgren movie -- and I'm even madder at all the Amazon.com reviewers who whet my appetite with their great reviews.  Jean-Claude Van Damme's newest flick, 'Derailed,' is even better than this piece of ... -- and I HATED that movie
MAXIMUM OVERDRIVE SEEMS STUCK IN REVERSE!. Among Stephen King's famous quotes is the one about why he doesn't direct his own films. His answer, not surprisingly, is, "Have you ever seen 'MAXIMUM OVERDRIVE'"? That just about says it all. The film has terrific material to work with, but it is static and very poorly executed. When I watch this film I always think, "Why didn't he do this or that?" and "Why are all the actors just standing around"? Fortunately, King is a better writer than director.IMPRESSIONS OF A YOUNGER KING FAN:My teenage daughter has read most of King's novels and agrees with King's assessment of this film. Her favorite film is "Creepshow" which I introduced to her when she was too young and scared her with the famous line, "Where's my cake?" That line still works.BETTER STEPHEN KING FILMS TO WATCH:To see better cinematic examples of Stephen King's storywriting, check out "The Shining", "Misery", "Creepshow" or "Carrie". None of these films was directed by King, but each film better represents King's work on the big screen. In "Creepshow" he even stars in one of the sequences "The Death of Jordy Verrill", and he does a respectable job of interpreting his own work.OUT OF FAIRNESS:There are worse films out there, but Stephen King did not write the novels or screenplays for them. This film, though not a good representation of King's work, is watchable for some and is not terrible. Unlike many of King's other films, this cannot be classified as good, however
Why has this been cut?. A totally awesome movie when it was first released, Hawaii is based on the James A. Michener bestseller. Even at three hours plus, it still had to leave a lot of Michener's novel untouched, but the basic idea is still there. The breathtaking cinematography adds to it, as does an outstanding Elmer Bernstein score. Then there's the acting by the stars, Max Von Sydow as the missionary who goes to Hawaii to preach to the natives, and brings his own brand of religion with him. Julie Anderws is outstanding in a rare non-singing role as his wife. Richard Harris is excellent as the sea captain who is amazed that the preacher's wife turns out to be an old girlfriend.The supporting characters are just as memoriable, with an actual islander playing the queen, and also an unknown playing Keoki.All in all, take Hawaii complete, or don't take it at all. Wait until the complete version comes out on DVD. I rated it one star because of the cuts, but it is a five-star movie in its complete version
Shark(from some other footage) Attack. Shark Attack is an interesting tale of deceit and stolen shark footage.  The movie features some computer harpooning police men and a crazy fisherman turned taxi driver.  The most interesting part is all the shark footage...  The best scene is after the bad guy/hotel owner is eaten, the shark clearly shown with a hook in it's mouth being pulled towards a boat.  This of course has nothing at all to do with the plot.  So where did this hook come from?  It was probably I was trying to stab in my eyes to stop the pain of this movie
Beware!. For any of you teachers out there who plan to watch this in your classroom with your students:  BEWARE!!  First of all, I've heard of taking "liberties" with a book but this is ridiculous! Sex between Farmer Jones and the neighbor farmer's wife is not in the book, but sure is shown in the movie.  I was shocked to see them rolling under the sheet as the headboard was "knocking against the wall". Utterly revolting and embarassing for me and my students.  I expect better from Hallmark Entertainment, Family Home Entertainment, etc...Second, there is a "no rating" statement on the DVD - I'm angry about this and don't appreciate being taken advantage of. There was no warning about adult situations. It's a shame that one can't be truthful in advertising.  Buyer Beware
WARNING: POSITIVELY DISGRACEFUL EDITION OF A 5-STAR FILM!!!. I just wanted to write this review and warn people to save their money. My friend bought this DVD (thank god it wasn't me!) and we were both disappointed to see that it was a horrible print, badly transferred. This DVD is disgraceful, but the movie itself gets 5 stars, of course. Just thought I'd let you know: AVOID THIS INCREDIBLY LOUSY DVD OF POLANSKI'S CLASSIC FILM AT ALL COSTS!!! If you decide to go against my advice and buy it, well... I tried to warn you! I don't usually write reviews of DVDs, preferring instead to focus on the film in question, but this was one instance where I felt it would be unfair not to say "Caveat emptor!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!" If you have a region-free DVD player, get the Anchor Bay UK version (available through amazon.co.uk) for a much nicer edition
Poor support. This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet
A BIG BOMB AND A STINKER FOR TOM CRUISE!. This movie is nearly 3 hours of hot air as bad as the movie The Hindenburg! If George C Scott saw this movie he would be rolling over in his grave! I yawned so much that I got a charley horse in my neck and nearly had a stroke from being bored to tears! Saddam Hussein should be strapped in a chair and be forced to watch this movie- maybe then would he confess of his atrocities that he committed! Stay as Far and Away from this movie as you can!
Great play, miscast Cyrano and a dull, flat English translation. "Cyrano" is one of the greatest verse plays ever written.Unfortunately Gerard Depardieu is no Cyrano.  He's a great, clumsy side of beef, not a shining flame encased in the middleweight body of Hercule Sevanien Cyrano de Bergerac.  With the best will in the world, his performance seldom achieves adequacy and never brilliance.The English translation was especially commissioned for this film.  It is undistinguished, prosy and dull.  It has little of the wit and less of the poetry of the old standard translation commissioned in the 1920s by the great American actor Walter Passmore.Get the Jose Ferrer version.  This one's a dog
Not worth the time  - save your money. This is a case where the book is wonderful and the movie is just pathetic.  I hadn't read the book before seeing the movie.  The film stunk.  A few years later, I read the book and was enchanted.  I did not make the connection that this was the same story until I saw the film again on late night tv.  I was all excited to see one of my favorite books on the screen.  Then, I realized what movie it was.  I tried to sit through it.  I just couldn't.  The monster should have eaten the film
Mild Things -- Lame pun for a lame movie. What does WILD THINGS 2 have going against it from the get-go:A) No Denise Richards  B) No name actors  C)Being a crappy direct-to-video sequel  D)No Denise Richards NAKED . . .What is wrong with WILD THINGS 2 after the fact:A)A script that tries to overcompensate its idiocy with more twists than a corkscrew  B)ONE sex scene -- A (weak) threesome, one of the few things even linking this to the original C)Sexy actresses who star in a sexy movie but decide not to be naked (leaving us with a body double and naked-from-behind shot) . . . Wait let me play that again!If I seem to be dwelling a little too much on the sexuality aspects of this film maybe its because this is an EROTIC THRILLER.Did I mention no Denise Richards?
Another blight on the franchise... The original Halloween was the greatest horror movie of all time. Since then, a series of inferior sequels were released one after the other. Some were watchable such as Halloween 4. And one was actually pretty good; Halloween H20. But most were terrible drivel. Halloween 2 was a let down, Halloween 3 was an abomination, Halloween 5 was a crime against nature, and Halloween 6 (The Curse of Michael Meyers) was perhaps the worst movie ever made. Then Halloween H20 came out and surprised everybody. It was good! Could this be a trend to revive the dying franchise? Unfortunatly, the answer is no because "H2o" was followed with "Resurrection" which effectively sank the franchise back into the depths of its own miserable oblivian
Aerial Gunner. Typical of the war movies of that age.  Very much the Americans are all good clean kids who will overcome injustice.  I enjoyed looking at an America that was.  Would purchase again but this is not a documentary or even a close approximation of real life
revolting prelude. I hate this film and "The Ballad of Cable Hoge," because of its depiction of animal cruelty. This happens just at the prelude of both films.
We all hated this film. I bought this DVD because a friend said it was one of the funniest films he had ever seen. We're still friends, but I'll never listen to one of his reviews again--our taste must not be compatible.My wife, daughter, and I seldom agree on anything but we unanimously consider this the worst movie we've ever seen. It's the only movie I've ever turned off before the end.On the plus side, watching most of this film has given me a new perspective on cinema. I used to think I knew bad movies. Now I know that most movies are at least pretty good, and it's only a very few that are truly bad. This is one of those very few bad films.Best in Show belongs to a genre of "comedies" that I find boring at best, but often cruel and mean. Other films of this type are "Waiting for Guffman", "Bottle Rocket", etc. If you enjoy watching pathetic people struggle then perhaps you'll appreciate this movie
Buy the other version -- the Tai Seng release. I would like to give this version 5 stars, i love the movie, but this is the Dimension release which only offers an English language dub. If that's OK by you, then this is the cheaper version, but if you are a purist like me, you'll want the Cantonese/Mandarin version with English subtitles
UnBox video not yet working. Will not play once video was downloaded. I get the error message:  "can not play file, please try again later. error# 0x80040273" I made the exlusive give me call me back feature but the UnBox department was already closed, I was told the UnBox Saturday and Sunday 6-5 hours. I have to say I am impressed with the Call back feature. I downloaded the Unbox Beta now and am recieving email assistance to try to resolve the problem. Thanks Amazon UnBox! I will Update again - Feb. 10,200
A B-movie with a little more substance. Michael Moriarity is my hero! He is just one of the coolest actors in my opinion. He has done such great B-movies as this, Q, and It's Alive 3: Island of the Alive. How awesome is he?? Anyways, I think that this movie was hilarious! I think a lot of people take this movie too seriously, thinking that it is going to be your typical movie. But you shouldn't because not only is this a B-movie, but IT IS supposed to be funny. My favorite part is when "the stuff" started bubbeling out of the ground and that old hick guy just starts eating it. Who would do that?? I just started laughing by butt off when that happened. So if you watch this movie, just sit back and enjoy it for what it's worth, don't be too critical on it.What I learned from The Stuff: Dairy products are evil! Especially if they come from with in the earth!If you like The Stuff, I recommend: Watching other B-movies, such as Island of the Alive 3, Zombi 3 and 4, etc
The InCrowd is out..... Susan Ward,coming out of daytime and primetime soaps on TV, gave movie acting a try with this rather lame picture from AOL Films.    Director Mary Lambert tries and fails to give us a Basic Instinct story with zero script and while this was a studio pictures, it looks like Warners gave them a fairly low budget to work with.  As the lack of film sets show.   If you like Susan Ward, then give this a movie a try, if you want to hope that she gets better film roles in the future, DON"T FIND IT HERE
Didn't work. I downloaded the player and this episode as part of a promotion that gave a free episode. Not only did I get charged, but when I cancelled the download to contact about the charge - I was told I had to finish downloading before they could refund. Once it finished downloading, it didn't play anyway. I gave up.
Jet's worse film of all time. Jet lee was dorky in this film, and the cholos he was teaching were just as bad. This film was made in a desperate attempt to relaunch his career in America. After seeing the light, Jet returned to Hong Kong and completed the historical Once Upon a Time in China series. The rest is history
Not "Pride of the Yankees". Starring Tony Perkins perfectly miscast as a major league ballplayer. What can you say? The Red Sox have Jimmy Pirsall, Tony Perkins and "Fear Strikes OUT". The Yankees have Lou Gehrig, Gary Cooper and "Pride of the Yankees".
ick. foul. just plain foul. seemingly never-ending..and not in a good way. tasteless. sick. not even worth the beautiful faces. Heck, I can't even write a proper review because I refused to finish the worthless trash-couldn't tell you what it was about.
VIncent D'Onofrio saved this movie from getting 1 star. I found Claire Dolan to be a bleak, sad and depressing portrayal of a woman trying to earn money to may off a debt by selling herself to wealthy business men. Not only did Katrin Cartlidge (Claire Dolan) not have any depth to her role, but I found her terribly unappealing. She only had one facial expression through out the entire movie, even when she was having sex. She showed no feeling or emotion. Granted, some of the dullness to her character was due to her role, but it seemed as though there was nothing underneath.Vincent D'Onofrio was the saving grace of this film, playing Claire's love and pseudo-savior. He carried the entire cast, along with the very talented Colm Meaney. This movie is an OK choice for any fan of Mr. D'Onofrio's, but other than that, i found the film to be very boring and slow moving.
McGregor and Judd voyage threw a boring obsession tale. Ewan McGregor (The Pillow Book, Brassed Off), becomes obsessed with mystery woman Ashley Judd (Double Jepordy, Twisted) and soon he starts to follow her around everywhere she goes. His fascination gets the best of him and it becomes deadly, yeah, ok. He sees her kill someone and the obsession starts right there...no wait was it there or was it when he took her picture. He then sees her kill another guy, she sucks up onto a blind guy who McGregor ends up accidently killing, she ends up almost being arrested but McGregor sets her free and then he follows her to a restaurant in the middle of a snowy area where he gets closer to her. Then she finds out he's stalking her and she tries to run but then he chases after her with his car and ends up killing her and that's that. Wow, exciting. McGregor also suffers from seeing his little girl everywhere he goes and he talks to her. Plays off like one of those Music Videos....like from a sappy writer.....a voyage of obsession. Also starring Patrick Bergin, k.d. Lang (the singer), Jason Preistley (Calendar Girl, Beverly Hills 90210) and Genevieve Bujold
Wes, Say it aint so. I have hope that someday Wes Craven will return to greatness, that his abilities as a filmmaker will once again outshine his horrible motives for movies like Scream 2, cursed, and Dracula 2000. I have waited patiently for him to make another cinematic cult classic like "A Nightmare on Elm Street" or "The Last House on the Left", but alas "Red Eye" fails to be anywhere near as good as those two previous movies. First of all, the flick is PG-13, which means no blood, no sex, and no good stuff that accounts for a horrible plot. A pair of breasts and a bloody brain splatter can make up for bad plot twists sometimes.  I must admit there are directors that can pull off a PG-13 horror flick but Wes Craven is not one of the chosen few.As soon as the opening credits are over the plot has unfolded in my head, yeah it's that predictable. The main character Lisa is on the phone with her dad while in the airport. Her grandmother just kicked the bucket and she is hopping a red eye flight (creative title, huh) to visit daddy. Immediately you realize the old man has something to do with the story line, and he is obviously more than a destination point. While on the phone with Pops, Lisa puts him on hold to speak with Cynthia, a girl that is taking her place as hotel manager while she engages on her trip. Cynthia has to somehow be a victim.  Next Lisa meets a gentleman that buys her a drink in the airport bar and the two of them just so happen to sit next to each other on the airplane; he is obviously the bad guy. Not just because of the random circumstances, but he has those bad guy eyes. The movie is over from my point of view, besides a few inconsistencies, the viewer already knows that the father will be threatened if Lisa and Cynthia don't work together to make some violent action against a guest at the hotel. Now we all know that this won't happen because all crappy movies have happy endings. That is why seven was a splendid film by the way, the villain was triumphant. The guy that sits next Lisa on the plane will most likely be the only one who dies in the entire movie. It's all expected, and it's all dribble. Which may be why they made the movie PG-13, no one over the age of thirteen should be allowed to see it.This movie could have been saved, if the villain had a better plan, if he was more convincing. If the protagonist wouldn't be so heroic if her morals wouldn't be so goody two shoes. If the movie wasn't so black and white good versus evil it would have been tolerable.
Why?  What's the point?. There are enough reviews of the main movie story so I don't need to add anything in that regard.  But, what on earth does a lesbian sub-story (in both regards) have to do with the story as a whole?  Nothing.  So, we have another movie that would be great to introduce the whole family to blue-grass music and the Appalachian way of life that, instead, heads for the trash bin
Hitler making speeches in a cave. When this movie began, I was sure I was in for something penetrating and deep.  As it went on, I felt that the movie was merely clever.  Within a few minutes of that, I was just plain bored.The premise -- Hitler, his colleagues, and a few random Nazis in a surreal, underground world akin to hell -- has potential.  But the movie becomes tedious for lack of any plot, or of any pretense of one.  The whole movie is given over to listening to Hitler make speeches about heroism, propaganda, and other abstract concepts.  For the sake of variety, his speechifying is occasionally interrupted by comments from Goebbels, Goering, Eva Braun, and others.Having Hitler talk with Sigmund Freud was evidently intended to be the cleverest stroke of all.  Freud, however, is portrayed as a bland, ordinary, TV-stereotype of a psychologist; the only way we know he's supposed to be Freud is the beard and the pince-nez.
Awful film barely saved by a couple of decent acting performances. The Next Generation is basically a remake of the original Texas Chainsaw Massacre, in fact up to an hour into the film the plot is practically identical, though different characters and locations are used.  The original was a little overrated in my opinion and this "remake" is quite frankly terrible.  Bad acting with the exception of Renee Zellweger and Matthew McConaughy who do their best with a terrible script and several B movie actors.  The only major differences from the original are that Leatherface now dresses as a woman, which was fairly amusing but hardly essential, and a tacked on conspiracy theory.The conspiracy theory of a secret society only surfaces in the last half hour and is absolutely ridiculous, I won't explain it, theres no point, watch it yourself if you want to know how stupidly the film ends.  I would sooner suggest avoiding this film completely though, even die hards admit its awful, I only gave it 2 stars because I reserve 1 star for the very worst of the worst (yes even worse than this!)
Visually stunning?. I waited for this movie to transcend the pretentious, derivitive visuals especially the awful artwork but it ended up being just as bad.  I read some of the reviews and the comments are consistently favorable of the visuals even if they did not like the movie.  The only way I can understand this is by also seeing that somehow the awful art of Thomas Kinkade is so popular.  It is so marketed and fake, served to you as great art.  That is exactly how this movie has been served to you, don't accept it find something real.
Thomas Hardy?  Not even Oliver Hardy!. After two hours of watching it, I still don't know what it was about.  Yes, the scenery is fantastic, but a National Geographic film would have done more.I applaud the acting of Milla Jovovich, and Nastassja Kinski.  But, the kudos reviewers have given to Peter Mullen would have been better deserved if this were a silent movie.  I hardly heard anything he said and there are no English subtitles offered on the dvd.  As for Wes Bentley, that's acting?  He kept the same expression when he was having sex as when he was having a gun pointed at him, or a co-worker being blown to "Kingdom Come" (that's a pun based on the movie).  He makes Clint Eastwood look like Laurence Olivier.The film is supposedly based on a Thomas Hardy book, but very loosely based, and the scriptwriters should have at least used Cliff Notes to have learned more about the story and the character development.  They obviously fell asleep after the first couple of chapters and made up the rest.
Survivor Rip Off. I have bought 2 seasons of Survivor on unbox and both of them are not complete. Very dissapointing. Guatemala  episode 11 is from a completely different season and it is missing the last 2 episodes and the reunion show. Just leaves you hanging. Exile Island is missing the final episode it just goes from the competition between Danielle and Cirie for a spot in the final 3 to the live reunion show
disapointed. i was verry disapointed to see this movie because i wanted to see the  real movie and not a musical movie.i'm still looking for the real real movie but still can't find it
what?. This movie was so stupid, everyone listens to Nina when she is clearly messing with their lives. They are stupid enough to believe her, and well I don't even know what else happens cause I saved myself and changed the channel
jazzman. A very deplorable, highly offensive, insensitive, profane,and depressing piece of garbage.  The dialogue is jaw-dropping embarrassing and so horrible, you want to coveryour ears. Also, very pretentious and unrealistic.  Justwhat kind of people enjoy watching crap like this?  TheONLY positive thing I ever got from this film was thesoundtrack by Gato Barbieri, the great jazz saxophonist.I wanted to smack the s*** out of that wimp French boy-friend of Schneider's. Brando's not much of a man in thiseither. An artsy-fartsy work for the New York/LA filmschool crowd, I suppose.  Give me "Cool Hand Luke", thankyou.
Just not gripping. Admittedly the film is clever and the acting is good and it has it's moments of entertainment, BUT overall it's long and pretty boring.  It seems it would have been better suited as a play, which apparently it was originally.  I had just finished re-reading Romeo and Juliet when I rented this, thinking I was still in a Shakespeare mood, but this didn't do it for me.  I suppose if I had just finished reading or watching Hamlet, it would have been better.  My favorite parts are Oldman's silent scientific discoveries, completely amusing.  Couldn't wait for the movie to end, honestly
Didn't work. I downloaded the player and this episode as part of a promotion that gave a free episode. Not only did I get charged, but when I cancelled the download to contact about the charge - I was told I had to finish downloading before they could refund. Once it finished downloading, it didn't play anyway. I gave up.
Heartburn  or  Men..beware ! Most women only want to breed !. This movie made me sick to my stomach. Here we have a woman like Nora Ephron, a woman with professional job skills and talent and when she marries, she turns into a needy, desperate women whom evidently believes her own self-worth is determined by having babies, one after another. I ususally love all of Meryl's movies, but I could not stand seeing her turn into a needy, always pregnant &quot;homemaker&quot;. If I were a man, I would have run awary screaming, too
Beware of Unbox!!!. Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for
No good scenes in the whole movie. This movie doesn't have a single scene worth watching. Femalien 1 is in another league, don't waste your time on the sequel
Being French does not mean you don't have to say your sorry. as the director and actors of this mess should, on their skinny french knees.  Complete waste of film and your time. Not erotic, sexy (? was that actress really a woman?, was her boyfriend really a man? or visa/versa) Damned if I could tell.  And that old man who tired her up, ya think he had enough rope? The movie was as clinicial as the gyno exam she went through.  French people are not pretty, and this woman was not only NOT pretty, but she drifted through the entire movie in a coma.  Even when she got screwed she looked like she was in a fog.  Save you money and your eyeballs and buy some french fries and eat them on your porch for the same experience
Star Trek:  City on the Edge of Forever. My favorite show of the Trek series but there's no way I'd buy another individual program from Amazon.  It will ONLY play on their downloaded player ...won't burn to DVD so can't play it on my television.  Don't bother buying this ...just go for the Trek collection on DVD
disney,  why are you editing & censoring?. the complaints about this dvd release are all correct. great movie, low qaulity release. yet i'm surprised no one has mentioned the thing that angered me most, the self censorship. the bataan race scene where ustinov swaps the bataan for a bottle of beer. we're ok to witness a pirate being drunk, but a sports commentator saying a teenager is running with a bottle of beer is beyond appropriate?  what are the execs at disney thinking? if they need to put out a disclaimer by leonard maltin befor showing such "questionable" material as they did with many of the vault collection... fine, but stop chopping up the movies. our ten year old children are not buying these movies, many of us were actually alive to see the originals and no we're being ripped off. stop angering a loyal fan base with this ignorance. keep this in mind when you contemplate the inevitable release of a cleaned up widescreen version of this title
Very boring. I've been wanting to see this movie and I finally did on LOGO. I'm just happy I waited untill It came on TV. I though it was going to be way better considering what reviewers everywhere said about it. The romance was slim to none. I thought the other guy on the cover was going to have a bigger role. Well, I won't say too much without destroying the movie for those who have not seen it. Anyway, I would much rather watch Beautiful Thing, Get Real, All Over the Guy & The Incredibly True Adventure of Two Girls In love
If you loved Terms of Endearment, never watch this film. I adore Terms of Endearment, it's a movie that time and time again has never failed to touch my heart and make my cry. I have known about "The Evening Star" for a long time, but I just got around to seeing it for the first time.While it was fortunate that Shirley MacLaine reprised her role as Aurora, the film didn't have the same chemistry that made Terms of Endearment such a memorable and much loved film. The cast was just off, with nobody except for Marion Ross delivering a much appreciated and genuine performance.Aurora returns in The Evening Star as a woman who has been weakened, and instead of seeing her as she was (and as she was loved) we see her adapt to the lives of her loser grandchildren with little contest. It's not the same Aurora from the first film. The Aurora we see in Evening Star doesn't have the same essence of "Houston class", the same sharp wit, and overall she is a different woman than the Aurora you grew used to in Terms of Endearment.Watching this movie was painful, just because it was so predictable and, well, it was just lacking that soul that made the first film so special. This movie was put together so poorly, and it really shows. Emotional scenes are poorly done, because whomever wrote the screenplay really tried to make everything over-the-top, so when there was a crisis, it became an emotional spectacle with the entire cast instead of an intimate and thoughtful event between certain characters. When tragedy would strike, you'd have a room full of characters you don't care about dilluting the scene and creating a disconnect in the moment.I give the film 1 star and that is only because we get a moment of time with Jack Nicholson, Marion Ross did a good job, and Shirley MacLaine came back to do her very best under the circumstances. These people are the only minute saving factor in this entire upset of a film.Honestly though, if you really love Terms of Endearment, you may find yourself let down by The Evening Star. I personally wish that I hadn't of watched it and allowed for the story to end with the first film. Overall, I advise, if you loved Terms of Endearment never watch this film.
Cant watch. I downloaded this program and it was garbled and video as if played in slow motion.  This is the first of two downloads that didn't play.  I know it was not my computer because I did download three that played ok
Didn't work. I downloaded the player and this episode as part of a promotion that gave a free episode. Not only did I get charged, but when I cancelled the download to contact about the charge - I was told I had to finish downloading before they could refund. Once it finished downloading, it didn't play anyway. I gave up.
This is Horrible. I love the Avatar and I was so thrilled that amazon allows people to download it except the only problem is I've been trying for the past days and darn it all, it's not working!!! It's not as if I'm downloading it for free. I am willing to pay and yet it just wouldn't go through!!! I think it's better to just buy the dvds...I think it's absolutely horrible to tease customers like that..
Not good...simple as that. Another disappointing Stephen King miniseries.  For some reason, lately I've been rewatching some of the older Stephen King miniseries that I hadn't seen since they originally aired.  Maybe I thought they'd be better without all the commercials to drag them on and on.The cream of the crop is THE STAND.  The dregs is THE LANGOLIERS, with the worst special effects ever...Ed Wood would have been proud.  TOMMYKNOCKERS falls somewhere between.Basically it tells the story of how one lady (Marg Helgenberger) stumbles across a mysterious little object in the woods, and is compelled to unearth it.  Turns out its some sort of alien craft with the power to exert its "will" on the people of the little Maine town nearby.  These people undergo gradual (or not so gradual) personality changes which allows them to "suddenly" invent impossible machines, read each others minds, and also to gleefully kill anyone who seeks to thwart them.That's all well and good.  Sounds like it could be good, clean, gory fun.  Certainly, the book it's based on was.  I know that King himself is not terribly fond of the book, mostly because he wrote it during the height of his drug and alcohol additions...but it contained some of his most disturbing scenes too, and a believable, ultimately heartbreaking romance between the two leads.  I have always liked it myself.  (To me, King's nadir was THE DARK HALF.)Back to the "movie."  Jimmy Smits plays Helgenberger's boyfriend, a formerly successful poet now awash in alcoholism...but trying to climb out of his hole.  He's immune to the power of The Tommyknockers because of a steel plate in his head, but goes along for the ride for much of the story because of the guilt he feels over his own behavior.  Eventually, things get bad enough that he finally musters up the courage to take matters into his own hands...with rather serious consequences for himself.But the story is told in a plodding manner.  For every compelling scene (for example, early on Smits is at a reception where he's been drinking too much, and has a gloriously over-the-top embarrassing moment) there's two clunkers (Cliff De Young and Traci Lords as two postal employees undergoing some serious hanky-panky in the sorting room!!)  Helgenberger and Smits are fine, as are Joanna Cassidy as the local sheriff and E.G. Marshall as a kindly curmudgeon.But the lengthy novel has been condensed so awkwardly, and the subplot with DeYoung and Lords given FAR, FAR too much time on screen (De Young is one of the worst actors EVER to get more than one role) to keep make even the gamest performances worthwhile.  I guess the producers were so tickled to have former porn star Lords on their set, they just couldn't help coming up with more ridiculous things for her to do.  Also, we are forced to see how far Robert Carradine (so good as the "head nerd" in REVENGE OF THE NERDS all those years ago) has fallen...he turns in a perfectly dreadful performance.The special effects and makeup are quite cheesy.  But many things could have been forgiven had a decent adaptation been managed.  But THE TOMMYKNOCKERS was doomed from the start with a pitiful script, not helped by uninspired direction.  If you're a big fan of Smits, Cassidy or Helgenberger, I guess you might want to take a gander.  If you're a fan of Stephen King or horror/sci-fi...stay away!
Not happy. This is only a portion of this episode.  It cuts off in the middle of a sentence
Stop the world I want to get off. Five of six episodes of 1955 mini-series Orson Welles created for British television.The first episode takes place in St. Germain des Pres in Paris.  It opens with a very young Art Buchwald at the typewriter providing a typed narration of sorts.  The idea was jettisoned for the remaining episodes.  We catch a quick glance of Jean Cocteau and Simone de Beauvoir waving at the camera and running away.  Most of the episode is taken up with Welles interview of an old American expatriate in a tunic.Episode two takes place in London and splits its time between Welles interviewing a handful of old women who live in a home for destitute widows and the Chelsea pensioners - retired soldiers, interviewed in a pub.Episode three is a loving look at the Madrid bullfight, with much history and explanatory narration supplied by writer Kenneth Tynan and then-wife Elaine Dundy.Episodes four and five take place in the land of the Basques, an `aboriginal' people living on the border of Spain and France.You can probably file this one under "Failed Experiment."  In the first two episodes Welles seems to think that the audience will find his tittering eccentrics as interesting as he does. Either that, or more likely, he went into this project without a plan or purpose and ran the camera at the first thing that wouldn't run away.The third episode - the bullfight - seems to support this argument.  Not only is it the only interesting episode, it's the only one that seems to have been thought out beforehand.  (Why was bullfighting so popular in the '50s, anyway?)The final two episodes show a real loss of whatever steam this project had.  Marginally interesting to begin with, episode five repeats two full scenes from episode four.Recommended only for die-hard fans of Orson Welles.
Cant watch. I downloaded this program and it was garbled and video as if played in slow motion.  This is the first of two downloads that didn't play.  I know it was not my computer because I did download three that played ok
old documentary!. Please think this DVD is recorded in 1986. More worse, this is recorded as a documentary. Sound quality is worst. After I bought this and DVD of &quot;Company&quot; (same, worst sound quality DOCUMENTARY), I suspect the word &quot;concert&quot; or &quot;soundtrack&quot; in DVD title
Ummmm, OK. This movie had barely any cool 3-D sequences, was boring, and babyish. Juni gets zapped into a video game. The acting is pretty bad, and there is pretty much no story. It's just flying around on machines. Is that entertainment or what(sarcasm) ? You could enjoy it if you were a 3 year old, but, since you are on this site, you probably aren't three, so I would not reccomend this movie to you
This is Horrible. I love the Avatar and I was so thrilled that amazon allows people to download it except the only problem is I've been trying for the past days and darn it all, it's not working!!! It's not as if I'm downloading it for free. I am willing to pay and yet it just wouldn't go through!!! I think it's better to just buy the dvds...I think it's absolutely horrible to tease customers like that..
disappointing. i had never known that there was a movie made about the life story of one of my very favourite singers patsy cline.well they needn't have bothered as it was a very much by the numbers story something definetely not above anything that you would see as a midday movie on any weekday.i liked both of the main actors,jessica lange and ed harris.the problem for me was that there was no attempt at conveying any real depth to the characters.whilst i appreciate that there has to be some element of fiction in most bio-pics anyone watchimg the movie and not having heard of patsy cline would be none the wiser for her motivations and driving forces.the only saving grace for me was that patsys singing was used in the movie to at least try to convey the quality that others saw in her singing
Was this movie made for the Lifetime channel?. If Lifetime switched from showing crappy dramas about wronged women to showing crappy horror flicks about wronged women this would one of them.  This movie was not scary.  It would have been suspenseful if I cared for any of the characters.  You know what the best part was?  When it was over.Few movies compel me to write reviews, good or bad.  This one obviously did
... horrid movie. i can't believe how disappointed i am in this anime. i had heard so much about it and how it is a story that is at the same time most touching and sad. but it's not. the little girl annoyed me so much. i just can't stand spoilt kids like that and seita probably would not have died if it had not been for her. omg she just annoyed me so much throughout the whole movie. can't stop ranting yeah... for those who haven't seen it, you might like it like everybody seems to but... i would not recommend it at al
The Brat Pack Comes of Age. "St. Elmo's Fire" is one of those movies that could have been better, should have been better and yet, it just wasn't.It featured an ensemble cast of THE young and hot stars of the 1980s, the so-called Brat Pack (well, everyone but Molly Ringwald and Anthony Michael Hall, who were spared this misstep).  Maybe this was supposed to be "The Breakfast Club - - After College", but while "The Breakfast Club" had characters, even stereotypical characters, that you could relate to, there is absolutely no one, with the exception of Emilio Estevez' character, that you care enough about to relate to in this film.The setting is not the John Hughes teen friendly Illinois, but Georgetown, where our bunch of Brat Packers have supposedly graduated from college.  Uh-huh.  Yeah, RIGHT.Judd Nelson and Ally Sheedy are living together and supposedly looking toward marriage - - problem is, Nelson is looking at and screwing everything else female that walks by and somehow hoping that Sheedy, in her prim and proper sweater and skirt sets and pearls can change that.  Andrew McCarthy is their mutual friend who knows what Nelson is up to and secretly harboring a festering desire for Sheedy (or maybe it's just the pearls?)  Emilio Estevez is a future attorney, working as a waiter/server and suffering a serious crush on Andie MacDowell.  Mare Winningham is a dowdy, trust-fund type girl who is still holding on to her virginity, working in social services and fighting over marrying the proper dork that her parents have selected for her.  She instead fantasizes about Rob Lowe, who is the pretty boy sax player in a local band, who has dropped out of school, married a white trash-y looking groupie, had a child with her and has now separated from her, and taking up with other groupies.  Demi Moore is the wild chick who works in international banking, has a serious coke problem, stepmother issues and a problem with painting her apartment walls hot pink and with giant murals of Billy Idol.Sounds promising, huh?  Well, in what is an early portend of the "Melrose Place" to come, Sheedy finds out what a dog Nelson is, dumps his ass, immediately jumps into bed with McCarthy, who is too desperately in love with her to realize that this is a rebound job; Estevez, after screwing up a lucrative house-sitting job by hosting a party there, travels to the snowy mountains to track down MacDowell and profess his love to her.  He finds that she is holed up there with her boyfriend and despite being crushed, he lays a huge kiss on her and then heads back home.  Lowe, in between faux-playing his sax and shaking his feathered head everywhere, takes Winningham's virginity and heads back to his estranged missus.  Moore, after whining seemingly incessantly about her ill stepmother, has all her furnishings repossessed, loses her job and freaks out.Not exactly "The Breakfast Club".The real problems seem to lie in the characters themselves.  With the exception of Estevez' character, they all seem like caricatures and horribly stereotyped.  Their every action, every line of dialogue seems like just that - - they seem very one dimensional.  Their so-called angst seems like a handy plotline device and nothing more than that.Winningham's character could have been salvagable - -except that she followed Lowe around like a sick puppy, knowing full well how he mistreated his wife and what a basic slacker he was.  And yet, she still gave her virginity to him.  Maybe if Winningham wasn't so bright, or she was a college freshman, it would be understandable.  But she was a college graduate and seemingly intelligent.Lowe really had little to do with his role.  Maybe if he had played the role Nelson had - - as the roving Lothario, with Sheedy waiting at home, it might have gone over better.  With his too-pretty looks, it would almost be understandable how the character could get random women he just met to sneak into dressing rooms with him.  Nelson just doesn't seem comfortable and doesn't pull it off - -but maybe Nelson might have been better suited for the sax player.Moore basically plays herself - -an interesting sidenote is that she was originally fired from this production for her drug problems, mirroring her character - - but was later rehired.While the title song later become a minor hit, "St. Elmo's Fire" itself missed the mark.
Wish they'd make a better version!. I am a teacher who reads this book to my class every year.  I show the movie and this is a terrible version.  They leave out almost the whole story, and change the rest.  It is such a great book and I think they could have done a better job on the video.  I am always hoping a newer and better version is made
Movie is great - This DVD release is HORRIBLE. Don't buy this.  Seriously.  Someone is bound to release a better version.  This is PAN AND SCAN, cropped at 1:33, and seems to be transferred from some sort of used tape...Like a 3/4 inch VHS.  There are visible tape flutters and wrinkles throughout the film. And no it's NOT the print.  The film is fine.  It's the transfer.  cheap, cheap, cheap.The compression is abysmal (notice the obvious scan lines on the titles) and the sound is piss poor.  How is it possible this is the only way this film is available in the US?  Disgraceful
power. i can't rate it because i received (2)discs from amazon and bth of them jammed on me i would luv to see this movie .Beware if your considering ordering it.
I have not yet received this DVD. I can't review an item you haven't sent me yet
Nice Story. Wooden Acting. Apparently, a film that many women, who have read the book, with effort and imagination, make enjoyable.Pretty scenery; such as walks along the ocean. The costumes are often exceptional. There is wonderful singing in one scene and over the closing credits.The less imaginative, those who have not read the book, and men, will find:Characters, including Anne & the Captain, display wooden acting. Poker-faces. Others speak at a clipped pace. The properness of the times allowed for personality, as shown well in "Pride & Prejudice" 1940, 1996 & 2006, but not here. Shyness, plainness, or slowness, may be portrayed likeably, with some personality; but not here.Both Anne & the Captain maintain wide-eyed, desperate, looks, constantly. Many of us do get nervous within romance; but we are compelled, by conversation and activity, to interrupt our nervousness with personality. Thus, Anne's & the Captain's constant, wide-eyed, nervousness is un-natural. All of us at the age of Anne and the Captain, would have refined our nervousness, clearly showing: shyness, or thought, or distance, or hopefulness, or approval, or alarm. Poor directing.You understand the quiet thoughts, because of the story, in spite of the confusing, paralyzed, looks; rather than because of them. You come to like Anne and the Captain toward the end, in spite of the wooden acting, because of the novelist's story.A female reviewer, who liked the film, cites a huge amount of important background from the book that is not shown in the film. A poor script for those who have not read the book. Good period, romance films are so few, and so desired, that many women, who have read the book, work and imagine an enjoyable film; better than it otherwise is. I applaud their positive imaginations. However, they continued their imaginative thoughts into rating the production of this film.I would like to see this good story idea re-made, with a better script, by a better director.Well-made romance films are: "Pride & Prejudice 1940, 1996, 2006", "Wives & Daughters", "North & South", and "Naughty Marietta 1935 with Jeanette MacDonald and Nelson Eddy". Fairly made is "Under the Greenwood Tree".
Poor support. This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet
Beware of Unbox!!!. Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for
Great to Learn about Yuppies. I should have known this movie would be terrible because it stars Matthew McConaughey.  McConaughey plays one thing well - the smarmy yuppie.  Having grown up in a working class Manhattan family, I know the type well.  He does an excellent job at this one role for which he is type cast again and again.  This film is no exception.  The worst thing about this movie is that even though I only watched about 2/3, I had to use grease-cutting cleaner to clean my tv screen free of all the slime.
Creepy, disgusting script. Harriets adventures include feeding laxatives to her rivals, and her bright friend's big plan is to set off a smoke bomb (incendiary) during a school assembly. Either one will get a kid expelled, arrested, and in the newspapers. Not amusing ! Then there's Golly telling her about the virtues of lying. If there is a lesson that could be drawn (which the movie misses), Harriet's secrecy from her parents manages to create a full blown crisis out of nothing, because she is showing the sort of behavior that (in a kid 2 years older) would be take as a possible symptoms for other bad things like self-mutilation or bulemia, as in the movie "Thirteen.
2 out of 10. The Pick-up Artist is a dangerously bad film. There is absolutely no chemistry between Robert Downey and Molly Ringwald. Molly Ringwald may have been of the most iconic 1980's female actresses, and she certainly proves her worth here. Ringwald looks too much of a virgin to me when her character wasn't supposed to be. That marks the moment when the film had lost its believably element. The real joke in this film has to be Robert Downey. His acting is insanely moronic. I often have to wonder if he wears a lipstick. I am pretty sure Robert Downey can make a great drag queen if he chose to. From the start to the end, I was annoyed. I couldn't see how Dennis Hopper and Danny Aiello got interested in this film and lend their hands in it. Harvey Keitel gives a fair performance, but I believe he is much tougher than that. Comparing Harvey Keitel's performance in Bad Lieutenant, Reservoir Dogs, and Mean Streets to The Pick-up Artist, it is enough to make an apparent observation that Harvey Keitel should have applied his talents to a more different film than this. A smaller film that he did rightfully apply his talent was Rising Sun, and he pulled that one off better than he did in this film. Why did they have to call it The Pick-up Artist? Could they give the movie a better title such as The Player
Great Yoga Tape? I do not think so!. I think there are two major problems with this tape. First, in no way it is suitable for beginners. Instructor cues  for breathing are inconsistent, about 50% of the time there is no cueing at all. Her cues for poses are very poor, she mostly mentions if the pose is hard to do or not. You cannot follow her without looking at your TV screen, and if you do not know which muscles to flex or stretch, 50% of the time she is not going to tell you. The program does contain two levels, for more and less flexible. Yet, transition from one pose to another is so quick that you can barely get your balance. Try Jane Fonda Yoga instead, or (and) Kundahlini yoga
Bad Device. I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service
Another one of those silly 80's movies. The jokes are pretty much what you would expect and there are a lot of slap-stick sight gags. I normally wouldn't have bought a movie like this but I needed it to make my Johnny Depp library complete
Dissapointed. I watched this movie in Religion and was dissapointed that it didn't follow the book. I read the book as a child and saw almost every version of the movie available, but now seeing this one again (I'm pretty  sure I saw this before) I was annoyed at how much it changed the book. I think if your going to take a book and make it a movie you have no right to take such liberties. The way Mary discovers the garden and the key are absolutely rediculous. Also I don't like colin's strange fortune-teller like air. I had no emotional reaction to the ending where the children are all grown up because they just seemed like random actors and didn't even remotely resemble the children. Don't get this version if your a purist
Poor HD-DVD. I own both Blu-ray and HD-DVD movies, and have been consistently dissapointed with all the HD-DVD's.  They just don't compare to Blu-ray.  The Hulk was not a very good movie to begin with, and the transer to HD-DVD was not impressive.  Picture quality was average at best, and the sound quality was also mediocre.  I have yet to find any HD-DVD that is even comparable to the best of Blu-ray
Why?. Why? Someone tell me why. Someone e-mail me and explain to me why. There is nothing to gain here. Nothing to be learned, nothing to excite, no story. Why? Seriously, is there any documentation that might explain WHY this thing (not a film) exists. Return of the Texas Chainsaw Massacre is so unprecedented in it's poorness, that it doesn't even succeed in being a dumb slasher flick. Let me reiterate. The filmmakers actually FAILED at the least complicated genre in the book. If I wanted a series of randomly assembled images leading nowhere I would have rented "Week End".The only reason to see this is that ever crafty curiosity value. Yes, you will be compelled to watch, if only to observe some clue as to why both Matthew McConaughey (pre-"A Time to Kill") and Rene Zellweger (pre-"Jerry Maguire") accepted the lead roles (the clue never comes). Texas Chain Saw fans will, of course, feel the completist need to see this, the death knell of the series. And finally, I think just the concept of Leatherface as a shrieking cross-dresser will garnish a few bewildered viewers. But believe me folks, this still doesn't answer the ultimate question: Why? Why?! WHY?
No information, no pictures. The film shows no action, except a disgusting performance of cutting apart a dead body, and you ask yourself, in what relation to the subject of the film this stands. (Sorry, forgot the 3-second-sceen of a naked young man) Just the head of 17-year-old lads, who wonder why they got infected, when they work as prostitute,  explaning in detail what they are to do in this job and where you can find them in Prag. (Like advertising) You are provided with not the least background information about their education, why they left their home town, why they have no normal job. I would wonder what politics think and do  about the youth in the new EC-country, what young people get told about the danger of deceases at school, and what other chances they have in life
Taboo porn. This movie has nothing to do with a house. Its really just a low budget rape porn. I tossed it in the trash about 20 minutes into it.
Warning Incomplete Episode!!!. The episodes in this series have an average running time of 50 minutes. This one happens to be only 18 minutes. This mean sthat the file abruptly stops right in the middle. Even though it only cost me $2 I still got jipped.  Let's hope Amazon can iron out these kinds of problems before they get this service farther underway. Be careful enough to sheck the running times to be sure they seem accurate before you buy them
Star Trek:  City on the Edge of Forever. My favorite show of the Trek series but there's no way I'd buy another individual program from Amazon.  It will ONLY play on their downloaded player ...won't burn to DVD so can't play it on my television.  Don't bother buying this ...just go for the Trek collection on DVD
Manipulative trash. I'm disgusted by DePalma.  This is trash and so is he.  It is too manipulative and it is completely his fault.  He stretches out these horror scenes in the most manipulative way, as we watch Travolta fight his way through crowds to save the girl.  This kind of manure (self censorship) angers me.  This isn't art.  It's garbage.  His whole purpose is to manipulate us, to extend the horror scene in the most manipulative way.  Don't you see how phony it is?  Don't you resent how he is playing with your emotions?  You call this art?  You call this talent?  You call this good directing?  It's trash.  He stinks.  If he's trying to copy Hitchcock, he's not doing it right.  Why not show us Travolta swimming through sharks trying to save the girl.  I got it.  How about Travolta pushing kindergarten kids out of the way trying to save the girl from a four year old strangler.  And stretch the scene out, make it last through the whole milk and cookies period, as Travolta keeps pushing kids out of his way and the kids are merrily eating their Oreos and the girl is getting strangled.  Eeek.  That's a good scream.  DePalma, you stink.  What other stupid tricks can you do
Tiresome. THE STORY OF O attempts to defy the wisdom of the 10 Commandments of Hot Movies and fails.  I won't bore you with all of the Commandments, just #7 "Thou shalt not make a hot movie with an entire cast of non-hot actors."Shot in that hazy sometimes dreamy kind of way that I dislike TSOO is about a rich guy who sends his girlfriend to a mansion where unattractive masters train unattractive slaves how to be obedient.  After graduation the rich guy loses his woman to his older, much older, step-brother.Other stuff happens (banging, branding, eating, talking, talking, talking, whipping), but it's all unimportant and not hot
Star Trek:  City on the Edge of Forever. My favorite show of the Trek series but there's no way I'd buy another individual program from Amazon.  It will ONLY play on their downloaded player ...won't burn to DVD so can't play it on my television.  Don't bother buying this ...just go for the Trek collection on DVD
One of the worse in a while-not enough camp to make it fun. If a movie is going to be really bad, it should have some camp value added in: i.e. real humor of some kind, some excitement and unexpected events, and some good hammy dialog. This groaner has almost none of these things, at least to my understanding. I did watch this two times over the years, once in the theatre, and another buying this tape for 99 cents. I really do like most science fiction films I've seen in the last 40 years, including many critical failures and campy low budget and high budget films. So I am qualified to submit an opinion. Lost is Space does have some entertainment value for kids. It is just OK, if you can turn down your IQ rather drastically and lower expectations also. I was able to do both a little the second time, and enjoyed it somewhat. In the theatre, I ended up walking out before the ending. This is the only time I have done this because of a movie. (One other time I did because of an audience laughing at some torture scenes, but that is another story.)Both times I saw this, the first part really seems like it is supposed to be a video game, and there is some expectation or question of when is the movie going to start? The problem is, it never does. Saying the story has not much revelance has become a cliche for movie reviewers who don't have enough to support their arguments, but in this case it is very true. Nearly every twist and turn of this story (there are a lot for such a bad movie), causes the story to worsen. So by the end, when the story has no ending, one really doesn't care at all. Knowing that a needed sequel never got made gives one a feeling of justice in the universe
2 and 1/2 really.. The good info. here is very good but there's so much more winded, no-where going storyline info that's so unneccessary
MODERN MARVELS:" ROLLACOASTERS". Only got five minutes of show when downloaded!  Most of it was comercial for Modern Marvels. It say's show should be 49 minutes!!
Beyond Bad. They wouldn't let me give a review of 0 so a gave it one star. The film is broken up into five sections, for five different time periods, but none of them have any substance to them. There is a reason that this film was  smashed pretty hard when it was released. I'll watch pretty much anything,  but this remains the only movie that I've ever walked out of. I later  watched it again with a friend to prove that Williams really did a film  this bad, and it was worse the second time around. There is no reaseon to  see this film. If you looking for a good Williams picture, get &quot;dead  poets. . &quot; or &quot;Good Will. . .&quot; or even &quot;What dreams[the  book is better though].&quot;      This film is terrible, but not bad  enough to justify being watched to mock, such as &quot;attack of the  killer...&quot; or &quot;THe Starfighters.&quot; There really is no reason  to see this film
AMAZON SUCKS. I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!
Being French does not mean you don't have to say your sorry. as the director and actors of this mess should, on their skinny french knees.  Complete waste of film and your time. Not erotic, sexy (? was that actress really a woman?, was her boyfriend really a man? or visa/versa) Damned if I could tell.  And that old man who tired her up, ya think he had enough rope? The movie was as clinicial as the gyno exam she went through.  French people are not pretty, and this woman was not only NOT pretty, but she drifted through the entire movie in a coma.  Even when she got screwed she looked like she was in a fog.  Save you money and your eyeballs and buy some french fries and eat them on your porch for the same experience
Excellent performance VERY POOR VIDEO EDIT!!!!!!. As other have stated, the performance is excellent.  My wife and I watched this in vegas and thoroughly enjoyed the show.  With that said, my review is for the extremely poor job the video editor did. They used some kind of filter on many of the shots.  They change camera angles 50 times in 1 minute to the point that is unbearable and painful to watch.  You do not get to see the dancers perform any full steps because the angle switches before they finish it.  Additionally they use these slow motion segments that totally ruin the moment and create the unsynchronized dance with the music.I have to sell my copy because I get nauseas watching it.  I hope they re-make this DVD.  I think my 7-year old daughter could do a better job editing...and we could use the additional revenue stream...
Not Happy. I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?
Why bother?. I find myself rehashing my own reviews at this point but nonetheless, I aspire to write a review on each instalment.  Producers have tested logistics to new levels by taking Jason on a murderous vacation to New York.  The film begins on Camp Crystal, where two teenage lovers are discussing the legend of Jason.  Whilst they speak of him, Jason is electrocuted (again) back to life by the contact of the boat's anchor.  More conveniently, he finds a hockey mask on the boat to cover up his unsightly face.  Cue two dead teens with very bad gory effects and Jason's off on his way to New York.  Cue once again a series of brutal murders on the boat, with female heroine Jensen Dagett avoiding him at all costs until he reaches New York shores.  As a side story, the heroine has had previous contact with Jason when she is swimming in the water so she is frightened of the water as a result.  At this stage, a change of scenery was needed but it doesn't work well at all.  What's so scary in New York?  Comedy is used to no effect in this movie and again the death scenes are more elaborate.  Can this unlucky lady stop Jason in his tracks one more time? Will this beast ever die? I rest my case
disappointed. I was very disappointed in this video, Keb-Mo was good, but there was very little of him playing, actually there was very little playing by anyone. The interviews were fine, but you find yourself waiting for the music to start, and when it did, it didn't last.It is alright, not great by any  means, I would be hard pressed to buy it for more than a couple dollars
Same Thing. The Dane Cook episode is the same one that it on his "Harmful If Swallowed" c.d. The c.d. also has the uncensored version of this routine that is over 1 hour long. The one star rating is not based on the content. It is based upon Amazon not sharing this fact with customers
Politically correct retelling ruins the message. Although it looks the same as the HG Wells story and the 1960 movie, this bastardization of the source material turns a frightening story about man's nature into a mildly fun sci-fi outing. Alexander's motivation for building the Time Machine is entirely different, and what he learns 80,000 years in the future could have been deduced by a more probing scientific mind (that is, if it was used to dealing with less than scientific cinematic time-travel paradoxes).So the first half of the movie wreaks havoc on the source material and pales in comparison with the fabulous creativity of the George Pal version. We don't even find out anything about what we are about to see!But things get worse is in the distant future. Although the writing tries to dance around the fact -- they have de-fanged the harsh reality of the Eloi and softened the horriffic underpinnings of their naivete. Instead of unknowing sheep, they are new-agey world-culture pluralists. The dichotomization of the human race really makes little sense. And there is no Rod Taylor running about castigating the apathy of his hosts.The only reason why I give the film two stars is because it is one of the only genuine sci-fi films in years, and I found some of the special FX (the moon) and Jeremy Irons, cheesy as they may have been, fun
Stick with the Disney version. When I watched the version with Paul Ruebens as the title character, I liked it so I decided to watch this with my little brother, I did not like this movie at all, I feel bad for feeling that way cause Jonathan Taylor-Thomas was great in The Lion King, Man of the House and Home Improvement but this movie is not enjoyable or watchable at all
A girl dancer has to be exotic; she has to be - a peach. I realize that many may love this film for the impressive sounds that both Fred Astaire and Judy Garland create together.  I must admit, there was quite a bit of singing and dancing to demonstrate this karmic connection that these two had together.  Honestly, I would like to admit that there was just a bit too much singing and dancing in this film.  Easter Parade was nothing except a showcase that allowed Astaire to prove himself to audiences again and again, while Garland attempt to counter her Wizard of Oz persona that followed her until her bittersweet end.  Musicals are a tough genre to create.  You, as a director, need to have a concrete balance between the song/dance routines and the physical plot, which keeps the audience watching until the very end.  I have seen musicals fail and succeed because the director had that bond secured.  Sadly, Easter Parade's director, Charles Walters, did not have a strong enough grip on the two.  Instead of a good story, with emotional characters, and a sincere plot, we are forced to watch Garland and Astaire seemingly attempt to continually outdo themselves on screen.  There was no chemistry between the two, there was no logical plot to this story, and finally, there was no emotion.  I cared nothing for anyone in these performances because I was bombasted time and time again with dance, song, and meaningless clichs, which seemed to be the overall theme of this film.Judy Garland and Fred Astaire fans out there are not going to enjoy what I am about to say. This being my first Fred Astaire picture watched, I must admit I was not impressed.  Astaire did nothing to develop his character throughout the film.  While I do agree that it is the job of the director to create these lines, Astaire should have done something instead of prance around hoping to carry this film on just the weight of his tappy feet.  As I watched Easter Parade, I couldn't help but think of Astaire as this manipulator towards his own common good.  I saw him as this evil man who wanted nothing more than to be successfully, but was not willing to do it on his own.  From the opening scenes in this film, where it is obvious that he loves the camera on him, to the moments where he is on stage proving that he is the top dog in dance and song.  Perhaps I misread this film, but I saw Astaire as this guy who had relationship issues.  He wasn't interested in actually falling in love, but didn't want to loose his partner again.  His character Don was determined to be the best in the business, and he didn't care whom he was partnered with which allowed him to reach that goal.  You could see that when he showed minimal emotion towards Nadine when they parted, and how unemotional he because during all of his scenes with Garland.  There was absolutely no chemistry between these two actors.  I believe the age difference to be the biggest hurdle, but the fact that when they gazed into each other's eyes nothing pulled me, demonstrated how poorly the director chose on this film.  You could tell that Walters wanted two big names to anchor this film because he didn't have the glue to keep it together himself.  Coupled with the fact that Johnny was the most random character witnessed in cinematic history also hurt the overall emotional effect of the film.  What was Johnny's relationship with Nadine?  It felt like whatever was available, these two men ran towards, without any emotion or sympathy for anything.  It was disastrous.Not only was the acting enough to be scoffed at, but the plot ... well ... was completely missing.  There were minor threads of plot dangling throughout the film like the dysfunctional wardrobe that Garland wore during one of the dance sequences.  That dress completely represented the direction of this film.  The dress itself was the actual plot, while the falling pieces of fabric represented the audience being tossed about and thrown on the floor in hopes to reconnect with the dress again sometime during the performance.  Alas, we never did.  Due to the plot, we jumped, literally, from emotion to emotion, never quite sealing a secure moment throughout.  One scene we are trying to connect with Johnny and Hannah, the next with Hannah and Don, then there is Nadine and Hannah, or was it Johnny, and what about Don and Nadine?  Jump.  Jump.  Jump.  It became obviously clear that Walters knew that this was a flimsy plot and instead of fixing it, pushed more song and dance into the film to attempt to cover the soiled sections.  It did not work.  Our flimsy characters, no matter how well their singing, could not conceal this broken direction that Walters obviously lost control of.Finally, there were the songs.  Decent numbers, but just too many.  What was the infamous "Easter Parade"?  You would think that a film that chose to have this as their title would explain the ritual a bit further.  Sure, there was a song, but I kept watching Astaire jump around so often that the dizziness caused me to miss the lyrics of the songs.   There is no need to break into song so often about absolutely nothing.  Walter's needed to take a page from a true musical like Singing in the Rain to show him how to correctly combine a great plot with some great songs!Overall, I didn't like this film.  I needed better characters, stronger stories, and the director to just tighten down on this runaway balloon.  I think if you saw Astaire at a bar today, looking like he did in Easter Parade, the first words out of your mouth would be "Glen Quagmire".  He looked like an utter sleaze that preyed on young women, but maybe it was Astaire just trying to stay with his character!Grade: * out of ****
Can't bring myself to say more. I love a good action movie.  Love them.  So what weent wrong?  Well, the effects were there, but it all seemed so detached.  We may have seen most of the action sequences you can do on a ship previously, or we may not.  Bottom line is this:  if you are going to have an action sequence, make it exciting.  Watching the DVD of this, I wasn't able to be drawn in sufficiently to keep me from checking my email.  At less than 100 minutes in length.A boring action movie is just plain wrong, and that's what Poseidon is.
Worst episode EVER!. This was by far the worst episode of this show. The first 10 minutes were dominated by the boring Howard and his sister Bonnie Stern......If You think Anna's cousin Shelly was a trainwreck.......check out these two together on tv....Keep these people off tv please!!!!!!!!! Talk about total trainwrecks!! However it was amusing to see Anna babysit and work at the cafe this didn't redeem the mess Howard and his repulsive sister made of the first 10 minutes..
Bad porn. The setting of this film is in the late 70s, just before adult movie theatres were driven out of business by the invention of the VCR and the subsequent explosion of pornographic VHS tapes.  Burt Reynolds plays a porno director who has the effrontry to try and be "artistic" in his craft.  Heather Graham plays his psycho-starlet, and Mark Wahlberg plays a porn star who is....well.....let's just say, endowed.Wahlberg's character quickly becomes a huge hit and encounters success he would have never dreamed of. Wahlberg's character seems to be a sort of oblique allusion to John Holmes, although I don't know if the film-makers would admit as much.   At any rate, he becomes arrogant and begins to believe that he is loved for factors other than his "package."  This hubris leads to his un-doing as the world of porn coalesces with the world of drugs and LOTS of shady characters.This sounds like it would be the framework for a good movie.  Well, it could have been, but all the way through there seems to be something missing.  There are times the film "seems" to try and convey a message, but I'm not really sure.One thing I do know is that I quickly remembered why I've never cared for Wahlberg.  He has all the screen presence of a bowl of yogurt.   Also, I was expecting a LOT more skin than what the film delivered.  Given the context of the film, one would think that it would be an excuse to parade miles of topless women.  That's simply not the case.In the end, however, the biggest problem of this movie isn't Wahlberg or the lack of nudity.  The difficulty is that it's just plain boring.  I have more than a passing interest in the history of porn, and yet this flick failed to grab me
No need to Suicide. I get the story line but 5 grown women need to suicide!?  The one dare to have a boyfriend and not go home for the night.  Why would that kind of free sprite would kill herself!?!?  It is not matching the character
Disappointed. I bought the DVD based on all the positive reviews, and I think prospective buyers should be warned that not everyone finds this a 5-star movie.  My husband and I, who love old movies, hated it.  My teenagers just found it completely uninteresting.  It was apparently made about the time Alaska became a state, although it deals with an earlier time period, and the movie has not aged well.  The story was uninteresting, the direction was uneven, the comedy (mostly bar fights) felt forced and awkward.  Stewart Granger did not seem to know what he was doing or why his character was there.  Fabian's acting was unmemorable and we felt Capucine was miscast.  We got bored and spent half the movie pointing out to each other how little the sandy beaches and desert terrain looked anything like Alaska (it was obviously shot in southern California).  I gave it two stars because I was able to sit through the entire thing, but I spent most of it asking myself "why?  Why am I wasting my time like this?
A perky American in Europe, way too much emphasis on hotels. I'll devour anything about European travel, but Samantha Brown is a bit too perky and silly for my tastes. I can get over that, but what really ruins this show is her silly obsession about the hotel she stays at in each episode. You've got 20 minutes to tell me about Paris, or London, or Amsterdam, and you're wasting 5 of those minutes on a single expensive hotel? Seriously? That's not what travel is all about, sorry. Otherwise, a decent production. Too bad she's a hotel industry shill. (And she is: Her Great Hotels series is sponsored by the hotels she vists. Guess who foots the bill?
Far from Eisenstein's finest hour. Alexander Nevsky may be an Eisenstein film, but that doesn't make it any less cheesy. In fact, it makes some of those Italian peplum look substantial by comparison, with it's crude stereotyping and propaganda as the Russian people rise to save their homeland in defiance of the capitalist and aristocratic oppressors of the people and do battle with the baby-burning Papist Germans (how Stalin ever signed the Ribbentrop-Molotov Pact after this hatchet job is a mystery).Much of the filming is as clumsy as the characterization, with obvious painted backdrops, clumsy medieval-speak dialog, constant reversion to silent moviemaking techniques at their least compelling and a tendency to go for height in the image to such an extent that the action is often barely clinging to the bottom of the frame. It's reputation rests on Prokofiev's dreary score and the spectacular battle on the ice, although both are a mixture of the good, the bad and the downright lazy. Only moments in the aftermath of the battle retain any real potency
Movie is great, but Unbox is uncooked. Movie got 2/3 through and just quit. No problem, this is Windows right? Just reboot and start where you left off. Only for whatever reason I can't restart this movie from anywhere but the beginning. I'm not going to watch this moving over from the beginning just to see if it fails in the same place again. Only a couple bucks, but definitely not worth it
My Friend & I saw this in the 70's....... ...and I can remember some of the scenes to this day (i'm 49 now). I was 16;my friend,17 at the time. I used to hitchhike to and from her house a lot in those days,and after that movie, I didn't-for a long time. At the time it was a really scary film,and the urban legend at the time was that it was based on a true story,which only added to the starkness of it. Of course,as some have opined here, what is perceived as horrifying then and what's considered horrifying now is like comparing oranges and rutabagas."Horror-and-brutality technology" in films has definitely-and I use this word wryly-evolved
Not what I had In Mind........... Let's get one thing straight. I loved bionicle legos and when i first heard of this movie, i was hyped up to buy it. but when i saw it, i was really disappointed. let's see how this movie is:VOICESthe voices are really cheesy. They don't fit the bionicles at all. I'd rather have no voices than any!PLOTOkay, they totally missed out on the original bionicles. They only focussed on the second bionicle design which is Ugly!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!THE MUSICI have not much to say, but this music was............................... freaky.OVERALLthis movie would of gotten a one star if the plot was bad nothing relating to the stories in the magazines or website. However, the plot was okay following a bit at the comics and websites. so this somewhat a "ok" movie. just be warned
Not Happy. I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?
WARNING: Wrong Episode!. This item is supposedly titled "UFOs: The First Encounters." It is, however, an episode about reincarnation. It is incorrectly labeled. DO NOT PURCHASE unless you are looking for an episode on reincarnation
Poor support. This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet
Brit Pomposity at its...er...Worst. Lots of dramatic images, just watch it muted.  The narrative is merely one long whine, and more often than not misstates details.  Shows numerous clips with no explanation or description given.  VERY short on details, long on opinion
Regional issues. Unless I missed it, it was unclear that the video download only worked in certain regions so I ended up wasting my money.
WARNING: Wrong Episode!. This item is supposedly titled "UFOs: The First Encounters." It is, however, an episode about reincarnation. It is incorrectly labeled. DO NOT PURCHASE unless you are looking for an episode on reincarnation
Fair. This wasn't as bad as I thought it was going to be. The biggest disappointment for me were the main players. Few of them really looked like the historical persona. Lincoln's portrayal was a letdown from the start. Although he looked fairly close, his voice was all wrong. Lincoln had a squeaky voice with a real Kentucky twang. (This comes from observations by Lincoln's law partner, Herndon as well as Nicolaye &amp; Haye, Lincoln's secretaries and biographers) Hal Holbrook actually came closest to the right pitch and tone. Even more annoying was the portrayal of Sec. of War Edward Stanton. Here, he comes across like a frustrated grandfather. The real Stanton was NOT a Lincoln fan, he once refered to Lincoln as the &quot;original baboon&quot; and constantly challenged the 16th president on issue after issue. Lincoln would let Stanton have his temper tantrums, but managed to &quot;put his foot down&quot; at the right time. Stanton himself was far from well liked by other members of the cabinet and was actually feared and loathed by many. First Lady Mary Todd was far too slender and attractive in this depiction. If you've ever seen photos of the real Mary, she looked dowdy if not downright frumpy. Her rages were legendary in Washington. She once chased a deliveryman down the street with a broomstick. Secretary Seward called her a &quot;she-wolf&quot; and others dubbed her a bit**. A surprise for me was the portrayal of Dr. Charles A. Leale, the 27 year old Army surgeon who took charge of Lincoln after the shooting. The actor bore more than striking resemblance. It was almost spooky to watch. Jim Bishop's book was followed closely which was one of the more appealing parts of this film. Even snippets of dialog from the book crept in with regularity
another failure with Dolph Lundgren. Dolph Lundgren (Universal Soldier, Blackjack) plays a man who is hired to take out a primary target and helping him is his old partner, Gina Bellman. Soon things heat up as the two security guards working at the building they are at start to get fiesty and one of them takes drugs and sees spiders and stuff. The 2 are also in a heated romance and get caught in a deadly cat and mouse game of double cross as the agency they are working for want them dead. Another Dolph Lundgren stinker vehicle though Lundgren can't act if his life depended on it. He couldnt pull of He-Man and The Punisher, he can't pull off anything else. Gina Bellman is hot but her acting is horrible as well as the rest of the cast. There's nothing like being hired to kill people and then have sex. Directed by Russell Mulcahy (Highlander). Bottom line is this actioner is a borefest
Is this horror ??. Well...don't know where to start......bought this one because it has Jeffrey Combs in it, Stuart Gorden is director.....and they did a good job on Re-animator.but let me tell you, horror freaks will be disapointed. Only one really bloody scene is worth watching...not because of the blood, not because of the gore.....just, because it is the only bloody scene in the movie...a nice looking woman is eaten by the "castel freak".....If you have seen Re-animator, The Evil dead, From Beyond, Hellraiser and maybe The Thing, then skip this one..you will be disapointed like me....Even a John Woo action movie has more blood in it.....
this is a movie?. After watching this movie I wish an asteroid would hit Earth, or the movie studio that put it out.  And what a lame 4th of July scene.  I hope the movie extras in that scene didn't get paid, especially the putz in the white t-shirt.   Geeeesh what a waste of video tape.
ITS OFFICIAL - BRAD PITT  CANNOT ACT. Ive read reviews for this piece of schlock calling it a "  cult classic" ( isnt that  what they always call crappy movies that only stoned college kids can watch? )  or "underated" (theres a reason  it was underated -IT SUCKS). Brad Pitts performance was laughable. Watch any episode of Gunsmoke and tell me Early Gracewasnt a bad impersonation of Festus from start to finish. And that guy from the X Files ,David sumthin or other, mumbles in this annoying monotone throughout the whole film. This guy adds about as much to the movie as those ads for the concession stand.And Juliet Lewis playing a  yet another brain dead bimbo. Who woulda saw THAT one coming??? The only reason I gave this one 2 stars is its so bad it just kept me on the edge of my seat. I think its called " morbid fascination", like when you stop to gawk at a really bad traffic accident - it repulses you but you just cant turn away. If you want my advice ( and you probably dont) take the money you were gonna spend on this movie and go buy a Gunsmoke DVD. That way you get Festus AND you get to watch Matt Dillon beat the h*** outta somebody
"It was so boring, that I could scream!". This line, spoken by Julie Christie to Dirk Bogarde in "Darling" just about sums up my feelings towards this movie. Although I am halfway done with this movie I think this is one of the most boring films I have ever seen and I am stopping this movie when it gets to the scene where Christie looks at herself in the mirror as she removes her clothing. I am done with this movie (believe it or not) and it only got worse: Christie's character Diana Scott marries an Italian man who hello, is old enough to be father! And oh yes, he's an aging prince (in what had to be a ripoff of what happened to Grace Kelly and what would happen to Jacqueline Kennedy and the announcer in the newsreel that calls her "Princess Diana" almost made me laugh). That nearly made me grab a gun and shoot my TV (a la Elvis Presley) considering that this is the same setup that occurs in "Georgy Girl" and that is spoiled British girl living in Swinging England marries older man (Three words: Anna Nicole Smith). Also, I would like to know what are these reviewers smoking in saying that Christie deserved the Oscar for Best Actress? She didn't at all because it should (and I mean SHOULD) of gone to Julie Andrews for "The Sound of Music" (my pick for the best movie of the 1960's) because not only did she overtake her performance of "Mary Poppins," for which she won the Oscar, she pulverized every performance by a female that year including Christie. And there's a problem with the Academy: They can't seem to pull the trigger in giving back-to-back Oscars to the same person.I'm not alone in this arugment: In Danny Perry's book "Alternate Oscars" he picks Andrews for Best Actress of 1965 and states that the reason why the AMPAS gave the Oscar to Christie was not because it was 'The British Invasion,' but they saw it as a way to give an Oscar to Christie's other film "Doctor Zhivago" which was T.S.O.M.'s rival and added to the fact that "Zhivago" had no acting nominations. There's another Oscar problem: They don't know when to be hip.Also, does it seem like Dirk Bogarde and Lawrence Harvey were the two worst actors in film history? Because it seems to me that every movie that I have seen with them are bad; weather it was this movie, or "The Manchurian Candidate" with Harvey, or "Modesty Blaise" with Bogarde.In conclusion, I think some moviegoers should change their mind about buying this movie because this has to be the worst performance ever to win an Oscar. Or as what Bogarde said to Christie: (a fitting way to close this review since that I end where it begins) "I don't take taxis that are filled with whores!
Firefly: Excellent.  But buy it on DVD, not "Unbox"!. Read the Unbox terms of use CAREFULLY before choosing this route over a regular DVD purchase.  It is not your usual set of "blah blah" legal jargon.For example, 3c:"Removal of Software. If you uninstall or otherwise remove the Software, your ability to view all Digital Content you have downloaded to the Authorized Device will immediately and automatically terminate and we reserve the right to delete all Digital Content from that Authorized Device without notice to you."If you ever remove the Unbox software, Amazon may revoke your ability to view the Firefly episodes you paid for and may even delete them from your machine!Amazon, I've ordered literally thousands of dollars of stuff through you and always had a great experience; why did you let Unbox create these anti-customer terms of use??
passed ages-passed showcases. I simply spent time watchnig this French response to a Chaplin-style but non-silent motion picture.Maybe, it was a top at the timing of the making.
typical van damme. Is that THE ROCK who is in this movie looking malnourished with the rotted teeth and sinister contact lenses make-up? This movie is horrible. But, it is typical for a Van Damme flick. Horrible acting, over-produced with that cheesy waxy feel to it, non-existent storyline and the usual idiotic ending. I have to admit though, that I have most of Van Damme's movies. He is a decent Martial Artist. In my opinion his best movies are "Kickboxer" and "Bloodsport". These are his only movies that are actually enjoyable to watch and somewhat inspiring. I have a few observations / comments / questions to make that should be humorous for the seasoned Van Damme fan: Isn't it funny that with all his millions of dollars that Van Damme can't find a plastic surgeon who can hide that silly bump on his forehead... Why must every character Van Damme plays speak with a French accent? He tries to play a wide variety of different action hero roles but always the character must in some way originate from France. Isn't this preposterous? You'd think if Van Damme was serious about his "acting" career he would have attempted to remedy this flaw. I mean, it's not like his acting roles are all that challenging but it would be nice if he was even partially believable in his roles... Why does Van Damme always have to show his bare rear-end so much? Does he think WOMEN are watching his silly movies? You'd think someone would realize that mostly men watch action films and the majority of men have no desire to see his naked backside so WHY SHOW IT? ... Is it me or does Van Damme need a good hair stylist? His hair is especially stupid in CYBORG. He looks like he should be in the cast for "Revenge of the Nerds"... Speaking of style, was it Van Damme himself who invented that stupid tucked in shirt with pleated Dockers pulled up way too high over the waist with a snazzy belt 80's look? If so, for this deed alone he should be reprimanded... Why was Van Damme such a huge action hero? He is so friggin' short that if you saw him in line behind you at a convenience store I don't think he would look all that intimidating. At least Steven Seagal is tall and tough looking although Van Damme is definitely in better shape. You never see Seagal showing his muscles.... Lastly, even though I can laugh about Van Damme I am definitely a fan. That being said, I wonder if any of his other fans share my sentiments about the producers, directors and just about everyone else involved with most of his many films. I think they should be ashamed of the way they have done their work. Van Damme has alot of heart, maybe not so much as Stallone, but more heart than most action heroes like Shwarzenegger, etc. The people involved with most of Van Damme films have truly done a disservice to him and to action film fans everywhere. They should have taken pride in their work. It's not like they weren't paid handsomely for their services
"Welcome to the Suck". I want my two hours back.  This film struggles to find an audience.  I cannot imagine that it will inspire anyone to join the military (at least the fictional one it portrays!).  Furthermore, it's message is utterly ambiguous- much less than what the veiwer deserves for putting up with its boorish crassness.  Skip this one
Here we go again. I gave this movie 1 star because it is not a true documentary.  It falls more along the same fodder as "Spinal Tap".  It is missing a counter point from GM.  One could argue that Roger had chances to talk with Moore, but choose not to.  One the other hand, Rogers missing interview is what gave the movie such an emotional hold.  I believe that Moore counted on not being granted air time at GM for the production of this film.  An interview would have killed the tone.Watch the nightly news NOW.  Last night, March 22nd 2006, GM offered a one time buy out to some of it's employees.  The news reported that GM cannot afford to maintain its relationship with the UAW (Just like what caused the Flint situation in the film).  This same thing happened in the late 1980's and brought forth this extremely biased movie.  This film is entertaining in a strange way, but should not be considered to be the absolute truth.  Watch it with a grain of salt.For what it's worth,Under close examination,Careful consideration andKeen intellect, you will see a undercover messageYou might need to examine closely the content.Outwardly, things are not what they seemUntil you look more closely.Many times the basic concept isMisread in the dialogOnce you see this, andOpen your mind to it,Rational thought willEmerge
WARNING: Wrong Episode!. This item is supposedly titled "UFOs: The First Encounters." It is, however, an episode about reincarnation. It is incorrectly labeled. DO NOT PURCHASE unless you are looking for an episode on reincarnation
&quot;Turbulence 3: Heavy Metal&quot;. This is one of the worst films ever made! And I mean it!! One of the worst scripts I have ever come across. The acting is hammy and the direction is very weak! There was no reason for this movie to exist! &quot;Turbulence&quot; was a good movie and they should of stopped at that but two sequels! No way! If you like the 1st mabye try &quot;Turbulence 2: Fear of Flying&quot; but stay away of the 3rd. This is one terrible movie! Believe ME!
Did not work. The ones that are posted twice do not work. If they are posted once, you can try to download it, but it might not work. The video only worked for about a minute. Shame, since I really like this show and I wanted Amazon Unbox to be cool. The one cent CSI works, go download tha
Cant watch. I downloaded this program and it was garbled and video as if played in slow motion.  This is the first of two downloads that didn't play.  I know it was not my computer because I did download three that played ok
Same Thing. The Dane Cook episode is the same one that it on his "Harmful If Swallowed" c.d. The c.d. also has the uncensored version of this routine that is over 1 hour long. The one star rating is not based on the content. It is based upon Amazon not sharing this fact with customers
Almost unwatchable sci-fi turkey. This blatently derivative (hat tip to Ridley Scott's Alien, with a hint of Stanley Donen's Saturn 3 thrown in) movie should surely win the award for the most irritatingly gratuitous over-use of strobe lighting ever. This makes it extremely uncomfortable to watch and is, presumably, employed to detract from the lack of any genuine thrills. Throw in a ridiculously precocious ship's computer and a downright silly robot, and this adds up to one helluva big turkey in space. James Spader and Angela Bassett do their best to make something out of an inadequate script and plot, but this is unremittingly dreadful and dull.  The &quot;happy ever after&quot; finale will probably make you cringe in its corniness. Supernova's only redeeming factor is that it is very short
Funny Premise - Unfunny Film. I was very disappointed with this film. The premise was really intriguing, with Elvis switching places with an Elvis impersonator who as we all know goes on to die at Graceland leaving the real Elvis to scratch out a living as - what else - an Elvis "impersonator." And now, at the end of The King's life, he's a semi-invalid in a nursing home being attacked by a killer zombie mummy. Since it's Texas, the mummy has a more than passing resemblance to Stevie Ray Vaughn. And oh, yeah, JFK is also in this nursing home, having inexplicably been transformed into Ozzie Davis.How can you miss with a setup like this? Well, for starters by assuming the premise is so funny there's no real need to provide any additional comedy. The movie is flat, with very little humor. As other reviewers have noted, it moves at a glacial pace, even allowing for the protagonists being 80-somethings who don't move like they used to.Sure, the acting is several notches above the norm for a low budget film, but there's no point in making a comdey that isn't funny.Nice try, but booooooooooring. Not at all recommended.
Like All Gossip: A Lot of Talk About Nothing!. A very boring and stupid film about college freshmen with a kindergarten maturity level. The movie is horribly slow to get to the point and is riddled with nonsense dialogue: I've heard better lines in 'Fast Times At Richmond High' thank you.Altogether a very forgettable film that has a lot of talk about nothing. Don't believe the great reviews about this film: the film might appeal to the 14-17 year-old crowds fantasizing about how 'cool' college life might be with all the 'cool' people and 'parties.' If you're not in that category, skip this boring film and save both your time and your money.
Notorious Euro-Trash. Umberto Lenzi's most notorious entry into the "Italian Cannibal" subgenre is a contender with Cannibal Holocaust with the most bloodshed. Whereas Cannibal Holocaust was a well made exploitation film, Ferox is just a standard Euro-trash film laden with shocking gore moments. A student travels into the deep Amazon with a group of friends to prove here thesis that cannibalism never existed. They of course find evidence to prove this wrong. Our characters meet up with two criminals (tied in with a poorly explained subplot that takes place in New York City) who, guilty by association, get the entire group into sickening torture situations by a vengeful cannibal tribe. As usual, in poor taste, there are some real animal killings. Most of the music was taken from Umerto Lenzi's previous cannibal film Eaten Alive!
Not So Super. In an era of Batman Begins, Sin City, Spiderman, and 300, it's easy to forget that there was a time when a movie based on a comic book wasn't a sure thing.  For an example of a spectacular misfire, Spawn comes to mind; the movie was so obsessed with making the film look like a comic book that it actually FELT like you were watching a comic book, complete with isolated panels, minimal movement, and jarring transitions between scenes.  One moment Spawn's threatening some guy and the next he's standing on some building with his really fabulous cloak whipping in the wind.Similarly, Superman is a visually beautiful movie that has nowhere to go.  The iconic scenes of Superman basking in the sun's rays, or hovering about the Earth listening for crime, or when he's actually doing something heroic (which happens far too infrequently) fail to cover up the complete lack of a coherent plot.  For example:Superman's been gone for years...one assumes that whatever he discovered on his long journey would have something to do with the plot.  Nope.Lex Luthor has discovered Superman's Fortress of Solitude and plans to create an entire continent out of a hybridized Kryptonite.  Surely that means Superman won't even be able to get NEAR the place, right?  Nope.Once said "continent" shows up, it's clear that the whole thing is patently uninhabitable.  This is Lex's big plan, to create a rock formation and play cards while he waits for...people to call him and offer him money or something?  Surely he must have more up his sleeve? Nope.Heck, the world's changed a lot since Superman's been gone, right?  Wouldn't it make sense to really pound home how different Earth is, with it's global warming, crazy politics, and pop starlets?  Nope.  Instead, the crazy new world is supposed to be summed up with a kid taking a picture of Superman with his cell phone--that's right, the kid scooped the Daily Planet with just his camera phone! ISN'T THAT WACKY?Superman Returns is very much a movie in love with the original and, while visually faithful, it's a very poor imitation.  Yes, Brandon Routh looks like a spitting image of Christopher Reeves, but he has no real acting chops to display since he barely speaks.  Kate Bosworth is far too young and whiny as Lois Lane, Jimmy Olsen (Sam Huntington) still wears a bowtie for some reason, and the rest of the cast is too caught up in being iconic comic book characters to be memorable.  Even the amazing Kevin Spacey can only be a marginally cartoonish Lex Luthor, jarringly transforming into a murderous thug at the movie's climax.The pacing is all wrong.  Superman saving Lois from a plane crash is great.  Superman fighting criminals with belt-fed chain guns is excellent.  Superman drowning, Superman moping, Superman frustrated over Lois Lane, Superman convalescing in a friggin' hospital?  NOT GREAT.Superman Returns has its moments, and if you squint your eyes it almost feels like the magic from the first movie has been captured.  But then it's gone and the movie drags, and drags, and drags.  Superman has been co-opted to be a Christ-like father-son parable and on the way Bryan Singer forgot what made the first Superman movie so great: it was FUN!I could have made a better movie with my camera phone.
Histoire d'eau. This movie is more a curiosity than a "chef d'oeuvre" (French for masterpiece) of erotism. It hasn't aged very well either... It may have been a hit then, because it was one of the first of its kind - although I am not sure.Coming from my fellow French men, I was expecting a more sensual and passionate love story rather this 2 hours of voyeurism and sadomasochism. I found the movie rather boring, expect maybe for a few scenes. The total exploitation of a young woman for sex and pleasure will be very disturbing to some.
Cant watch. I downloaded this program and it was garbled and video as if played in slow motion.  This is the first of two downloads that didn't play.  I know it was not my computer because I did download three that played ok
Wow forgot how awful this film was. What a disgusting stupid movie. I saw this when i was just a kid. and news flash drew barrymore doesnt look like that anymore. Not trying to be rude, but what the hell is wrong with that girls chin? It grew over the years, because she looked fine in bad girls this movie, and i think boys on the side, but movies like never been kissed, and at the end of charlie's angels full throttle, all you can see when you look at her face is that huge white chin, like a jay leno chin. reminds me of the moon man from mcdonalds... with the huge chin that sticks way out. it's a cruel fact of what time does to our looks, when you get older you arent as pretty as you use to be, but i never thought chins grew bigger, in her early years her chin was of normal size now it looks huge and deformed. AS for this movie, not sexy at all, unless you find a backstabbing, murdering, lying, crazy ass teenage girl ..... sexy? Maybe men would like it, because all it has is sex scenes. only for shallow people who get excited when it comes to "that fantasy" of a much older man having sex with a teenage girl, and he's old enough to be her father. I dont find it sexy at all, it just wasn't believable in any way shape or form. A complete waste of time, money, and talent. Flat out garbage. thumbs down
Speeding to hell. The story here dosen't matter. The main characters fuse into a missle of meth and insanity towards an explosive ending. Scwartzman escapes his fate temporarily and murphy is blessed with a reprieve but rourke pays the full price for his evil concoction, meth. Quirky directing and film editing can be somewhat distracting but not meaningless. Roberts is so gay you want to smack his face. he an rourke have history on film and play out their familiarity. Rourke is phenomonal again as an immoral genius, a role he plays better than anyone today in film. BR
Disappointed. I bought the DVD hoping to see one skit -- the funniest one my family had ever seen on SNL. We had it recorded on VHS many MANY years ago and somehow lost it. But we would sit and laugh until we cried watching the skit where Phil played the drill sargeant who came up with nicknames for his new recruits -- "Smiling Laughing Joking Around Man" ... "Man Who Reminds Me Of My Doggie" ... "Hair Head!"  I thought for SURE that THE funniest skit in all of SNL history would be on there, but no...it was just a 20 second clip. I was SO disappointed!!And it was quite surprising to see some of the skits they chose to show in their entirety...They just weren't funny.On a positive note, there was a serious song and dance number at the very end of the DVD that was so sweet, it brought me to tears. And the bonus featuring Phil's audition was quite interesting. But overall, I don't recommend it.
Does not do the book justice. Wuthering Heights the novel grabs you at the first page and drags you through passion, betrayal, madness, despair, greed, hatred, and revenge. It's not necessarily a pleasant read, but always an engrossing one. Emily Bronte's characters jump off the page and will continue to haunt you long after you've finished the book.Modern day moviemakers have had a notoriously bad time translating any of the Bronte sisters' works into film and this is no exception. The characters are representations in name only and fail to capture any of the true spirit behind this amazing book. Juliet Binoche and Ralph Fiennes are two of the best actors working in film today, but this movie is a definite low point for both.As Heathcliff and Catherine, Fiennes and Binoche seem to have failed to grasp the depth or the passions of the characters and their performances are flat and bland. Binoche's personality is too grounded and mature for the wild and carefree Cathy so she compensates with endless giggling that got on my nerves. Fiennes comes across as greasy and sullen instead of a tormented and complex soul; he simply does not have the charisma or the depth to play such a demanding role. The other characters are likewise lacking in realism, only Janet McTeer fares well, she is fabulous as Ellen Dean.Even if the acting were better, the story does not capture the essence of the book. Everything moves too quickly, the film jumps around frequently and large plot holes are left either unexplained or are patched quickly with a few brusque words. Sinead O'Conner's appearance as Emily Bronte to bookend the film is contrived and unnecessary.This film was very obviously made on a budget and the sets and costumes show it. The wigs are dreadful and the costumes are for the most part, ugly and unflattering. Fiennes actually looks potbellied in some of his vests!Maybe someday someone will make a film that does this remarkable book justice. This isn't it
Why the Charge. Curious as to why Amazon would charge for this content when CBS offers it for free on the official Survivor Website.  Yeah, at the CBS site you have sit through 4 commercials, but it is worth it to not have to download any extra programs
I've been cheated by Amazon. It really sucks, tried to download but it's not able to be viewed in pc's outsided the united states. Crikey.I'll have to wait for reruns to watch it on the telly.Whatta shame amazon dot com. Let's send a CSI to yer headquarters
For Lana Clarkson fans only. An incredibly bad film, whose only redeeming feature is Lana Clarkson, in (and out of) some skimpy outfits.  She's completely gorgeous, but even she can't save a disaster of a film.  Buy Deathstalker instead
It was great and awful at the same time. Blue Lagoon was a commercial success but due to the terrible acting and the cheesy storyline, the movie did very bad with the critics.I personally loved the beautiful scenery - the ocean and the islands - it really does make the movie worth seeing.  And Brooke Shields was just about the most gorgeous girl to look at when she made this movie - this is why the movie was a commercial success.  Though Brooke's acting was just terrible, she was so beautiful to look at that no one cared.  Now Brooke is trying so hard to become a serious actress.  She tries and tries and tries... however though she has improved somewhat, she just is not a good actress.  I just watched Bob the Butler and throughout the movie her efforts to try so hard to act well made it that I just couldn't see her character.  Brooke Shields trying so hard to act was all that anyone could see.  However this doesn't for a second take away from her great beauty and sweet nature.  She is a very nice person and a very lovely woman.So if you haven't seen Blue Lagoon, see it if you just want to get lost in the beauty of nature and Brooke Shields.  Otherwise you'll just laugh at this movie.
Terribly Disappointed!!!!  Curse Words!!!!. I purchased this movie for my 7 year old twin boys birthday thinking that because it said the rating was PG that it would be fine.  Also, the market for Transformers is huge with boys their age and the toys being sold everywhere.  Wow, were we hugely surprised to hear curse words on this cartoon movie.  These were not just words like shoot or dang, but the real deal.  I remember Transformers when I was growing up and I certainly do not remember their being foul language in the cartoons.  I am going to take this matter up with higher management and at least get my money back and try find out what they were thinking.  Who knows what the rating will end up being for the upcoming movie at the box office.Concerned in Alabam
The worst film of all time ?. Artie may well be a baby gorilla, but the film sucks
Interesting Horror Premise, But Moves Astonishingly Slowly. The Tenant is a film that wastes time and loses viewers.  Long stretches of time where nothing happens, something quickly happens, then we are back to the monotonous pace - excruciating to watch.  Never have I checked and checked to see how much of a film was left.The story sounds really good and gripping - tenant moves into the apartment of a woman who committed suicide.  He feels something is going on with the building, the manager, and the other tenants.  Slowly, he begins to identify with the dead girl.  But the pace is so slow.  The main character, played by Roman Polanski, is so boring and unsympathetic that you wish he would just jump out of the window and get it over with.  He has a beautiful girl interested in him - why?The end - which I won't reveal - is absurd instead of unsettling, mainly because of the duration of time it took to get to that point
There must be a conspiracy... Something fishy is certainly going on if the average review for this movie is 4 stars.  This is truely THE worst adaptation of a novel ever made.  Costner should be tried for crimes against cinematography.  This movie is far beyond AWFUL
I bought my DVD copy from Amazon. I love Sophia Loren as an actress however this DVD as 3 movies in one package is a very very very poor quality DVD. Colors are bad, picture is bad and the sound is even worse. don't waste your money. My DVD copy was bought from Amazon.this is my advic
Not a definite favorite. I don't like the fact that somebody can take a horror movie and turn it into a joke!I couldn't even get through this movie once.I just don't like films that express monsters as four-legged dog creatures.The Relic is a story about a ritual gone wrong when some foolish explorer actually drinks this weird concoction from a tribe of Indians.Mysteriously enough,the liquid turns him into a beastly creature that lives in the sewers under a mansion.Don't get this movie
banality by any other name. Jeez, maybe I am getting old, but I really found absolutely nothing about this film to be interesting or original in the slightest.A brilliant scientist.  Disfigured.  Angry.  Finds temporary techie fix for face.  Goes to get bad guys.  Fighting.  More fighting.  Still more fighting.  Ex mate learns he's alive.  He leaves her anyway (he's too ugly).  The end.  More to come, if successful.  Not recommended
DVD PUT IT ON DVD. I DONT WONT TO DOWNLOAD IT I WONT IT ALL ON DVD THIS IS WASTE MONE
Top 10 or top 5 ? (worst ones). One of the worst films ever. Absurd. The whole story.In adition, tring to be an "important, deeply movie". Just pathetic. Don't even try to rent it, don't even try to talk about it. The sex scenes are awful too. Nothing to save, nothing to see, nothing...really, a full horrible experience
GREAT HORSES!!!!. Movie is horrible but horses are FABULOUS!  This is some of the best footage of the fabled Andalusian Horses I've ever seen - if there's more out there somebody please let me know!  Bought the movie just to see the horses
Very Irreverant remake of a Disney Icon. I am appalled at the greed that Disney must have to milk out a classic like "The Absent Minded Professer". I found this to be one of the worst if not the worst remake of any movie. I found the plot to be too embelished as it made for the relationship between the characters played by Robin Williams and Marsha Gay-Hayden to be one of where it either tried to remake the safe and easy happy ending that's throughout all Disney movies, or it showed to be one where the parties had to wear their hearts out on their sleeves. I also feel that with the Character of "Flubber" it was a waste of time considering I don't remember any merchandising from the character. They should've stayed with the bouncing rubber balls from the original. I also feel that with the promotion of the Flubber substance that it was all shallow, and commericial as where in the original it was going to be put to good use in the military, and here it was to make a buck. I feel that there are some movies that are best to just be left in original state, and not be remade, and this is one of them.
Survivor Rip Off. I have bought 2 seasons of Survivor on unbox and both of them are not complete. Very dissapointing. Guatemala  episode 11 is from a completely different season and it is missing the last 2 episodes and the reunion show. Just leaves you hanging. Exile Island is missing the final episode it just goes from the competition between Danielle and Cirie for a spot in the final 3 to the live reunion show
Not happy. This is only a portion of this episode.  It cuts off in the middle of a sentence
TERI HATCHER NAKED? BIG DEAL - WHERE'S THE CURVES?. She's built like a 12-year-old boy... give me Vida Guerra anyday
Missing episodes. This series is being sold with missing episodes, like many others here in Unbox. Do they think their customers are so dumb? Would you buy a DVD series with a missing DVD? What sense does this make? What a disappointment this service is..
Bad times. VE2 has a ton of potential, but it just doesn't work out.  Brandy Davis is both cute and sexy, of course, but Playboy's Testing the Limits is a much better showcase for her, um, talents.  Not to be mean, but most of the film's other women just aren't that attractive, and many of the sex scenes are actually irritating because of the obnoxious soundtrack.  Contrary to a previous reviewer, the massage scene is fairly ordinary.  The girl-girl stripper scene is the most disappointing, however.  It starts really well, with the straight girl gradually overcoming her shyness and enjoying the stripper, but even the unrated version then fades to black without any real action.  The only scene worth watching at all is blue-collar vignette, with two girls and one guy hooking up. Stay away from this one
Another overrated, underachieving, unimpressive French film. This movie epitomizes the sub-genre of "French films".  Which is to say it engenders every tired stereotype of what makes some French films either unwatchable or unenjoyable (the other type of films from France or by French directors, including Jean-Pierre Juinet/Luc Besson/ etc, who have a good sense of pacing and action and frenetic mood).To explain my statement about stereotypical French films, the movies in question consistently consist of stilted drama unlikable characters who do not have much use for the concept of understatement or indoor voice, whose lives are always immersed in melodrama, whether or not circumstances warrant it.  These films also do not seem to place much value in pacing, and indeed regard a slow and plodding progression as an indication of depth and thought, even if such elements are not evident.  Something else that seems troubling about French film (if not the culture itself) is the seemingly nonchalant attitude about physical coercion in sexual encounters.  In more than one interview Gerard Depardieu has cavalierly waxed nostalgic about participating in gang rapes during his teen years.  Correspondingly, this film has more than one occasion of where a teenage girl is assaulted, and in each case the matter is regarded with minor (if any) attention at best.There is also the inveterately disfunctional interactions between all parties in this film, as is so common.  As it turns out, hardly of the characters are particularly likable or sympathetic.  The father was conveyed as a marginally sympathetic character at the end, until his encounter with Lise.  One thing I will give the French credit for is that they do not feel compelled towards using formulaic, predictable happy endings.Aside from this, the title has an apt metaphor in the plot that has been mentioned in other reviews.  However, I was not very impressed with the film, for the plodding execution and other reasons listed.  I didn't think the movie was completely terrible, but I also think it wasn't very strong (barely 2 stars).  Additionally, both the film's synopsis and several other sources are guilty of misleading descriptions regarding the so-called erotic/sensual nature of the girls' relationship.  If this is why you are renting it, you will be very disappointed.  Otherwise, if you are an unremitting Francophile or praiser of foreign films, you will find some excuse to laud this film, if for no other reason than your need to.
Dont get "Fiji" final week ... Dont dwnld " Survivor, "Thunderstorms & Sacrifice" ". Its my fault for not reading the whole thing. you would think that the last episode would be the finale , but NO, its just a 10 minute recap going to the finale 4. I didnt even get a full 45 minute episode. No finale. I got rippped off. $1.99 dwnld not well spent. Dont bother dwnldng any episode of fiji if you dont know the ending. Because they dont have that episode, not even the reunion show
AMAZON SUCKS. I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!
Language is not Russian (as stated by amazon) but Chezh. Be aware!. If you don't understand Russian and going to follow subtitles - this one is for you. The DVD quality is perfect (I'm not gonna say anything about the movie - lots of reviews here). But the fact that amazon said it is Russian but it turned out to be Chezh made me sad.
what?. This movie was so stupid, everyone listens to Nina when she is clearly messing with their lives. They are stupid enough to believe her, and well I don't even know what else happens cause I saved myself and changed the channel
Power. I could not get interested in this movie. It was slow moving and BORING
Nose candy? Want some?. For the first time in reviewing films, I found myself immediately uninterested in this story.  I don't know if it was the way that it was filmed or the story behind the characters, but it felt bland, overused, and completely unoriginal.  Within the first thirty minutes, I found myself rather apathetic with all the characters and the story.  I felt as if I had seen this structure before, and Tart was providing nothing new to surprise me.  After thinking that it may just be my mood, I stopped the film and chose to start it fresh in the morning, but the same feeling persisted.  I just didn't care.  That is not a good sign.  The characters were bland.  When I say bland, I literally mean that by watching them develop, you will never have any flavor hit your palate.  The story seemed recycled, nearly to the point of plagiarism.  Now, I am not saying that Christina Wayne stole this story, but she added nothing fresh to the perspective.  The casting was horrid, the underlying symbolism and themes were so far lost that no critic could find them (nor the characters), and the stories were vague and sloppy.  You knew nothing about anyone or anything, and instead of pushing more emphasis on the characters, we instead found ourselves with drugs, minor sex, and money pushed into our faces.  These are themes we have seen in every film since the dawn of film time, yet somehow could not be creatively captured by Wayne.What immediately pulled me away from this story?  It was mainly the characters.  I have seen most of Brad Renfro's work, and honestly he needs to redefine himself.  Director Larry Clark has defined him, and oddly he cannot get out of that stereotypical character.  Within the first twenty minutes of Renfro's screen time I was bored.  I knew exactly what he was trying to portray and why.  It was spectacular nor impressive, just repetitive.  He needed to bring some excitement or suspense to his role, instead of just blandly playing this random socialite.  Without a strong character, the final climax of this film comes instead as a letdown.  Renfro did not showcase the best of his abilities in this film.  While I am on the subject ... nobody showcased the best of their abilities.  What is going on with Dominique Swain, outside of Lolita, I don't believe she has really emerged as an actress, and following-up with roles such as Cat Storm doesn't help. Bijou Phillips was the only actress that I witnessed actually try to bring something remarkable to the screen, sadly due to everyone else's horrid acting, she was lost.  Rambling here and there, and honestly nearly forgotten about during the second act.  Melanie Griffith was a pointless cast and most of this film's budget probably went to her TWO scenes that she was in.  Maybe the rest of it went to the random guy from The Kids in the Hall, who desperately needs to place himself far away from this project.My biggest problem, outside of the acting, was the pacing of this film.  Nothing, and this is hard for me to say, but nothing gelled together.  There were so many sub-stories happening throughout the course of the film that no actual substance was formed.  The robberies, the teenage "angst and woe", the wealthy socialites learning how horrible real life is, the random Kids in the Hall guy, and even the ending just felt rushed and horribly edited together.  With this shoddy craftsmanship the whole story never really formed any true shape.  Family structures were never defined, characters were never given any emotion, and all we are left with are bits and pieces of honest leftovers.  Wayne did not complete the task at hand.While I hate to put the entire burden on the director, with this film I am left with little choice.  With a horrid title that just screamed the complete opposite of what this film was about, with amateurish directional ability the cast pretty much was able to give every emotion in every scenes, leaving us with disgusting acting and poor developments, and with vague storytelling it is hard to place any "good" behind Tart.  This was a film I had heard nothing about, and after viewing it I can see why.  All Wayne has done with this film is random take excerpts from other films that have done a better job of defining all the elements above and cut all together to make the film Tart.  It is hard for me to say this, but Wayne ruined this film.  While I don't believe there was much to fully take from the story, any remaining elements of excitement were drained as Wayne took the helm.  While most of the time you can credit some of the story, perhaps strong acting, or even the music, in Tart you can credit nothing.  From the opening sequence until the end, I felt like I was swimming through very lumpy oatmeal.  No consistency, no strength.Overall, this film is a waste of your time.  If you are searching for some deep symbolic elements or possibly some banter on our society, you will not find it in this film.  While I know that was what Wayne was attempting to show, the final product seems like it was edited on an Etch-a-Sketch.  It was an embarrassing film to sit through, and encourage nobody to pick it up.  Wayne threw to the wind all the teachings of her Columbia University education and destroyed two hours of my life.  Avoid at all costs!Grade: * out of ****
Sterile, derivative and plastic... ...just like Hollywood and just like the music industry which, I guess, is the point.John Travolta, playing on his character from Get Shorty (and, to a lesser degree, like his character in Pulp Fiction and Swordfish) is Mr. Cool.  This time he's trying to make it big in the music biz.  He discovers a new talent (artist Christina Milian) and works his way through an assortment of characters that are more types and cliches than real characters.A brand name cast and yet no one makes any more than a dent on the personality radar.  The dialogue seems forced, funnier on the script than on the screen and most scenes feel posed and sterile.  Most of the actors appeared as bored as many celebrities are outside of their media personae.  Aside from a few interesting moments, only one speech toward the end made by Cedric the Entertainer redeemed the film.It's like a big commercial (which, I suppose, is any Hollywood film).  Certain musicians get shameless plugs (Steven Tyler and Aerosmith, included in the film), various movies get shameless plugs (including, in a not so disguised fashion, Get Shorty), certain Hollywood landmarks (e.g. the Mann Chinese Theater) are plopped into the film like a tourist video and even the L.A. Lakers and the Staples Center get a plug.It's an attempt to play on the irony of making a film about making a film or, in this case, making a musician.  So we watch Travolta as Mr. Cool navigating the landscape of the music industry to give Christina Milian her sudden and instantaneous rise to the top of the charts.  The ending is so horribly cheesy I felt as if I was watching American Idol.Watchable, but barely.The Player covered this terrain so much better.
Another King Masterpiece Butchered. I find it disheartening that so many of King's masterpieces were treated so badly in their film adaptations...and perhaps it's mostly because his books are too complex to adapt well to film...I'm not sure. Delores Claiborne, Stand By Me, Misery, Carrie, Shawshank Redemption, The Shining, and the Green Mile all did well. Then we are treated to stinkers like IT, Maximum Over-drive, Dreamcatchers, Thinner, The Running Man, Firestarter...and of course, this one.Did I forget to mention Stephen King's own remake of The Shining? He should have settled for the original.This film has all the feel of a made-for-tv movie or direct-to-video film...and, in fact, that's what it should have been. The film was terribly fast-paced and left out some of the more necessary plot elements of the book. They jumped into the darker elements way too quickly. There is barely a set up for the horror to come.That they left out Norma Crandall was very disappointing as she added to Judd's character so much. He's barely even interesting in the film. Fred Gwynn turned him into a goofy, drawling, old man. Over-acted. Not subtle at all, as his character was in the book.Ellie, the daughter, was a terrible actress. I am sure they could have found a better actress than her. She was whiny and abrasive and her lines were very forced and unnatural.Even the cinematography was badly done. Everything is way too bright for the plot line. Too many primary colors. It felt like they were on the set of a soap opera. At least it matches the acting of the principal characters.They tried to sew it all up with gory makeup effects, but set in the backdrop of a badly made film, it just makes the blood and gore goofy and laughable. The only way this film could be considered "scary" is with the cheap haunted-house "BOO!" scare tactics...like when a hand shoots out of the dark and grabs a shoulder.Why would they choose Mary Lambert to direct this film? She barely had any experience as a director before this gig and most of the experience she did have was with music videos. And, as expected, beyond this flop, she has barely done anything worth mentioning. Well, except for more music videos and the follow-up stinker sequel to this film.Let's hope the 2008 re-make is better.
Star Trek:  City on the Edge of Forever. My favorite show of the Trek series but there's no way I'd buy another individual program from Amazon.  It will ONLY play on their downloaded player ...won't burn to DVD so can't play it on my television.  Don't bother buying this ...just go for the Trek collection on DVD
Not for DVD aficionados. I'm rather upset with the technical quality of this DVD.  Grindhouse rereleased this disc exactly as it was in 2000, without so much as a 16x9 animorphic upgrade.  This is certainly not worth the $20+ dollar price tag Amazon.com has right now
Stupid. This is an absolutely absurd movie, with a stupid storyline, bad characters, bad character development and a really dumb predictable ending. /yaw
One of Elvis' worst movies. I've seen all of Elvis' movies, most several times.  This is one of the worst.  Only Stay Away Joe and Harem Scarem are worse.  I usually watch every Elvis movie every time it comes on TV, but not these three
A Politically-Correct Melodrama: A Definite Stinker. Waste of money.  Waste of time.  Well-known cast.  Amateurish direction.  Plotless.  Politically correct to the point of being stupid.  The film's incessant attempts at humor fail.  Eric Roberts' character laughs-off his grave circumstance throughout most of the film.  He is self-important, Godless and emotionally false.  It's difficult to empathize with such an unrealisitic character.  The best performances in this film were given by Gregory Harrison and Lee Grant.  The best scene is Gregory Harrison and Eric Roberts' passionate farewell kiss.  Most authentic moment in the film: Lee Grant's reaction to her dying son being carried off.  Very difficult to watch through in one-sitting because it's so repetitive and vapid. You will wait and wait for something to happen and nothing ever does until the final moments.  If you choose to waste your time with this film, you'll be sorry you did
dirty work blows. i love norm macdonald and this is the dumbest movie of all tim
Chop! Chop!. (What do Holly Hunter and Burt Reynolds have in common?)Just another flick about a gal who falls for an abuser, this time with the gimicks of a waterlogged piano and exotic New Zealand Maori.The tribe had it right, though, ignore these two losers and stick with the trees
AMAZON SUCKS. I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!
sum of all stars? zero!. Maybe no one noticed but towards the end of the movie when the Russian President and Jack Ryan are talking to each other through the computer, repeat is spelled "reapeat".  On top of that, the acting was horrible...this movie didn't take itself seriously enough.  Ben Affleck sucked as much as he did in this movie as he did in Pearl Harbor
hahahhahahah... ...hahahahahha, boy what a retarded movie! This is the stupidest thing ever...what's that music? Everytime it go's in-sync with what the actors are doing it's so emberessingly bad I cant believe anyone would take it seriously. See the second one if you must...melinda clarke is hotter than shirlyn finn. :
Another lame Shark Movie. Bad acting and bad effects make this movie awful.This movie was a little intresting,but could have been WAY WAY better.They coppied the same scenes from Shark Attack 2 and showed them over and over.When lots of great white sharks are killing tons of people at a beach resort ,its up to Wagner to kill them.It got pretty borring and made me want to go to sleep.Im warning you,do not see this movie
A poor man's "Dick". I'm sorry, but this movie is clearly nothing more than and overdramaticized and historically inaccurate retelling of the story much more riotiously and enjoyably portrayed in the film "Dick." "Dick" is funny, this is not. I'm sorry, but Dustin Hoffman simply does not have the acting chops to stand up to someone like Kirsten Dunst (or that level of indefatigable cuteness).Just go rent "Dick" instead. You'll thank me, yourself, and those fine ladies who saved our country
Mediocre Betty Grable Musical. The good news is that Fox finally released a Betty Grable musical on DVD, so I'm guessing fans are really happy about that.  The bad news is that, as many have pointed out, they picked one of the worse.  The reason seems pretty obvious: Grable is best remembered nowadays precisely for being a WWII "Pin-Up Girl" and, like when this film was first produced, the DVD makers are just banking on that.  Betty Grable musicals were formulaic and not particularly sophisticated.  They relied too heavily on her charms (and showing off her famous legs), but even her charisma cannot do much to save this movie.  If you love Betty Grable no matter what, rejoice the fact that at least one of her musicals is on DVD, if not, then I suggest you skip this one and wait for the DVD release of one of her better movies.
Don't waste your money on this one. Talentless people and garbage music  torture you in this turkey-in no time flat,you'll be driven to pure insanity as you run screaming "MAKE IT STOP!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!" out into the yard.Do not spend money on this product unless you want to wind up beating your head against the wall and babbling nonsense
Extremely slow... Utterly horrible movie. I honestly can't believe that Robert Patrick wasted his time on this piece of [junk] movie.  Ugh!  One of the worst movies I've seen in quite a while
Duped IS the word!!!. Believe it or not, we watched this movie from beginning to end--just to see if there's ANY redeeming feature. What a waste of time! We've enjoyed all sorts of movies, from the serious to the ridiculous--but this movie is totally pointless. Pointless doesn't even begin to describe it. What a cheap piece of #%$&@%! If you have any appreciation for the art of movie-making, for a good story, for good acting, for provocative ideas, for a good laugh, or even for the sheer entertainment value of the ridiculous, don't spend any money on it. And please, if you have seen it, add your 2 cents here so that fewer people get duped
Miserable acting, horrible script, inane directing. What a mind-numbingly inept end chapter to a series that began with the greatest horror-comedy of all time, The Re-Animator.  Continuing in his deluded quest to claim the Re-Animator series for his own, and to convince us that he can direct, producer Brian Yuzna has managed the opposite.  Beyond Re-Animator merely confirms what was evident about the Yuzna-directed Bride of Re-Animator, that Yuzna knows nothing about directing actors and story.As with Dagon, Yuzna seems to have secured financing from Spanish sources for this film.  Unfortunately, the problem is that they also tried to force in a mostly Spanish cast.  This is a story set in Massachusetts, for crying out loud -- why would the warden of the prison, the reporter coming to cover the story, the guards, and a good 90 per cent of the inmates all have Spanish accents?  It wouldn't be as howlingly horrible if these guys could act, but they can't.  Simon Andreu as Warden Brando and Elsa Pataky as love interest Laura Olney get the most screentime of anyone in the cast, but their acting is so bad, and their ADR-afflicted lines so glaringly off, that they manage to sink the film every time they open their mouths.  Yuzna seems to pick his leading ladies based on their willingness to take off their clothes (witness the gratuitous "nurse nipple" scene in this film, or Fabiana Udenio and Kathleen Kinmont in Bride of Re-Animator), and Pataky makes for one of the most unsympathetic love interests I can remember.But even Pataky and Andreu pale in incompetence next to that blustery, seething mass of bad acting that is leading man Jason Barry.  Based on Yuzna's shoddy history with actors, one might be tempted to blame it on the director, but the fact is that in this film, Jason Barry is incapable of pulling off a single believable moment, basic elementary acting.  His every internal and external beat rings false, his dialogue delivery sounds like a cold reading, and even his basic body movements look like amateur theatre.  Most high-school students do better than this.  Jeffrey Combs as Herbert West, seasoned pro that he is, gamely plays along, but the script puts West's character so far off to the sideline in favour of the vomit-inducing Pataky-Andreu axis that Combs is unable to save this film.On a strictly technical level, the cinematography looks good, the score is all right (though often too serious-minded for its own good), and the film doesn't look low-budget.  But when the "story" is such a mess and the actors so inept, no amount of slick lighting and camera moves can save a film.  Yuzna really should stick with producing, because on the Stuart Gordon-directed Dagon, at least there were some good moments.  But Beyond Re-Animator is beyond salvaging, possibly the worst film sequel I've ever seen, and way up there in the list of worst films I've ever subjected myself to
Where is the Disco song "I LOVE THE NIGHTLIFE"??????. Not The Original Film. Doesn't have the original disco scene with "I like the night life" song. THEY COMPLETELY RUINED THE MOVIE
BEWARE! THIS DVD ISN'T WIDESCREEN!. Dear Film Company Jackasses,Surely you know we already hate you for your greed - Why do you add insult to injury by taking fine films like "The Great Santini" and cutting them to Full Screen?Yet another fine film marred, no doubt, by some big company's desire to cut corners. Burn, Hollywood, burn
A B-movie with a little more substance. Michael Moriarity is my hero! He is just one of the coolest actors in my opinion. He has done such great B-movies as this, Q, and It's Alive 3: Island of the Alive. How awesome is he?? Anyways, I think that this movie was hilarious! I think a lot of people take this movie too seriously, thinking that it is going to be your typical movie. But you shouldn't because not only is this a B-movie, but IT IS supposed to be funny. My favorite part is when "the stuff" started bubbeling out of the ground and that old hick guy just starts eating it. Who would do that?? I just started laughing by butt off when that happened. So if you watch this movie, just sit back and enjoy it for what it's worth, don't be too critical on it.What I learned from The Stuff: Dairy products are evil! Especially if they come from with in the earth!If you like The Stuff, I recommend: Watching other B-movies, such as Island of the Alive 3, Zombi 3 and 4, etc
"Well, I love you, you potato head.". You'd think with a cast including Cary Grant, Ginger Rogers, Marilyn Monroe and a chimpanzee all directed by the great Howard Hawks you'd have a side-splitter and a half, but you'd be wrong cause this snoozer barely even squeezed a chuckle out of me.Cary Grant is a scientist working on a youth formula.  Funny premise but it takes over 20 minutes before the chimpanzee mixes up some real youth formula and Grant accidentally takes it.  The results are humorous, but the effects wear off too soon then Ginger Rogers drinks some and her take on the youth trip is just lame and even depressing.  Finally at the end they both take it with unfunny results.This movie was a great disappointment to me.  Change the script, replace Grant with Fred MacMurray and replace Rogers with either Vera Miles or Katharine Hepburn and you'd have something
Technical problems render this oater virtually unwatchable. This undistinguished oater is made much worse by technical problems.  It isn't a bad little western, and the two lead roles are played competently by Vera Miles, whose most famous role was Laurie Jorgensen in "The Searchers," and Sam Elliott, who was born to make westerns.  It had a good plot and some beautiful desert locations.Unfortunately, the film was not well shot.  None--and I mean not one--of the interior scenes is adequately lighted; you can barely make out dark shadows moving around against a black background.  The scenes in the Cactus Jail, which are key and set up the movie, might as well be taking place in a cave without even a candle for light.  Then there's the DVD which is full-frame and was mastered from an extremely distressed print of the film.  The DVD is blurry and shows every scratch, spot, and speck of dirt that 33 years of obscurity could inflict on the print.  Too bad.  Miles and Elliott deserved better.  Frankly, because of the technical issues, the film is probably not worth wasting 90 minutes on.
Just Another Pitiful, Tired Retread. After watching this lame, stupid sequel all I can say is "Leave it alone already!" God this film sucked. First, after 25 years of trying to escape from brother Michael, this is how Laurie Strode goes out???!!! Major let down, it should have been more shocking and spectacular. Second, while "20 Years Later/Halloween 7" was made for Lifetime, this one seems to have been made for MTV. All Dimension films has done for this franchise since taking it over for Part 6, is give it style, no substance whatsoever. The only one of their 3 sequels that was remotely scary was 6, fully due to bringing back the guy who played Michael in 4(the last good Halloween film)George Wilbur, he's sorely missed but probably too old for the part now. Third, I'm so sick of rappers and models thinking they can act as is the case in this film with Busta Rhymes and Tyra Banks. No talent Busta needs to stick to cursing and throwing his hands around to a repetitive beat and Tyra needs to stick to walking a catwalk in some designer dress with her mouth shut. They suck. Hopefully Hollywood feels the same way since I haven't seen them in anything since, thank god. Fourth, the story is just another retread with a new gimmick, the internet web cam. Poorly executed, no suspense at all in this film. The film was originally suppossed to be released for Halloween '01, but they had to do reshoots to improve the film, unsuccessfully I might add, so it was released in summer '02. Funny, this film was directed by the same guy who directed "Halloween II"(the best sequel). Even funnier is the fact that they had to do reshoots for that one as well, but John Carpenter did them and it DID improve the film. His touch is sorely missed here.So, if dreadful acting(except Jaime Lee Curtis, but she's only in the first 10 minutes, unfortunately), boring, dumb story and dialogue, shockless, routine kill scenes and no scares or suspense(unless your 10 years old and have never seen a horror film) if all that's your cup of tea then by all means watch or buy this waste of time, money & effort(if there was any). It's just another insult to fans of the original.And now, for next Halloween('07) we will get "Halloween:The Remake" directed by none other than the man who brought us the classic(NOT!!!) "House Of 1000 Corpses", Rob Zombie!I'm also sick of bad singers thinking they can direct. The choice is refective of Hollywood nowadays, style over substance, cool and trendy over timeless and great.
A Star is Born Fails to Capture Audience's Sympathy. A Star Is Born is a disturbing film for all the wrong reasons.  By failing to get the audience to sympathize with a movie star's tragic downfall, the film displays a schizophrenic quality. There is almost a breakdown in the relationship between the audience and what happens on screen.  This is in no part due to the performances by the lead actors; it's the nature of the material itself.  Perhaps if we were to see the James Mason character as a likeable star before failure and booze drain away his ambition and reason for living, the audience would understand what the Garland character sees in him and we could sympathize with both characters.  Instead, we see Garland's character despairing over a not very likeable washed-up drunk and we're left feeling as empty as the film itself
not for the easily offended, the squeamish or horse lovers. This review is for the Criterion Collection DVD edition of the film."Matresse" or "Mistress" in my opinion, is one of the worst three films to be released on the Criterion Collection. The only reason I watched and reviewed it is because it was released by Criterion. The film contains very explicit depictions of sadomasochistic activity some of which involve nailing body parts to blocks of wood. There is also a graphic scene of a horse being slaughtered for meat as well as numerous scenes of people eating horsemeat that horse lovers may be highly offended by. It got an X-rating by the MPAA and was banned in many parts of the US.The film is about a woman who secretly operates a sex dungeon in her basement. When her apartment is broken into, the burglar falls in love with her.The only special feature on the DVD is an interview with the film's director, Barbet Schroeder
so many gaps in the story. This movie is the story of a gay Cuban writer who eventually makes it to the U.S. to escape the persecution he's suffered in Cuba. And that's about all that can be inferred from this movie. There are large chunks that are spoken in a different language. But there are no English subtitles so you have no idea at all what's going on. This disrupts the already choppy flow of the movie so that it has almost no cohesiveness at all. Whatever the message of this movie is, whatever it's trying to convey, it's lost in the plotless story
Not a definite favorite. I don't like the fact that somebody can take a horror movie and turn it into a joke!I couldn't even get through this movie once.I just don't like films that express monsters as four-legged dog creatures.The Relic is a story about a ritual gone wrong when some foolish explorer actually drinks this weird concoction from a tribe of Indians.Mysteriously enough,the liquid turns him into a beastly creature that lives in the sewers under a mansion.Don't get this movie
no title. What a disappointment!  I remember Siskel and Ebert raving over this romantic comedy.  Romantic, maybe, but comedy - never.  Very predictable plot from beginning to end.  And Rosie Perez was truly offensive.  A few times I couldn't understand what she was saying.  There is no way I could buy that she and Cage's character were attracted to each other.  Maybe critics liked this movie because it had no sex, violence, or rough language.  Although Cage does get shot in one hold-up scene.  It was just that you knew what was going to happen every step of the way.  I am beginning to Like Cage more and more as he ages. [ spoiler] I was really disappointed at the end to find out that the real people whom this story is based on were always happily married to their original partners.  Either they shouldn't have changed it so much or they shouldn't have let us know about the real story it was based on.[end of spoiler]  But Fonda and Cage were very engaging together
What a bunch of village idiots... At first, I was really hyped to see this movie with the big named stars, especially Ms. Weaver. But when it was over I shouted, "I KNEW IT!" For a hard-core horror movie fan like myself, that's definitely a sign of a bad movie review to come. This movie broke my record of figuring out the plot even before the first minute was through. And the only reason why I sat through the entire movie was because I had my check book to balance, and a few crypto puzzles to complete. The Village reminded me of nothing more than a slap-shod script tossed around for a few days among amature script editors, then rushed into the credulous hands of famous stars. Not only did this movie ruin a few good careers, it also ruined my respect for those who stared in it.Tip for the day: If someone gives you a free copy of The Village, sell it on an auction site immediately. Trust me, you won't feel guilty getting rid of it as fast as you can. You'll experience more suspense selling it to the highest bidder than having to sit through the entire movie.
LOL~!. If you want UNCUT ORIGINAL version, ALWAYS look for ORIGINAL LICENSED Production. NOT US Release. Its a foreign film, it should not be US version to begin with~! HELLO!!!?? Why settle for LESS with US Version where they edit and cut so many excellent scenes especially with Jackie's Fighting Scenes. And US Release ruins the speed and sound as well.I found HK Version to be MUCH MORE in enjoyable, and HIGHER in Quality. American Market always like to "Americanize" and "Control". Regional Code Regulation thing is one of the example to CONTROL the Market. Why not let everyone enjoy the same HK Original Release move the same way REST OF THE WORLD enjoys it ?? No one makes Hollywood American movies to "French version" or "Chinese Version" ~! This what Americans are doing~! Well, enjoy the cheap "American version" then~! LO
Not happy. This is only a portion of this episode.  It cuts off in the middle of a sentence
Be Warned. I love this film.  It's epic storytelling on a grand scale and timeless viewing.  I was thrilled to see it being released on DVD , UNFORTUNATELY it seems there was little if any restoration on the print used.  I have only viewed sections of the film so far but EVERY frame I have seen has surface dirt or scratches.  In one section there are long scratches down the entire side of the picture.  I was so looking forward to seeing something close to a pristine print which is what a film of this calibre deserves.  I'd have given 5 stars if it had, so the minus three is for the appaling print .  One of  the worst I've ever seen
I HATED THIS FILM this film!. After reading all of the reviews, I was so excited to view a great film.  However, after about an hour of waiting for something plausible to happen, it just drifted . . . and drifted . . . and meandered . . . and, oh here's a scene:  she says "No" to the main character advances, and he ignores her initial rejection . . . and then it meanders more into something so absurd that I started to laugh.C'mon, people!  To all of you 4- and 5-star people, just because a film involves beautiful settings and artsy characters, that does NOT constitute a story!!I'm sorry, maybe it's me, but message to the character Claudia in the movie:  If some cad starts coming onto you while he's simultaneously searching for his fiancee (and your friend) who may very well have drowned, then get a 1000 miles away from this scum . . . and to all viewers watching this exercise in self-indulgence and boredom, get a 1000 miles away from this farce of a film.I am an enormous fan of stylish, artistic films, but just like those paintings at fancy museums that are being portrayed as elite art but instead are just simple circles and triangles on a blank canvas, this film is NOT art.  It's just boring, boring, boring, uninteresting.  I could not care about these characters any less, other than poor Anna who disappeared from that island . . . . actually, now that I think about it, Anna was the only smart one there!  She jumped off that island as quickly as she could so as get out of this ostentatious, boring, pompous, self-indulgent, uneventful, dreadful, meandering, dumb film!Way to go, Anna!  You're the only one with any sense.  Even if you did drown, trust me, that is a better fate than having to survive this DULL film.So, in case you didn't get my point, let me spell it out once again:  I HATED this film so completely!  I would rather watch water trickling from my sink.  At least that has a story!!Aaaargh -- I want my 2 hours back!  I gave up 2 precious hours of my life to watch this pathetic film
not worth the street fight. This movie does not even lead up to the game. The plot isn't good atall. Terrible acting performances by most of the actors/actresses. Iwas surprise to know that Kylie Mingoue was Cammy. The fight sceneswere fake. My favorites in the game were Ken and Ryu, and they madethem unreal. And for the rest of the other fighters, their backgroundstories are also fake and very hard to believe. Basically, the wholemovie from start to end was very boring. In my own opinion...theySHOULD MAKE A REMAKE OF STREET FIGHTER!!!! SAVE UR MONEY!!
Sucks. I tried to watch this twice. To see what the hype was. I fell asleep both times. Not funny just slow, boring, and stupid. WAY OVERATED
You DON'T Fascinate Me So!. "She's either the love of his life or the end of it" reads the tagline for "Fascination". And that right there is a big tip-off for what kind of movie to expect. It gives the entire movie away.Patrick Doherty died in a swimming accident but the odd thing is he was an excellent swimmer, soon, 3 months to be exact his wife, Maureen (Jacqueline Bisset) is engaged to Oliver (Stuwart Wilson) to the dismay of her son Scott (Adam Garcia).Scott soon meets his step-sister Kelly (Alice Evan) and believe it or not an attraction starts. Soon Kelly, in subtle ways, starts to manipulate Scott's mind and starts making him think his mother killed his father."Fascination" really wants to be a steamy sexy thriller. I can see it either as a cinemax late night movie or a WB TV series. The movie even goes as far as to have the guys walk around with open shirts to try and make us, or at least the women, think the movie is sexy. You could compare this movie to the works of Claude Chabrol, the dirty secrets of an upper-class family has always been one of Chabrol's favorite themes. But "Fascination" does not have the pleasure of being directed by Chabrol instead it is directed by Klaus Menzel. Menzel though makes the mistake of taking away all of the mystery of the film. He tries too hard to spell everything out of us. Events become too obvious and thus breaks all the suspense the movie could have created. That is a sign of Menzel's inexperience.I mentioned that Scott and Kelly have an attraction between them knowing full well they are about to become related. "Fascination" is now starting to open a whole new can of worms for itself as now it's dealing with incest. The reason I question this move is because the movie just doesn't seem interested in exploring these people and instead wants to focus on the mystery of whether Scott's father was murdered. To bring incest in the story means that you are going to have to examine the relationship between these people. "Fascination" does not dwell on the psychological aspect of these people.Then we have the terrible dialogue. It simply sounds phony. The scene where Scott meets Kelly is an embarrassment for the actors. The pick-up line he uses on her is corny. People don't really talk to each other this way. The movie has problem with that. Dialogue is not written in a convincing way. Even the music is wrong. It tries too hard to be alluring and sexy, like the movie itself. Menzel is hitting us over the head making sure no one walks out of this movie confused. While that is a very nice gesture on his part it really does take out all the suspense of the situation."Fascination" has a twist up its sleeve that is just sprung on us. I think it's a cheap shot, you may not. Nothing leading up to this secret though is really suggested.Is "Fascination" a really bad movie? Not really. One is almost tempted to merely toss it aside as a "guilty pleasure". A movie that doesn't seem to have high ambitious but is entertaining nonetheless. Notice though I said one is "almost" tempted. That doesn't mean that I'm going to do that.Bottom-line: Despite the pleasure of seeing Jacqueline Bisset the movie doesn't have much to offer. Director Klaus Menzel tries too hard to spell everything out for us but the movie then comes cliche and predictable. The movie carries no suspense
slow... I like westerns but in this film Raquel Welch and Dean Martin were down your capacities. Ever will be nice look Welch 's body but the film is only that.
Le Boring. I think there was packaging or a sticker that compared this film to Pulp Fiction.  As if.  Beyond minor superficial similarities - I dont see it.Le Samurai is one of the most boring films Ive watched recently without turning it off.  In retrospect I wish I had turned it off or never wasted my time since the ending is so dull.Imagine if breathless had a slightly more complicated plot, but the main character had no charisma.  Or if Alphaville (the film not the treatment) was more 100 times more boring.  Le Samurai makes Tokyo Drifter seem like a thrill ride.  I was not impressed by this film on any level.If you are into being bored.  Or if your so freaking smart you can watch paint drying and fill it with significance, this is the film for you
Highly offensive and sick. First let me state that if you are looking for a women in prison movie with a good amount of nudity, and the insensitive nature of what nazis (lack of capitalization is intentional) did to holocaust victims being as just a subject to get off on does not bother you, you may like this movie. I have no idea what I was thinking when I rented this. This movie is about a concentration camp of primarily female prisoners. The story takes place in one continuous flashback of a nazi who had been a commander at the now defunct camp. This is barely a story of continuity, rather a pastiche of attrocities committed at this camp, but presented for your enjoyment. One of the suggested attrocities includes a dinner scene where the nazis are having a rather unappetizing meal that turns out to be a Jewish infant. A Jewish server upon learning what the meal is, faints. They put her body on the table, pour flammable liquid over her, and set her on fire while laughing and having a roast. If one wonders if they were using this to show the nazis in a negative light, then why is the protaganist of the story a nazi who is recalling fond memories, but presented sympathetically? If I feel that the makers of this film were anti-semetic and were making a cruel film for their own misgivings, that would just be an assumption. Unfortunately this waste of good film stock suggests nothing to the contrary. The scenes I have mentioned are staged and are not actual footage (just to make that clear).--Bo
not a good movie as the reviewers here say it is. I just saw this movie on IN HD2.  Some people said that this movie is a hidden gem.  At first, I felt the same way.  I didn't even know such a movie existed.  Then after about 30 minutes, the movie became really boring.  It just drags on with a weak synopsis.  The cast includes some famous actors and actresses, and I think they are pretty good actors, but without an interesting storyline, the movie is a boring piece of work that leaves no impressions
Lost In The Re-write. I assume that at some point this project had a much better script than the final one in order to get William Hurt and others involved. I'll hold that in my mind as the only way they would get into this mess. It has action and special effects enough for 4 movies, but the plot is all over the map and never congeals into anything special.With the talent and money  that they must have had this is one poor excuse of a movie
Awful. I thought this movie was absolutely awful.It is one of the worst movie's I have seen in quite a while.You keep waiting for the movie to get interesting, but it never does.I don't recommend this movie, especially not to a guy, he would be bored out of his mind by this one
See this movie at lest once. ...to see just how bad it is. Unlike it's predecessor Heavy Metal 2k has one single 90 minute story arch talking place in the far future, using both hand drawn animation and very bad CGI, bad even for 2000. The basic plot is that a miner named Tyler (Michael Ironsides) stumbles across a green glowing crystal that is a literal key to the fountain of youth. The only draw back is that the moment he touches it Tyler goes completely bonkers and starts killing a lot of people.The "Key" draws Tyler to a settlement called Eden, full of people who haves traces of the life giving compound in them, giving them a healthy good looking looks, Tyler probtly kills half of the population and kidnaps the rest, a lone survivor of the raid Julie (Julie Strian) begins a blind quest of revenge.Everything that could be bad in any given movie is bad in HM2K, the dialog is terrible, both written and performed, the camera work is terrible, there's no back story to speak of, tere are loop holes that even a baby can see, not even a connection to the first firm with the Loc-Nar, which the key is suppose to be a shard from, except that it's green. Also there are not special features on this DVD!!!!!I don't mind the violence or the nudity, in fact I want to see more of that in western animation, but this movie is just as forgettable as any other movie that Julie Strian stars in.
Flesh Gordon. I enjoyed this movie. I orginially saw this move 30 years ago and it brought back some good memories from the seventies. I wouldn't really call it a porn movie. It's more of a movie with adult humor. I'd give it an "R" rating compared to some of the stuff that is available today
LAME. Lame! Lame! Lame! Corny sexual humour. No wonder it tanked- if the Amazon.com thing is true. Because it's bad. Don't watch it unless you think e*ections are one of the funniest things in the whole entire world
If all you want is yoga positions this video is for you... I was disappointed in this video.  I was looking forward to doing a routine with my 5+ year old and trying to start her on self-regulatory techniques.  The video merely did a well-paced run through of various poses, but gave no structure or routine to follow.  Most disappointing
This Film is a Disaster. Tom Berenger must have been desperate for work when he signed up for this embarrassment of a film.  It has the feel and tone of  the kind of made for television movie you might watch out of sheer boredom and exhaustion on a Sunday afternoon when you're too tired either to locate the remote or to fire a bullet at the television screen.  The acting is wooden and unnatural, and the music, which is supposed to be awesome, sounds curiously like a bad rip-off of Springsteen, even though the flashbacks in the film (when most of the musical scenes occur) are set, for the most part, in 1963, when NOTHING sounded like Springsteen.  Worse yet, the sets do not look like 1963.  This is very clearly a cheap production, doomed from the start by an awful script, terrible acting, and a devil may care attitude about capturing the feeling of an era.  Here's the premise of the film: years after Eddie, the tempestuous and dumb lead singer of the Cruisers, has disappeared (he died in a car accident, but his body was never recovered), a reporter decides to write a story about the band.  She has a theory that Eddie is still alive and believes that the band may be on the verge of a renaissance, if the missing final recordings, named A Season in Hell, can be located.  She forces her presence into the lives of the remaining band members, who are, by the way, dull as dirt, to piece together the band's history.  The reporter is so creepy and annoying that she'd probably have a restraining order slapped on her, nowadays.  Ironically enough, A Season in Hell describes quite acccurately the viewing experience
Brannaugh Blows it Again-Bad!. Although not a fan of Kenneth Brannaugh's,  I was willing to give his Hamlet a fair viewing.  Since this is my favorite play, I was hoping the film would be better than his last two mediocre endeavors into Shakespeare's plays; unfortunately, it's worse! Beginning with the performances: Jack Lemmon is a wonderful actor, but here, he is an embarrassment, as are many of the other actors assembled, including Julie Christie (whom I usually adore). The casting is all over the map which makes for uneven performances and unsatisfying scenes. Brannaugh's own delivery of the text is rushed and usually unconvincing, despite the vehemence with which he delivers every over-ennunciated syllable, which sounds manic, bordering on farce. Bad direction and over-indulgent acting! It might be interesting to see what Brannaugh would do with good direction, instead of his own.  I could go on about my problems with the staging and other production values but the damage to this brilliant work is on every level and not worth going in to in depth.The good news is that Zefferelli's Hamlet, with another actor I don't normally like--Mel Gibson--is spot on perfect. The actor's are excellently cast, the production values and direction are serve the text, rather than competing with it, as in Brannaugh's version. Zefferelli knows his Shakespeare and his films, in my opinion represent the definitive versions (watch his Romeo & Juliet and Taming of the Shrew), too bad for us he didn't do more. Too bad, also, no one contemporary seems as capable. Instead we get the recent unwatchable junk with "hip-cool" sensibilities. Argh!It's not surprising no one is in a rush to produce a dvd of this tragedy of a film
CAREFUL! The DVD is missing sketches that were on the original VHS version!. First off, I love Eddie Murphy.  In my opinion, he's one of the more brilliant talents to come out of SNL.  But it's a crying shame that sketches that were included on the original VHS version of "Eddie Murphy: Best of SNL" have been deleted from the DVD version.  My particular favorite piece (Eddie playing a rastafarian singing "we're gonna kill da white people" at a meeting of mostly white VFW members) is NOT on this DVD along with a number of others.  Have the SNL folks suddenly become squeamish and politically correct - I can only assume that such cowardice and overly correct behavior is at the root of such an obvious ommission.  After having owned the VHS version, I can honestly say that I regret having purchased the DVD.  I would return it if I could.  Listen to the other viewers and don't be fooled
Wonderful program, but flawed files... Okay, so to catch up on this exciting new series, I decided to try this revolutionary downloading program - Amazon Unbox!  I selected the first 10 episodes and hit Purchase.  Minutes later, I was watching the first episode, it came quickly, sounded great, and looked wonderful... however the second one was missing a few minutes at the end.  Forgiveable, until... whole episodes starting arriving incomplete or had missing video, making it incredibly frustrating and disappointing.But, this IS a good concept... unfortunately, Amazon has yet to verify all their own files for both audio and picture quality!  So, until the issue is fixed and paying customers recieve completed files or refunds... DO NOT try and download Season 1, Episodes 2, 4, 5, 6, and 7!!!  1, 3, 8, 9, and 10 were the only ones that were 100% complete for me
overrated. Transit station letter-writer-for-hire, Dora (although she writes letters she never sends) is relatively closed off from the world around her but is forced to open up when she is begged to write a letter for a woman to her young son's long lost father. As Dora witnesses this mother get hit by a bus in the next moment, she realizes the young son is basically orphaned for the moment. So she opens up, but not in the feel-good, maternal-instinct-to- spare way American viewers might expect. No, Dora is keen to exploit this find, and tries to sell Josue (the little boy) for a television. Eventually, though, Dora forms a kind of bond with Josue and goes out searching for the boy's father. Unfortunately it seems too easy for Dora, who is obviously hardened to life and all its sensitivities, to break down all these carefully formed barriers. Her emotion somehow does not seem authentic toward the boy. As a result, the performance is nowhere near the triumph most reviewers have claimed, and the film lacks a certain credibility. Sure, the film is watchable and somewhat interesting, but it was overrated.
Really Really Really Bad. Off-hand, I can't think of a worse movie. (And I think Nicolas Cage has done some truly awesome work in other films--hey, he's making a buck, here.) That's all. 1/32 star, if possible
It's so stupid... ...but not funny. I don't even know how Cheech and Chong fans could like this movie, because this movie is really different from "Up in Smoke" or their other movies. In "Up in Smoke" there was at least some direction to the movie, but in this movie most of it is composed of lame comedy gimmicks that were entirely not funny unless you are high off your ass or have an I.Q. less than 20. They don't even smoke in this movie! The closest thing they do to drugs is eat some marijuana leaves... how stupid do they think we are? Stay away from this one
What about the missing episodes. Why should one buy this series? What about the missing episodes? Are they going to be added later, or this is it? I cannot believe this. Would you buy a bicycle with a missing wheel? Or a keyboard without the C and R keys? I'd like Amazon to explain its customers what it plans to do..
Most disappointing DVD transfer. What a shame this DVD transfer is so aweful, because the movie is great. I have seen this movie before on SBS TV (Australia) and have been wanting a copy since. But this DVD looks like a transfer from an already poor quality VHS copy. Very disappointed
Star Trek:  City on the Edge of Forever. My favorite show of the Trek series but there's no way I'd buy another individual program from Amazon.  It will ONLY play on their downloaded player ...won't burn to DVD so can't play it on my television.  Don't bother buying this ...just go for the Trek collection on DVD
You've got to be kidding -- AVOID THIS MOVIE!. This movie was so bad (How Bad Was It?) that I turned it off after about 25 minutes. This is only the second time in my life I stopped watching a movie because it was so poorly done. DO NOT RENT OR BUY THIS MOVIE
Boring to watch. The actors spend too much time just staring at each other without speaking. The story is too unbelievable too. It was a waste of my money to buy it.
You have to download Amazon software into your PC... I am never happy when a purchase requires that you install the company's software.  The vid is encrypted so that you need Amazon's player to view it.  Blah.  You're better off buying the DVD for $20 with all the episodes so at least you can watch the DVD somewhere other than your own computer.
Sentimental and fake. Having enjoyed LOST IN TRANSLATION, I thought I might like this one, which seems to have some sort of cult reputation-- why I can't fathom. The entire plot is self-serving, shallow, and unrealistic. I guess it's supposed to depict the horror of repressive religious values, and while I don't condone those, the film lacks clear characters or any motivation. A lot of people have buttoned up parents who don't get it, and it doesn't mean they kill themselves-- because they were grounded!?Since the writer-director gerw up in Hollywood, she may not be aware that you can't keep your kid home from school without a very good reason-- social workers and what not come after you. So the entire premise is false.Romanticizing mass suicide by having a bunch of soft focus young blondes do it-- after which they supposedly ascend to erotic eternity in the imaginations of their boyish peers-- could actually encourage the act. It's not caring, not real, and not responsible.But I guess that wouldn't bother the rich, overfunded daughter of a Hollywood genius out to make a name for herself.
Dreadful. This film is so bad, on so many levels, it`s painful to watch it knowing Carpenter put his " Name" on it.  There is no suspense, no timing, poor visual effects, and the Director seems AWOL through most of the Film.It looks like a UCLA Freshman Film project shot in 10 days in a warehouse. These actors, we know from previous work, can ACT, move through it mouthing stilted dialog that seems disconnected to the visual events all around them. Ice Cube looks and acts like a LA  Hood who somehow has wandered into a bad B Movie set and wants out... Now !!Natasha Henstridge is decorative, but unbelievable as a hard case Cop with a Drug problem who will save the Team. The rest are probably thankful they get killed off early.The real Mystery about GOM is how could the man who did that masterpiece of directing, cinematography and cutting  " The Thing " do this mess
UnBox video not yet working. Will not play once video was downloaded. I get the error message:  "can not play file, please try again later. error# 0x80040273" I made the exlusive give me call me back feature but the UnBox department was already closed, I was told the UnBox Saturday and Sunday 6-5 hours. I have to say I am impressed with the Call back feature. I downloaded the Unbox Beta now and am recieving email assistance to try to resolve the problem. Thanks Amazon UnBox! I will Update again - Feb. 10,200
the Plan 9 of cannibal films. If you must see a cannibal film stick to Cannibal Holocaust. the grindhouse release is well worth the money. However the grindhouse release of ferox is just awful. The picture quality is horrendous. The movie is lacking any redeemable quality. There are a few violent moments, but just a few. One of the absolute worst italian horror/exploitation films made. If Cannibal Holocaust is the citizen kane of cannibal films, then ferox is the plan 9.
Another one of those silly 80's movies. The jokes are pretty much what you would expect and there are a lot of slap-stick sight gags. I normally wouldn't have bought a movie like this but I needed it to make my Johnny Depp library complete
Great movie - ghastly DVD transfer. I ordered this the night of the Oscars. I will assume the mad rush to make as many dubs as possible was the reason for this atrocious copy. There wasn't even a booklet or insert of any kind included in the packaging. It looks like a bad VHS transfer. I should have returned it, but it would've been more trouble than it was worth.I thought the movie was everything it was cracked up to be - but unfortunately, in my case, I have to add: buyer beware.
Dont get "Fiji" final week ... Dont dwnld " Survivor, "Thunderstorms & Sacrifice" ". Its my fault for not reading the whole thing. you would think that the last episode would be the finale , but NO, its just a 10 minute recap going to the finale 4. I didnt even get a full 45 minute episode. No finale. I got rippped off. $1.99 dwnld not well spent. Dont bother dwnldng any episode of fiji if you dont know the ending. Because they dont have that episode, not even the reunion show
Unboxed CSI:Miami is Defective by Design. Using this product requires that you agree to turn over the keys to your computer. If you refuse an upgrade, Amazon can delete all of your previous purchases without giving you a refund.This is a quote from Cory Doctorow, who wrote about the Terms of Service for Amazon Unbox (Amazon Unbox to customers: Eat !@#$ and die):Amazon says it respects your privacy, but this clause tells the real story. Click "I agree" and you've just signed away permission for Amazon to wiretap all of your viewing habits, and to search your entire hard drive continuously and report back on all the software you've installed. The entertainment industry can produce a blacklist of legal software that it just doesn't care for -- say, software that lets you take screenshots, or screen-movies -- and refuse to allow your movies to run if you've installed it. In other words, this clause lets Hollywood specify how you must configure your PC.Section 3c. Removal of Software. If you uninstall or otherwise remove the Software, your ability to view all Digital Content you have downloaded to the Authorized Device will immediately and automatically terminate and we reserve the right to delete all Digital Content from that Authorized Device without notice to you.Surprise! If you delete our software, we delete your movies! Imagine if selling your old DVD player gave Jack Valenti permission to come over to your house and take away all your DVDs, too
Widescreen Or HD Blueray ?. i have to say i love this movie very well done.but after all these years of it's release why? has it not been put in widescreen format or updated on HD or Blueray or a new 2 disc DVD set the laser dics version is in widescreen format someone needs to get this out in the newer formats so we can really injoy this movie..
Stupid. To put it succinctly, Brendan Fraser is a college senior who ends up writing a ridiculously long thesis, which is then swiped by Joe Pesci, the homeless dude who, predictably, is really quite wise.  The problem is that his "wise" sayings aren't really too wise; he's like the guy you know who is always trying to sound intelligent, but doesn't really know that much. Joe Pesci's character is pretty annoying.  That's probably why he ended up friends with Brendan Fraser's character
This is Horrible. I love the Avatar and I was so thrilled that amazon allows people to download it except the only problem is I've been trying for the past days and darn it all, it's not working!!! It's not as if I'm downloading it for free. I am willing to pay and yet it just wouldn't go through!!! I think it's better to just buy the dvds...I think it's absolutely horrible to tease customers like that..
Horrid. I went into this movie not expecting anything special. I had read the reviews and got a mixed feeling. I decided to go for it... I wish I hadn't. I couldn't even finish watching the movie it was so bad. Characters popping out of nowhere and having no purpose. Almost each and every scene could be given an award as worst scene in any movie if that award was given. I had read that some of the scenes were beautiful. All right, I suppose, the scenery perhaps... but the acting was awful. Even if I like an actor I try not to be bias and Colin Farrell and Salma Hayek are not bad actors, if I remember correctly. This was laughable. Sutherland's role had no purpose. It was well acted, but it meant nothing.The story didn't work; it just didn't flow well. I felt almost... tipped while watching it because everything was off. No one is seriously offended and then swoons over the one who did the offending; not in a matter of a few seconds anyway. The story moved so fast and was so crooked that I called it quits before I squirmed through anymore of the Razzie worthy scenes
Painful to watch... Another product of Hollywood's "Karaoke Culture".  In an age where we see cinematic remakes of every kind, we have in "U-571" an outrageous attempt to borrow from the success and acclaim of "Das Boot".  But instead of a gripping war drama that reveals the tragic waste of war, we get a cheap flag-waving pile of Hollywood propaganda. The lighting, camera angles and claustrophobic set are obviously inspired by DB. But the bigoted innacuracies (German submariners machine gunning helpless sailors) and absurd scenarios (an incredibly lucky stern shot sinks a destroyer in hot pursuit) put this ridiculous movie in its own category. U-571 is just another thin, over-promoted, throw-away movie you'll forget the day after you see it
HUGELY Disappointed. . . . Maybe it was just me, but this concert DVD is a MAJOR disappointment!  It's quite surprising to see how little (if any) connection Madonna makes with the audience.  Shorn of her locks, her aerobically toned and fit body is the hard shell of an automaton here. Perhaps it's a result of her having become larger than life (ala Striesand, Whitney Houston,etc.).  Despite all the razzle-dazzle here, examples of an almost icy distance from her audience abound.  Songs like "Vogue" and "Express Yourself" should have been rousing stompers.  Instead, they are overstylized, choreographed to the max and perfunctory (the effect is like watching a canned TV award show performance).  Worst of ALL is her ill-conceived "Like A Virgin."  I can understand the need to refashion the same songs to forestall boredom, but "Virgin" recast as 1940's Marlene Dietrich nightclub lounge kitsch(complete with unisex tuxedo, top hat and faux-German accent)???? This is a shocking lapse in judgment--and boring to boot!!!The only sign of life comes near the end, with the lock-step performance of "Holiday," which is seductively refashioned as a funky marching-band romp.  Here, she and her dancers perform in what must have been stifling maxi-length military-style coats!  One look at this performance and you can't help but wish for the juice of her earlier stuff. No one begrudges the right of an artist to change and grow, but there is something to be said for giving the audience what it came for.  I'm willing to give Madonna one more shot and pick up the Blond Ambition DVD when or if it becomes available.  Until then, my best advice is to check out DVDS featuring the likes of Tina Turner, Donna Summer or even Sade--they all prove that you can make the old new again, share and reveal something that a studio production can't, and thus never need to worry about going stale. Real concert greatness is not overstylized pomp--it's audience connection!
DVD PUT IT ON DVD. I DONT WONT TO DOWNLOAD IT I WONT IT ALL ON DVD THIS IS WASTE MONE
Cant watch. I downloaded this program and it was garbled and video as if played in slow motion.  This is the first of two downloads that didn't play.  I know it was not my computer because I did download three that played ok
Better not shown. I imagine this movie might be funny if you're really into dog shows.  I'm not, so I couldn't tell you.  Mediocre at best.  "This is Spinal Tap" was better
Missing episodes. This series is being sold with missing episodes, like many others here in Unbox. Do they think their customers are so dumb? Would you buy a DVD series with a missing DVD? What sense does this make? What a disappointment this service is..
A rotten musical. This film represents the low point in the splashy Grable musicals released by Twentieth Century Fox during the war.  The story/script is really appalling and Bruce Humberstone, a frequently poor director, adds nothing.  Grable plays a secretary doubling as a night club performer.  As far as plot, that is about it.In typical Fox fashion, the colour and sound are excellent. Grable looks attractive but the makeup is quite heavy, particularly the bleached blonde hair.  She was pregnant during shooting and the costumes have been designed to hide this. One would hope that Martha Raye and Joe E Brown would help but the material is so bad that they are just noisy and distracting.   Most of the songs are lousy too - duds like "Don't Carry Tales".Two redeeming feature - the song "Once too Often" as Hermes Pan and Grable perform a tame Apache dance and the title tune, nicely sung by Grable in close up.The film represents Hollywood cynicism at its worst.  Fox built a film around Grable's status as THE pin up of World War 2 but neglected to give her a script or a decent leading man. Not to worry, the public will come anyway and, of course, so they did.  In the long run, though, junk like this chips away at the reputation of this appealing star who barely holds the film together by sheer star quality, her pretty face and her sense of humour.  If you are not an ardent Grable fan, you'll hate the film."Pin Up Girl" really supports the view that Betty Grable made poor films which don't warrant revival.  In fact many of them are first rate entertainments but certainly not this one!  It should, however, be noted that the print of the film in this DVD is excellent and among the extras is an entertaining deleted number which can be seen already in the Hidden Hollywood series
Star Trek:  City on the Edge of Forever. My favorite show of the Trek series but there's no way I'd buy another individual program from Amazon.  It will ONLY play on their downloaded player ...won't burn to DVD so can't play it on my television.  Don't bother buying this ...just go for the Trek collection on DVD
Too Slow!. Expected more from this movie - although DeNiro was good as usual
a sorry movie. I wrote a huge review for this and don't know where it is but let me give you the short version.  They don't continue the story, that is until the end of the movie.  AND THAT WAS THE PART TRHAT RUINED THE MOVIE FOR ME. The movie is about this kid from the wudang sword school and he is going to get married.  Enter the Bride.  She of course doesn't want anybody to be happy so...The story is not really worth going over, it is just injected and there are no real emotions.  Except of course for an ending that really PO'ed me.  The only reason this movie gets a 2 stars and almost gets a 3 is for Christy Chung.  Not only is she one of the most beautiful women on earth, she is a great actress.  So I know of 2 movies now that are only worth watching for her, this and Red Wolf.  It may be because the people she works with are so terrible, but to tell the truth, Christy Chung actually made me pop this dvd in for a second time.  Not a big deal since it was only like a 77 minute long movie.
Not That Great. A number of people had told me that this was a very good war movie and one that should be viewed as soon as possible.  Honestly, I was not impressed.  The plot is disjointed and confusing; jumping from the North African Theatre to the European Theatre almost seamlessly, leaving the viewer thoroughly confused.  The character development is also very poor.  No one character stands out due to the fact that Samuel Fuller never allows them to grow or mature by switches between multiple characters too frequently or by not allowing any lengthy dialogue.  Historically speaking this film is a joke.  During the action scenes when the Germans have tanks they are in fact American tanks with the German symbol painted on.  Also, uniforms are sometimes inaccurate.  However, the most annoying aspect is the fact that Samuel Fuller makes it appear as though this squad of men is the ONLY squad fighting the entire war.  Only once or twice do you see any other American troops.  This feeling of isolation detracts from the overall sense of a full scale war, of which these men are supposed to be a part of.  Finally, to make matters worse, the film's action sequences are sometimes imaginative but are often impractical, sloppy, awkwardly placed, and consist of ridiculous situations.Overall this movie was too long, lacked character development for most of the movies characters, was disjointed, and was historically inaccurate.  For a movie that garnered so much hype I was expecting much, much more.
sum of all stars? zero!. Maybe no one noticed but towards the end of the movie when the Russian President and Jack Ryan are talking to each other through the computer, repeat is spelled "reapeat".  On top of that, the acting was horrible...this movie didn't take itself seriously enough.  Ben Affleck sucked as much as he did in this movie as he did in Pearl Harbor
PURE CRAP. This is one of the worst horror movie I ever saw. I just hate it.People dont waste your money renting or buying this crap.  If you want to see it that badly, just watch it on TV, like I did
JASON TAKES MANHATTAN....,THEY SHOULD'VE JUST CALLED IT FRIDAY THE 13th: TITANIC. This has got to be the most S*~^est Movie ever. It completeley ruined the Friday the 13th Series!Jason did not have Hair and was deformed as a ChildHe was on a Boat for most of the Movie, and appeared in New York at the End!Why the Hell did Jason turn back into a Boy at the End, when he Melted in the Toxic WasteJason's Face is just F$"#ing Stupid at the End. I mean Seriously. He looks like Zippy from F$"#ing Rainbow. Why did they even make it?
Basic  (2003). Director:  John McTiernanCast:  John Travolta, Connie Nielsen, Samuel L. Jackson, Timothy Daly, Giovanni Ribisi, Brian Van Holt, Taye Diggs, Dash Mihok, Christian de la Fuente, Roselyn Sanchez, Harry Connick Jr.Running Time:  98 minutesRated R for violence and language.John McTiernan's (the mastermind behind "Die Hard") "Basic" opens up in a rain-drenched Panama jungle at night on an Army training mission headed by Sergeant West (Samuel L. Jackson). Flash forward to the next day. An Army chopper picks up two men from the training mission, one injured and one very much alive. The injured man, Kendall (Giovanni Ribisi), is sent to a hospital, and the alive man, Dunbar (Brian Van Holt) is sent in for questioning by the very sexy and very Southern Osborne (Connie Nielsen). Dunbar refuses to speak to anyone except a Ranger. So in comes Ranger Tom Hardy (John Travolta) to piece together the events surrounding the death of Sgt. West and his team.  Most of the film takes place at night, during a rainy hurricane, and adds to the nonexistent plot. What is so intriguing is that the plot isn't really there, but the writer tries to manifest one, and we feel as if we are staring at some nonexistant, material wad of words and flashbacks and images thrown together in a blender, the writer hoping for it to come out smelling of roses.The writer of "Basic", James Vanderbilt (whose screen crudentials consist of "Darkness Falls"), has so many twists and turns that the film is impossible to keep up with. It becomes hard to seperate present from past and what's real from what's not. So many revelations happen that the audience will feel they are in the middle of the writer's mind, as he comes up with new ideas and tries to squeeze them in time after time after time. There is a limit to how many times you can use "surprise" revelation endings. Vanderbilt uses three of four in a row, piled on top of each other, time after time after time. Just as we think the plot twists are done, and we start to smile because we think we might finally understand the basis of the plot, something else happens, and we zoom in suspensefully on John Travolta's face as he, along with the audience, realizes something.  The performances of Basic's cast are a mixed bag: Travolta is watchable as usual, and he brings a believable sense of self-assured cool to Hardy, but he is frustratingly unable to contain his hammy instincts. The quality of a Travolta performance appears to be inversely proportional to the volume of his voice.  When he's quiet, he's very good; when he yells, he quickly becomes a cartoon. This movie has enough credibility problems; it doesn't need a cartoon hero.If Travolta is mixed news, Connie Nielsen is plain bad. It's not so much that she can't seem to make heads or tails of the convoluted story - heck, no one can. But she seems less to be stymied than just exceptionally stupid. The scenes that are supposed to establish romantic tension between her and Travolta fall laughably flat. To top it off, she is saddled with some Hollywood nimrod's notion of a Southern accent, which blinks on and off like a turn signal. The smaller roles, though, fare much better. Van Holt as the prisoner does especially well, flavoring his defiance with feral intelligence. There is also nice work by Taye Diggs as the unit's misfit and Tim Daly (where has he been since "Wings" folded?) as the base commander. The most memorable, though (and you sort of knew this already) is Jackson. He has the lunatic drill instructor bit down pat, and delivers it with relish. His is the one character in Basic who is supposed to be larger than life, in part because he is seen in flashback, which means that we are seeing not the man himself, but other people's impressions of him. In his commando sweater and poncho thrown over one shoulder like a warlord's cape, he looks twenty feet tall and invincible. Still, one of Jackson's great talents is his ability to project nuance and smarts to even the most unsubtle characters. His Sgt. West is the shadow leaning over the whole incident, and the movie would have been smart to take more advantage of that.  The real disappointment in the supporting cast is the normally talented Giovanni Ribisi as the wounded survivor, a hospital-ward weirdo who is supposed to seem mysterious but mostly comes off as jokey and annoying. Ribisi seems to have shoplifted his performance from Gary Oldman in "Hannibal", down to his marble-mouthed line deliveries.Though "Basic" is shabbily conceived, it is at least presented well by John McTiernan, who manages to wring what tension may be had from the loopy script. The movie is lacking in the action set-pieces McTiernan usually employs, but he nails the atmosphere just right. The use of weather to convey emotion is certainly overdone, but it is still effective when done right, as it is here. The pounding, ever-present rain and the dim, shadow-tinged interior lighting gives the movie the feel of an approaching end, a kind of despairing resignation to horrible things. It's a shame that the drama can't keep up with its own visual metaphor.  It has its merits, but strains your suspension of disbelief beyond the breaking point, and washes its credibility away like bloodstains in a rainstorm.
Beware of Unbox!!!. Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for
memorable orientalia wasted on poor film stock!. Being an Oriental I am fairly familiar with films released by our geographical neighbours, although not as extensive as standard Hollywood productions. With Japanese films, whether it was made by a Kurusawa or a  more obscure artisan, I can fairly adjudged them on a whole as lethargic in  pace, inconspicuously lacks background music/instrumentals, and are  generally pressed on celluluid films that are simply comparatively  substandard.  Village of Dreams, while touted as an award winner  is a  glaring testimony of this stunted Japanese film-making characteristic.  Review it yourself. The pace alone wantingly needs tighter editing. It was  the same character that can be seen even in Kurusawa's Ran - a &quot;highly  acclaimed&quot; work that in my case, I couldn't even view for the third  time, because even its DVD resolution has a quality that can only be  likened to the eye-view of a person who's suffering his earliest stage of  creeping glaucoma.  Village of Dreams is so &quot;relaxed&quot; as if the  filmmaker expects people like me to have an available time that they  enjoyed in 1940s Japan in an obscure countryside. At the very least, the  straight narrative of this film is a consolation, but with RAN, the actions  were so hard to follow, you'd be puzzled who was fighting and attacking  whom.  The most unforgivable quality of this DVD transfer  is the poor film  stock. The picture approximates that of a &quot;third generation&quot;  recording of a VHS copy. This means that you'll be sorely dissapointed of  having to get a VHS-quality copy COPIED, in turn, from another VHS copy  which was copied from the original VHS &quot;master tape&quot;.  Of course,  the DVD transfer is not at fault, its simply that the Japanese despite  their touted techno prowess just couldn't give us a decent film stock, that  could at least preserve their comparatively well-made gems. The glaring  deficiency of films like this comes even more obvious, when shown on high  resolution TVs. I've viewed this film in a 29-inch Sony Wega Flat TV, and  in a 50-inch Mitsubishi projection TV, from a Pioneer DVL 919 and 909. If  not for the antics of the two children leads, Village comes off as  wearisome. I bought this film despite its hefty price tag mainly because  I'm a film collector. Its works like this that whets my appreciation for  world cinema. Unfortunately, Village's poor resolution takes away  gratifying cinematic enjoyment, as well  as negating its  &quot;collectability&quot; factor. This should have looked more glorious if  it could approximate the celluluid quality of examples like  What Dreams  May Come or Dark City, but of course that's asking too much from those  editing-challenged Japanese filmakers.  I want to ask Amazon for a refund  because this is not well worth its price value. I was compulsed to buy it  because of its cover, I thought it was at least as exotically  glorious-looking as KUNDUN, but it proved to be just a small, obscure  production. Critics may raved about it, just like those Canadians did with  BLACK ROBE, but the final word is that they're just run of the mill, albeit  thoughtful, films....
Vulgar and disgusting. Saw this one on television.Vincent van Gogh was misfortunate in life and certainly crazy. The artist who portrays him does his job very well.The scenery is breathtaking.However the nudity  in the film is vulgar. The chaeracters are hard to identify with. Some of the scenes are disgusting.Not going to see this one again
could not be viewed!. i downloaded it and i couldn't view the video paste the intro. then i RE-downloaded it thinking that maybe it was a corrupt file, but it again it only had sound and not video. this one is a waste of money
no fun at all. Loosely connected to the first HM of '81, this sequel has a single tale of lust and immortality in place of the anthology of the older movie.  While mining an asteroid, one of the miners finds a crystal shard - the key to a fountain of immortality.  The fountain itself is on another planet thousands of light years away.  Unfortunately, the miner is played (okay, "voiced") by Michael Ironside and, faster than you can say "Oh No, General Katana is approaching!!" the key consumes the miner's soul and sends him off on a quest of conquest to find the well.  First off, he must ravage a remote planet whose few human inhabitants contain traces of an element that staves off death.  While successfully carting away most of the population of this distant planet, he misses Julie - a six-foot hottie with a big gun and a bottomless reservoir of rage.  The two battle across the galaxy - first to satisfy her thirst for revenge, but then for the sake of immortality itself.Even having been warned, this flick is still a big disappointment.  The first movie was guilty fun - catering and yet lampooning the rock-fan in each of us.  The animation was crude, yet in a charming way that today's assembly-line animation or CGI will never know.  (Imagine a story built on all those way-out 1970's album covers, and you get the idea.)  With animation reflecting an era that predated Japanimation, "Heavy Metal" grew better with age - a time capsule of bad music and laughably bad humor.  The new movie offers none of that - no memorable lines, images or characters.  Though patterned largely on "Taarna, the Terakien" from the first movie, HM2 has none of the spirit or wit of the earlier story, and Julie emotes less character (which is bad when you remember that Taarna was mute).  In short, the movie offers less than a fraction of the entertainment value of a single episode of "Heavy Metal" the magazine
Best movie with no conclusion I've ever seen. OK, I'm a SciFi fan.  I read the SciFi reviews and thought this was really a movie for me, and it really was good right up to the end.  Just one problem, they forgot to write the end.  What happened?  Did they run out of money?  Did the writer write himself into a corner?  There was no climax, conclusion, or resolution.  You can argue till you are blue in the face about "pan & scan."  I prefer movies with an ending.  If you are looking for a great unfinished story, this one is for you
Not Happy. I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?
Classic film - Horrible DVD!. "Raise the Red Lantern" is justifiably recognized as one of the great films of the Nineties and one of the most visually striking movies of all time. Unfortunately this DVD release by Razor Digital Entertainment is a travesty. The colors are dull and washed out and the English subtitles are poorly translated, ruining the stately mood of the movie.  This is not how a classic film should be watched! Hopefully a legitimate DVD company like Criterion will decide to release the movie with a properly done transfer. In the meantime, avoid this hideous DVD at all costs
Van Gogh. Pure trash. Save your time and money. It does not belong in the catagory with "Cezanne in Provence"
Embarrasing to watch. I have to disagree with the reviews above and say that I watched this movie on dvd having watched it as a kid twenty years ago. Unfortunately I couldn't find anything about this film I remember enjoying. It's a cross between The Blob, The Thing and a really crap detective movie. Moriarty's character is pretty smooth but the film culminates in a farce reminicent of an 80's kiddy movie. This film is definetly not for intelligent adults and you'll lose interest halfway through I guarantee it. No suspense, few laughs, and way to hokey to watch twice. If you love this movie you need to get out more.
I've seen it all before...... this tour did nothing for me.  I won't lie when I say the visuals were appealing to look at, with britney in her cute clothes and stage sets, but she TOTALLY rips off janet jackson with her dancing, style of dress and so forth, so I don't understand why little teenagers like her and won't give ms. jackson the time of day when she's the one who did it better than her. I got a sense of deja vu when I watched bits of this show, I felt that she purposely stole elements from the janet, velvet rope and all for you tours such as the costumes! Janet's All For You Tour, Madonna's Drowned World Tour and even Michael Jackson's 30th Anniversary concert were far more entertaining in 2001, and way more superior than this garbage.  This garbage just goes to show that young & pretty stars are given more attention than those who actually have more talent that shines even without all the special effects in the world
Cant watch. I downloaded this program and it was garbled and video as if played in slow motion.  This is the first of two downloads that didn't play.  I know it was not my computer because I did download three that played ok
Davy Crockett TV   vs. Davy Crockett Movies. I was very gung ho when I found out that Disney was finally releasing the Davy Crockett TV show on DVD.  I grew up watching the two Davy Crockett movies.  HOwever upon actually seeing these DVDs I was very disappointed.  It is exactly the same as those two movies it is just split into five seperate episodes.  The Episodes: Davy Crockett, Indian Fighter; Davy Crockett Goes to Congress; and Davy Crockett at the Alamo are all the parts included in the movie Davy Crockett King of the Wild Frontier.  The episodes Davy Crockett's Keelboat Race; Davy Crockett and the River Pirates; were what made up the movie Davy Crockett and the River Pirates.  I for one am planning on buying the newer version that came out in 2004 that is just the two movies on one disc.  The only difference between this set and the new set is that there are couple of features on this set and that there are introductions to the episodes buy Leonard Maltin and it has two discs in a tin collector's box.  The biggest difference of all is that this set runs from between $37-$100 whereas you can buy the two movies on DVD for $14-$16.  I myself will go for the cheaper movie set rather than have to watch each episode sperately.
quite boring.. the young actor is great in this movie, but the film itself is non-exciting and a bit boring.**
Free to Be You and Me - As Long As You Are Like Me. I rented this on a whim and it brought back a lot of memories from my 1970s days in elementary school.  This video made its rounds in the public schools.  The songs are catchy and the film quality is good.But make no mistake, this is propaganda aimed at children.  I will not be showing it to my kids.Despite the freewheeling title, the message is that girls will find happiness only if they mimic boys.Case in point:  Atalanta, a princess, finds happiness when she competes with men in a footrace and when she rejects marriage so she can travel the world (on her father's horse).  She also designs and fabricates rocketships in her spare time.Juxtapose that story with another cartoon where a femine girl in a pink dress and curls is devoured by tigers when she follows the custom of "ladies first."  The tigers abide her request and throw her into a boiling cauldron.  The narrator advises us that the boiling girl makes a very tasty meal.Our "hosts", infant puppets voiced by Mel Brooks and Marlo Thomas, are revolting.  There should be a law against using Mel Brooks' voice for a baby.  Apparently, I repressed memories of these creatures, but seeing them again brought back the horror.  Needless to say, I fast forwarded through the disturbing puppetry.Overall, this DVD is fun for thirtysomethings but should be kept away from children
I Was a Male War Bride. Not one of Cary Grant's better ones.  Too goofy and it didn't look as if he enjoyed the part
total utter nonsense!!!!!!. this is pure drivel!!!!!clearly there was some kind of argument behind this film;like the director wasnt given enough money to make it,so he thought,you know what,im going to spite the film company by making a hideousely awful film,that'll show them.the &quot;plot&quot;,if i can re-tell it without vomiting,is thus:a plane is struck by lightning,and kills all the pilots..............i kind of lost what was going on after that......the ending,if there actually was one,was that whatever predicament they were in,they got out of.where can i begin?????clearly no one involved with this project has any knowledge of basic physics,as they'd have pointed out that this ISNT POSSIBLE!!!!!!!!!im a little bit rusty on my physics,but isnt it called a faraday coil???if not then forgive me,my minds a little indestinct,but the main point is a bolt of lightning wont pass through a plane. &quot;what about the glass,it passed through the glass window!!!&quot; you bark smugly,well thick glass used for this wouldnt allow electric current to pass through it.think about it people,you ever been hit by lightning indoors??have you ever heard of this happening in real life before??NO,BECAUSE IT CANT!!!!!! well done,you're learning.anyway,enough of the banter,the film struggles from then on in.for some bizzare reason the plane operated by a laptop,the cable(??!!) for which has broken.it only works by some guy holding it with venom.factor into this some wierd pregnant woman type nonsense,some shouting passengers/helpful people arguing rubbish,a hint of romance between a &quot;criminal&quot; and a &quot;female human being&quot;,and you have this godawful tripe of a film.some wonderfully hilarious moments.guy says &quot;i skipped bail&quot;,&quot;are you a criminal?&quot; she asks!!!!!! well of course he is you stupid fool,he just told you!!!! any time there was &quot;turbulence&quot; the camera was wobbled about a bit,and the &quot;actors&quot; moved around unconvincingly.the terrible news report segments,where hilarity prevailed every time.the bit when the dog jumped out the car,that was brilliant!!!!he pushed it over a bit then it was half dead...then later he gave the oxygen mask,great!!!!! all the scenes involving the radar room,they were something else!!!!the ending also,the rubbish CGI aeroplane,what a laugh!!!!i could go on and on and on,pointing out rubbish but funny things about this film,but i think ive said enough.in short,dont come to watch this if you want a coherent engaging film.but if you enjoy laughing through mind-bogglingly bad trash,then this is definately for you!!!! i laughed nearly all the way through it,so at least it was entertaining.1 out of 5
Didn't work. I downloaded the player and this episode as part of a promotion that gave a free episode. Not only did I get charged, but when I cancelled the download to contact about the charge - I was told I had to finish downloading before they could refund. Once it finished downloading, it didn't play anyway. I gave up.
Harriet is good, but the rest of the film...... I gotta give it to that little girl who plays Harriet in the movie. She did a great job. But, I found Rosie O'Donnell's performance really lacking. Which made the film a little boring to watch at times.
Caged Heat is Dead Beat. This movie was a big dissapointment. Lame acting, lame script and 70's chicks with bad acting skills. Not a very good "Women In Prison" film....there are better one like "Reform School Girls"....the band Caged Heat is way better than the movie...pass it up and get a life
Star Trek:  City on the Edge of Forever. My favorite show of the Trek series but there's no way I'd buy another individual program from Amazon.  It will ONLY play on their downloaded player ...won't burn to DVD so can't play it on my television.  Don't bother buying this ...just go for the Trek collection on DVD
Give Your Fast-Forward a Work-Out!!. Let's just be honest: this film is terrible . . . and not in the way that "Attack of the Killer Tomatoes!" is so "terrible" that it's great . . . more like the way "Caddyshack II" is so terrible that the director should forever live in shame . . .I was a kid when this film was released. And, while it was not particularly exciting then, it is insanely tedious now. It is a genuine test of patience . . . but with no pay-off what-so-ever.Here's some potentially helpful information:The slasher film can branch in two directions: supernatural (Friday the 13th II, Halloween, Nightmare on Elm Street etc...) and crime/revenge (I Spit on Your Grave, Friday the 13th, TCM, Scream, Urban Legend ect...). This one falls under the latter heading. And while realism can render a more potent effect ("This could really happen!"), this film simply fails to engage the viewer ON ANY LEVEL.The goal of a slasher film is two-fold: to horrify and repulse. This does neither!! The "horror" element is non-existent: there is no point in expounding, since there is nothing to examine.  And, if you love gore (and who doesn't?) try another film. The "murders" are barely visible (literally) and so sloppy that they solicit no response other than a yawn. Many of the film's problems are technical: the cinematography is just horrendous. The entirely film is extremely underlit, the colors are needlessly washed-out, and the film stock is grade "F." And this, as you know, is not because the film is over twenty-five years old . . . the problem was always there.There is ONE "good" moment in the entire film . . . when the school's "bad boy" has his head lopped-off and it clumsily thunks down the prom-court walk-way. Still, it is more comic-relief than genuine horror.The soundtrack could not BE WORSE. I am not referring to the disco tunes (we accept those since this film was made at the end of the disco period), but the tracks made for the film . . . they sound like they were squeaked-out by The Carpenters. So, imagine lots of disco punctuated by lackluster, psuedo-thoughtful ballads (like the final song on the track). Words cannot explain how wildly offensive it is!!Did I mention that Leslie Nielson has a meaty role (yes, THAT Leslie Nielsen from Airplane, and Naked Gun)? He plays a tough-minded principal who is tormented by the death of his daughter. I know, it SOUNDS funny, but IT'S NOT!! Trust me!!If you dig watching unattractive teenagers "disco the night away," hey, this film is totally for you!! But if you are looking for a decent slasher film from the early middle-period of its reign look elsewhere (like Halloween, Friday the 13th etc...)I'd be willing to get all Ed McMahon's Star-Search on you and give this "film" a 1/4 star. But it is an important milestone in the slasher sub-genre (I will not spoil the film and tell you why, though). So if you are a slasher enthusiast or a horror scholar, watch it . . . on picture-in-picture . . . maybe after a few drinks . . . on a day when the cable is out . . . on fast-forward!
Huh?. I can't figure out which was worse - the acting, the dialogue, the direction or the plot.  I rented the movie thinking...."OK, a post WW2 spy thriller with Nazi intrigue starring Michael Caine and directed by John F.  How could it be anything but spine-tingling?".Jeesh, what a mistake.Believe or not, Caine is capable of giving a bad performance.  And this was it.  He just seems lost in this train wreck.  However, he was Olivier compared the rest of the cast.  Veronica Tennant shows why her career lasted months!  All the others were caricatures of stereotypes (that Orchestra Conductor better be slinging hash somewhere now, because acting was not his forte).And the dialogue!  Caine is supposed to be a "foreign born American citizen".  He, of course, has as thick an English accent as in every other movie, indicating he was brought up on the Isle.  When Veronica Tennant tells him "the umbrella is in the boot", she has to explain that boot means trunk in England!  Gawd, are we all idiots?!?The plot?!?  Don't even get me started...  It's absolutely asinine.  Our bumbling everyman is caught up in some meandering travelogue which is supposed to pass for international high-stakes intrigue.  What a snorefest.What were they thinking?Nah, they weren't.  Pass on this one folks
The Harvey Girls review. I really enjoyed the movie.  The story background is the Fred Harvey restaurants and concessions at train stations.  My father worked for Fred Harvey at the Chicago and Cleveland facilities.Regarding the movie and Judy Garland - The movie is great and Judy was one of my favorite entertainers.Lane Hanse
Survivor Rip Off. I have bought 2 seasons of Survivor on unbox and both of them are not complete. Very dissapointing. Guatemala  episode 11 is from a completely different season and it is missing the last 2 episodes and the reunion show. Just leaves you hanging. Exile Island is missing the final episode it just goes from the competition between Danielle and Cirie for a spot in the final 3 to the live reunion show
Daydeaming and Fantasies can have Consequences. I found this movie to be a fascinating story about the trauma that can be caused to those we love when we allow our fantasies and daydreaming to interfere with our actual lives. I was constantly wondering where I would draw the line if I was the heroine. The experience allowed me to visualize the mayhem that could be caused by to much fantasy/daydreaming
Do the right thing...avoid this movie. I would not go so far as to say this movie is terrible. I would say it is self-important, immature, obvious, and overwhelmingly one-sided.  It seems Spike Lee does not believe there are any white people alive who are not either stupid, racist, phony, or downright evil.  I had a bad feeling about this movie as it started off with 4 1/2 minutes of a sleazy looking woman having a seizure accompanied by bad music. Then 4 minutes of an inane morning dj spouting a string of unconnected meaningless words.  Lee had his moments, but it was pretty much a 2-hour music video.Spike Lee doesn't mess with fantasy, only with reality and his reality is black and white. It is infact fantasy, and pure propaganda
Dont get "Fiji" final week ... Dont dwnld " Survivor, "Thunderstorms & Sacrifice" ". Its my fault for not reading the whole thing. you would think that the last episode would be the finale , but NO, its just a 10 minute recap going to the finale 4. I didnt even get a full 45 minute episode. No finale. I got rippped off. $1.99 dwnld not well spent. Dont bother dwnldng any episode of fiji if you dont know the ending. Because they dont have that episode, not even the reunion show
Unimpressed... I'm shocked that having spent, (what was it?) $200 Million, they couldn't have at least employeed a writer/director who cared about the original medium, Comics, and that pre-existing fanbase.I wouldn't be complaining, but to base it off of the original films, and then ignore so many gems that made the original films enjoyable, simply left a lot to be desired.I feel looking back, that the writers simply wanted to reach non-fans by writing a 'cutting-edge' 'non-traditional' Superman story. It wasn't necessary.Lastly, while I love Lex Luthor, I found it a shame they chose to keep the Version of Lex who is a Real-Estate Obsessed Super-Villian, who lacks forethought.I'm beginning to think the heads of WB don't know of any other villians for Supes to fight.Most shocking is that they signed the writer's up for a trilogy deal, before this movie even hit theaters
Star Trek Animated v-5. The weekest of the 11 volumes. I erased the first episode showing satan as a misunderstood alien. The second one is only ok. A bad link to a great cartoon series
This one will put you to sleep. This was a big disappointment.  Not worth it!!!!
The book was great and the movie wasn't, period. Do yourself a favor and read the book and dont even look at this movie
A bit plodding, but funny series of reversals. A woman who lives in an apartment in NYC and can't cook and doesn't have a baby must fool the owner of her magazine into thinking she really is the character she writes about. (She writes a very popular domestic advice column.) She succeeds, until a Navy hero wins the opportunity to spend Christmas with her in her house in Connecticut, enjoying her homemaking skills and meeting her baby. Problem is, she doesn't have any of those things. She borrows the house (from a man who wants to marry her), she borrows the cooking skills of a sweet grandfatherly chef who secretly cooks for her at the house, and she even borrows a baby. The unmaking beings when she tells the Navy man her child is a boy, and when he volunteers to give it a bath he discovers it's really a girl. Then the mother of the baby takes it back, and the baby is replaced by a baby who looks nothing like the first one. Then the woman is falling in love with the Navy man (and he with her) while the man from whom she's borrowed the house still believes she's going to marry him, and keeps bringing a minister to the house for a quickie wedding.It's a delightful movie. Very funny, and rich in both plot and character development.  Unfortunately, what probably makes it not a classic by today's standards, it is a bit plodding.  It does not move at the same pace as, for example, the movie Casablanca, with which it shares some of the same supporting actors
What's up with that?. I wish I had read the other reviews first.  Though the quality of the episode and the video are top notch, the episode cuts off after 22 minutes.  Obviously, I already know the ending of "The Black Death", but I still wanted to see the full show
Cant watch. I downloaded this program and it was garbled and video as if played in slow motion.  This is the first of two downloads that didn't play.  I know it was not my computer because I did download three that played ok
Terrible!. I have never not been able to sit through a rated G movie.  However, my sister and I rented this thinking it would be a funny show, and it was so terribly BORING that I was forced to leave the room.  I couldn't believe it because I love movies.  I can see how this movie would be funny for a 6 year old boy to watch, but don't count on the parents or older siblings being able to sit through it
I love Christmas movies, but this one was both depressing and annoying. From the back cover:Miracles do happen!Award-winning actress Mary Steenburgen (TV's JOAN OF ARCADIA, HOPE SPRINGS) gives a solid performance as Ginny Grainger, a young mother who rediscovers the joy and beauty of Christmas, thanks to the unshakeable faith of her six-year-old daughter Abbie (Elisabeth Harnois) and Gideon (Harry Dean Stanton), Ginny's very own guardian angel. Ginny's wonderous experience will touch your heart and warm your soul in the timeless tradition of past Disney favorites. ONE MAGIC CHRISTMAS fulfills all your most treasured Christmas fantasies. Share it with those you love.And my review:I'm such a sucker for Christmas stuff. I probably own more Christmas books and movies than regular ones. So this review is not from a "Bah Humbug!" Scrooge. And I don't expect all of my Christmas films to be "happy happy joy joy" all of the time. My absolute favorite of all time is IT'S A WONDERFUL LIFE, which can be very dark in places.First off, I don't think that the acting was bad in this movie. And the cinematography was pretty good as well. I made my judgment based on the content and the storyline, which, in my opinion, flopped.What I really found annoying was the way Ginny, the heroine, was constantly being villified. For example, let me paint you a picture of her life: her husband was laid off and hasn't worked in six months. They have two young children. She's making minimum wage, and they're barely scraping by. They've also been evicted from their home (since it's owned by her husband's previous employer) and are forced to move in with her father-in-law. They have very little saved in the bank, and yet her husband wants to take out $500 to buy Christmas presents for the kids. She understandably balks at the idea. First of all $500 is way too much to spend on presents for just two kids, even if you're rich. Unless you want your kids to become spoiled! (Remember, this movie was originally made in 1985, so that number is even more outrageous. Plus, they have only one meager paycheck to live on and no house of their own. I think that she's being reasonable. But she's painted as the bad guy for not blowing a bunch of their savings on toys.Then her husband wants to sink what little money they have into his own bike shop, and possibly go into debt to own his own business. Again, she's villified for being the only responsible one, and telling her husband that he needs to get a steady job with a steady paycheck. After all, they may need their savings to survive. This is not the time to be blowing it on dreams that may never pan out (and usually don't, since most small businesses fail in the first year). But no, she's shown to be a mean, cold-hearted witch for saying this. Grr. It was just so irritating. Yes, you want to give your kids a magical Christmas, yes, the husband has always dreamed of owning his own shop, but you have to be responsible, especially when you have children to feed the clothe. I don't think she was being a Scrooge for wanting to be a responsible adult (she did buy her kids resonably priced gifts, after all), but the film painted her as such.And this film was so depressing. It felt like the world was constantly kicking this family while it was down. The happy ending was a long time in coming.Also, I'd be very hesitant to show this movie to impressionable young children. I certainly wouldn't want one of my children to think that they can constantly disobey me, run away from home in the middle of the night, or talk to creepy-looking strangers in trench coats. That's how kids end up abducted or killed! Not really realistic.I really expected better from Disney, especially when I really loved one of their other Christmas movies, THE SANTA CLAUSE. There are way better Christmas movies out there. See my list "Christmas movies that I watch every year" for movies that are worth your time and money. I don't recommend ONE MAGIC CHRISTMAS. If you're still determined to watch it, try to rent it first, or you might find yourself upset that you wasted your money, like I was.
Jason Goes To Hell. I bought most the Friday the 13th dvds around halloween time at a discount. Of course i couldn't find this one, even thought it was at wal-mart for a long time before that. In my opinion, this one wasn't very good at all. Compared to all the rest i was Greatly disappointed. It was just so fake, and not realistic at all. Very cheesy. For those who wish to complete the set, this one is part of it.  This one was so awful and far from the other ones.  So Fake it's shameful, bad script, it jumped the shark!!!!Jason -yes that's my real name!!!
Prom Night. Years ago, a group of children playing accidently kill one of their friends, and decide to keep a secret. Years later when they're all in high school, the girls twin brother exacts bloody revenge against them. Your typical 80s horror film, not very notable other than Leslie Nielsen, and Jamie Lee Curtis. This is one prom, better left unattended
Eh...I've Seen Worse. If you want a review of the plot itself, complete with spoilers, feel free to read the other reviews.My biggest beef with this movie is the fact that any suspension of disbelief is utterly killed, again and again, due to the fact that the script writers and director couldn't keep the story straight.There is a homage to Asimov with the shipboard computer telling one of the crew that it can not let a human come to harm. That would have been fabulous if it had actually been adhered to in any other part of the film. There are a handful of these screw ups that kills any chance of the story being credible.That said, it was a bit enjoyable. The cast did a fantastic job with what they were actually given. If the writers would have spent more time developing the characters than finding ways to get them naked, maybe I would have cared what happened to them.The dimensional jump effect was quite novel and was the one thing in this movie that made me say, "Oooh, cool".Good premise, good effects, good acting, but poor writing killed any chance at this being a good film
Firefly: Excellent.  But buy it on DVD, not "Unbox"!. Read the Unbox terms of use CAREFULLY before choosing this route over a regular DVD purchase.  It is not your usual set of "blah blah" legal jargon.For example, 3c:"Removal of Software. If you uninstall or otherwise remove the Software, your ability to view all Digital Content you have downloaded to the Authorized Device will immediately and automatically terminate and we reserve the right to delete all Digital Content from that Authorized Device without notice to you."If you ever remove the Unbox software, Amazon may revoke your ability to view the Firefly episodes you paid for and may even delete them from your machine!Amazon, I've ordered literally thousands of dollars of stuff through you and always had a great experience; why did you let Unbox create these anti-customer terms of use??
Here We GO AGAIN!!! RELEASE DIFFERENT ONES. Well Warner is releasing duplicate episodes again. why don't they put all the scooby-doos out. They have 5 DVDs of cartoons out and Hassle in the Castle is on 3 of them. 3 out of the 4 episodes on this DVD are already on DVD. I don't think anyone should pay 15 dollars for only episode that isn't released yet!!!I am getting the other ones that are coming out though. So in short I don't reccommend this to anyone. Not only that, they are wasting a whole DVD for only 4 eps. 3 of which are already out. They should release different ones like Terror in the Big Top, Dr.Jeckyl and Mr. Hyde and other ones from the series. They should release Scooby Movies with Speed Buggy and Josie and the Pussycats. In short I'll just say I am sick of duplicate Scooby episodes
Relative to other Abs videos, not very good. This video is not very good at all.  I have been using the 8 Minute Abs video for a few weeks, and I have seen results already!  I thought that I would add some variety to my routine by using a different video, but in choosing this video, I failed!  The workouts are for those who squeeze in workouts during their lunch break without any time to shower.  You will not break a sweat with this one
What's up with that?. I wish I had read the other reviews first.  Though the quality of the episode and the video are top notch, the episode cuts off after 22 minutes.  Obviously, I already know the ending of "The Black Death", but I still wanted to see the full show
Movie is great, but Unbox is uncooked. Movie got 2/3 through and just quit. No problem, this is Windows right? Just reboot and start where you left off. Only for whatever reason I can't restart this movie from anywhere but the beginning. I'm not going to watch this moving over from the beginning just to see if it fails in the same place again. Only a couple bucks, but definitely not worth it
guess you have to be stoned... I don't expect anything more of a movie than to enjoy it and be entertained. I don't seek to psychoanalyze or offer up in-depth critique, it's only a movie. I either enjoy it or I don't. I did NOT enjoy this, and I ride, so I assumed I would like this. I guess you have to ride AND use drugs to appreciate this...
One of the worst movies I've ever seen. Before I saw this movie I thought I would enjoy it. I enjoyed watching the miniseries when I was a kid. However, nothing could prepare me for what I was about to watch on screen. It was an absolute disaster of a film. I do enjoy superhero movies, some recent ones I like are the Spiderman series and Batman. But the Hulk did not inspire me at all, it was like going to the Dentist to get a tooth pulled. The character is a cartoon-like green figure, totally lacking in his emotional capacities, not even his rage convinced me, it looked like a video game more than a movie. This film had no serious plot worthy of mention. It was just plain painful to watch. If I could give it half a star I would!
What about the missing episodes. Why should one buy this series? What about the missing episodes? Are they going to be added later, or this is it? I cannot believe this. Would you buy a bicycle with a missing wheel? Or a keyboard without the C and R keys? I'd like Amazon to explain its customers what it plans to do..
SUPER TEEN. Having been a teenager once, I can certainly understand the inner turmoil and angst teens experience.  However, in PUMP UP THE VOLUME, the movie's attempt to martyrize teens and make all adults look like uncaring morons only serves to underscore why so many adults look with disdain on teens.  The teens in this movie seem to have little respect for authority and their assignation as to being tortured and misunderstood is vanquished in their juvenile behavior.  Even our hero (well played by Christian Slater) cannot communicate with people on a one to one level; he instead decides to become some kind of salvation to his teens by using his pirated radio shows to cause some kind of uprising among them.  As a proponent of truth, he is a vapid antithesis of truth: he fakes masturbation to arouse the youths; he doesn't use his real name or voice; and on a call with a potential suicide victim, he treats the caller as someone who isn't serious and never really offers any kind of consolation.  The suicidal teen says he is lonely and we automatically assume he is lonely within his familial structure, but isn't he just as lonely with the peers who mourn him after his demise?  The adults are played almost as caricatures and the teens as misunderstood heroes.  Sorry, folks, been there done that...living at any age requires a commitment to better yourself and do what you feel is right.  Questioning authority without any viable alternatives, as none of these teens do, merely escalates the generational gap, and movies like this are merely attempts to exploit the so called misunderstanding of youth
Virtual Snooze!. I bought it because I had heard it was a good flick! Well after watching it I gave it to my brother. Save your money
hu, I'm Confused?. This movie made no sense to me whatsoever. it wasn't really funny and it wasn't scary. the only thing that i got was that he killed Zombies or "Returners" as he called theme. and was upssed with one. i have to admit the female lead in the film was hot. but that was the only good thing in the film. it was also boring. but if you are into forgin fright films this is the movie for you
Drags On and On. This account of the life and love affair of Henry Miller and Anais Nin seems endless.  The director attempts to show character traits and development via an endless parade of sexual liaisons, which becomes more than tedious after the first hour and a half of the movie.  Henry, June, and Anais deserve better
bogus. one of the worst movies ever    this stuff must have been made up and total lack of common sense makes this movie an amatureish comed
terrible. This movie was absolutely terrible. the one star is for the concept, which is interesting, but the execution...wow...it is bad.
Read the book instead. I originally read the novel (of which I assume most of the other reviewers are unaware) and watched the earlier German film of the same name for a college course entitled "Memory and Mourning in Post-War Germany."I'd just like to point out that the film is a horrible depiction of the novel. It seems that the director wanted to make a more "Hollywood" version of the film, and I think he succeeded. For instance, the entire ending is completely different from that of the novel, and in my opinion is completely wrong for the story.In general, the film has little to do with any of the original versions, and is far inferior
Far from Eisenstein's finest hour. Alexander Nevsky may be an Eisenstein film, but that doesn't make it any less cheesy. In fact, it makes some of those Italian peplum look substantial by comparison, with it's crude stereotyping and propaganda as the Russian people rise to save their homeland in defiance of the capitalist and aristocratic oppressors of the people and do battle with the baby-burning Papist Germans (how Stalin ever signed the Ribbentrop-Molotov Pact after this hatchet job is a mystery).Much of the filming is as clumsy as the characterization, with obvious painted backdrops, clumsy medieval-speak dialog, constant reversion to silent moviemaking techniques at their least compelling and a tendency to go for height in the image to such an extent that the action is often barely clinging to the bottom of the frame. It's reputation rests on Prokofiev's dreary score and the spectacular battle on the ice, although both are a mixture of the good, the bad and the downright lazy. Only moments in the aftermath of the battle retain any real potency
good effects bad script...... I had to say Shark Attack 1 was a better film and there was only 3 things i liked about this film-1. Good special effects2. I didnt have to see the first one.3. People acually have graphic deaths {Not deaths that are like cgi graphics}I'd get watch this movie if i had to kill some time. Thats all i could say
Stick with the Disney version. When I watched the version with Paul Ruebens as the title character, I liked it so I decided to watch this with my little brother, I did not like this movie at all, I feel bad for feeling that way cause Jonathan Taylor-Thomas was great in The Lion King, Man of the House and Home Improvement but this movie is not enjoyable or watchable at all
The Big Sleep. Here we have what has to be one of the most mind bogglingly boring movies ever made! I couldn't believe what I was watching! Moreover,I am aghast that this film garnered some acclaim and that some reviewers on these pages even saw fit to award this dreck with an unbelievable four and five star rating. What is going on? Is it me or them that has totally lost the plot of what movies are supposed to be all about? Am I naive to think that movies should first and foremost entertain? Where oh where was the entertainment in this lame effort of a film with its unsteady shaky comera work,hamfisted confusing screenplay and the cloying performance of modern cinema's most tedious and overratedsleep inducing actor Ralph Fiennes?How I long for the good old days when we had great movies with great actors from great writers and great directors and which achieved what they set out to do - entertain.Sadly with the emergence of such a travesty as "The Constant Gardener" it appears that we unfortunate "real" film lovers are in for a dismal viewing future.
pretty cheesy. Big fan of Nas, but this moive's a bit over the top and have some good messages that suffer because of it. Visually flashy, vacant plot, and messages are reduced to sermonizing. Skip this and watch Juice instead
Firefly: Excellent.  But buy it on DVD, not "Unbox"!. Read the Unbox terms of use CAREFULLY before choosing this route over a regular DVD purchase.  It is not your usual set of "blah blah" legal jargon.For example, 3c:"Removal of Software. If you uninstall or otherwise remove the Software, your ability to view all Digital Content you have downloaded to the Authorized Device will immediately and automatically terminate and we reserve the right to delete all Digital Content from that Authorized Device without notice to you."If you ever remove the Unbox software, Amazon may revoke your ability to view the Firefly episodes you paid for and may even delete them from your machine!Amazon, I've ordered literally thousands of dollars of stuff through you and always had a great experience; why did you let Unbox create these anti-customer terms of use??
FINE HISTORIC RENDITION. Filmed in 1933, this movie is in black and white, and might be considered dull and slow-moving by today's standards.  An accurate chronology of the six wives of Henry VIII, the characters of the wives are rather  undeveloped, and the movie does not delve very deeply into the important  religious and political questions around which the marriages centered.  A  good introduction for those who are unfamiliar with the basic story, but  the serious scholar will want to conduct further research
That movie was bad... I hoped I could leave the theatre, but I was hoping it would get better. Here let me put it this way:3-D suckedPlot suckedActors suckedMovie suckedPLEASE DON'T MAKE A SEQUEL!!!
Why bother?. I find myself rehashing my own reviews at this point but nonetheless, I aspire to write a review on each instalment.  Producers have tested logistics to new levels by taking Jason on a murderous vacation to New York.  The film begins on Camp Crystal, where two teenage lovers are discussing the legend of Jason.  Whilst they speak of him, Jason is electrocuted (again) back to life by the contact of the boat's anchor.  More conveniently, he finds a hockey mask on the boat to cover up his unsightly face.  Cue two dead teens with very bad gory effects and Jason's off on his way to New York.  Cue once again a series of brutal murders on the boat, with female heroine Jensen Dagett avoiding him at all costs until he reaches New York shores.  As a side story, the heroine has had previous contact with Jason when she is swimming in the water so she is frightened of the water as a result.  At this stage, a change of scenery was needed but it doesn't work well at all.  What's so scary in New York?  Comedy is used to no effect in this movie and again the death scenes are more elaborate.  Can this unlucky lady stop Jason in his tracks one more time? Will this beast ever die? I rest my case
no title. What a disappointment!  I remember Siskel and Ebert raving over this romantic comedy.  Romantic, maybe, but comedy - never.  Very predictable plot from beginning to end.  And Rosie Perez was truly offensive.  A few times I couldn't understand what she was saying.  There is no way I could buy that she and Cage's character were attracted to each other.  Maybe critics liked this movie because it had no sex, violence, or rough language.  Although Cage does get shot in one hold-up scene.  It was just that you knew what was going to happen every step of the way.  I am beginning to Like Cage more and more as he ages. [ spoiler] I was really disappointed at the end to find out that the real people whom this story is based on were always happily married to their original partners.  Either they shouldn't have changed it so much or they shouldn't have let us know about the real story it was based on.[end of spoiler]  But Fonda and Cage were very engaging together
This is Horrible. I love the Avatar and I was so thrilled that amazon allows people to download it except the only problem is I've been trying for the past days and darn it all, it's not working!!! It's not as if I'm downloading it for free. I am willing to pay and yet it just wouldn't go through!!! I think it's better to just buy the dvds...I think it's absolutely horrible to tease customers like that..
Did not work. The ones that are posted twice do not work. If they are posted once, you can try to download it, but it might not work. The video only worked for about a minute. Shame, since I really like this show and I wanted Amazon Unbox to be cool. The one cent CSI works, go download tha
Hasn't this been done much better before?. Let's be frank, shall we? This mock sci-fi is just one more take on "can't we all just get along".  How transparent.  Dress up the black guy in a silly rubber suit and pretend he's an ALIEN.  Involve him in SPORTS!  There aren't many films that make me curse out loud, but this is one of them.  Treacly and brain-dead beyond endurance, the only thing that might have saved it would have been a spirited rendition by poor Gossett of "It Isn't Easy Being Green".  One of the other reviewers mentioned Lee Marvin and Toshiro Mifune in HELL IN THE PACIFIC. I couldn't agree more. That film, essentially the same thing, is immeasurably better.  Do yourself a favor: skip this exploitive garbage and watch either HELL IN THE PACIFIC or some genuine science fiction.
Moronic view of the (lack of) life of an angel. I learned long ago to ignore and laugh at the positive and negative feedback that a reviewer gets.  Obviously my one star review of this movie will get negative feedback but that doesn't make my opinion any less valid.  It is, after all, my honest opinion, and therefore it is worth something to someone, if only to me.  Sometimes I agree with Ebert, and sometimes i completely disagree with him.  I think we all believe in our hearts that "I" am the only one with the correct opinion.  I would subscribe to that myself.This movie is PAINFULLY slow and boring.  Wim Wenders, next time maybe you will develop a story line, please, huh?I really hate the premise that the only way an angel's life can be fulfilling is if he becomes human.  That is the moral here and also in the annoying movie City of Angels.  That's absurd.  Assuming that there is life after death, assuming that there are angels, and I in no way discount that possibility because I know how little we truly know, it is absurd to think that the angels have nothing to do but watch over us and wish they were with us.  That is offensively stupid and self centered.  It is like a child's point of view that mommy and daddy have absolutely nothing to do and are bored to tears when they are not watching the baby and coloring in the baby's coloring book.So this conception of angels is, in my not at all humble opinion, stupid and offensive.  What makes you think that we humans are the center of the universe and the only worthwhile thing that is going on, dingbat?Stupid premise, and boring story, if you want to call it a story at all.  I can't keep watching it.  It is still on right now, and I'm writing this review to relieve the boredom.Later - After seeing the end of the movie, I must add that the final monologue committed by the angel's human girlfriend is probably the worst monologue I have ever seen on film.  She goes on and on, saying nothing, in a stupid and self indulgent elongated bit of nonsense that is surreal, meaningless, and stupid.The only thing that this movie has going for it is that it makes people appreciate simple things about life, like warming your hands together on a cold day.  That's a nice and worthwhile thought, to appreciate the very little and insignificant things about life.  Aside from that bit of wisdom, this movie is poor, boring, full of itself, aimless, and overrated
WARNING: Wrong Episode!. This item is supposedly titled "UFOs: The First Encounters." It is, however, an episode about reincarnation. It is incorrectly labeled. DO NOT PURCHASE unless you are looking for an episode on reincarnation
Poor support. This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet
AMAZON SUCKS. I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!
Sofia Milos is all the money!. The Order sheds light on a religious sect dating back to the Crusades.  Having survived throughout the centuries, it aims at fulfilling a prophecy, which would plunge mankind into a third world war...In short, the acting and the dialogues are extremely weak (Van Damme and Charlton Heston really disappoint with their performances!), while the plot and the setting, are actually very good, therefore, the potential for a great movie was definitely there if only the actors and writers could... act and write!As for the rating, if you're going to have it rated R at least give it the sex and/or the violence.  If not, give it the proper rating i.e. PG-13.Overall, far from being a masterpiece, it just might provide for an evening's entertainment if in a really silly mood and/or intoxicated. 1  StarsIf Van Damme movies is what you had in mind, check out the Legionnaire and Timecop
Night Life song Replaced. The most memorable part of this film was the dance scene to "Night Life" which would repeat through the movie.  This version credits the song, but it was replaced with some lame disco music. I am writing MGM to complain and demand a refund.  Even the trailer has the right music playing all through it.Demand the original
A colorful yet disappointing attempt to capture Doyle's idea. The color and CGI's are excellent in this film. The location shots are great, and the attempt to capture the late 1880's successful.  However, the female character is obnoxious and certainly un- becoming in attitude,  language and appearance. While this might be the 90's, and women should be  able to handle strong lead characters, this woman, who was the financial  backer of the expedition, was disgusting.  There have been several major  cinematic attempts at this story, but this version leaves a lot to be  desired
not for three year olds. This is a great movie with a mistaken rating.  If your three year old is enjoying this movie, please re-think what you show your children.  REALLY
Not Happy. I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?
Poor Quality. I'm not going to waste a bunch of my time or yours giving a personally oppinionated review of the movie plot. It's redundant and unnecessary, and whether someone likes the story or not is irrelavent. Only you can form an opinion of whether you like it or not by watching it yourself. Double that with the fact that most movies hardly ever line up with the book that's based on and well...My gripe is the transition from putting the movie in it's original format onto DVD was bad. The soundtrack is about 1/2 to 1 second off from the video part of film, therefore the voices don't sync up with the lip movement.
What's all the fuss about?. Before I review, I'd like to clear something up: I am a very latecomer in seeing this movie. I was introduced to the Ghost in the Shell franchise through the new Anime series airing on Adult Swim, Ghost in the Shell: Standalone Complex. I absolutely love that show, and so I figured eventually I'd have to get around to seeing the movie, which I knew full well shares no connection with the show. They're both seperate interperetations of the comic series of the same name, (which I have not read, so I don't know which is more accurate) but the TV series is exponentially better than this movie in almost every concievable way.There are many things I don't like about this movie, the biggest being poor pacing. The plot for the movie is actually surprisingly straightforward once you cut away all the filler, but that's the biggest problem. There's not really enough story to last a full-length feature, because it seems almost like it was originally written with the intention of being a 30 minute short. And since they didn't have the budget to load the movie up with action scenes (there are barely any, and they aren't very impressive for the most part) they had to slow the story down with drawn out conversations that you won't understand more than 60% of, and camera shots that last for what feels like minutes where we're looking at either nothing, or a woman's nipples. That's not cinematic artistry, that's being either lazy or perverted.The animation itself isn't even that good, especially considering that this is was a theatrical release from only 10 years ago. It's choppy, and there's not really a whole lot of detail (except when it comes to women's nipples). Looking at just the animation, if I didn't know better, I'd have thought this movie was an OVA from the 1980's.The only thing I can really say I liked about this movie was that it was Ghost in the Shell. It's probably kind of like how I didn't see the 1989 Batman movie until years after I'd been spoiled by Batman the Animated Series, and couldn't bring myself to like it for any reason other than that it was Batman. Everything about the TV series is superior to this movie: the animation, the stories, the character developement, the production values... I could go on for an entire page about how much better the TV series is.In short, if you're you're at all interested in the GITS franchise, do yourself a favor and rent the DVDs of the TV show instead. You'll find a lot to love, but I can't say the same about the movie. My dream is that someday Alex Proyas will give us a GITS movie that lives up to what I would hope for after watching Standalone Complex
Negative 5 stars!. Because there were so many great reviews for this movie, I decided to go out and rent this film and watch it.  I was bored to death watching this film, and whats with the words "what's wrong" kept being said over and over again every time someone opened the medicine cabinet in a computer generated voice?  Those words and that voice really annoyed me!  Why does this place have not one person with hair?  Now, I'm not trying to be raciest here, but what's with a black girl and guy dancing totally nude on t.v., well  I can only say that the girl was totally nude since they only showed the guys chest and up.  What's with that guy who kept stalking one guy by saying that he wanted to be his new roomate?  Was he supposed to be gay?  I guess this film is way to so called "artsy" for me.  What I know is that this film is boring, and when it comes to ending, you don't know what happends to the guy at the end.  The film just kind of fades out after he stands on top of that cone stairway.  This film makes the movie The Village exciting to watch.  I wish that I could give my money back
What a bore!. i was amazed that you could take such an innovative TV show from the 80's and make it into such a boring movie. Action was slow and predictable. Casting was horrible. Even the cars weren't as good as in the TV show. I am glad I only rented tis and didn't buy it. Don't waste these 2 hours of your life on this flick
Mother forgive me!. Just awful slasher picture with not one hint of real talent behind it. The first movie I ever walked out of,and I was home!!!! THE PITS!!!!!!!
Great movie, DO NOT BUY THIS DVD. Carwash is a classic film in its own genre.  However, the DVD version is cut.  If you watch the Television broadcast version (Such as on BET: Black Entertainment Television) you will see the original scenes that were in the original theater version.  For instance, the scene with Danny DeVito in a jealous rage with his wife is NOT on the DVD. Nor is: The Hooker watching the apology; the extended bus scene; and NOT EVEN THE TOUCHING ENDING WITH MARSHA (Melanie Mayron).  I strongly encourage you to act on this DVD deciet by contacting Universal @ DVD Manufacturing 10 Universal City Plaza Universal City, CA 91601.  You can't email them because they don't recognize Carwash in their online library.    Another note; The "Widescreen" addition is NOT widescreen.
Not as bad as I expected, but not great either. WARNING: MOVIE SPOILER BELOW!!!I confess that my primary reason for buying a copy of this film, is grounded in recent history. I was around in the early 80s, when L. Ron Hubbard and his Scientologists were going full-bore with the logistics of making the book into a movie (the hero depicted on the original edition of the paperback looked like Chuck Norris, or so I thought), when all of a sudden Hubbard died, and the whole project apparently fell apart. Back then, I was close to 20 years old and I was curious about whatever it was that these Scientologists were turned on to that was supposed to help improve a person's quality of life... then I read about Larry Wollersheim's 1985 lawsuit. You can figure the rest out for yourself.Anyhow, oh, yeah, the movie... the storyline is your basic alien invasion number, i.e., the Invaders arrived to make life miserable for the poor humans (in this film, the aliens look a lot like the Klingons from Star Trek), until your typical dashing young male hero organizes a band of his fellow humans to rise up and tell the Invaders to get off of our planet. Pretty simple and straightforward, but hey, there are other films MUCH worse than Battlefield Earth, and they've taught me that if you have good enough special effects, even the lamest sci-fi storylines can work!The thing that stood out about this film, though, was its reliance on everyday talk and contemporary cliches for much of its dialogue, and as a result, it came across as rather corny... a film to be recommended for its comedy value, rather than for things like epic space battle scenes. Also, the "bad guy" aliens use some sort of psychic power to interfere with the minds of their human subjects, in order to keep them from organizing revolts... I must say, trying to depict mind-manipulation effects on film does pretty much the same thing to the movie as varnish stripper does when applied to a CD---it turns it into a confusing, incomprehensible mess! A couple of times, the picture would break up into a concentric blur, and I'd wonder what the heck was supposed to be going on.How the makers of this film ever talked a great studio like Warner to help them film it, is something which will forever remain a mystery to me. I remember just before this picture opened, a group of Scientologists were trying to hype it: "oh, watch---this film is going to be bigger than Star Wars and Gone With the Wind combined!" You can guess what happened when those staggeringly huge box office numbers never materialized... can you say "oops"
Poor support. This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet
Ok but Not Great. I saw him live in 1987 when he was hot and hoped this would be a great reminder of his hilarious sense of humor and delivery but it was far too short (only 45 minutes) and only had a couple of good routines.  My hopes were higher than what this delivered!  The bonus material was taken from Vegas when he was near the end and it really was not very funny.  I would recommend looking at another DVD of his rather than purhcase this one
UnBox video not yet working. Will not play once video was downloaded. I get the error message:  "can not play file, please try again later. error# 0x80040273" I made the exlusive give me call me back feature but the UnBox department was already closed, I was told the UnBox Saturday and Sunday 6-5 hours. I have to say I am impressed with the Call back feature. I downloaded the Unbox Beta now and am recieving email assistance to try to resolve the problem. Thanks Amazon UnBox! I will Update again - Feb. 10,200
you're better off reading the book. The book is amazing; this movie adaptation is quite poor. Although the actress who plays O is quite beautiful, and there are some fairly erotic scenes, this movie is deeply flawed, and I can't recommend it. The plotline gets totally garbled, especially toward the end, to the point where it runs entirely contrary to the book's intention on several key philosophical and psychological points. Second, the actor who plays Stephen is absolutely one of the worst casting choices I've ever seen; doesn't fit the role one bit. So please, read the book. If you've already read the book and love it, it is probably worth your while to eventually see this film, but expect to be disappointed.
Horrible Horror Flick. Friday the 13th spawned a whole new subgenre called slasher flicks. This was not a positive development for with the new sub genre came a brand new cookie cutter formula that subsequent slasher flicks have rigidly adhered to.Friday the 13th has an absurd premise in that it concerns the re-opening of Camp Crystal Lake 23 years after its closure. There are members of the community who are aware of evil plottings being aimed at Camp Crystal Lake and its denizens such as a truck driver and a local lunatic named "Crazy Ralph." Camp Crystal Lake opens up and it turns out that just about everyone who shows up, both counselors and campers alike, are nothing but a bunch of perverts who apparently deserve being slaughtered at the hands of a demented maniac.Friday the 13th is an awful flick in almost every regard.Unlike almost all of the pre-1980 horror movies, Friday the 13th and the slasher flick sub-genre that it spawned is not with the victims. These poor excuses for movies are with the killers and the whole point is for the audience to anticipate the next murder or killing spree. Slasher flicks like Friday the 13th are movies to avoid like the plague.
Not happy. This is only a portion of this episode.  It cuts off in the middle of a sentence
warning. Not in a long time have i had such a dislike for a movie as i do with Freeway. I am a fan of dark comedies so i thought i might check this movie out, it has reese witherspoon after all, how bad could it be? Well, really bad. First of all on a good note, reese witherspoon is good enough in the movie, although her character isn't all that likeable nor do you empathize with her all that much. But Reese does a good job with what shes given.My main beef with the movie is that i would not call it a dark comedy. It's more like a comedy that also wants to be dark, graphic and serious, or a dark graphic serious movie that wants to be funny. The result is that it's a movie that doesnt know what it is or what it's trying to do. Both the funny parts and the serious parts are horribly mixed together in a way that it feels like two different movies fighting for the screen.But hey, if you find being shot in the neck, or stiff lifeless grandmas with their throats slit and a horrified expression on their face to be funny, you just might like this movie
a waste of my time and money. this movie is such a rip-off of every sci-fi/horror movies that have come before it that i just couldn't enjoy it! a waste of my time and money and i'll not waste any more time on this stinker or it's review!!
The Harvey Girls review. I really enjoyed the movie.  The story background is the Fred Harvey restaurants and concessions at train stations.  My father worked for Fred Harvey at the Chicago and Cleveland facilities.Regarding the movie and Judy Garland - The movie is great and Judy was one of my favorite entertainers.Lane Hanse
Great Movie, Lousy Video. I was 11 when I first saw Black Sunday.  It was very scarey and I thought about it nightly for months.  I think Barbera Steele was my first love.I enjoyed the movie very much - as a reminder of times past.  However, the video was terrible.  The sound was slightly better than terrible.  I'd have paid more for a better quality video.  I wonder if the expensive DVD has the same issues as the VCR tape
Dreadful Film That Gives a New Definition to the Term 'Family Picture'. Director of two `Scooby-Doo' films makes another comedy without the eye-popping CGI of the funny talking dog, and now what you get is `Yours, Mine, and Ours,' a remake of 1968 comedy that should have been left untouched. The only good thing about the newer version is the kids (and some of them would be seen in a much better film sooner or later), so if you a fan of, say, Dean Collins, please stop reading this review here, take a look at the film and enjoy yourself.But I'm talking about the film itself, and Dennis Quaid & Rene Russo, and what I am going to say is not very nice. To their credits, they truly look like two adults Frank and Helen, widowed Coast Guard Admiral and widowed designer, who had been romantically linked to each other when high school students. Their story is sweet, romantic and convincing. Sadly their story ends in five minutes.The rest of the film is about the predictable culture clash comedy between two sets of values with lots of badly-constructed pratfalls. Frank is an uptight military person while Helen is a free-thinking vegetarian. Frank has 8 children while Helen 10 (including the adopted kids). Frank demands his home should be `shipshape' while Helen wants her kids always `free.' So what would happen if they live in a same place?One of the two terrible things about `Yours, Mine, and Ours' is its awfully made slapsticks which are just embarrassing to see. If you think it funny to see someone slipping over vomit on a yacht, or Dennis Quaid soaked in green slime, this is your film. And you can also see Mr. Quaid kissing a pig. Rene Russo is not the same sexy woman you have seen in `The Thomas Crown Affair,' but her stand-in who looks very tired.But the most annoying thing is the characters of the kids (or what they do). These spoiled children are not only allowed to eat a bucketful of sweets, but they plan to break up the relations between Frank and Helen just because they want to live as they want! Of course they relent after getting what they want, and cue to the sappy ending.This messy and unfunny comedy comes from four big names - MGM, Paramount, Nickelodeon and Columbia. The images are crisp, and shot in widescreen. Despite its beautiful package, however, none of the cast would like to remember the film and its contents that are simply dreadful
Not Happy. I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?
not what I was looking for. This movie concentrates on Cobb as a bitter old drunk desperately trying to get his life story told from his point of view.  I expected to see more scenes from when he was playing ball, but sadly there is really only one scene that showed his legendary hitting and baserunning....and that scene is very short and quite poor.  If you are interested in what Cobb was like as an old angry man, go for it.  If you are interested in Cobb as the greatest offensive ballplayer ever.....skip this one in a hurry.  Other than that, I thought the movie - on its own merits as a movie - was pretty lousy.  I regret buying it
Give Your Fast-Forward a Work-Out!!. Let's just be honest: this film is terrible . . . and not in the way that "Attack of the Killer Tomatoes!" is so "terrible" that it's great . . . more like the way "Caddyshack II" is so terrible that the director should forever live in shame . . .I was a kid when this film was released. And, while it was not particularly exciting then, it is insanely tedious now. It is a genuine test of patience . . . but with no pay-off what-so-ever.Here's some potentially helpful information:The slasher film can branch in two directions: supernatural (Friday the 13th II, Halloween, Nightmare on Elm Street etc...) and crime/revenge (I Spit on Your Grave, Friday the 13th, TCM, Scream, Urban Legend ect...). This one falls under the latter heading. And while realism can render a more potent effect ("This could really happen!"), this film simply fails to engage the viewer ON ANY LEVEL.The goal of a slasher film is two-fold: to horrify and repulse. This does neither!! The "horror" element is non-existent: there is no point in expounding, since there is nothing to examine.  And, if you love gore (and who doesn't?) try another film. The "murders" are barely visible (literally) and so sloppy that they solicit no response other than a yawn. Many of the film's problems are technical: the cinematography is just horrendous. The entirely film is extremely underlit, the colors are needlessly washed-out, and the film stock is grade "F." And this, as you know, is not because the film is over twenty-five years old . . . the problem was always there.There is ONE "good" moment in the entire film . . . when the school's "bad boy" has his head lopped-off and it clumsily thunks down the prom-court walk-way. Still, it is more comic-relief than genuine horror.The soundtrack could not BE WORSE. I am not referring to the disco tunes (we accept those since this film was made at the end of the disco period), but the tracks made for the film . . . they sound like they were squeaked-out by The Carpenters. So, imagine lots of disco punctuated by lackluster, psuedo-thoughtful ballads (like the final song on the track). Words cannot explain how wildly offensive it is!!Did I mention that Leslie Nielson has a meaty role (yes, THAT Leslie Nielsen from Airplane, and Naked Gun)? He plays a tough-minded principal who is tormented by the death of his daughter. I know, it SOUNDS funny, but IT'S NOT!! Trust me!!If you dig watching unattractive teenagers "disco the night away," hey, this film is totally for you!! But if you are looking for a decent slasher film from the early middle-period of its reign look elsewhere (like Halloween, Friday the 13th etc...)I'd be willing to get all Ed McMahon's Star-Search on you and give this "film" a 1/4 star. But it is an important milestone in the slasher sub-genre (I will not spoil the film and tell you why, though). So if you are a slasher enthusiast or a horror scholar, watch it . . . on picture-in-picture . . . maybe after a few drinks . . . on a day when the cable is out . . . on fast-forward!
Not Much Plot & Poor Editing - Avoid. Avoid this one. The bad reviews are not kidding. The plot is almost non-existent. The action scenes are not enough to make up for the poor editing. The writing has drawn the characters very thinly. Sadly, a reason to watch this movie is to be amused at how badly it is put together
Could've, would've, should've. The novel of the same name by Joyce Carol Oates on which this movie was based is beautiful, moving, transcendent, heartbreaking, lyrical, and unforgettable.The movie, on the other hand, felt like the After-School Special version of the book.Do yourself a favor and read the novel instead."Make them regret all they ever did to you and your sisters...
Midly entertainitng, but a bit off. Parts of this story are entertaining, but parts of it tended to bother me.  What really bothered me was that Harriet did some mean things to people in her class, but her nanny never told her that what she did was wrong.  She seemed to tell Harriet to pretend to be sorry, even if she wasn't sorry.  That attitude is what really bothers me about the movie and the book
Survivor Rip Off. I have bought 2 seasons of Survivor on unbox and both of them are not complete. Very dissapointing. Guatemala  episode 11 is from a completely different season and it is missing the last 2 episodes and the reunion show. Just leaves you hanging. Exile Island is missing the final episode it just goes from the competition between Danielle and Cirie for a spot in the final 3 to the live reunion show
Bad Device. I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service
Lord of the, oh I mean Feet of Flames. This should be titled Lord of the Dance not feet of flames. The two shows are almost identical. If youv'e seen Lord of the dance then you have seen Feet Of Flames. There are a few minor changes here and there but basically the same stuff. My biggest gripe is that Flatley seems way to full of himself in this one! I mean he is so in love with himself its anoying! I truely enjoyed his dancing in the original Riverdance filmed in Ireland, but id say after watching Feet of Flames he deserved getting bagged on by Mike Meyers!!! The sensuality is bit more ramped up in this show, and it reminds me more of Vegas show than anything else. Can someone please knock some sense into Flatley so he can fit his swelled up head through the door. That way I can go back to enjoying his dancing with out his puffed up ego
A sad, hyper-ideological film of little consequence. Lots of stilted pseudo-intellectual dialogue.  A pseudo existentialist hero. A painfully ideological lecture against the death penalty.  Stilted performances by brilliant actors.  A receipe for disaster.  Why this film was a hit, I have no idea
Bad one for Charlie. Charles Bronson is one of my favorites, but VIOLENT CITY is example of 70's trash at it's worst.Boring slow pacing and a "see-saw" action that gets old really fast.Bronson's character is so stupid acting in this film for a hitman that you wish he would get killed off himself.I love Charles Bronson... but this is one of his dud films
Terrible and embarrassing. Jerry Jenkins ought to be ashamed. He states in an interview on this DVD that he started a movie company because he thought this was such a good story that it needed to be told. First and foremost it's a terrible movie, Christian or secular it's just plain bad. The script stinks, the characters are unlikable and weak, the directing and editing is high school quality and most of the acting is pathetic. As for it being a "Christian" movie you've got to be kidding me. Why? Because there's no cussing? Is that what makes it Christian? The gospel is not portrayed in any way, shape or form. In fact the way I see it it's unbiblical. We even have the main character who doesn't really profess to be a Christian but since she mentions god we assume that she must be (in fact Jesus is never mentioned in the movie) she ends up dating an openly unbelieving boy. Is that the "Christian" message we want to send our kids? From now on if Jerry Jerkin's name is on a movie I'm not watching it. This movie robbed two hours of my life I'll never get back. If you want to see a family movie buy a classic made in the 30's or 40's.
He Knows You're ADORK. This movie really showcases the extreme dorkiness of the early 80s. But it's really no one's fault, they didn't KNOW they were dorks back then, that's just the way everyone acted before Michael Jackson came along.Clarence Beeks (the Breakfast Club guy) turns in his usual McGruff the Crime Dog performance. And nice appearance by Tom Hanks too; his 2nd best performance, very closely behind Saving Private Ryan, which I would recommend watching immediately after seeing this movie. They go well together.Oh well, at least this movie gave the Police Squad! an idea on how to open up their show. And it's still better than Hercules in New York, although by very much, no
Avoid this movie-!. This has got to be the worst film version of an Austin story I've ever seen. The plot is only tenuously connected with the book; as for the characters, hairstyles & costumes, it should be subtitled "Fellini Does Austin" because it most closely resembles the "Satyricon" IMO. The makeup, costuming, & hair on all the characters is not only not even close to reasonably accurate historically, but downright grotesque & bizarre - and that's just the lead character, Catherine. The rest are worse. Bad acting, too. Very lame film. The Austin estate should sue BBC for turning out such a turkey & using her name
Political Propoganda. Remember when Mary Poppin's said "a spoonful of sugar helps the medicine go down"?  This movie is saying:  "a spoonful of cute dancing penguins helps the policital propoganda go down."This is not a kids movie.  It is a cartoon aimed at drawing a wide audience (especially kids), in order to force feed them the directors views on morality, homosexuality, and environmentalism.The political undertones and overtones in this movie are so blatant and obvious it is ridiculous.If you want Hollywood to be your moral compass, then this movie is perfect for you, otherwise stay away
weird translation. as I remember when i watched the original chinese version, although it wasnt any big deal but I did like it as I remember, but this version is totally destroy that feeling, something about the translation is just bad to the core makes the movie like a piece of crap, especially some sound effect. Why don't they put the original track in it I hard can understand. if u can find some asian version and rewatch it u would agree with me. it worth my 3 stars with the original trac
Planes, Maps, and Death......Oh My. My friend and I watched this movie together and both agreed on one thing, Naveen Andrews looks very good with long hair. We were both so depressed by the end we wanted to weep!(and NOT in an oh my gosh that was good kind of way) The movie is well made and the filming is beautiful, but all the great scenery in the world can not overcome one of the most depressing sorylines ever. This movie makes Titanic seem cheerful! My friend summed it up with saying "obviously you shouldn't go and cheat with somebody's wife or you will end up with a burnt face or writing letters in a cave". She followed this comment by saying, "I think I'm gonna go home now and cry". Well I have to say on this one I agree with her. For those of you that love this film, more power to ya, it's all yours
Beware of Unbox!!!. Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for
Great for the Zen Vision. At first I didn't realize that you have to use Amazon's software to load onto the Zen.  Once I figured that out (actually my husband figured that out) the show played perfectly and it was very easy to do.  I wasn't able to edit the stars.  If I could I would give this 5 stars.  If you have tried some other sites for the Zen, they are much more difficult to use. Amazon's Unbox is great for the Zen
Its Really Just A BAD Movie. Leaving aside the painful and horrific real life incident that taints the movie for a moment, lets just look at the movie as it is. First off, I love horror movies, some of my faveorites even include ones that are considered "Bad" by tons of movie critics, like the first 4 'Friday the 13th' movies. I love most of the Nightmare on Elm Street movies, and the first 2 Halloween movies, and tons others, inlcuding, yes, Victor Salva's own 'Jeepers Creepers', whcih I think is the best horror movie to have come out in the last 5 years.But Clownhouse is just laughable and annoying and terribly acted. The bickering among the 3 brothers was driving me nuts for one. The characters do so many amazingly stupid things that are cliches in horror movies, and they do them often, more so than in even the dumbest horror movies. Peple here have already noted the very cheesy music that takes away from whatever creepiness there is. The movie is just plain Boring.The killings are all dull and lifeless. There just didnt seem to be any reason for this movie to exist, I mean its barely 80 minutes long! That is incredibly short for any movie, even a horror movie, which are usually around 90 minutes-plus or minus a few.The movie is very lazy at explaining who the killers are, we get very little info about them, why they are mental patients, for one-What did they do? I mean what is their method of killing or why are they dangerous. Now that they are loose, what do they want? Money? Do they just wanna kill? Isn't it strange that they don't talk at all? SOme people have actually compared this to the greatest horror movie of them all, John Carpenter's Halloween, now thats a truley scary thought.The movie was also incredibly predictable and took an incredibly long time to finally have the kids realize the killer clowns were in the house and gonna kill them, and even when the action finally starts, its all too unbeleivable and silly to beleive.Unfortuneatley, I had a rather disturbing and sinister thought about why this "horror" movie, which almost doesnt even feel like a real horror movie to me, anyway, might have been made. Apparently, Victor Salva , the director had been molesting the young child star of the film, Nathan Forrest Winters, for years since he was age 7, they had previously worked on Victor Salva first film, a short film, some years earlier. Perhaps this whole movie making enterprise was endeavered just so Victor could have even more close proximity with the boy so he could molest him even more. Perhaps that is why Victor made the film. Its ironic that this movie is about evil clowns, because a clown is someone that usually makes kids happy, the kid actually has a line about why clowns are fake and shouldnt be trusted. Its all so weird, like was Victor trying to get himself caught? There is so much incriminating visuals and dialogue in this film that just doesnt belong in a horror movie, but well brings to mind kiddie porn. Apparently Victor was also a friend of the kids family for years. This movie is almost like Victor was bragging about his molestation of the boy, using his camera and storytelling skills to shove in everyone's faces his relationship with the boy. \There is some strange back story in the film that is never really explained that alludes to mental illness, that the boy may have been suicidal and tried to off himself by cutting his hand or perhaps wrist. Its said he has "scars" there. Also that the boy may have been committed, just like the escaped killer clowns? Is Salva drawing a parallel there? Why does the child wet the bed at such an advanced age, Whats his problem anyway? Its never said, but perhaps Salva is hinting that hes gay, who knows. Its interesting that the killers dont just escape out of jail, they excape from a mental facility perhaps they are really just sick individuals, just like the boy ? Is Victor Salva trying to say he and the boy actor in the film both share something that others may say is sick but that they belong together? They say that child molestors search out young boys who they think are homosexual, who are one of them. The clowns are drawn to the boy, yet its also always the boy who see them, almost like hes looking for them like they are both drawn to each other.I dont know why this film was made, so if my theories rub some here the wrong way, I am sorry, I just cant figure out why someone who would show talent in later horror movies like Jeepers Creepers, would make such a pointless awful and strange horror movie, if not for his own perverted pleasure. Definitely miss this flick, and dont be fooled by all the surprisingly positive reviews here. This movie sucks
Dont get "Fiji" final week ... Dont dwnld " Survivor, "Thunderstorms & Sacrifice" ". Its my fault for not reading the whole thing. you would think that the last episode would be the finale , but NO, its just a 10 minute recap going to the finale 4. I didnt even get a full 45 minute episode. No finale. I got rippped off. $1.99 dwnld not well spent. Dont bother dwnldng any episode of fiji if you dont know the ending. Because they dont have that episode, not even the reunion show
exit the freeway... This movie was loaned to Me, (Thank God I did'nt rent it) and is the biggest waste of a few hours of My life ever! The acting is so horrible it made Me cringe,and the cuts in the movie were done to where it seemed like it had been edited for tv.This is supposed to be a black comedy? It's NOT funny, and the so called violence in it made Me yawn, seriously, I've seen more gore on the Simpsons. There are so many things in the movie that are AMAZINGLY unbelievable, K. Sutherland walks for miles to a hospital with a bullet through His neck, head,and two in the back.R. Witherspoon overpowers Sutherland (For the second time) and strangles Him, pretty good for a 90 pound teenage girl huh?  But, I do think Everybody should watch this movie once so You can see what a movie should NOT be.(Besides, misery loves company
Wish I had not bought this. I guess studio time must be very expensive, cause Denise Austin rushes through the exercises like the set is on fire.  Maybe if she had cut down the intro, there would have been more time for exercising.It seems a little disjointed with the constant change from floor to standing exercises.  Before you can get to the floor, the exercisers are on rep 2 or 3.  Then it's back up again.There's a lot of talking going on, with exhortions to "sqeeze, sqeeze, sqeeze!"  Perky is an understatement.
Parents, Think Twice!. The only thought in my mind throughout this whole movie was the Natalie Holloway case, about the girl last summer that went on that school trip, went off with a boy and disappeared. In this movie, Hilary Duff's character is on a school trip to Rome, meets a guy there and then fakes sick to get away from the school group to follow this guy around Rome. I felt so bad that Disney had made this movie showing a young girl going off on her own with a boy she did not know on a school trip because it rang so close to home from that tragic dissappearance of Natalie Holloway. In this movie the only repurcussions the character gets for doing such completely unsafe acts was that she was grounded..and they didn't even show that part. Young girls are very impressionable and will jsut see the glamour in the movie. Hopefully they will be brough up by good parents that will teach them right to know better than to go off with a stranger in a strange place
Nothing Golden About This One. This film is based on a concept that has potential - a mathematical key to the interconnectedness of all things - but it doesn't deliver.  Clearly, the writer wants us to believe that there is one elusive key to the intriguing patterns all around us, but he pretty much drops the ball right there.  Usually with this sort of plot, you are at least given the illusion that *someone* knows the answer and what's more has some clue about what to do with it as well.  There's no such suspension of disbelief in this one, nor even an attempt at such.Adding injury (if you count eye strain) to insult, the whole thing is shot in grainy B&W with annoying MTV-style jump cuts.  In the awards for Obnoxious Splash Films of the Year, this one takes the cake, but not the Pi
He doesn't lie to me. Domestic Disturbance is a typical Hollywood film.  The story, characters, and even the camerawork all seem prefabricated and recycled.  The language that Travolta and Vaughn spurt from their mouths even feels repetitive.  Do you know why?  Because we have seen it all before.  This film did not scare me, did not entice me, or even excite me in anyway because of the resemblance this had to every other film of this genre.  It is the classic story of the boy that cried wolf too many times and eventually everyone never believed him.  It is the classic story of the strength of a father that believes that when life throws lemons, that he must make lemonade.  It is the classic story of the family struggle to survive against all odds.  It is nothing fresh, it is nothing new, it is nothing remarkable.  It is Hollywood, in its purest form.  Audiences paid money to see this recycled film and for that I think we should all be issued an apology from the Hollywood community.I even have the subtle feeling that everyone involved in this project felt the same way.  Travolta and Vaughn are laughable in their roles.  The child actor was acting, and you could tell every time he was on screen.  The only "fun" character in this entire production was Steve Buscemi, who continually plays this slippery sneaky fishy looking character that just gets under your skin the wrong way.  He was perfect, I only wish I could say the same for everyone else.  Perhaps it is my newer images of Vaughn that hurt him in this role.  After seeing the comedy duds like Dodgeball and Starsky & Hutch, I couldn't help but think that Vaughn was trying to play a bit of comedy into this role as well.  He just didn't seem to fit.  His eyes needed to see evil, when in fact they saw nothing more than the cue cards reminding him of his lines.  I kept waiting to hear him say something to Travolta about "Vegas Baby, Vegas", but alas, it never occurred.  I felt similar about Travolta's role in this film.  His character suffered from lack of solidity.  I never felt that he was a strong father.  I knew he could build boats, but fight evil I just couldn't see it.  I also had trouble seeing the father/son dynamic.  During the scenes that him and O'Leary share, I continually felt that they were acting their parts, not building the characters.  It was sad, and only left me with a weak impression of them when the climax occurred.  Teri Polo was shallow, really contributing nothing to the story other than the classic role of mother who will not believe, while child actor Matt O'Leary definatly needed more time with an acting coach before landing this role.  All of these paid actors were going through their parts, but not into their characters, which ultimately flawed the film.What happens when you have actors not reaching their potential and a story that seems like it could be a "Made-for-TV-Movie"?  You get the film Domestic Disturbance.  The story was horrible.  Father who loves his son, who cannot let go of a previous life (although it seemed that in the film Travolta and Polo were ok with there divorce), who doesn't trust his ex-wife's new beau.  This seemed like a very troubled man instead of the hero that he portrayed.  I also felt that this story really didn't give any credit to the local police.  Instead of investigating, it seemed like they were just sitting around.  That was Travolta's tax dollars at work, but instead he ended up doing all the work.  It reminded me of the times that I have to bag my own groceries at the story.  Am I not paying for the goods so that they can provide baggers?  Ah well.  From the opening scene of this film until the unclimactic ending (which made me chuckle due to the lack of sympathy), it was nothing more than Hollywood fluff.  Travolta had been making a strong return to the film industry prior to this project, and I wish that somebody had talked him out of it.  This film was filler, and plenty of people got paid for some shoddy workmanship.Overall, I was very disappointed with this film.  In fact, I was more than disappointed, I was appalled.  This had no redeeming value to it (outside of Buscemi) and it continually perplexed me as to why it was made.  There was no stretching of anyone's acting ability, nor did I ever really see the power family structure that was so important to the characters.  What I saw was an angry father upset about the path his life has taken, and decides to do something about it using his son's lies as a crutch.  Perhaps I needed Vaughn's character to be darker, or maybe more boats built to help me understand Travolta's role, but something needed to happen and it didn't.  This was a sad excuse of a film, and I do not recommend it to anyone who is a fan of the cinema.Grade: ** out of ****
Dull and unrealistic. This film tried to do too many things at the same time. It was an attempt to portray life in Sarajevo under siege, the plight of its citizens, the efforts made by foreign aid workers, the misadventures of foreign journalists, etc. In the end, it failed in all of these aspects. Except for the actual documentary footage of the notorious bread-line massacre, nowhere did this film adequately convey the horror of the war. Even though based loosely a true story, "Welcome to Sarajevo" was largely unconvincing; the direction and production were poor, and the actors generally seemed to be going through the motions. Thus, in most scenes in wartime Sarajevo, the various characters seem to act as though they're stuck in some provincial bus station rather than huddled in shelters to keep from getting hit by artillery shells or sniper bullets. In some ways it almost seems to romanticize life in the city during the siege - although you'll have a hard time finding any Sarajevan today who looks back on those years with anything resembling fondness. Another troubling aspect of this film is that it tends to take a very condescending and self-serving attitude: it's basically up to Western reporters and aid workers to save the children of Sarajevo, rather than the efforts of the locals. Although the intentions of the producers may have been noble, "Welcome to Sarajevo" is a misleading and condescending film
Why bother?. I find myself rehashing my own reviews at this point but nonetheless, I aspire to write a review on each instalment.  Producers have tested logistics to new levels by taking Jason on a murderous vacation to New York.  The film begins on Camp Crystal, where two teenage lovers are discussing the legend of Jason.  Whilst they speak of him, Jason is electrocuted (again) back to life by the contact of the boat's anchor.  More conveniently, he finds a hockey mask on the boat to cover up his unsightly face.  Cue two dead teens with very bad gory effects and Jason's off on his way to New York.  Cue once again a series of brutal murders on the boat, with female heroine Jensen Dagett avoiding him at all costs until he reaches New York shores.  As a side story, the heroine has had previous contact with Jason when she is swimming in the water so she is frightened of the water as a result.  At this stage, a change of scenery was needed but it doesn't work well at all.  What's so scary in New York?  Comedy is used to no effect in this movie and again the death scenes are more elaborate.  Can this unlucky lady stop Jason in his tracks one more time? Will this beast ever die? I rest my case
Not happy. This is only a portion of this episode.  It cuts off in the middle of a sentence
Two great scenes... I will give this movie two stars, simply for the two memorable scenes in the movie that make it worth seeing - at least once. The demon coming out of the TV set scene is suprisingly well done, rivaling even what we would see years later in movies like The Ring. The second scene is where the demon kid is chasing a woman around the apartment, then he falls to the ground and an alien demon crawls out of his chest and continues to chase her around the place. There's pastel neon lights flashing in the background, and the whole scene is jam packed with 80's cliches. It's almost like a cross between The Omen, a Billy Idol video, Aliens, and Return of the Living Dead. It's so ridiculously absurd and campy, it makes me crack up every time I see it
Not Happy. I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?
Poor. Terrible, all around bad movie. Don't waste your time
Still updated even after all these years!. I have been looking for a copy of this movie for a long time now because I wanted my kids to see it. I was very young when I first watched this film and it stuck to my mind somehow. Good thing amazon had it and they do make shipments to my country here in Asia.Daryl Hannah played a beautiful and believable mermaid. Tom was also perfect for the role. I can't say their chemistry on screen is as perfect as that of Tom Hanks and Meg Ryan, though, but it wasn't bad. I can't imagine any other actor for the lead role in this movie.I let my kids watch it finally together with my niece. We found ourselves teary-eyed in the end. It was just so touching, we couldn't help it. Even the theme song sang by Rita Coolidge was perfect for the ending. For those who wanna know, the title is "Love came for me".I'm glad I purchased the anniversary edition. I have a home theater and the dolby 5.1 surround sound was just what I needed. It would have been better if DTS was used but I'm not complaining.For those who are thinking of getting this, I hope you make the decision to do so. Tom Hanks is a certified great actor. This movie will soon be in line with the classics like "Gone with the wind" and "Breakfast at Tiffany's". It's already a collector's item. You won't regret it! Besides, love stories don't get out of style
could have been good. There was a possibility of a very good movie here with good acting, talented kids, etc.  Unfortunately , as in many kids movies these days, the parents are stereotyped as blithering idiots, and the kids have to go it on their own.   The cursing gets out of hand for a family movie, and gets worse as the movie continues.  I didn't finish watching it.   Christopher Lloyd is great though and it does have it's funny moments ( if you had TV Guardian to block all the foul language that is!
Gobble Gobble. The DVD for "Fascination" has a great cover and makes you think this will be a romantic film set in exotic locations.  There really was only one beach location, which probably helped cut down on the budget.  Klaus Menzel's direction lends a sputtering pace and made me feel the picture was going downhill as it changed from romance to attempted thriller.  James Naughton from 1974's "The Paper Chase," "First Wives Club" & "Devil Wears Prada" plays the father whose swimming accident casts an early shadow over the film.  Adam Garcia plays his son Scott.  Garcia has been in a number of films including "Bootmen," "Coyote Ugly" & "Confessions of a Teenage Drama Queen."  However, I didn't quite remember him, nor would his rather wooden self-absorbed performance and his flat vocal affectation be likely to make me recall him from this film.  However, he does a good job in the bare bottom love scenes.  Scott's mother is lovely Jacqueline Bisset who has had a long career since she first claimed fame as Giovanni Goodthighs in "Casino Royale" back in 1967 and went on to work with Francois Truffaut in "Day for Night."  She has 4 Golden Globe nominations with the most recent being in 1999 for "Joan of Arc."  She does a good job as the mother Maureen who has an affair that turns into her second husband.  Unfortunately, her taste in men does not improve as husband #2 appears to be on a revenge mission for husband #1 who let husband #2's wife #1 drown -- in short, the plot is a bit contrived and confusing with more twists and turns than common sense.  Husband #2 is Oliver Vance played by Stuart Wilson from "The Prisoner of Zenda," "Wild Things," "Lethal Weapon 3" & "Enemy of the State."  As the bad guy, he is overbearing and a bit revolting.  His intimacy with his adopted daughter turns him into a real sleaze merchant.  His adopted daughter Kelly has the most confusing of roles, confusingly written, although actress Alice Evans does as good of a job as possible with this.  Why a girl who survived the streets of Johannesburg decides to try to jump out of a car at the end of the movie didn't make sense to me.  Such was the bundle of contradictions of this character.  How could she allow herself to be used by her stepfather?  Why would she still feel allegiance to him?  The only real answer is the screenwriter wanted her in the movie; and that's how she arrived.  Evans has worked in "National Lampoon's Blackball," "My Wife Maurice" & "102 Dalmatians."  This role will hardly catapult her onto Hollywood's "A" list.  The actors bravely stick with this turkey that does have some nice love scenes & one tropical location.  Otherwise, you'll be wondering how much longer until it's over.  The alternate ending apparently had Garcia dead; so I'm glad they picked the ending they did.  Taxi!
Bad Device. I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service
He was fired from GM for calling off and showing up late. what a joke...people believe the stupidest things...do some research and you will see that this is a joke.  I hated it
The Biggest Waste of Brian Cox Ever!. The Premise:Lisa Reisert (Rachel McAdams) is travelling home on the last flight of the night (the red eye) to Miami where she lives and works as a hotel manager for a prestigeous hotel after attending the funeral for her late grandmother. Jackson Rippner (Cillian Murphy) is a mysterious and charming stranger she meets in the airport who as it turns out is not so coincidentally taking the same flight as she is.Rippner's reason for travel is strictly business. It so happens an assassination is planned on the Secretary of Homeland Security while he stays at Lisa's hotel. Rippner needs Lisa to call the hotel and arrange for the Secretary to stay in a different room. If she doesn't comply, he has a man waiting outside her fathers home to kill him.Thoughts:This was one of my few experiences with Wes Craven's (Director) work who is most known for the horrible genre of teenage slasher films I despise. I had dismissed this film in theatres without giving a second thought, and when I finally saw it last night I knew next to nothing of what it was about. From what I vaguely remembered of the previews, and given Craven's reputation, I was honestly expecting Rippner to be a supernatural character such as a vampire. In hindsite, I think 'Vampire on a Plane' woulda been a much better foundation for a film.To call this film's premise shaky is as kind as it is unfair. It's unfair because the core plot points could prove to be an interesting thriller. The problem with this film is how it executes those points. A hotel manager? The Secretary of Homeland Security? Give me a break! Make it the Deputy Director of the FBI and the President of the United States and we have a plotline that warrants all of this hullabaloo. The concept of this film has potential, but how it was staged is just too ridiculous. Are we really to believe that the Secretary of Homeland Security is that important that such an elaborate scheme to assassinate him would be put in place. Are we really to believe that the only way this assassination (which involves missles did I tell you? I won't say anymore) can be pulled off is if the manager of the hotel can get the Secretary to stay in a different room? And who are these nameless caucaisions who want the secretary killed? And why?The premise isn't only shaky, it's totally gutless. It sickens me that Hollywood is so afraid of offending anyone that neither the antagonist nor their motives can in any way reflect real world people, situations or beliefs. It forces me to recall the debacle of the last adaptation of the great Jack Ryan thrillers by Tom Clancy, The Sum of all Fears. In that film, instead of having militant muslim terrorists acquire a nuclear warhead lost by Isreal (which truly is something to fear), they decided to go with Nazi's. Heaven forbid we offend all the militant muslim terrorists of the world by portraying them as the evil stain on humankind that they are. I digress. My point is simply that Red Eye doesn't even go that far. It has no voice. It doesn't tell us anything, and worse, it's too spineless to put a face on fear.There are some good things about the film. First and foremost is the cast. While Rachel McAdams is completely not believable as a manager of a prestigious Miami hotel, that part of her character is more of sidenote and it's a fault of casting more than her acting anyway. Cillian Murphy is very talented, and he has a look that allows him to come off as charming one moment and creepy the next. I still wish he woulda turned out to be a vampire though. Finally we have the legendary Brian "Better than Anthony Hopkins as Hannible Lector" Cox. He's such a great actor, but in this film he's relegated to the most menial of roles. Almost every scene he's in is him answering the phone, being woken up by the phone, or picking up the morning paper.The film is ok in it's first two acts, with the second act being the strongest part of the film where Rachel and Cillian have performances confined mostly to their seats on the plane. It's here that the tension builds, and the performances really hold the scenes. Then comes the third act were the film just breaks down in to complete ludicrousness. The story continues off the plane and gives up completely on being an intellectual thriller. Instead it goes for the action route and follows just about every cliche for a movie of this type.The Verdict:Red Eye has an interesting idea that could have beened turned into something a lot better under a more able screenwriter and director. The actors performances do the best they can to keep this ship afloat. If you can ignore the ridiculous parts of this film which are about as far fetched as your typical network TV thrillers, then you may find some enjoyment your first time through. It's not horrible, but neither is it really good
AMAZON SUCKS. I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!
Horribly crude stuff. The Chaplin cult continues to amaze me as it is inexplicable to me that anyone could find anything hinting of greatness in any of these very crude comedy shorts. I agree that Chaplin's feature films were generally very goodbut this stuff is unfunny and uninspired. If I see Chaplin zip around that revolving door one more time, I will go mad! In another short, Chaplin gets everyone at an alcohol rehab center drunk - isn't that hilarious? He plays a cop in another and hits everyone in his path - talk about crude slapstick.  I saw some of these played to a contemporary audience in a theatre recently and there wasn't a single laugh. The audience grew impatient and when the film finally ended, people said &quot;was that it?&quot; Until the late 20's, any Keaton, Lloyd, or Langdon film was infinitely better than the stuff that Chaplin turned out at the time. Keaton hasn't aged - Chaplin has
Very sad attempt at a sequel. I rented this film immediatley after seeing the first Bride with White Hair hoping for a fluid and entrancing continuation of the story.  There was a perfect setup for a sequel and I couldn't wait to watch it unfold.  After the first half an hour I knew that director Ronnie Yu had abandoned the feel of the first film and it seemed he didn't really give a damn about how interesting the story was.  Poor dialogue, inadequate story, there was nothing satisfying or even interesting in this film.  If you enjoyed the first BWWH you'll probably still be tempted to watch this movie just make sure you rent it before buying
Sorry. This movie is so freakin stupid. Yes its funny...but so very dumb. Not good dumb; bad dumb. Terribly, painfully stupid. Funny at times. Best avoided or taken in small doses
Poor support. This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet
Curious, Unsettling, and Highly Questionable. When I rented Twentynine Palms, I knew it would showcase Bruno Dumont's taste for dispassionate portrayals, violence of various sorts, and shock. In spite of this mental preparation, this very atmospheric film built to a grotesque resolution that left me, a seasoned viewer, rattled. Unfortunately, the shock and awe that the film achieves is short lived. Twentynine Palms is modeled on the horror film, but, like many of its American cousins, the horror it achieves failed to haunt me. The film as a whole left me with an unsettled feeling, as if a cynic had just talked my ear off.  I also had the sense that this was more about the worldview of the director, rather than the world his film creates.Sam Peckinpaw's STRAW DOGS is in ways a similar but superior film. I can admire STRAW DOGS based on its many strengths, so long as I avoid viewing it as the MAN-AS-ANIMAL fable that Peckinpaw intended. It isn't that I disagree with his view of humans as domesticated animals. I see the film as a rare example of violent drama and technical virtuosity transcending the simplicity of its maker's defense. Whether Peckinpaw has a point or not seems beside the point. Of course, the trick with any argument is in having good evidence. In pressing one's point of view, there is, almost inevitably, an artful description of a scene, one that reflects the viewer's position. In this way, films have the strange ability to create their own myths; their own arguments. To invest a film with one's views too forcibly can dull the work's independent life, its peculiar logic, with the sententiousness of fables.Watching Twentynine Palms, it seems impossible to avoid questioning Dumont's personal views. This is because so many of the events described in the film are implausible. Lacking believable characters and action, one naturally develops a sense that the director is revealing something to us that we haven't seen; something unique to his vision. If the strange behavior of the two principles was about their uniqueness and their relationship (e.g. as outsiders) then why would Dumont undercut their characterization, denying us a belief in them as individuals, or, more profoundly, as points of identification? I gradually came to view the two principles as an every-couple, with private rhythms and misunderstandings that might appear absurd if made public. This seemed like a worthy focus, but Dumont forces it to play against a theme of violence, both seen and unseen. The violent atmosphere of the film was something I couldn't account for until the resolution, and even then with difficulty.Toward the end of film, we're given a horrific equation of two orgasms: that of the male protagonist and that of his rapist, the film's principle antagonist (aside from the desert). Both orgasms are shown to be dangerous, powerful, and unspeakable (or, at least, not clearly worded). This equation discounts the context in which the orgasms occur, leaving the viewer with no reliable distinction of the protagonists from their insanely hostile environment. Clearly, the bourgeois, carefree lifestyle of the couple is set up to be cut down (a horror convention), but Dumont makes the attack personal in the most perverse way. From early in the film on, the protagonists suggest an inner horror, which is unmitigated by their lovemaking, and perhaps even feeds on their relationship. The irrationality of their environment makes the couple our most recognizable guides on this strange road trip, but they demonstrate their own measure of insanity. The male half of the couple betrays an undercurrent of sadism that eventually explodes as an act of sexualized murder. The female's deviance is less clearly defined, but there are several scenes in which she is shown inviting harm. If our trip, as it seems, is through a kind of anti-Eden, and our guides are an every-couple, with no structured identity of their own, then their deviancy would suggest a kind of universal infection, or nature, rather than an aberration of character. This would also render the criminality of the final scenes uncertain, in light of their amoral setting.Some would say that the best criterion for judging a horror film is whether it horrifies, regardless of how. This is an unsettling film. It is also an especially tasteless one. In watching this DVD, it may be useful to some viewers that Dumont can be found rationalizing his use of violence (indeed, his violence as an artist) in an interview, in a director's statement, and in the course of the film itself
Bow wow. I can't understand the good reviews given by others to this movie. Frankly, I thought it was a dog.Not to say that it had no redeeming features - the friendship between the young girl and the lawn man was endearing, if improbable. And the girl herself was a real sweetie, and a good actress - perfect for the part. In fact, the acting all around was admirable.But the script! Yikes! Not a single character in the whole movie - with the partial exceptions of the two protagonists - had any motivation for anything they did. People acting awkward or mean (in fact, just about everyone in the movie other than said two was mean), or spiteful, or stupid, for no reason at all!It seems as though somehow, the movie could have been good, but didn't make it. Call it almost watchable.I came away from Lawn Dogs (Yawn Dogs?) feeling not at all enriched. Puzzled, perhaps, at why anyone would make such a movie. Well, there was that admirable, unlikely friendship. But that was all.Pass this one by
stick with the first one!!!!!!!. after the scary and funny "return of the living dead" i couldn't wait to see this one,know what? turns out i could have waited to see it because this is the PITS!!!!!!!! how could they have blown this movie so bad!! not funny,not scary,and not worth the price!!!!!!!!! stay away!!!!!!!
Confusing...Vague....and disappointing!. Good cast, adaptation of King Lear. Don't bother unless you are really bored
Worst movie I've ever seen. I would have given this film 0 stars if possible.  This film was long, boring, and painful to watch.  If you like Jane Austen films or other BBC period films, do not be deceived by this one; it is nothing like those types of films
You have to download Amazon software into your PC... I am never happy when a purchase requires that you install the company's software.  The vid is encrypted so that you need Amazon's player to view it.  Blah.  You're better off buying the DVD for $20 with all the episodes so at least you can watch the DVD somewhere other than your own computer.
If You're a School Teacher and Thinking About Using This Film in Your Class, Please Read This First. Whether William Golding deserved Nobel Prize or not is still a debatable point, but it is true that he wrote one marvelous book, and its name is `Lord of the Flies.' But let's not talk about the differences between the book and the film for a while - because after all no one I am afraid can bring the multi-layered world of words onto the screen. Even those who loved the 1963 version would admit that. You can interpret the meaning of `Lord of the Flies' but who can really visualize it, or the imaginary conversations of Simon for that matter?The biggest problem of Harry Hook's new version is not the changes done to the film. The boys are American military school cadets, using dirty words frequently, but those parts didn't annoy me much. Real problem is something more essential to the film, which is storytelling. In short the 1990 film doesn't know what it wants to be. On the film's video cover you can read (and I quote) `this stunning adventure explores the deep dark corner of the human soul." Well, not exactly.For as adventure story it lacks pace; the film always feels rushed and often needs better editing. As allegory it needs more distinctive personalities for each character. The conflict between Ralph and Jack should be clearer, and Piggy's role should be more than that of a whining fat boy. And don't forget Simon, who sees things, it is true, but definitely not those things that the film actually shows us.It is a pity that the cinematography is so beautiful. It could have been a perfect backdrop against which dark allegorical survival story would develop, opposite of optimistic tales of Jules Verne's adventure stories. By watching this film you can follow the story of the book, but find no tension or thought-provoking words in it.Balthazar Getty's feature film debut. And Lewis M. Allen, one of the producers of the film, had also produced Peter Brook version in 1963
Davy Crockett TV   vs. Davy Crockett Movies. I was very gung ho when I found out that Disney was finally releasing the Davy Crockett TV show on DVD.  I grew up watching the two Davy Crockett movies.  HOwever upon actually seeing these DVDs I was very disappointed.  It is exactly the same as those two movies it is just split into five seperate episodes.  The Episodes: Davy Crockett, Indian Fighter; Davy Crockett Goes to Congress; and Davy Crockett at the Alamo are all the parts included in the movie Davy Crockett King of the Wild Frontier.  The episodes Davy Crockett's Keelboat Race; Davy Crockett and the River Pirates; were what made up the movie Davy Crockett and the River Pirates.  I for one am planning on buying the newer version that came out in 2004 that is just the two movies on one disc.  The only difference between this set and the new set is that there are couple of features on this set and that there are introductions to the episodes buy Leonard Maltin and it has two discs in a tin collector's box.  The biggest difference of all is that this set runs from between $37-$100 whereas you can buy the two movies on DVD for $14-$16.  I myself will go for the cheaper movie set rather than have to watch each episode sperately.
MORTAL KOMBAT. I DID NOT RECEIVE THIS MOVIE AND I WAS CHARGE FOR ITI WOULD LOOK TO RECEIVE THE DVDTHANK YOUCAN SOMEONE EMAIL ME WITH THIS INFOrossannemccullough@hotmail.comor call me at 312-404-0267 my name is ROSSANNE MCCULLOUG
Watch out for faulty VHS tapes. While the Young Ones is indeed a truly hysterically funny TV show, when I ordered the VHS tapes, I was suprised to see that, though brand new, the sound level on the first tape (for the first 10 min) was so low as to be nearly inaudible, and that the second tape would not play at all in the VHS player.  Just a heads up
Bad Device. I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service
An easy film to sum up... Just repeat the following several times.1) Draggy plot2) Uninspired acting, especially Allen, who almost sinks it3) unimaginative (story, direction, etc)Then get a Hitchcock film
Lack of blonde ambition!. I only gave this movie 2 stars because of its 2 stars: Mamie Van Doren and Jayne Mansfield. Without the presence of these 2 bombshells, the film is a complete bomb. As a piece of film history, it has its place. As entertainment, it's atrocious, even for the time. Still, as I've said, it does have Mamie & Jayne! The male actors are laughable and the plot virtually non-existent, although you can say that about a lot of modern films too. Only get this film if you're passionate about its 2 lusty blonde actresses. Otherwise, get a life
Great Acting but unbelievable story line. This movie has such wonderful reviews from both professional critics and Amazon customers that I was expecting great things. While I agree the acting (especially the girls playing Christy and Ariel) is excellent the story is just too implausible and I got that impression from the minute we see the family crossing from Canada to the US (yes they are Irish but for some reason they have to sneak in to the US from Canada). Anyway why on earth would an apparently intelligent couple enter the US with their two kids illegally, without jobs or much money to settle in the most expensive city in the country?  I know the dad is an actor but couldn't he have settled the family in one of the less expensive boroughs and taken the subway in to Manhattan? The mom is a teacher but can't find a job but no wonder if they are in the country illegally. Yet there is money for private school, fixing up the dump of an apartment, an expensive camcorder, betting the rent money on an ET doll etc.  I can't imagine any parents moving in to an apartment building known as the "drug house" with two young girls and then letting the girls wander about as they please.  Mind you the parents are a couple supposedly almost crippled by the guilt they feel over a third child - a son - that has recently died.  I kept expecting someone to call Social Services.   And the medical situations with both Frankie and the mom and new baby are not well thought out or researched. The symbolism between Mateo, the new baby and Frankie is very heavy handed. Though the film is told through the oldest daughter's eyes  because of several scenes and elements the movie is not suited at all to children.  And there are also several scenes that are really not connected with the oldest daughter at all.   Maybe if I had taken it more as a fable I would have "gotten" this movie more but I was expecting a straight forward drama and was disappointed.
Great Acting but unbelievable story line. This movie has such wonderful reviews from both professional critics and Amazon customers that I was expecting great things. While I agree the acting (especially the girls playing Christy and Ariel) is excellent the story is just too implausible and I got that impression from the minute we see the family crossing from Canada to the US (yes they are Irish but for some reason they have to sneak in to the US from Canada). Anyway why on earth would an apparently intelligent couple enter the US with their two kids illegally, without jobs or much money to settle in the most expensive city in the country?  I know the dad is an actor but couldn't he have settled the family in one of the less expensive boroughs and taken the subway in to Manhattan? The mom is a teacher but can't find a job but no wonder if they are in the country illegally. Yet there is money for private school, fixing up the dump of an apartment, an expensive camcorder, betting the rent money on an ET doll etc.  I can't imagine any parents moving in to an apartment building known as the "drug house" with two young girls and then letting the girls wander about as they please.  Mind you the parents are a couple supposedly almost crippled by the guilt they feel over a third child - a son - that has recently died.  I kept expecting someone to call Social Services.   And the medical situations with both Frankie and the mom and new baby are not well thought out or researched. The symbolism between Mateo, the new baby and Frankie is very heavy handed. Though the film is told through the oldest daughter's eyes  because of several scenes and elements the movie is not suited at all to children.  And there are also several scenes that are really not connected with the oldest daughter at all.   Maybe if I had taken it more as a fable I would have "gotten" this movie more but I was expecting a straight forward drama and was disappointed.
Great movie, LOUSY LOUSY transfer. This is one of Clint's best, but the transfer is awful.   All dark scenes are grainy, highly pixellated.  The daylight scenes (fortunately the balance of the movie) are OK.  Movie 3 stars, transfer 1 star
UnBox video not yet working. Will not play once video was downloaded. I get the error message:  "can not play file, please try again later. error# 0x80040273" I made the exlusive give me call me back feature but the UnBox department was already closed, I was told the UnBox Saturday and Sunday 6-5 hours. I have to say I am impressed with the Call back feature. I downloaded the Unbox Beta now and am recieving email assistance to try to resolve the problem. Thanks Amazon UnBox! I will Update again - Feb. 10,200
Dreary, hard to watch. Given high acclaims this film has collected over time, I was glad to pick up a VHS copy at my local library sale.  Began to watch it last night.  I was able to sit thru the part 1.  When the tape ended, I was actually glad. I felt a sense of acomplishment in finishing the part 1!  The movie is DREARY to the max.  People portrayed are irrational, lost, uncommunicative, and subject to random and cruel violence by soldiers and rulers.  In some way, this movie reminded me of the dreary winter (lasting 6 months!) I spent in Russia a couple of years ago...To me, the movie reflects the psychological breakdown that happened after the decades long terror policy of Soviet state (1920-1956).  For survivors, nothing made any sense anymore, except perhaps fear and evil, as people in this dreary film reflects.  People have been already destroyed in their souls.  They are psychologically shattered beyond repair and only occasional readings of the Bible verses give them any sense of permanence in their chaotic daily experience.Maybe that is the real meaning of this movie.  To really reflect what happened to people's psyche after Lenin and Stalin's UNLIMITED TERROR, they found a parallel in Mongol's devastation and oppression of medieval Russia.  In both cases, people were left shattered, helpless, irrational, withdrawn,  and autistic.
Complete Fiction. While there has never been a completely factual account of the life of Wyatt Earp ("Tombstone" comes the closest), this film is completely fictional. First, Wyatt isn't even married in this version, and he becomes enamored with a woman named Clementine; thus the title. Doc Holliday was a dentist, but in this film, he is a surgeon who operates on a wounded bargirl he loves.As a piece of Western Fiction, this film would be alright, but since it was decided to use the names Wyatt Earp, Doc Holliday and the OK Corral, the entire project is distracting. The only accurate facts in this film, are that there was a Wyatt Earp, a Doc Holliday and an OK Corral. If it wasn't for the excellent performances of Henry Fonda, and especially, Walter Brennen, I would have given this film one star
Strictly Based On A Foreigner's Point Of View. Being a Salvadorean, I must say that this movie is based on an outsider's viewpoint. First of all, there was no dictaroship, the death squads were splinter squads operating apart from the government and the military. Second, Human Rights only came to stir up more trouble, as our police, military and other sectors have been downgraded in favor of system which is comfortable for the FMLN (the former guerrillas now a government party). The movie portrays them as some kind of heroes and critisices the USA for helping our military, which was getting murdered, mutilated and tortured by the opressive guerrillas. I seriously doubt any Salvadorean finds this movie historically accurate, I myself do not remember anything portrayed in the film happening in reality. And contrary to foreing belief, our country is not in same stage, as when the guerrillas were terrorising ours and blaming the government for it. This is classic propaganda done through a film: misinformation to the foreign public, in hopes of critsicing our democratic government and liberty-loving way of life. In the end, this movie is nothing more than a confused foreign opinion on something that only us Salvadoreans truly understand
Unable to review. Unable to see the movie. Received the original shipment, and later a replacement, and both had the same defects and we were unable to watch the movie
Ugh. Thats what I got to say about this piece o' sheeitt. When I bought this together with the first one for that kick a** price I thought I was going to watch the sequel of all sequels. I thought big huge offensive against the bugs. How can you go wrong? Well they somehow succeded. Poor acting, garbage special effects, retarded plot, man I can go on and on whats wrong with this pile of trash. But the other reviewers already did this. So I'll just be beatin on a dead horse. Please, if you loved the first ST DO NOT WATCH THIS!. It will put a bad taste in your mouth
For die hard Kutcher fans only. The movie starts off very slowly, with childhood episodes from Ashton Kutcher's character.  It's at least 1/2 an hour before we see the adult Kutcher, although he does appear at the very beginning for a brief scene.  The premise is good, and it has some good momentum in the middle, which is why I gave it two stars.  The shifting situations of his life and the lives of his friends are interesting and well done, but the overall story line is very weak, and the ending is dreadful and not supported by most of the rest of the story.  Also, the movie has too many tongue-in-cheek references to Kutcher's real life circumstances -- such as the reference to "tighty-whities."  They distract from the story, and make the movie more of a vanity vehicle -- which is too bad -- If you are not a Kutcher convert and are just looking for a movie, skip this one
Poor support. This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet
Aims low and hits its target. This straight-to-video's modest budget is attested to by the fact that while most of the action is supposed to take place at a large state prison, this prison only seems to house about 12 inmates. The plot is that old but reliable one about a man posing as a prisoner so he can go "undercover" and solve a crime. The crime in this case is not especially interesting and it's resolved in much too pat a fashion. However, leading man Tommy Lee Thomas looks good with his shirt off, (though he seems too small to be throwing his weight around), and there's a torture scene, (modeled on the one in "Lethal Weapon"), in which he's hanged by his wrists and zapped with electric shocks. Mr. Thomas' performance may not be of Oscar caliber but he does know how to yell.
Different yet Hollywood ruined it. I am kind of in the middle of the other reviewers.  It DID have a "different" and unpredictable story line.  i took it that he was dreaming, since the state names and money werent real.  the kid was great.  the problem, as usual, is Hollywood ruined it...what could have been a great movie my kids could watch, they throw in a sex scene in the kid's car back seat while he is sitting next to the car, and then of course they have to have the kid throw in a couple of "F" words.  And of course Hollywood doesnt let us who object to that buy a version that has that edited, or permit DVD players that allow you to skip those parts.  if it wasnt for the trash above, i would give it 4 stars for its uniqueness.  If you are morale and have children, you dont want this movie
Where is the old hunter Buldeo?. The best of Rudyard Kipling's Jungle Book stories took place in the man village because that's where Mowgli meets a superstitious old hunter named Buldeo.   Buldeo claims that the tiger Shere Khan is supernatural,  the ghost of a wicked old money lender.  When Mowgli says that Shere Khan is only a very disagreeable tiger Buldeo threatens to spank our young hero.When Buldeo learns that Mowgli has a vendetta with the tiger and a black panther as his personal body guard the old man tells the other villagers that Mowgli is a demon child who is able to turn himself from a boy to a wolf, and back to a boy at will.  This is great story telling.  But where is Buldeo?  He isn't in the movie at all!  It's like leaving the Wicked Witch out of the movie version of "The Wizard of Oz".On a side note, in the Kipling stories the black panther Bagheera has a secret so shameful he can tell no one but Mowgli.   Bagheera was born in a zoo, chained and keep in a cage for the amusement of men.  But rather than blame Mowgli for the cruelty he suffered in captivity Bagheera sees the boy as a kindred spirit.  They were both separated from their own kind at an early age.  Once we have that bit of information the relationship between the boy and the panther makes sense.   We are able to understand Bagheera's total devotion to the Mowgli.  But the movie never explains that.  I realize that the movie shouldn't follow the book completely.   But since the book was so much richer the movie seemed like a let down
Garbage pure and simple. This has got to be the absolutely the sickest bottom of the heap horror movie ever made. You have been warned
Blah... I liked the other Eisenstein movies that I've watched.  Alexander Nevsky is a classic and would probably be more of a classic if it were American.  Battleship Potemkin is pretty good and has some stuff that gets ripped off by Hollywood.  So I thought I would give this one a try.I really wanted to like this movie.  It's about the Russian Revolution but for me it lays things on a little too thick.  I could only get to about half way through the movie (as the horse is hanging off the bridge is where I stop).  Excellent cinematography and music but I couldn't watch more of it.  Way too thick for me
Dont get "Fiji" final week ... Dont dwnld " Survivor, "Thunderstorms & Sacrifice" ". Its my fault for not reading the whole thing. you would think that the last episode would be the finale , but NO, its just a 10 minute recap going to the finale 4. I didnt even get a full 45 minute episode. No finale. I got rippped off. $1.99 dwnld not well spent. Dont bother dwnldng any episode of fiji if you dont know the ending. Because they dont have that episode, not even the reunion show
All lies, an attack on america... For what purpose these lies about the life of this man? Are the liberal film makers racists who don't believe that there is a good black man to depict on film so they have to lie? If someone wanted to write fiction about a badass black fighter on the cusp of super stardom who is framed for a murder then be my guest. Hurricane carter is not and was not that man.Facts:In the movie denzel washington is shown in military garb with more medals on his cheat than colin powell. They want to drive home the point that here was a man who served his country and is now about to be screwed by it. Fact is carter was kicked out of the army after being court mashalled 4 times!In a title fight scence with an italian american fighter named giodello carter is depictied as beating this man pillar to post only to be screwed out of the decision he so richly deserved. Fact, giardello deserved to win that fight according to the overwhelming number of experts who have viewed it then and now on tape. The depitction is another lie.Another lie is this notion put forth in the movie that hurricane was on the verge of getting that title before mean white bigots framed him for this murder. Fact is that carter's boxing career was going down hill and he had only won 8 of his last 15 fights. As carter's boxing career failed he became more militant in his political views and hated white people. While in prison he was diagnosed to be psychotic. Yeah a psychotic racist is the model for black america. Shame.Norman jewison must not think much of black folks to make a movie of lies like this. Denzel washington should be ashamed he participated in such trash. Those who produced this trash bet that the average public would be gullible enough to believe these lies with no attempt at knowing the truth and hollywood didn't care; they just like the message. Looking at these reviews i have to say they made a good bet. America bashing and race baiting is alive and well, earning oscars and making for big box office. A shame.
snowboarding mixed with bullets and action dont mix. this movie started out good but then got all mushy with the action and the gunfire. good snowboarding stunts, and the cast is great, Sawa looks a little scruffy looking. like I said, with the snowboarding and action, dont mix well and it gets muddled when the badguys come alon
Davy Crockett TV   vs. Davy Crockett Movies. I was very gung ho when I found out that Disney was finally releasing the Davy Crockett TV show on DVD.  I grew up watching the two Davy Crockett movies.  HOwever upon actually seeing these DVDs I was very disappointed.  It is exactly the same as those two movies it is just split into five seperate episodes.  The Episodes: Davy Crockett, Indian Fighter; Davy Crockett Goes to Congress; and Davy Crockett at the Alamo are all the parts included in the movie Davy Crockett King of the Wild Frontier.  The episodes Davy Crockett's Keelboat Race; Davy Crockett and the River Pirates; were what made up the movie Davy Crockett and the River Pirates.  I for one am planning on buying the newer version that came out in 2004 that is just the two movies on one disc.  The only difference between this set and the new set is that there are couple of features on this set and that there are introductions to the episodes buy Leonard Maltin and it has two discs in a tin collector's box.  The biggest difference of all is that this set runs from between $37-$100 whereas you can buy the two movies on DVD for $14-$16.  I myself will go for the cheaper movie set rather than have to watch each episode sperately.
WARNING: Wrong Episode!. This item is supposedly titled "UFOs: The First Encounters." It is, however, an episode about reincarnation. It is incorrectly labeled. DO NOT PURCHASE unless you are looking for an episode on reincarnation
"Virginal" Encounters might be a better title  [:-(. All the promos made me think that this would be a really great Sci-Fi story with beautiful babes all over the place.  Well, there WERE some beautiful babes but the anticipated provocative poses by sexy ladies, never materialized.  Has the art of "posing" been lost by modern girls?  Maybe all the good directors have retired or died!  What a pity...Why, I couldn't even muster a stiff upper lip as I played this DVD through to the end.In spite of my being a certifiable "dirty old man". [:-)
Star Trek:  City on the Edge of Forever. My favorite show of the Trek series but there's no way I'd buy another individual program from Amazon.  It will ONLY play on their downloaded player ...won't burn to DVD so can't play it on my television.  Don't bother buying this ...just go for the Trek collection on DVD
Poor adaptation. As said by other reviewers, a lot of what was in the original story was changed, and the film was updated to the time period where it was. The boys are American, from a military school, and talk about fear of the Russians snatching them up and drafting them for their athletic teams. The choice of making them from a military school may have been a poor choice - it may have hurt the belief of the transition from normal boys to animals. I don't want to sound like I'm stereotyping people in the military, but people in general already think there's a thin line between military experience in matters of war and the feelings of a wild animal.Basically, I think the biggest problem with this film is that the storytelling is lost. You don't feel like there's a transition to barbarism like you did in the book and the 1963 film. For example, during the bonfire sequence Jack is shouting out directions: "OK, you be the pig, we'll be the hunters," and everyone chases the selected kid around the fire. (not actually hurting him, mind you, just chasing him) That's not chaos nor barbarism, that's an organized celebration. It's about as uncivilized as a frathouse orientation. The director tries to play this scene out like it's a terrible thing, but it just doesn't come across that way.I might also add that this shares a similar problem with another modern adaptation, that being the John Hurt "1984." That film, if I recall correctly, didn't have a single "Big Brother is Watching You." Likewise, this film doesn't have a single, "Kill the pig, spill her blood!" That's right, the most famous line from the book is not even in this movie. Actually, a kid in one scene says quietly, "We killed a pig." That's about it. This leaves out an important part in the transition of the children from civilization to animal-like behavior. The fact the boys relished in the killing of a wild animal, chanting and screaming, "KILL THE PIG! SLIT HER THROAT! SPILL HER BLOOD!" was one of the most poignant moments of the book and 1963 film, and is one of the most recognizable literary quotes next to "Tell me about the rabbits, George."On a final note, the character of Piggy is ruined in this film. Danuel Pipoly was terrible in the role, and sounds like he was plucked from an elementary school play. I don't wanna give too much away, but I was happy when "something something" happened to him. That sounds mean but it's true, and it's a very bad thing in a film like this.This film could have been good, but it fails on all levels. The transition from schoolboys to animalistic roots is unbelievable, making the whole point of the story lost on the audience. The best part of the whole thing to me was that marine at the end, and he's in about ten seconds of film time. I hate comparing it to the 1963 film version so much, but I would really suggest people see that instead. Avoid this unless you can catch it on cable and watch at your own discretion
Star Trek:  City on the Edge of Forever. My favorite show of the Trek series but there's no way I'd buy another individual program from Amazon.  It will ONLY play on their downloaded player ...won't burn to DVD so can't play it on my television.  Don't bother buying this ...just go for the Trek collection on DVD
Bad Device. I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service
there is something wrong with you if you enjoy this!. This is a horrible movie with no redeeming value. I realize that such a knock will actually drive people to purchase this. Let me bring something to you attention.This is a slasher movie with effective gore. In fact, for the time, the gore was more sick that similar movies. However, there are no scares, no suspense, no clever script, no story and it has a stupic ending. I know, that applies to most gore movies!The problem with this movie is that it is overly mean spirited towards women (I am a man, a 6 foot 235 pound big strong guy that also raises a family).The story, which has a guy killing women b/c of mistreatment from his mother, seems like it was written and directed by a person that shares the same demons as the killer of the film.The murders in this movie are so mean-spirited (yet with no cinematic value) that a normal movie goer would have to be offended. This movie is not sick in a "good" movie way but rather sick in an ashamed manner.This is a woman-bashing movie that should make any viewer feel guilty that they are patronizing this garbage. A movie should have an entertainment value. There is no cinematic, artistic touch on this film.This is simply a mean, mean movie!
MORTAL KOMBAT. I DID NOT RECEIVE THIS MOVIE AND I WAS CHARGE FOR ITI WOULD LOOK TO RECEIVE THE DVDTHANK YOUCAN SOMEONE EMAIL ME WITH THIS INFOrossannemccullough@hotmail.comor call me at 312-404-0267 my name is ROSSANNE MCCULLOUG
SOO FRUSTERATING!!!. i think i am the only one that HATED this video. after reading all the reviews i was sooo excited and rushed out to get it. HOWEVER,i just could not figure out how to do the excersises! it was soo confusing, frusterating, and the most boring workout ive ever had in my life. also, the instructer just got on my nerves, she was so annoying.this is probably just me, as judging from all the other reviews no one else had this problem, but check it out from your local library and see if you can do it before you buy it. just be prepared to be bored out of your mind
The book is so much better!. I picked up the book at a yardsale without knowing much about it, and absolutely loved it! It is so smart, funny, and heartbreaking, without ever being sappy. So, naturally, I was curious about the movie too. I figured that because Ephron had written the screenplay too, not much could go wrong. And while the story line followed the book more or less, the movie turned out terrible. I could not have been more disappointed!! First of all, Jack Nicholson is completely miscast, because he essentially plays himself (as usual), not the *interesting* guy that Mark is supposed to be. He is the opposite of charming, funny, tender, lovable, i.e. somebody that the character of the wife (Rachel) would fall so deeply in love with and trust so completely. You suspect all along that he is a cad; therefore, Rachel's utter shock at his betrayal doesn't make sense. Besides, he is too old for the role! Meryl Streep is annoyingly twitchy, but much better in her role as Rachel. Still, she can't carry the movie alone, and her love scenes with Nicholson are flat; there is no spark there. I wonder how happy Ephron was with the movie adaptation of her novel, and whether she really did write all the scenes. The wedding scene, where Rachel has doubts about marying Mark and spends what feels like 5 hours in a room alone agonizing, while the wedding guests wait, is out of place, not to mention boring, not to mention heavy handed. A total dud
Is ''cringe-worthy'' a word?. I'm surprised by all the praise this movie gets here at Amazon and beyond. There really wasn't much here I liked. The soundtrack was the usual "pap" you'd expect from a family friendly movie, though the sets were nice. It seems this movie was just miscast. Mel just doesn't do comedy all that well, at least for a lead role. Jame Garner, the reason I bought this seems more like a bystander. And Jodie is Jodie and I never bought for a moment she was her character.Although the cast is a powerhouse (on paper), sadly the chemistry never really works and the jokes are just cornball. An example: There was a sequence when Bret asks his friends (who are standing behind him) to whistle to reveal themselves to some bandits he was confronting; which as it turns out they are unable to do. Instead Jodie and James, blow madly, just like the movie.This movie reminds me a HELL of a lot like ''The Three Amigo's''; on paper you would think it couldn't miss, but on film it's painful to watch
Philadelphia. Denzel Washington is probably my favorite actor. Even in that dog of a movie called THE MANCHURIAN CANDIDATE, he shone. Tom Hanks? Well, lemme quit hating the guy. This is a well-intentioned movie, Tom did a creditable job, and we had extreme close-ups with funny colors to camouflage the spots where he overreached. I was also pleasantly surprised to see Antonio Banderas fly in the face of his Latino studliness by playing a gay guy. A passionate one, though, since he's still a Latino, after all.Actually, this is a Hollywood "message movie," and you know what that means. It's about as subtle as Michael Moore. Those who agree with the message flock to be beaten about the head by it for two hours. Those who the filmmakers would like to see the movie, those who don't agree with the message, stay as far away from it as possible.There's a scene in the library where nobody wants to sit at the table with AIDS boy. The way they stared at him reminded me of "lao wei in China" experiences. Denzel's character was reminded of segregation, even though he's too young to remember it, and started to care about Tom Hanks' character.AIDS discrimination is bad. Actually, any discrimination at all is bad. And that's the movie's message. I agree with the message, but still. That's all we've got.As a totally irrelevant non-sequiter, if the name "Sam Francisco" means anything to you, you've seen subtle commentary on discrimination.I love a great courtroom drama. This one was merely good. With so much of an agenda to squeeze into a two-hour film, they had to take a few shortcuts here. Sad, ain't it? But even so, a well-intentioned film that I'm glad I saw. Once. Not twice. Once is enough, thank you.
"You're going down Burnhead" ???. I have to say that I was not familiar with any Darkman comics, or had had any other contact with the character apart from this movie so I cannot compare the character to other sources. Therefore, coming from someone that did not "know" Darkman prior to the film I have to say that the movie was quite a disappointment!There are the obvious comic book characteristics that one finds in these types of movies, like the Shadow, Batman etc, which is interesting.Nevertheless, Darkman was quite a disappointment considering the make-up of the cast: Liam Neeson, Larry Drake, and Frances McDormand among others.  It is the story of a scientist who falls victim to a group of gangsters resulting in his horrendous disfigurement.  In an effort to exact revenge, he makes use of his latest invention in order to appear like his targets/victims....In short, the acting and the plot are average (nothing great), while the dialogues are way below average.  The movie falls into the action/adventure/horror type of category.The characters are, overall, bland and just plain uninteresting (e.g. Rick Anderson played by the "fool," Ted Raimi, from the Xena series).Though the potential for a good movie was definitely there it fails to take off.  A shame really...In a nutshell, it's not a movie you would want to add to your collection, but it might provide for an evening's entertainment, and that's about it.No masterpiece here... 2 Stars
"Who would want to kill the sweetest ****** woman in the world?". I knew I was in trouble with FOUR BROTHERS when I saw that Josh Howard (of SPORTS NIGHT fame) was scowling hard, trying to be a tough Detroit cop. Not believable for a nanosecond. And then it got worse when Marky Mark said, "Why don't you two cops get some doughnuts and coffee?"The rest of the film veers along in that kind of lame and clichd rhythm. Almost every scene in this thing is a howler. And watching it, I remembered I hadn't forgiven Tyrese Gibson for the travesty that was 2 FAST 2 FURIOUS. Still, Tyrese is better than Garrett Hedlund, who looks like he's a refugee from THE OUTSIDERS.But the movie's not a total wash; after all, it's got a GREAT soundtrack
MODERATELY SLY PREMISE BUT PRECIOUS LITTLE TO BEHOLD HERE. If mind-bending thrillers like Basic Instinct prove anything, the theme of an expert becoming obsessed with his cryptic subject presents a great deal of potential. This film attempts a similar tapestry. Our protagonist (Ewan McGregor) finds himself progressively involved in eavesdropping a disturbing femme fatale across the street (Ashley Judd) who's in the blackwidow-spider type habit of zapping all males she beds. Problem is, nothing much happens of this premise. We never find ourselves feeling for the agent or his liege. No romantic overtures with dangerous undertones. No edge of the seat interactions ala Sharon Stone films of the early 90s. Instead, there's a queer apparition of the agent's daughter that punctuates every second scene and adds to the pile of threads that end up nowhere. Such constant failure to take advantage of its almost-intriguing buildups gets the film my generous 1-star rating, anyone but McGregor's biographer needn't bother
Beware of Unbox!!!. Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for
not as good as it sounds!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!. i was really looking foward to watching this one as i have seen the box and looked at the reviews here,so i was upset when i watched this sad movie. gary graham(t.v.'s alien nation) is a robot jox,which means he pilots a large voltron like machine which are used as fighting weapons in a future where war is no longer fought! the f/x are not very good and the story is paper thin,only the acting is good,but it can't save this one from being just a let down. skip it
It was whack!. I had to watch this movie in school today. Very boring from beginnig to end. Don't watch
Warning Incomplete Episode!!!. The episodes in this series have an average running time of 50 minutes. This one happens to be only 18 minutes. This mean sthat the file abruptly stops right in the middle. Even though it only cost me $2 I still got jipped.  Let's hope Amazon can iron out these kinds of problems before they get this service farther underway. Be careful enough to sheck the running times to be sure they seem accurate before you buy them
Worthless, Except for Tarantino's Cameo. "Sleep with Me" would be completely worthless if not for a Quentin Tarantino cameo in which he riffs on the homosexual undertones of "Top Gun."  That lasts about two minutes.  The remainder of the film is just dull relationship philosophy spouted by pretentious, ersatz neo-Bohemian characters. Except for Tarantino's "Top Gun" bit (and the twenty seconds or so when Parker Posey has her shirt off) there's nothing worthwhile here
most boring movie i have ever seen...... i finally decided to purchase this movie considering i was told by one person it was symbolic and by another it was truely disgusting.  however i found it to be very slow and boring which made want to go to sleep, making it difficult for me to actually catch any of this great symbolism i heard about.  as far as the digusting goes....i didn't find it that disgusting compared to some movies i have seen.  it isn't very explicit in the violence so there is not any gore to it and they aren't very innovative with the torture compared to some movies i have seen. the movie consists of alot of monotonous sodomy and an old lady telling stories of her sexual exploits while her friend plays the piano (these parts were rather torturous to sit through because they were the most boring in the film and she told quite a few stories).  if you want to see something shocking i would not look here and if you are looking for symbolism i wouldn't look here because it is difficult to stay awake unless you like watching a bunch of naked people walking around groping one another
Beware of Unbox!!!. Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for
A classic celebration of war. One of the first genres moviemakers turn to, when wanting to stir up a little historical or emotional reflection, is war.  Films about war make up some of the oldest in the history of the media, many of them about battles that never took place.  But throw in a dash of historical accuracy here and there (and at the producers' discretion) and you have a recipe for "classic" status.Exhibit A: "Zulu."  Nevermind that this is the retelling of a senseless battle fought in the name of British colonial expansion, in which countless men died, Brits and Africans alike.  Who cares that the Zulu empire was as oppressive and unforgiving as any tribe on the continent.  Forget that the ultimate outcome - "victory" at Ulundi - resulted in British control of Zululand and naturally, a barbarous system of apartheid for the next 100+ years.  (As one reviewer pointed out, the Africans who played extra roles in the 1964 film weren't even able to go see the movie under the current policies of apartheid.)  Nevermind all that.  Tally ho, mates!This is war, and war is classic.  Gather round and hear a tale of glory, courage and heroism... again.  Sure, the heroes in question are fighting in the name of racism and greed, but fighting bravely nonetheless.  And to counter any suggestion that the filmmakers condescend to the adversary, the Zulus are presented as equally brave.  Yes, bravery abounds.  After all, what better match for the white man's unflinching imperative than another power-hungry, merciless (but brave) army: that of the Zulus.Make no mistake, this war story is told from the perspective of the white minority in Southern Africa; there are no significant individual characters on the African side.  And looking at things from that angle, one would have to spin the British effort in a somewhat positive light, or never sleep another night.  But to pretend that it is accurate or just to arbitrarily assign themes like "glory" and "patriotism" to what adds up to brutal militarism, is to deceive one's self utterly.  If anyone can tell me how the effort to defend British fortifications in South Africa in 1879 has made Africa (or the world) a better place, I will gladly take it all back.In the meantime, filmmakers will continue to rouse passionate armchair patriotism, recalling the brave men who sacrificed their lives for the greater good, whatever that might have been.  Unfortunately, it is the public willingness to accept these tales as accurate, these missions as noble, and these surges of testosterone as plenty justification, that many more men and women will be needlessly sacrificed for years to come."Zulu" is indeed a classic war movie.  But ask yourself: is that always a good thing
The Return of Halloween? Sorry, look elsewhere... I remember when I was in fifth grade, I snuck downstairs late at night to sneak a peek at the original Halloween when it was on HBO. I was mesmerized and scared to death at the same time. "The Shape," aka Michael Myers, was a chilling and oddly fascinating character. The sight of his shadow on the side of a building sent shivers up my spine.I remember a scene that showed his silhouette against a house for a few seconds and the camera cut away as someone caught a glimpse of him. When the camera returned, he was gone. Little things like that scared me more than what little blood there was. Halloween sparked a number of imitators that added buckets of blood, but none of them had those little scary touches like the scene of "The Shape" against the wall.So when Halloween: H20 was announced, I was at once a little skeptical but excited. Jamie Lee Curtis would reprise her role as Laurie Strode, the survivor of the first and second Halloween movies. H20 would be ignoring those sequels from 1982 to 1996, that had basically turned the storyline into another slasher epic, with the addition of psychic powers, strange secondary characters and a complete loss of focus on the true nature of what had made the original so powerful. With a lot to live up to, Halloween: H20 had the potential to disappoint as easily as it could return the series to greatness.Unfortunately, the movie does not live up to the original. It barely matches up to 1981's unnecessary Halloween II. It tries very hard to be better than those other, now ignored, sequels, but it doesn't quite make it.It's now 1998 and Laurie Strode has moved to Northern California to take a job as the head of a private school. She has a 17-year old son named John (Josh Harnett), who attends the school. Laurie and John have been battling the demons inside Laurie's head in different ways. Laurie copes through alcohol and John tries to keep her straight. It's beginning to take a huge toll on both of them, and something's got to give. A visit from Michael Myers, however, is not quite what they need -- but it's what they get.I'll leave what little plot is left to the movie. If you decide to see it, you won't need to take notes to keep anything straight. It's as simple as slasher movie plots get, with plenty of false scares and predictable dialogue. The movie tries hard to be unique, even including appearances from L.L. Cool J, Adam Arkin and Janet Leigh (Jamie Lee Curtis' real life mom and Psycho star.)However, director Steve Miner, who directed Friday the 13th Part II and Friday the 13th Part III, attempts to pay homage to the original by aping some of its best scenes. Only one, involving a closet, pays off. The rest are so blatantly lifted from the 1978 original, it gives the movie a by-the-numbers appearance, as if Miner expected to regain the greatest of the original by taking the best scenes from it. That's like attempting to retain a painting's originality by simply taking a picture of it. It may look good from far away, but up close it's going to be missing more than a few key elements.If nothing else, Halloween H20 serves as an adequate final chapter in the splintered timeline of the Halloween series. That's about it.
Poor support. This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet
Didn't work. I downloaded the player and this episode as part of a promotion that gave a free episode. Not only did I get charged, but when I cancelled the download to contact about the charge - I was told I had to finish downloading before they could refund. Once it finished downloading, it didn't play anyway. I gave up.
Strange Movie.... Very bizzare movie! Not for kids or anyone who is prudish!Can be an erotic movie if you choose to see through the bizzare nature of it
Bad Device. I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service
Tedium. Notwithstanding the fact that the acing in the movie is actually quite good, the screenplay is so tedious I actually fell asleep in the middle of the afternoon while watching it. A good cure for insomnia
Mortal Kombat: Annihilated. Such a sad sequel to the best video game movie. Mortal Kombat: Anilhilation was anihilated the day it was made. The story was poorly done. I didn't like how the characters act in this film. Jax {Williams} acts like a afician-american stereotype. Sonya {Hess} acts like a weak little bitch. Sindel {Vander} acts like one of those pathetic villianess you see in those direct-to-video films that have dumb villianess. And Brian Thompson should be a shame of himself, such a good character actor playing a pethetic Shao Khan.One thing that sucks in this film is that Radien {Remar} and Shao Kahn are brothers and Shinnok {Schore} is their father. What a pathetic change to add in this film. Raiden and Kahn are far from family and Shinnok and Kahn don't even like each other...and they're not father and son in the game.This film cost $30 million, yet the special effects in this film look so cartoony. In fact, I've seen Playstation One graphics look better than that.This film is really bland, and John R. Leonetti directing style sucks.If you wanna watch a sequel to Mortal Kombat, just watch yourself playing Mortal Kombat 2 on Midway's Arcade Greatest Hits 2 on Playstation 2 and XBOX
WARNING: Wrong Episode!. This item is supposedly titled "UFOs: The First Encounters." It is, however, an episode about reincarnation. It is incorrectly labeled. DO NOT PURCHASE unless you are looking for an episode on reincarnation
Wonderful program, but flawed files... Okay, so to catch up on this exciting new series, I decided to try this revolutionary downloading program - Amazon Unbox!  I selected the first 10 episodes and hit Purchase.  Minutes later, I was watching the first episode, it came quickly, sounded great, and looked wonderful... however the second one was missing a few minutes at the end.  Forgiveable, until... whole episodes starting arriving incomplete or had missing video, making it incredibly frustrating and disappointing.But, this IS a good concept... unfortunately, Amazon has yet to verify all their own files for both audio and picture quality!  So, until the issue is fixed and paying customers recieve completed files or refunds... DO NOT try and download Season 1, Episodes 2, 4, 5, 6, and 7!!!  1, 3, 8, 9, and 10 were the only ones that were 100% complete for me
The Ultimate @ss Wipe. Give me a break. This is the hokiest plot I have ever seen, read or dreamed of. The Ultimate Attraction is in reality the ultimate ca-ca. Example: The story starts out where a guy locked in an airplane restroom flushes a device which looks like a combination of a TV remote control and a pocket cassette recorder down the toilet, where it is discharged outside the airplane and falls through the roof of a health club and lands on a stack of towels, next to and in a closet, where a gorgeous babe (Gabriella Hall) and some numb nut guy are fornicating. Does anybody hear the device crashing through the roof? No!  Do the amorous couple notice it dropping onto the shelf next to them or notice there is now a hole in the roof? No!Lo and behold, the lovers eventually notice the object from the sky and start fooling around with it. You know, turning dials and aiming it and guess what it makes a gal on one of the exercise machines get stimulated and have an orgasm.I should mention that the Health Club is in default with the bank and unless thirty thousand buckeroos are raised within the next three weeks it will be foreclosed upon and so these employees decide they can use this little machine to increase membership, raise the thirty thousand for their boss and save the club and of course, their sexual rendezvous location.Their plan seems to be working, a little stimulation here and there and everybody is really digging it but then something goes wrong and pretty soon the clientele is going at it like rabbits in heat. Clothes are slung around everywhere and everybody is engaged and in some state of undress.If this movie is so bad, why did I give it two stars? Well I never said the movie was terrible, just the story. Nobody really expects the stories for soft porn movies to very good and this story was one of the worst but on the flip side for a movie showing attractive people in various states of undress, depicting gratuitous sex, which is what most soft core movies are like, this movie wasn't bad. I guess it depends on what you're looking for and if you're looking a profound story in a sensual soft core movie, you're in the wrong genre. Ultimate Attraction was a soft porn movie with an abominable plot, that was otherwise typical of the genre. I didn't pay much attention to the guys (except for the geek that was with Gabriella Hall) but the girls were great looking with nice bodies, especially Gabriella Hall, Jacqueline Lovett and Jennifer Burton.If you are looking for a good movie in the so called light erotic/comedic vein, there are better movies around but if you just want to see some good looking guys and gals in the altogether, it delivers. Final Rating 2.2 stars
mumbles strikes again. Segall mumbles alot in this flick. Movie is disjointed and makes no sense. Characters are introduced that have no connection to the story. Segall stunt double is pretty good
If I could give this movie less than 1 star I would. This movie is the worst piece of clap trap that I have ever seen.  Built in the mold of the Rambo series, the film tries to play off of the West's fear of the Soviet Union.  You'd be better of watching a &quot;How to pour milk&quot; instructional video, than watch this film that will make you less smart
Star Trek:  City on the Edge of Forever. My favorite show of the Trek series but there's no way I'd buy another individual program from Amazon.  It will ONLY play on their downloaded player ...won't burn to DVD so can't play it on my television.  Don't bother buying this ...just go for the Trek collection on DVD
Forgive me lord, I have blasphemized. So, a bunch of mafia gangsters come over and shoot each other up, then they go out west and shoot each other up there, including one particular scene in which a bunch of people all get shot up together as part of a sort of montage. Woo hoo. How brilliant. I'll never forget this movie. NOT.
Lost Souls. "THE RULES OF ATTRACTION"Lost SoulsAmos Lassen and Cinema PrideThe Rules of Attraction" is a twisted story about sex, drugs, and college life. Three students at Camden College are involved in a love triangle. Sean Bateman, a womanizing drug dealer is love with Lauren, a virgin but who is more infatuated with her ex-boyfriend. Then there is Paul who is bisexual and used to date Lauren before he came out. Paul,However, is interested in Sean who he thinks is bisexual. Throw in a bunch of other characters and you have a mess. In fact everyone in this money is suffering from some kind of problem and each is only looking out for him or herself. We can tell right away that no good can come from these people and we are told so right in the beginning as the first scene of the movie is the end of the story and the rest of the movie tells us how we got to that point. In fact, a more apt name for this movie would be "Les Miserables" as that is what everyone turns out to be.In reality the film is a satire of those crazy teen movies like "American Pie" and "There's Something About Mary". If we look at the movie like this, it is ingenious. If, on the other hand, we look at it as just a movie, it bombs.The characters are not the kind of people that you would want to call friends but that does not mean they are not interesting. The problem with them is that we all know someone like them and they are realistic. Without the acting, this film does not move and the cast manages to succeed at that. For a young cast, the acting is good, better than what I had expected. His direction, however, is highly stylized and the tricks that Roger Avary employs just do not always work but by and large when I consider what he had to work with, his job is admirable.I think a lot of people were expecting a fluff movie with a young cast and what they got is a dark and realistic movie. It destroys some of the myths about drugs and college life and because of this, the movie has been deemed offensive by many. The treason for the offense is that many cannot understand that there are really this shallow who have no feeling.There seems to be no narrative focus, no beginning and no end and the focus is on a group of selfish ambiguous characters who traffic in rape, drugs, and homosexuality and general obsessions. We don't see smiling happy college kids. Rather we are given kids who have problems and they aren't pretty problems either. The characters are lost souls, pathetic people that we do not want to emulate. There is no resolution, there is no love.Everything seems to be overdone and excessive. The first time I watched the film I thought that my distrust in humanity had been validated and that perhaps I should consider becoming a loner. The characters are vile and horrible and not much more than amalgams of the worst that society has to offer. The only character that elicits sympathy dies right way. The satire on wasted youth never quite reaches its conclusion and comes off more as sour grapes.On the other hand, the movie can be classified as brilliant. It was true to the novel from which it was adapted and resented real characters even if we d not want to admit that people like this really exist. We are not supposed to like these people because they are too much into not being attached to anyone or to themselves. On first viewing I found the whole movie to be an appalling mess. On second viewing I eased up a bit and by the third viewing I was really into it. But then if it takes three viewings to appreciate a movie. I wonder if it is worth the effort. It is a challenging film. When sex means no more than a handshake, you want to question our value system. Likewise I am still questioning "The Rules of Attraction". Maybe one day I will shout its praises. Right now I am not in the mood for a fourth viewing.
The most stupidest horror movie of all. THIS MOVIE IS GOD AWFUL. I MEAN POOR RENE ZELLWEGGER. BEING CAST IN THIS MOVIE. WHAT DID SHE TURN DOWN IF THIS IS WHAT SHE PICKED. DON'T GET THIS MOVIE SEE IT ON TV. DON'T EVEN RENT IT. DON'T GET IT PLEASE. I'M SAVING YOU 12 BUCKS
Dissapointing. This DVD is a complete rip off, the performance is more focussed on Bonos sunglasses, with a camera in his sun glasses of all things, keep it simple and exciting, that means proper editing. Its oviuous this editor should'nt be editing any shows what so ever and needs lessons as to how to tell a story to an audience. We are not at the show, so stop trying to create an atmosphere, of swishing shots, because the atmosphere for the viewers is the flaming living room, and your job is to bring something into the room, not try and pull you in, with disasterous effects - what? A great big switch of OFF on the remote and a $13 dollar cash in at the second hand store. Thnak you very much - for Nothing
The Russians are Coming. Your service was excellant. The movie we ordered for a relative who could not find it. Why ; I have no idea as I did not care for the movie when it was new. We will be ordering other items from you in the future and are very satisfied with your availabilty of movies etc
Awful film barely saved by a couple of decent acting performances. The Next Generation is basically a remake of the original Texas Chainsaw Massacre, in fact up to an hour into the film the plot is practically identical, though different characters and locations are used.  The original was a little overrated in my opinion and this "remake" is quite frankly terrible.  Bad acting with the exception of Renee Zellweger and Matthew McConaughy who do their best with a terrible script and several B movie actors.  The only major differences from the original are that Leatherface now dresses as a woman, which was fairly amusing but hardly essential, and a tacked on conspiracy theory.The conspiracy theory of a secret society only surfaces in the last half hour and is absolutely ridiculous, I won't explain it, theres no point, watch it yourself if you want to know how stupidly the film ends.  I would sooner suggest avoiding this film completely though, even die hards admit its awful, I only gave it 2 stars because I reserve 1 star for the very worst of the worst (yes even worse than this!)
ehhh, so-so. it's a so-so film with Rourke in the IRA. Some good stuff. Look for Anthony(Stewart Head) as Rupert(note: Anthony Stewart Head portraits another Rupert...Rupert Giles on the TV show Buffy The Vampire Slayer)so, now you know. but this one is so-so like I sai
This is a comedy?. Seriously, I didn't even think that this was a comedy until I came here and saw people saying "it wasn't funny."  I got it as part of a boxed set of Cary Grant films (purchased here), and it's the only dud of the lot.There was one scene that, I will grant you, was light and entertaining.  Not laugh out loud, but funny enough (I won't spoil it by saying which one).  Aside from that, the film struck me as a rather unbelievable farce about infidelity.Most of all, you could almost feel the very talented cast trying to keep this elephant airborne.  Grant and Simmons, in particular, are strong - but their efforts are ultimately squandered.  Bob Mitchum is OK, but generally miscast, and Kerr's beauty and talent are basically wasted.  No amount of acting would allow you to believe that anyone could act as impetuously and stupidly as she does here.  She goes from happily married to tramp in about 5 minutes, for no discernible reason.Overall acting: C (Grant/Simmons: B)Directing: FWriting: D-I understand that this film caters more to English tastes, and that's fine, but I found it most un-satisfying
Warning Incomplete Episode!!!. The episodes in this series have an average running time of 50 minutes. This one happens to be only 18 minutes. This mean sthat the file abruptly stops right in the middle. Even though it only cost me $2 I still got jipped.  Let's hope Amazon can iron out these kinds of problems before they get this service farther underway. Be careful enough to sheck the running times to be sure they seem accurate before you buy them
ugh. This is an extremely dry anime.  The manga version by Masamune Shirow is filled with bits of humor.  Not so for the anime.  The character Batou was especially funny in the manga, but, for reasons unknown, he is the driest character in the already humorless anime version.Expect long scenes filled with monotonous talking.  These really make the movie crawl.  One minute there's action, next you're listening to Matoko or Batou go on and on about existentialism.  Seriously, these little talks, take up 3/4 of the movie.The visuals are awesome, no question about that.  Even so, they do not fulfill the need for SOME kind of thread of a story.  Altogether, not much actually, HAPPENS during the movie.If you must see it, rent it first to be sure you want it
A very long political attack ad. I was trying to think of the best short description of what this is. Sure it's a propaganda film but that doesn't mean much to most people. However, most people have seen attack ads around election time. That's what this is, a very long political attack ad, full of all the things we commonly see in such ads: distortions, sarcasm, scary close ups, mood music, mocking tone, glaring omissions, out of context quotes, etc.That said, the most rewarding review so far must be the one by AT "DL" (New York), who basically condemns Michael Moore as pro-Bush because Fahrenheit 9/11 doesn't say Bush engineered 9/11 himself. What's next? A review that condemns AT "DL" (New York) as pro-Bush because his review didn't say that Bush flew the planes himself? Or that Bush is an alien who gave birth to Saddam and Osama on a UFO?Just when you think you've seen the craziest conspiracy theory ..
Beware of Unbox!!!. Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for
ZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZ. Me and a female friend went and watched this one in the theater. I ... was ... bored ... out ... of ... my ... skull. After about a half hour my friend, who tends to be more "progressive" than I, actually suggested we leave. It was the first time either of us have ever left while the movie was playing. Ever!Perhaps I'm biased. However I highly recommend that no one get this movie. The only reason I can think that anyone would give it a good rating is because of its political slant. I tend to lean to the right, but even I was entertained by V For Vendetta, despite it being blatant liberal propaganda. If you are going to pontificate about how we conservatives are evil, at least make it interesting
Thirty Frames Per Second: The Visionary Art of the Music Video. Not exactly what I was thinking. The title is misleading, the text is unreadable. The idea is good but who care to see picture of actual video. It would have be nice to have video made of this book. Waste of time try to read it
The Story of Jane. The title character does not get much screen time in this film.  He doesn't even get any lines (most of his yells are done so that you can't see his mouth).  This is really the story of Jane.Jane has decided to go to Africa to search for her father who left her and her mother many years before.  On the way she must defend her virtue, kill the crew of the boat she hired, and pilot the boat to her father.  There she finds a man who seems to have had his brains baked in the sun a little too long.Eventually they all go off to search an escarpment to find the elephant's graveyard.  Once on top they find the giant inland sea and a bizarre tribe living near the graveyard (we only see one dead elephant so at the time I did not know the "graveyard" had been found).  They also run into Tarzan who has the habit of not speaking and passing out whenever he exerts himself.I really got the feeling that the only thing any of the film's creators knew about Tarzan was what they had learned from Johnny Weissmuller films.  The escarpment seems to be about half the continent.  It is nearly impossible to climb so I don't know how dying elephants manage to get up it.  Jane's experiences with the bizarre tribe (where she gets painted white) seem to have been lifted from Ursula Andress's film Slave Of The Cannibal God.There is very little that is right with this film (other than that it does finally end).  Jane goes from super-able to a frightened schoolgirl but eventually falls for Tarzan and reconciles with her father.  But in the end it is not really worth watching.  For viewers who are hoping to see Bo Derek nude, almost all of that is found during the closing credits so you might as well just skip right to them.
Survivor Rip Off. I have bought 2 seasons of Survivor on unbox and both of them are not complete. Very dissapointing. Guatemala  episode 11 is from a completely different season and it is missing the last 2 episodes and the reunion show. Just leaves you hanging. Exile Island is missing the final episode it just goes from the competition between Danielle and Cirie for a spot in the final 3 to the live reunion show
AMAZON SUCKS. I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!
Dont get "Fiji" final week ... Dont dwnld " Survivor, "Thunderstorms & Sacrifice" ". Its my fault for not reading the whole thing. you would think that the last episode would be the finale , but NO, its just a 10 minute recap going to the finale 4. I didnt even get a full 45 minute episode. No finale. I got rippped off. $1.99 dwnld not well spent. Dont bother dwnldng any episode of fiji if you dont know the ending. Because they dont have that episode, not even the reunion show
Broadway's Lost Treasures. I can't write a review because I had to send both CD's back because they would not play.  I just ordered another one yesterday, and here's hoping that will be okay
No Point & Very Blank. As I recall, 1967 was not the most prolific year for movies and Point Blank,in my opinion, would be one of the worst films I have ever watched.  Notwithstanding the very violent nature of the film, the acting by such notables as Lee Marvin, Carroll O'Conner and Angie Dickinson continually appear to search for conviction with their dis-jointed and nonsensical dialogue.Flashbacks, San Quentin, the San Francisco skyline cannot save this film from the trash heap of celluloid history. If your a Lee Marvin fan, better to watch "The man who shot Libery Valance" twice, than waste your time on Point Blank. Your disposition will be better for it
2 1/2 stars - I'm sure it was more exciting in the early 70's. I guess I missed the point. I can see how this film could be considered a horror "classic". I'm sure the violence was ground breaking in 1972... in fact, one of the comments in the "making of" on this dvd was that teenagers were actually throwing up in the theatres. I don't think it's a well done film overall... it's lacking in story, music, direction, and suspense. The acting is not too bad, but could have been more intense and believable in some scenes. If I was craving some good 1970's horror, I'd rather watch "I Spit on Your Grave" or "The Texas Chainsaw Massacre"
not a horror movie(except for the fact it is a horror to watch). sstephen king can blame no one but himself for this missfire of a movie,because HE WROTE THIS JUNK! never finds it's feet, horror,comedy,drama,fantasy,adventure,and even thriller,it tries to be all and fails at each one!!! skip it!!
Recycled but nominally workable throwback. I can't really bring myself to either like or dislike this movie entirely.  Another entry in the "future troopers" genre, it uses science fiction to explore the notion of a fierce, unstoppable, but ultimately disposable form of combat soldier.  Examples of this notion have ranged from the excellent (Blade Runner, Robocop and the Terminator) to the awful (Universal Soldiers).  This one's okay.On first viewing, it reminds me of a larger-budget version of Enemy Mine, in which we get barely a glimpse of a war-torn future before the hero is dumped on a barely habitable planet, struggles for survival, and ends up in your basic action climax.  Like Dennis Quaid and Louis Gossett, Jr. in that movie, Kurt Russell gives a performance better than his material deserves -- which isn't saying much, since a lot of Soldier plays like it was written for Stallone at the height of his Rambo misanthropy.The cast is generally good, particularly Russell's finely understated performance -- his character's lifelong conditioning has made him incapable of expressing emotion, or even speaking conversationally (he robotically addresses everyone but the enemy as "sir"), yet he conveys enough in his body language to make more of his role than one might expect.Another reviewer called this a sequel to Blade Runner and compared Russell's Sgt. Todd to BR's Deckard.  Without arguing too much, I'd modify that by saying it's more of a Blade Runner prequel (thematically, if not literally).  It's essentially the backstory of Blade Runner's Roy Batty, an enhanced combat soldier bred for offworld service but never regarded as truly human, who rebels against his shortsighted human masters and leads his followers to a prospective home on another world.  Of course, Todd's stoic efficiency bears little resemblance to Batty's charismatic dark angel persona, but they're flipsides of the same coin.  (The fact that both films were written by the same screenwriter becomes clear long before the credits roll -- listen for the "Tanhauser Gate" reference.)Soldier isn't a great movie by any stretch.  If anything, it has the feel of a script written back in the 80's that had gathered dust on a shelf until someone felt like filming it.  Take it on that level, and it's watchable.  Not great, but good enough to pass a little time
Did not work. The ones that are posted twice do not work. If they are posted once, you can try to download it, but it might not work. The video only worked for about a minute. Shame, since I really like this show and I wanted Amazon Unbox to be cool. The one cent CSI works, go download tha
Dont get "Fiji" final week ... Dont dwnld " Survivor, "Thunderstorms & Sacrifice" ". Its my fault for not reading the whole thing. you would think that the last episode would be the finale , but NO, its just a 10 minute recap going to the finale 4. I didnt even get a full 45 minute episode. No finale. I got rippped off. $1.99 dwnld not well spent. Dont bother dwnldng any episode of fiji if you dont know the ending. Because they dont have that episode, not even the reunion show
Okay for 30 years ago, maybe. This movie is laughable today. It's very dated, and it shows. It's not worth your time. The acting is so-so, but felt forced (like William Shatner style). The storyline is okay. By today's standards, it appears like a low budget flick
&quot;Turbulence 3: Heavy Metal&quot;. This is one of the worst films ever made! And I mean it!! One of the worst scripts I have ever come across. The acting is hammy and the direction is very weak! There was no reason for this movie to exist! &quot;Turbulence&quot; was a good movie and they should of stopped at that but two sequels! No way! If you like the 1st mabye try &quot;Turbulence 2: Fear of Flying&quot; but stay away of the 3rd. This is one terrible movie! Believe ME!
Classic Film But Terrible Video Transfer. This is a wonderful film. Some may say it's a bit slow paced and perhaps it's not geared for the MTV generation's pace of visual stimulation. Nonetheless, patience has it's rewards for anyone who cares to take a  chance. It appears that every last detail in this film was molded by the  director, Tati. Unfortunately, the video transfer on this edition is so  terribly soft, as though the telecine was not in focus. It's a crime that  such a great film could not have been treated with greater care. One only  hopes that a DVD transfer of superior quality is in the pipes
Columbia Wimps Out. Too bad Republic didn't make this serial because over there they at least had Commando Cody and Captain Marvel up in the skies. Instead we get some fake animation everytime our boy in blue jumps. I'm sure that some think it's cute but I felt cheated. I give them 2 stars for trying though
So awful I turned it off. I saw this film on TV several years ago, and started watching it because William Hurt is one of my favorite actors.  I got as far as the monkey man scene and turned it off, it was so ridiculous and just plain bad.  I can probably count on one hand the number of movies I have not watched all the way through (I even suffer through the bad and boring ones).  I couldn't take another minute of this one, however
Poor support. This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet
What's up with that?. I wish I had read the other reviews first.  Though the quality of the episode and the video are top notch, the episode cuts off after 22 minutes.  Obviously, I already know the ending of "The Black Death", but I still wanted to see the full show
Beware of Unbox!!!. Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for
bad baby, bad!. Okay, it's not high art but this film has something to say all be it in a round about fashion.  It does make the viewer wonder about modern medicine and how it can possibly affect those who take it on a regular basis.  On the other hand, the film lacks true suspense.  I was hoping for an explosive opening scene when the baby is first born and instead was offered a yawn.  The baby itself is about as scary as fozzy bear and while there is some blood flow it is kept to a minimum.  The pacing is too slow at times and it just doesn't stand up that well today.  The actors who took part in this didn't go anywhere say for the father who went on to appear in the sequel.  Why there was a sequel is beyond me.  I recall how frightening the commercial was for this film when it first came out but I was only five at the time.  At the most this is a rent not a buy.  I guess good for it's time but perhaps a re-make would pump some needed life into the story.
Stupid. To put it succinctly, Brendan Fraser is a college senior who ends up writing a ridiculously long thesis, which is then swiped by Joe Pesci, the homeless dude who, predictably, is really quite wise.  The problem is that his "wise" sayings aren't really too wise; he's like the guy you know who is always trying to sound intelligent, but doesn't really know that much. Joe Pesci's character is pretty annoying.  That's probably why he ended up friends with Brendan Fraser's character
So-so. Though this is by no means Argento's worst film (his Phantom of the Opera was pure rubbish), this film is also not among his best, and was a disappointment even to Argento (he considered the production of this film cursed--in a way himself buying into the superstition which was part of the plot of the film).  For the Argento fan this film is quite enjoyable in a piecemeal sort of way, but it simply does not work as a whole.  The plot is fraught with enormous gaps in logic.  The scene when characters in the film rely on the memory of birds to identify the killer among opera audience members is utterly absurd, and the end monologue in which the herione announces that she doesn't need other people and has a lot in common with insects is absolutely random, nonsensical, and has absolutely nothing to do with what preceded it in the film.  Such scenes aside, what hurts this film the most is its absolutely corny heavy metal soundtrack, which has a very negative overall impact on the mood and atmosphere established by the film.  This said, the notorious "peephole scene" is one of Argento's most brilliant and effective sequences in any of his films, and this movie is well worth viewing for this scene alone
Kentucky Fried Movie. I remember this movie back in the 70's as being much, much funnier. I bought it. I saw it and I will never watch it again. It is in the give away pil
The Constant Gardener. I'm starting to appreciate John LeCarre novels more than I did when he was all over the bestseller list. This film version of one was acted well, but in 30 minutes there just wasn't anything to engage my interest. Not its characters and not its plot. A good cause worth building a story around, but not this story. I quit watching, so I guess I could be wrong, but I doubt it.
AMAZON SUCKS. I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!
These Were Real People, People. I waited over 30 years to see this film, and now that I have -- I'm glad I waited that long.  Its glaring defects might not have been so obvious to me 30 years ago.Nicholas, Alexandra, their daughters, their son, the people surrounding them -- not only are they not fictional, but thanks to the era in which they lived, they were photographed, we know what they actually looked like.  So who on earth did the casting?!  It was impossible to tell one Grand Duchess from another, and as for Alexandra -- in the first few scenes, I had trouble distinguishing the actress from someone in drag.  Janet Suzman was the worst casting flub of all, unless you count the stilted manner in which Michael Jayston delivered his lines.  What a stiff and boring character he makes Nicholas to be.  Yet there are photos extant of Nicholas smiling as he played with his children.  Nicholas was also portrayed as obsessed with holding on to his power as Tsar.  But in the Robert Massie book after which the movie was purportedly modeled, it was very clear that Nicholas was acutely aware of his responsibilities to the Russian people, as well as to his family, and above all his son, the future Tsar.  There was nothing exceptional about his behavior; most of Europe at the time was ruled by kings and queens, and to all of them, the thought of losing their thrones was simply unthinkable.Yet this film falls into the trap most of us do, of judging history not on the basis of its own terms, but with our usual spectacularly accurate 20/20 hindsight.  Having been fed Soviet propaganda for 75 years, we have it entrenched in our minds that Nicholas was an extremely poor ruler.  That's the stunning success of the Massie book, that someone who had absolutely no connection to Russians, and no connection to royalty save for the one coincidence of both their sons having hemophilia, was able to overcome the general (and erroneous) "knowledge" of his time and write the kind of sympathetic biography of this family that was long lacking.  The movie, on the other hand, makes Nicholas look petty, and Alexandra slightly over the edge.One petty anachronism was the scene that showed the royal family praying just prior to Nicholas's sending off his troops into World War I.  It was badly researched, to the point of ludicrousness.  The Tsars of Russia were all Orthodox Christians.  Orthodox Christianity has its own very distinctive music; in fact, Russian Orthodox chant is very different from Greek Orthodox chant.  So what kind of background music did the director choose?  Gregorian, of course!  Can we at least *strive* for a little authenticity?!Apparently not.  Massie wrote in considerable detail about the attitude of the Romanovs towards their captors, how their guards had to be changed every three or so months because they kept winning over the Bolsheviks:  "You aren't anything like what we thought," was the most frequently quoted comment on the subject.  The movie showed nothing of that.  Well -- in the end, it was this exact trait of graciousness and consideration towards their captors that ended up getting the Romanov family canonized in the Russian Orthodox Church.  That movement was well underway by 1971; I wonder, if the directors and producers had done a little more thorough research, if the film would have been a tad more sympathetic to these five people caught between two worlds and two cultures.All in all, purchasing the movie was a waste of money.  Maybe the Bolsheviks over at the University's Russian Department will appreciate my donating it -- that way, others can get to see it without wasting their money
My disc was defective too, and the movie wasn't worth it... I actually bought this DVD over a year ago but just decided to watch it.  I'm a huge fan of Sidney Lumet, and I like Richard Gere, Gene Hackman, and the other stars in the film.  About 30 mins. into the movie the picture started distorting, and after that it would skip large chunks of the movie.  There was nothing visibly wrong with the DVD itself.  But, I saw enough.  Even before I reached the defective part, it was like watching a foreign film without subtitles.  I had almost no clue what was going on, and didn't really care after a while.  I can usually watch almost anything, most movies have some redeeming quality - for example, maybe an exotic, interesting locale.  This is largely set in New Mexico.  No offense to New Mexicans, but skip this.  I threw it away
what is it?. You need to list which movies are in the collection! I might buy it if I knew. Same goes for all the other collections. Sorry! Cesc
Big name cast adds up to unfocussed dud. The worst movie of this genre. Incredible does describe this movie- incredibly bad! This movie doesn't know what it wants to be. At times one can see attempts to recreate and milk the genuine rage and drama of "Mississippi Burning" or the anger and impunity of "Ghosts of Mississippi", or a hybrid of those and bits and pieces of other movies of this genre. At other times it looks like its just trying to draw from the sex appeal and cheesy interaction of 2 of its main actors, Matthew McConaughey and Sandra Bullock. As a result this movie picks up the rear in that genre's list of movies for lack of originality, and the scattered hodge podge statements it tries to make. Some of my favorite actors are wasted, either by being given cliched dialogue, over acting, or being put there merely for their brand name with no script to support their presence. If this script is considered a great adaptation of a great book, then I have no interest in reading the book. I'm sure the idea and the premise looked good on paper. But the direction doesn't guide the story with any coherence or identity of its own.  Bullock is mere cheesecake and is unbelievable in her role, proving she's only worthy of b-grade "Miss Congeniality" type crud.  McConaughey over acts so much (as can be said for Keifer Sutherland and others) that it can be said he balances out the under acting of Patrick McGoohan, Kevin Spacey and Donald Sutherland. Samuel L. Jackson should be ashamed of himself of not only his worst performance ever, but also easily his worst choice of movies to participate in.  Even the extras in this movie are horrible. Enough can't be said about the terrible direction in this movie, equating elongated facial shots with drama to a fault, making Sergio Leone westerns look much more authentic by comparison. This is not "a powerful film." It's a powerful attempt at using a big name cast, a brand name book and a capable director to use material that they know would easily jerk the emotions of its audience, and in doing that they resort to all the cliches of this genre scattering the story line in so many directions, culminating in an over the top, pleading hunk of cheese summation scene by McConaughey that wouldn't hold water in any real court of justice. Maybe people claim greatness to this movie out of guilt, or because they haven't seen quality comparisons and classics like "Mississippis Burning," that has both a great script and fabulous acting. I don't know. All I know is it tugs from so many hokey directions it takes the final scene to remind everyone how it started. Among the top of my most over rated movies
The book is so much better!. I picked up the book at a yardsale without knowing much about it, and absolutely loved it! It is so smart, funny, and heartbreaking, without ever being sappy. So, naturally, I was curious about the movie too. I figured that because Ephron had written the screenplay too, not much could go wrong. And while the story line followed the book more or less, the movie turned out terrible. I could not have been more disappointed!! First of all, Jack Nicholson is completely miscast, because he essentially plays himself (as usual), not the *interesting* guy that Mark is supposed to be. He is the opposite of charming, funny, tender, lovable, i.e. somebody that the character of the wife (Rachel) would fall so deeply in love with and trust so completely. You suspect all along that he is a cad; therefore, Rachel's utter shock at his betrayal doesn't make sense. Besides, he is too old for the role! Meryl Streep is annoyingly twitchy, but much better in her role as Rachel. Still, she can't carry the movie alone, and her love scenes with Nicholson are flat; there is no spark there. I wonder how happy Ephron was with the movie adaptation of her novel, and whether she really did write all the scenes. The wedding scene, where Rachel has doubts about marying Mark and spends what feels like 5 hours in a room alone agonizing, while the wedding guests wait, is out of place, not to mention boring, not to mention heavy handed. A total dud
Attempts To Be Provokative, Turns Out Ultra-Violent Gore. The ideas behind 15 minutes aren't bad at all. Take one Robert DeNiro, put him in New York, mix him with some American-dream hunting Eastern Europeans on a killing spree, and try to provoke some emotions, and have a sly dig at the American justice system. Lets see...nothing happened...only repulse.If, like everyone else, you plan on watching this film because DeNiro is in it, you will be dissapointed. He puts in a tired performance, almost as if he knows the film is a load of B.S. The attempt to be hard-hitting goes horribly wrong, instead it's just repulsive over the top violence, and its pointless...naked prostitute gets hacked to pieces, why? There are ways to create provoking films with such violence but they have to have meaning, such as 8mm (the horrible subject of snuff movies, hard-hitting meaningfull film), 15 minutes is far from meaningfull. We all know there are some deranged psychopaths out there doing just that, but when converting it to a film, it needs a deeper meaning, otherwise it turns into melodramatic Hollywood [...].If you like brain-dead gore and violence, lack of plot and cringing melodrama. Go ahead
too bad Friday the 13th wasn't lucky for this movie. Let's understand two things about slasher horror from the 1980's: first of all, they had a legacy of saturating their own market, and secondly, they were simple stories born out of the twilight of an ever changing world.With this in mind, it would be easy to point out what is wrong with Jason Goes to Hell: The Final Friday- however for the sake of time, it might just as well be easier to point to what's right about it. The answer to that is: NOTHING! All you ever wanted to know about Jason is revealed, and once you know the dark secret, it will haunt you- except for a small matter of cosmetics, the "dark secret" is the same as the lemon revealed a short time earlier in New Line's bad "finale" to the Nightmare movies. Of course, the only nightmare about that film was having to admit that you paid to watch it- much the same with this piece of total garbage.Jason, it would seem, is not merely a specter capable of regeneration with a great rage at those who he feels are responsible for both his own and his mother's demise. Oh no, the dark secret is that if you can find someone who shares his father's blood line (cause lets face it, his mother was not born a Voorhees), then you can see Jason finally put to death, or you can see him re-born. Guess what happens here.Except the rebirth is anti-climatic because he is nothing more than the same twisted mass of flesh that he was before he was blown apart by bombs and bullets at the beginning of the movie. And apparently genetics has a preference for certain types of clothing, and a certain mask because he is reborn with both.In one laughable sequence, you would be forgiven for thinking "Jason" (or as I'd like to refer to him as...the Imposter) being reborn meant the world would end, however a mere 10 minutes or so after he was "reborn," he is also summarily killed again with an ancient dagger (who were the camp counselors who ignored Jason as he died...some ancient Sumarian or Egyptian people or something? What's with the dagger that must be used? Why does it look like an artifact?) supplied to his niece (oh, this is a long story, and is too tedious and boring to go through right now) who finds the Linda Hamilton in her to terminate the 'terminator.' You'll be in for your just desserts if you think this repulsive piece of junk is worth even five minutes of your time. Of course, there is plenty of blood and gore (as the Friday films always seem to have), and there is also plenty to gross you out- but if you think or feel anything towards the horror icon that made these films successful, you ought to take a pass on this one
garbology. Main Line, Main Line.... those Main Liners.... You like to look at those Main Liners, don't you Ginger... I mean Kitty?  You the suffragette who just got offa the suffragette wagon...  the same wagon that was seen rolling by in The Story of Vernon and Irene Castle... wait a minute... that was the exact same footage!  I guess the makers of this fine movie assembled it out of stock footage.  In fact Wynn, the MAIN LINER seems to be assembled out of stock footage of Bill Clinton.  Did you know allabout the MAIIINNNE LIIIIINNNEEE????  Seems the whole worl knows about the MAIIIIIIINNNNEEE LIIIIIIINNNNNNEEEEEEE "Philadelphia Aristocracy"  See, in Philadelphia, they're old skool, dig.  They even got a Queen of Pennsylvania, who sits on a throne and stuff.  Played by Margaret Dumont when she's not getting scandalized by Groucho Marx.  And I believe there is a duke and duchess of Bakersfield.  And just the other day I had tea and crumpets with the Viscount of Compton.  Of the Night Train...  I mean Wild I... I mean Yeah, he was drinking Ripple back when Redd Foxx was merely the Duke of Cornwall.  He was in line to the throne... or was that waiting for the mens room... See, over here in the States we take our aristocracy just as seriously as our Prussian counterparts.  We are always to be seen marching around with those spiky helmets on, saluting the statue of Kaiser Bill's moustache
Awful. Spend your money for some other DVD. If you're interested in watching this movie, just rent it
Bad Device. I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service
Not Bad, but Not Great either. Children of Men transports us to the year 2027 where the world has not experienced a new birth in 18 years due to mass human infertility.  As a result, people have lost hope and have turned violent.  Suddenly, a pregnant woman capable of producing life appears out of nowhere and the chase is on...In short, the acting is pretty good (but nothing wonderful), the plot is quite interesting, while the dialogues are average and sometimes below average.In a nutshell, it's probably not a movie you would want to add to your collection, but it might provide for an evening's entertainment, and that's about it; it lacks that extra something to put it over the top.  No masterpiece here.
Good basis. This film is an integral one in the study of film adaptation of Jane Austen's most popular novel, Pride and Prejudice.  It represents the beginning of a serious love affair between film and Austen novels; however, it is not great in terms of adaptation.  If you love Pride and Prejudice and have never seen this film, skip it.  It will only anger you.  If you're studying film adaptation of Austen novels, you MUST see this one as it has influenced everything that came afterwards.  AND--it's Laurence Olivier, afterall
I've been cheated by Amazon. It really sucks, tried to download but it's not able to be viewed in pc's outsided the united states. Crikey.I'll have to wait for reruns to watch it on the telly.Whatta shame amazon dot com. Let's send a CSI to yer headquarters
The Tommyknockers got ahold of this movie... ...and put their own little spin on it!Going to split this into 2 reviews, one based on it from the book, the other just based on the movie in general.  The book "The Tommyknockers" is set in the town of Haven, Maine, where strange thing's start to happen to the townspeople after Bobbie Anderson find's a large, mysterious object in the woods behind her farm.  Curious, she starts digging it up, and with each shovel full of removed dirt, open's up a terrifying and life-altering experience for all those involved.1)  The movie based on the Stephen King Novel:  2 starsI watched the movie after reading the book (my own personal rule) and though at time's felt like they were true to the book, was often left going "huh?" at the changes that were implemented.  Certain thing's are left out, while replaced by hollywood's cheap imagination.  The missing teeth as well as the batteries and inventions running off them never really hit home, and though the book had a multitude of characters who had important part's of the story, we see some simply vanish and never make it to the mini-series.  Perhaps the Tommyknockers got to them first! Since it was a miniseries and ran over 2 hours, there was no reason to chop and hack this thing up and replace it with alternate scenarios and a different ending.  I was disappointed to see how Hilly was found, as well as the fate of Gard and the ship, and Marge's ultimate destiny comes out differently as well.2)  The movie in general, without comparing it to the book: 3 starsMargie Helgenberger and Jimmy Smit's do a very good part cast as Bobbie and Gard.  The overall pace of the mini-series roll's along well, and the production and directing is okay.  The sound is good and set's the mysterious mood that the town of Haven is faced with.  Disappearing people, mysterious inventions run off batteries, and a mob like atmosphere are all displayed as we wait to see who the tommyknockers are, and what exactly they want with the townspeople of Haven.  An excellent cast overall considering the many various character's that had to be portrayed in the story
.. nice idea but... When I came across this movie two key words caught my attention...1 - vagina... 2 - director's cut...I love Gabriella Hall but this movie is kak...it is a nice idea but again not cleverly executed... lots of nudity but not that erotic...it looked too 'cut' for a directors cut... I did not enjoy the movie...the key words did not do the trick..
Missleading and Incorrect. This movie is entirely fictional and is NOT based on true events. First of all, the great 'Saviors' family was killed by muslims, and so he chooses to go killing some muslims in a completely different country. That in in itself shows that the director hates muslims and limits all muslims to being 'bad'. The other thing is the way that he portraied Bosnian-Muslims; main causes/killers of the war, which is a complete lie. The serbs goal was to eliminate the whole Bosnian-Muslim population and create a dominant ethinc group; the serbs ofcourse. Also he forgot to mention the attack on Srebrenica where serbs killed over 8000 civillians in just one day...I just have to asume that the director LOATHES all muslims as he completely LIED.
What about the missing episodes. Why should one buy this series? What about the missing episodes? Are they going to be added later, or this is it? I cannot believe this. Would you buy a bicycle with a missing wheel? Or a keyboard without the C and R keys? I'd like Amazon to explain its customers what it plans to do..
Cant watch. I downloaded this program and it was garbled and video as if played in slow motion.  This is the first of two downloads that didn't play.  I know it was not my computer because I did download three that played ok
Great movie, terrible print. I have been a big fan of this most fun of all kung fu flicks for more than twenty years, from originally seeing it in the theater to having the VHS version to the DVD.  It's got everything a great kitschy martial arts film should have.  High kicking, fast moving action coupled with colorful costumes and scenery lends all of the excitement any movie needs.  But of course, the masks are what sets this movie apart, and gives it its most distinctive flavor- even though, aside from the Scorpion, no other character wears his mask for more than the first few minutes of the film.The HUGE downside to this DVD is, as others have pointed out, the quality of the print.  It is simply terrible.  Grainy and scratched, with multiple blips and splices, it is annoying to watch on a medium like DVD which is normally so pristine.  I took a previous reviewer's advice and found the DVD on the Celestial release- and I couldn't beleive it.  The difference is night and day.  The Celestial release has been remastered and restored to the glory that DVD can bring- I was so used to watching the grainy release that seeing it like this brought details to my eyes I had forgotten.  I bought mine from [...] (Hong Kong Flicks), and it was worth every penny- it includes extras like movie stills, the original movie poster, and a behind the scenes feature.  This is the DVD to get, not this sub-par print
Snore. Don't let the cover fool you, this film isn't half as fun as you may hope it is. Maybe it's my own fault, but I was expecting something more like "Groove", or at least something interesting to watch. And it's not for my lack of knowledge of the bands, I often listen to Joy Division/New Order/Happy Mondays, and more from that scene. However, this seemed much more like the story of Tony Wilson and The Factory, than it did about the music, and almost came-off as a documentary. I almost stopped watching it out of boredom, but saw it through anyway. Now I wouldn't call this bad, it had it's good parts, just not many.
waste of money. Dont purchase episode 5 of season 2, it's 7 minutes long and you dont get any of the Charlie Murphy Prince story.  WTF!!!  Can someone fix this and refund or offer the entire episode for re-download!!!
Bad Device. I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service
The blue fairy? Gimmie a break!. This movie was cheeseball beginning to end...I thought the concept was corny even before I watched it but decided to give it a try anyway. Big mistake. A robot who can love? Lame! And with all this high tech stuff the docs can't bring the couple's real son out of a coma (or whatever was wrong with him) so the parents forget all about him and get some robot kid who can 'love' but lacks the common sense of a human making him a danger to himself and everyone..Brialliant plan (especially considering the amount of orphan human kids there must be in this messed up futuristic world)..Then the real son wakes up and comes home and thats when the problems with the robot kid begin. The family decides they don't want the robot and the mom 'loves' him so much she dumps him somewhere instead of sending him back to the lab to be humanely disposed of...It was then I knew I was smelling a stinker but NOOOOO someone else wanted to watch it till the end until he soon found out the horrible truth...I have since nicknamed it Artificial Idiocy...The worst part was the end, Ugh, I don't even want to get into it but those of you who see the title of my review above and have seen the movie know what I mean. The whole plot was muddled and full of holes with no sense of realism. For those of you who have not seen it, I suggest renting it before you buy it. Maybe this movie is great for some people, it just wasn't my thing.
A lot of green light and not much else. Rule number one if you're making a Stephen King movie, especially if it's a TV movie; make it scary or don't make it at all!  THE TOMMYKNOCKERS fails to do this miserably!  For most of the film, you're watching a lot of green light and a lot of silly inventions.  Granted, that's all in the book, but it written chillingly by King in a way only he can do it.  There are some exciting alien moments at the end, but by then it's too late.  You've just spent three hours watching a bad knock off of an X-FILES episode.On the plus side, I had no problem watching the infamous Traci Lords act like like a total slut!  Bless her
Did not work. The ones that are posted twice do not work. If they are posted once, you can try to download it, but it might not work. The video only worked for about a minute. Shame, since I really like this show and I wanted Amazon Unbox to be cool. The one cent CSI works, go download tha
The Tommyknockers got ahold of this movie... ...and put their own little spin on it!Going to split this into 2 reviews, one based on it from the book, the other just based on the movie in general.  The book "The Tommyknockers" is set in the town of Haven, Maine, where strange thing's start to happen to the townspeople after Bobbie Anderson find's a large, mysterious object in the woods behind her farm.  Curious, she starts digging it up, and with each shovel full of removed dirt, open's up a terrifying and life-altering experience for all those involved.1)  The movie based on the Stephen King Novel:  2 starsI watched the movie after reading the book (my own personal rule) and though at time's felt like they were true to the book, was often left going "huh?" at the changes that were implemented.  Certain thing's are left out, while replaced by hollywood's cheap imagination.  The missing teeth as well as the batteries and inventions running off them never really hit home, and though the book had a multitude of characters who had important part's of the story, we see some simply vanish and never make it to the mini-series.  Perhaps the Tommyknockers got to them first! Since it was a miniseries and ran over 2 hours, there was no reason to chop and hack this thing up and replace it with alternate scenarios and a different ending.  I was disappointed to see how Hilly was found, as well as the fate of Gard and the ship, and Marge's ultimate destiny comes out differently as well.2)  The movie in general, without comparing it to the book: 3 starsMargie Helgenberger and Jimmy Smit's do a very good part cast as Bobbie and Gard.  The overall pace of the mini-series roll's along well, and the production and directing is okay.  The sound is good and set's the mysterious mood that the town of Haven is faced with.  Disappearing people, mysterious inventions run off batteries, and a mob like atmosphere are all displayed as we wait to see who the tommyknockers are, and what exactly they want with the townspeople of Haven.  An excellent cast overall considering the many various character's that had to be portrayed in the story
WARNING: Wrong Episode!. This item is supposedly titled "UFOs: The First Encounters." It is, however, an episode about reincarnation. It is incorrectly labeled. DO NOT PURCHASE unless you are looking for an episode on reincarnation
Better the 2nd time around with judicious use of the FF. I came to this film with the attitude of enjoying a bit of ridiculous 'camp'.  Emma Thompson and Alan Rickman sporting Nawlins accents?  I couldn't pass that up.  Well, even with the right attitude coming in, it was at times painful.  Emma's dialect coach should have been shot; Alan did better, at least he sounded like he was aiming at a southern accent, but he tends to drawl a bit anyhow so maybe it was easier for him.  However, Emma and Alan are only supporting characters.  The main characters are not terrible or anything, but really not that compelling.Oh, the plot.  The film does have a good plot, and it could have been interesting, but nonetheless I found it a bit plodding.  And as others, have noted, the editting is so weak it's comical.  Oh actually there is a quite memorable scene: the cunnilingus scene in a meat locker.  Wow, that was...um...unusual.Well, Emma and Alan fans will no doubt watch it, but save it for a slow mid-week night.  Actually, any Emma fans with a sense of humor should definitely watch this at some point.  Emma is obviously having a good time, and seeing her dangle a cigarette while tailing on roller blades is something else.  It just you might not want to choose this as a film to watch with friends, unless you want to expose the depths to which you will descend to watch Emma or Alan on the screen.Addendum: Alan plays a good character here.  It's a nice lite break if you've been working through his films where he often plays morally ambiguous (or not so ambiguous) characters in films that explore difficult themes
Van Gogh. Pure trash. Save your time and money. It does not belong in the catagory with "Cezanne in Provence"
PURE GARBAGE. Gee another Steven Segal BOMB, wonder what this guy is thinking about??? The story takes place in Poland and a little girl whom Seagal has befriended via penpal has been kidnapped for prostitution purposes.Seagal arrives in Warsaw and single handedly fights the Turkish mob which is behind the above mentioned prostitution ring.The finale is laughable as Stevie being fat and old as he is, proceeds to kill the bad guy witha sword!!!!Steven it is time 2 retire my boy
Great movie, bad DVD. Can't add much to the discussion about the movie, but wanted to say that this DVD listed does not contain a widescreen presentation of School Daze. It says it has both full screen and widescreen, but it doesnt
Beauty and the Beast (Disney Special Platinum Edition). I was stuck with a bad copy and nothing has been done about it as of yet.
possibly the most boring film I have seen... Unfortunately, I was made to watch this film in a French class I took. While I could appreciate the fountain and the ridiculous gate, it was infuriating that the camera never moved close enough to see any character's face. It was honestly one of the most boring films I have ever seen. It's difficult to watch a movie where you never really see the characters' faces.
Truth Stretching, and All-Out Fabrication. I saw this movie as a kid when it came out and liked it, but since then it has gone through something of a critical reevaluation. Goodman is an entertaining actor, but there are just too many factual errors, and they arguably detract too much from the film's quality.As was noted elsewhere by other reviewers, Goodman's Ruth does not represent a great athlete. Ruth was not overweight growing up, nor in his early days as a ballplayer. Ruth's weight did fluctuate, but few to this day know that Ruth had 123 career stolen bases, and actually led the Yankees in steals one year (1923). Goodman's character was unreasonably slow, and at the end was portrayed as unable to run the bases even on a home run. This might work as light humor, but it certainly is not fact. Also of note, Goodman was a natural born right-hander that had to learn how to bat and throw left-handed like Ruth for the purpose of acting in this film. This makes Goodman look awkward, and even less like an athlete on a few occasions.On the other hand, I understand as a general rule that playwrights and filmmakers are given a certain "artistic license," and that it is alright on some occasions to stretch the truth for a purpose. The bloated portrayal of Ruth might be one such example, no matter how erroneous it is from a factual standpoint. Even so, many of the inaccuracies have no discernable purpose. Case in point,  "Jumpin' Joe" Dugan was never a teammate of Ruth's in Boston, only in New York. It is also known that Ruth did not have any home runs in 1914, but according to this movie he had one that year. In addition, Ruth was not the first player to hit a home run at Forbes Field. The list could go on for a while, and there seems to be no reason why the filmmakers decided to alter such facts. "Jumpin' Joe" may have been put in there just to have a veteran teammate friend for Ruth, but Dugan started his career three years after Ruth did, so he could not have been a veteran to Ruth at any point in his career. They could have picked someone else to fill this fictitious "veteran teammate" role, or scrapped the idea all together. The 1914 home run served the purpose of providing a dramatic rookie year home run, but this scene could have been set in 1915 instead, and with some modifications perhaps could have been just as dramatic. Lastly, regarding Forbes Field, the announcer could have said a true statement along the lines of "Forbes Field is a pitchers ballpark, not many home runs are hit here folks," as opposed to the inaccurate "no one has ever hit a ball out of Forbes Field." The latter line had a dramatic effect, but was not necessary.Also of note, Ruth's supposed "meeting" with gangster Alphonse Capone seemed a bit absurd, perhaps this was thrown in to get a glimpse of the times. Aside from the dicey misrepresentations though, there were a few strong qualities. The acting was strong overall, with Ruth's two wives giving strong performances, and Goodman's performance was not a total wash, even if there was too much over-the-top buffoonery. And let it be said that this film does have the ability to evoke some of the excitement of the game of baseball - a sentiment especially felt as an eight or nine year old viewer. But as said by Derek Armstrong, there were "too few ambitions toward a greatness to match that of its subject matter."
The book is better. This film is based on one of my favourite books, so I was really looking forward to seeing it. Despite great performances by Blanchett and Fienes, it just doesn't hold together well. Too much of what is in the book has been left out and that which is there lacks weight. The characters in the book are so much more complex and endearing. The book was very moving and engaging while the movie is not. There is also an ending tacked on that doesn't exist in the book, and that always annoys me. I was very disappointed. I think had I not read the book, I'd have stopped watching the movie about 1/3 into it
DUMB PERFORMANCES. Everything is this movie seems out of place. The old cliche &quot;good cop-bad cop&quot;, lived by Sutherland and his pal doesn't work at all!  Dridget is in an awkward performance, totally unconvincing, unreal, flat.  ANyway, it serves to study how a movie with so good cast can be a  tremendous waste of time.
where's the love?. Although I applaud the fact that Zhang Yi-mou can portray a love story without reverting back to sexual escapades, this moving is just plain boring! When you are watching it it takes forever and there is also this 30 min. snooze of an intro he takes explaining the background for the lovestory between his parents. Goodness gracious do something!  Zhang zi-yi does a great job of prancing about in her pigtails, but I too am flabbergasted as to  how his parents ever fell in love. Unbelievably, they said like two words to each other before deciding they loved each other. i dont call that a great love story, I call it a 3rd grade lunch recess fling
Sofia Milos is all the money!. The Order sheds light on a religious sect dating back to the Crusades.  Having survived throughout the centuries, it aims at fulfilling a prophecy, which would plunge mankind into a third world war...In short, the acting and the dialogues are extremely weak (Van Damme and Charlton Heston really disappoint with their performances!), while the plot and the setting, are actually very good, therefore, the potential for a great movie was definitely there if only the actors and writers could... act and write!As for the rating, if you're going to have it rated R at least give it the sex and/or the violence.  If not, give it the proper rating i.e. PG-13.Overall, far from being a masterpiece, it just might provide for an evening's entertainment if in a really silly mood and/or intoxicated. 1  StarsIf Van Damme movies is what you had in mind, check out the Legionnaire and Timecop
A  Dog. This movie is a dog, pure and simple. We ended up with two of these are the freebie give aways for the last few DVD players we bought. They can't sell it, so they're giving them away.  Hide ...fast
Has not aged well. When I was a kid, I loved this movie and the TV series.  I was a devoted fan, and built model rockets of the Viper fighter, and dreamed of one day being a starfighter pilot.  So you can imagine that I was very excited about getting this DVD.  Unfortunately, now that I am an adult it simply isn't possible to enjoy it any more.  The storyline is full of holes and every cliche you can think of.  The special effects are cheap.  It's just no fun anymore
Wonderful program, but flawed files... Okay, so to catch up on this exciting new series, I decided to try this revolutionary downloading program - Amazon Unbox!  I selected the first 10 episodes and hit Purchase.  Minutes later, I was watching the first episode, it came quickly, sounded great, and looked wonderful... however the second one was missing a few minutes at the end.  Forgiveable, until... whole episodes starting arriving incomplete or had missing video, making it incredibly frustrating and disappointing.But, this IS a good concept... unfortunately, Amazon has yet to verify all their own files for both audio and picture quality!  So, until the issue is fixed and paying customers recieve completed files or refunds... DO NOT try and download Season 1, Episodes 2, 4, 5, 6, and 7!!!  1, 3, 8, 9, and 10 were the only ones that were 100% complete for me
Do not believe what you can not see. I saw this film on IFC. It was a very interesting film with great acting by Molly Parker. I order this film, and low and behold they had chopped it to pieces. It was hard to understand the characters. All the necrophilia scenes were severely cut and this is what the film was all about. Do not waste your time buying this if you want the whole film. Wait for a director's cut which will hopefully show the film for what it was meant to b
AMAZON SUCKS. I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!
ask yourself ''why''. WARNING ~ a bunch 'o ''SPOILERS'' and common sense ALERT !!!why)did the grand father have to be a perverted drug addict????how i would have done it)make him practicing for his upcoming geriactric pageant.honestly,the movie might have been better without him.most old folks are being portrayed as hippies,hipsters,sassy vixens and gruff  guys anyway.this of course,would have killed off this movies 2nd biggest gimmick.why)did the uncle HAVE to be gay???how i would have done it)ok,a regular uncle isnt funny or gimmicky.how about a gambler ??? an uncle whos depressed/suicidal over losing everything in poker while having only the second highest hand there is.not only that but he loses everything to the loan shark who happened to be at the same table.why)were the parents so feeble???how i would have done it)first off,dont have ANYONE,relative or not,have control over a young child in your home.in real life,its not friends or neighbors who mess you up,but family members.i would have had the whole family participating in olives quest for shallowness.of course that would have killed the movies biggest gimmick.why)wasnt there a pet added to the mix of ''dysfunction''(it was the only gimmick left untapped)????how i would have done it)to replace the cursing,drug addict geezer and empty headed parents gimmicks,id toss in pet skunk,porcupine or rat.some animal thats not a popular choice but is loved nonetheless.why)did olives routine have to be an audition for her future stripping gig????how i would have done it)while my idea wouldnt have been ''edgy'',it would have been more original....have her be a magician and gramps be her ''eye candy'' assistant.even more,have her be good at it.get those ''ugly'' pets to par take as well.make the done up midgets AND their loser parents feel ridiculous not by being outrageous but showing her talent/s.if contestants arent allowed to have assistants,no prob.have her be good at her tricks while still involving said animals and have rick james be her soundtrack.having olive win despite not being little miss pretty would have been the way id go.the stuff that worked;dad having difficult time living his dream.son having will power of some sort attempting his (not speaking is a good a choice as any).a family conflict of any kind and having them come through it even stronger.the bus.im not completely sure what message this little movie was trying to get across.dreams cant get crushed even though the ones you place your dreams success upon are the ones crushing them ?!?!?!?!?!?!?(shrugs uncaring shoulders uncaringly
What a pity!. I hope people don't start to think of this movie as Alien 5.  In my mind this is a whole new venture, one that is separate from any of the work that Sigourney Weaver did on the first four Alien films.  The first 4 films are pretty good and I really like the whole series.  It works rather well and I would love to see another Alien film with Sigourney in it.  I think they could pull off one more film.  Ripley's a great hero.This movie was pretty bad.  The only reason I give it 2 stars is because of the special effects.  I felt like I was watching a Scooby Doo version of Alien.  Whoever greenlit this film clearly just wanted to make money.  The plot was..well..stupid and the atmosphere of the movie was pretty much non-existent.  Each of the first four Alien movies were provocative in some sense no doubt because of Sigourney's involvement.  This one was as boring as a white wall and it was as cheesy as a funhouse at a state fair.
"It was so boring, that I could scream!". This line, spoken by Julie Christie to Dirk Bogarde in "Darling" just about sums up my feelings towards this movie. Although I am halfway done with this movie I think this is one of the most boring films I have ever seen and I am stopping this movie when it gets to the scene where Christie looks at herself in the mirror as she removes her clothing. I am done with this movie (believe it or not) and it only got worse: Christie's character Diana Scott marries an Italian man who hello, is old enough to be father! And oh yes, he's an aging prince (in what had to be a ripoff of what happened to Grace Kelly and what would happen to Jacqueline Kennedy and the announcer in the newsreel that calls her "Princess Diana" almost made me laugh). That nearly made me grab a gun and shoot my TV (a la Elvis Presley) considering that this is the same setup that occurs in "Georgy Girl" and that is spoiled British girl living in Swinging England marries older man (Three words: Anna Nicole Smith). Also, I would like to know what are these reviewers smoking in saying that Christie deserved the Oscar for Best Actress? She didn't at all because it should (and I mean SHOULD) of gone to Julie Andrews for "The Sound of Music" (my pick for the best movie of the 1960's) because not only did she overtake her performance of "Mary Poppins," for which she won the Oscar, she pulverized every performance by a female that year including Christie. And there's a problem with the Academy: They can't seem to pull the trigger in giving back-to-back Oscars to the same person.I'm not alone in this arugment: In Danny Perry's book "Alternate Oscars" he picks Andrews for Best Actress of 1965 and states that the reason why the AMPAS gave the Oscar to Christie was not because it was 'The British Invasion,' but they saw it as a way to give an Oscar to Christie's other film "Doctor Zhivago" which was T.S.O.M.'s rival and added to the fact that "Zhivago" had no acting nominations. There's another Oscar problem: They don't know when to be hip.Also, does it seem like Dirk Bogarde and Lawrence Harvey were the two worst actors in film history? Because it seems to me that every movie that I have seen with them are bad; weather it was this movie, or "The Manchurian Candidate" with Harvey, or "Modesty Blaise" with Bogarde.In conclusion, I think some moviegoers should change their mind about buying this movie because this has to be the worst performance ever to win an Oscar. Or as what Bogarde said to Christie: (a fitting way to close this review since that I end where it begins) "I don't take taxis that are filled with whores!
Thoroughly predictable "thriller". The only thing that kept this from being ABSOLUTELY predictable was that a dead bad guy did NOT spring back to life.  I found myself saying "Oh come on" to one plot point after another (previous reviewers have covered these absurdities).  The underlying scenario was unconvincing and un-involving (previous reviews in this thread provide details)
The Quality to DVD is Appalling!. Raise the Red Lantern is a wonderful movie with a great story.  When I had heard that this movie was going to be transfered to DVD format, I was thrilled. And then I bought the DVD, and to my dismay, within the first couple of minutes into the movie, there were white lines and distortion. Since I loved the movie so much, I thought I would make an exception for the first few minutes, but as the movie continued, so did the white lines.  I could not believe what I was seeing.  The DVD copy of this movie, reminded me of the old movies I use to see years ago, when there were only 7 channels on TV.And not only is the visual appearance of this movie distorted so is the sound. It's very harsh and nasally.I am on my way out the door to return this DVD and ask for a refund.
Beware of Unbox!!!. Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for
I prefer... This movie was ok. I do prefer The Messenger starring Milla Jovovich. Milla is exceptional in that version
Not really for the beginner. This tape really doesn't show you how to do all of the cuts listed.  In fact, you don't ever see a complete groom from start to finish and all of the dogs are show dogs who stand perfectly still without the use of a grooming tether.  The tape also assumes a certain amount of knowledge about grooming and grooming tools; she tells you the name of the tools but not why she choose them or which breeds to use them on.  I was expecting a step by step video including expert tips on grooming but it was more a "show" with occasional comments tossed out.  The groomer almost seemed bored with her job!  I purchased it so that our novice volunteers could learn about grooming but I don't see how it will help educate them.  We'll probably never use it
Not Happy. I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?
Missing episodes. This series is being sold with missing episodes, like many others here in Unbox. Do they think their customers are so dumb? Would you buy a DVD series with a missing DVD? What sense does this make? What a disappointment this service is..
Shockingly Revisionist and Doctrinaire View of Jazz History. Throughly dismisses all Jazz after 1960, including Fusion, Free Jazz, and everything thereafter. Marsalis actually calls Cecil Taylor's music "self-indulgent bullsh**" Apparently Taylor was not allowed to rebut this during the film. How was that allowed to air on the supposedly intellectual (but more likely agenda-driven) on PBS, I will never understand. If you think Swing is the only valid form of Jazz, you will love this series. If you think Coltrane is a God, you get five minutes' summary. So lets see here: 15 hours on Louis Armstrong and Duke, 5 minutes on Coletrane, and a total didmissal of everything after Duke's death. Reminds me of the Republisuck's "Fair and Balanced" nonsense. PBS, this is your wake-up call. Stop trying to rewrite history - Jazz ain't in a museum. Just ask the artists (most of whom are alive) whom Burns left out. Metheny, you out there
Stupid Boring Gross!!. This movie is stupid beyond words. I watched a half hour of it and COULD NOT watch any more I was so lost and BORED. Makes no sense, talks about creepy gross and disgusting things, is boring and stupid!! Don't waste time on this dull as dust film
This is Horrible. I love the Avatar and I was so thrilled that amazon allows people to download it except the only problem is I've been trying for the past days and darn it all, it's not working!!! It's not as if I'm downloading it for free. I am willing to pay and yet it just wouldn't go through!!! I think it's better to just buy the dvds...I think it's absolutely horrible to tease customers like that..
Disappointing in more ways than as a remake. It's not just that this film is a bloated remake of a quick, clean, near-perfect minimalist thriller. It's not that much of the added material (particularly the internal affairs sub-plot) feels tacked-on and unnecessary. It's not even that Pacino's character is a toned-down shell of the dangerously off-kilter detective of the original, that one of the more complicated characters (Frya Selmer/Tanya Francke) has been reduced down to set dressing, or that the ending ruins the film's moral atmosphere. It's the fact that Nolan, a sublimely talented director, is unable to coax a believable performance from any of his leads. Pacino does the method-acting bit again, taking it over the top in every single scene; Hilary Swank plays a pale imitation of her better roles as the down-to-earth hometown girl; and Robin Williams--well, he's Robin Williams. The kids in this film, Katharine Isabelle and Jonathan Jackson, turn in fine performances that, while hardly career-makers (which they couldn't be, considering how far their roles have been pared down), are a refreshing change of pace from their adult contemporaries' mugging. See the film for their far-too-short performances, but make sure you rent it, and don't pay too much to do so
This Movie was very Disappointing. This movie is strickly for the women now I see why it was made for the lifetime channel. It was hard for me(as a man)  to watch this show knowing that there are people out there like these characters.  I was looking for a happy ending and didn't get it.
Bedlam. The bedlams that greet the current Republican Administration each morning for USA `involvement in Iraq' have actually relegated this DVD to second-rate.It is obvious that the producers of this so called `Documentary' are more likely to be fractious to Mr. Bush in particular than accommodating to the American public at large.It is also obvious that Mr Bush is not the type of person to succumb to self-pity.Mr Moore must be happier receiving ready cash from the other camp though.In the meantime I can still see very long queues moving slowly waiting for the full truth behind 9/11 to unfold.
it left me rooting for stalin. a tired bit of revisionist propaganda out of post-soviet russia which somehow won an oscar as best foreign film.  its fascinating that something so heavy handed can pretend to be an answer to the vile excesses of the stalin era, but what can one expect?  there is (at least one) great movie to be made about that era; dont look for it here.
Femme Fatales or Very Lame?. Terrible direction, terrible writing, it almost feels like the director didn't know what he was working with. Although this movie wanted to be in the same race and quality of the movie CLUE, it fails to realize that the plot and characters are incredibly riculous and not funny ha ha but funny stupid. It was a total watse of good celluloid
Been better books by Seuss.... This is an interesting Seuss book. The moral that it is trying to portray is good, but the story is pretty lame and it doesn't seem to flow as nicely as most Seuss books
Star Trek:  City on the Edge of Forever. My favorite show of the Trek series but there's no way I'd buy another individual program from Amazon.  It will ONLY play on their downloaded player ...won't burn to DVD so can't play it on my television.  Don't bother buying this ...just go for the Trek collection on DVD
Dull Brass. Interesting only because it was made by Europe's premier exploitation director, "Kitty" is tedious and has pretensions to being an expose of the Nazis. This film is nothing more than a forerunner of the Italian (...) genre that flourished briefly in the 1970's. As to the controversial and perverse elements - they are clumsily handled and pointless. You'll find more (...) readily available elsewhere and the horror of the Nazis is presented much more graphically and forcefully in movies by Speilberg and Polanski to name but two. If you're interested in a more thoughtful attempt at controversy from Italian directors with better artistic credentials, you might try "Seeds of Evil" and Pasolini's "Salo: 100 Days of Sodom"
A BOMB of a flick except for a few good gore effects. This sequel to a horror classic started out ok, but by the middle, none of it mattered anymore, I even got a bit tired of the well done gore effects because I had to sit through scenes of a severed [...] and rat duking it out! The original "ReAnimator" is a great flick to see if you want excellent and original gore effects as well as a creepy storyline, but this sequel just stinks
Saving the world from giant grasshoppers. A review by the students in ENT 201, Insects on Film (Clemson University, Clemson, SC) Spring 2005When better to meet your new man than while saving the world from GIANT radioactive grasshoppers! That's what happened to Audrey Ames in Beginning of the End. The black and white movie, produced in 1957, takes place in a small Illinois town called Ludlow, near the big city of Chicago. The main character, Audrey, is a persistent reporter who discovers a new and interesting story on her way to write about a lackluster flying demonstration.  On her way to the flying demo, she is stopped at a roadblock in the town of Ludlow, Illinois.  It seems that the town has been mysteriously destroyed overnight! Following a lead, Audrey goes to the U.S. Department of Agriculture and meets with the project director named Dr. Ed Wainwright in order to find out more about what happened. Dr. Wainwright tells Audrey about a wheat factory that was demolished in the same area before the destruction of Ludlow. Ed, Audrey and Ed's co-worker, Frank, go to investigate the abandoned grain bins. While they are there, a locust comes from the woods and eats Ed's co-worker. They finally realize what is destroying the towns and eating the people-although it's a little too late for poor Frank Johnson.Determined to resolve the problem, the military enlists the help of Dr. Wainwright, who tries to find a sound frequency that mimics the sound grasshoppers make before they attack. The viewer of this film will be held in utter suspense, until, at a climatic moment, Dr. Wainwright discovers the right frequency and saves the city of Chicago from the military's impending drop of an atom bomb.  The sound is broadcast from a boat in a lake outside of Chicago and the sound attracts the grasshoppers to the lake. As the grasshoppers follow the luring sound, they eventually end up in the lake where they meet a watery death.  The city of Chicago is safe and everyone lives happily ever after (except, sadly, those who were eaten alive by the radioactive grasshoppers).While this movie has extremely entertaining moments, such as when the grasshoppers scale the skyscrapers of Chicago looking for food-the movie, in general, is a B attempt at science fiction. Also, the movie was produced during the 1950s, resulting in minimal attempts at realistic special effects. The special effects are entertaining at best and add humor more than substance to the movie.  The viewer also might be left with several questions after watching this movie-like why can't the National Guard protect the citizens from grasshoppers? Or, why is it more funny than tragic when Dr. Wainwright's deaf/mute assistance gets eaten alive by a grasshopper?On a scientific or scholarly level, the movie has several errors. The most important error, in the entomological sense, is the noise that the grasshoppers make throughout the movie. To make the noise that they did in the movie, they would need wings. In the movie though, the characters say that the grasshoppers could not fly because they didn't have wings.  Also, the scientist indicates that the giant vegetables were produced through radioactivity, which allows for photosynthesis to occur both day and night.  For photosynthesis to occur, light must be present, thus raising the question of how the vegetables could continue to expand during the darkness of night.  The inability of the grasshoppers to burn in the fires set by the military reflects an error as well.  In reality, grasshoppers are highly flammable because of their wax-like coating.  Finally, the plot as a whole is completely unrealistic and so bizarre that the movie should be placed in the comedy (opposed to science fiction) genre. While Clemson University research may have led to the evacuation of mole crickets from golf course greens, using technological concepts similar to those presented in the movie, the likelihood that radioactive grasshoppers would eat hundreds of people is improbable.Beginning of the End is an amusing movie to watch! The acting is traditional of the sci-fi movies of the era. The special effects are mediocre, but the humor, in retrospect, is delightful. If you are a fan of cheesy sci-fi suspense movies, give this flick a try! You will not be disappointed.  Who knows-maybe you'll learn something that could save the world the next time we are attacked by radioactive BUGS
once again a king story is ruined on film. in the short story collection night shift, mr.king gave us some of his best short stories and spawned at least 6 movies that i know of(this mess,trucks( twice once by king as "maximam overdrive" and once as a t.v. movie),night surf,the boogyman(not the new one),graveyard shift,the mangler,and maybe more and not one has been done right! this one misses by a mile as it tells of the cult of kids who kill all the adults in a town and serve "he who walks behind the rows"more like "we steped in something behind the rows" and we steped in this flameing piece of junk!!! skip it!!!!!!
One of the worst movies I've seen in a long time. This movie is so disjointed that you watch it hoping to understand what's going on.  Brad Pitt, who I think is great, walked through his role, what there was of it.  Kate Blanchard was the heroin that you couldn't like.  Everyone else in the movie did what you would expect them to do, no orginality.  I flat cannot recommend this movie to anyone, Academy awards aside
Didn't work. I downloaded the player and this episode as part of a promotion that gave a free episode. Not only did I get charged, but when I cancelled the download to contact about the charge - I was told I had to finish downloading before they could refund. Once it finished downloading, it didn't play anyway. I gave up.
If there's a worse movie than this I haven't seen it!. If there's a worse movie than this I haven't seen it! Looks like it was made in a day. The quality is dark and muddy with choppy edits. Sort of like it was copied from a VHS tape that was recorded in the 6 hour mode after it was played 6,000 times. The actors and actresses deliver their lines like they are playing aliens in a bad Twilight Zone episode. If you look hard enough you can see the guy holding the cue cards in the scenes. The musical performances are obscure little known Doo Wop Flops! (except for Frankie Lymon). Look.....I wasted $14.99 plus tax plus gas to "run out" and buy this bomb. The only possible way to save it would be to maybe dub it in Swedish, send it to a Greenwich Village "art house" and pass it off as a foreign film. Come to think of it....don't bother to dub it.....the sound is so off it looks dubbed already! IMPORTANT UPDATE.....PLEASE READ THIS! I later discovered after I wrote this review that there is some significant social redeeming value to this little gem of the 50's. I understand that it is used constantly at the International Institute For Sleep Disorders as the most preferred method of inducing a semi-comcious near sleep state for incurable Insomniacs. And so as I write this update I've been watching the flick again and I must admit.....I.....(yawn) oh excuse me...where was I...oh yes I must admit that I.....(bigger yawn) Oh my goodness....I'm so sorry....This is so rude of me....(yawn) but it seems like.....(snoring)....I....(snoring) I just can't seem to (intense snoring)........
Great movie, awful print. Avoid! Get the more expensive one. I have seen the 'cheap' version of this movie on VHS and it is terrible. A beautiful, mesmerizing film butchered by terrible sound, a faded print, and subtitles that go off the screen. The people responsible for this should be ashamed. This edition is truly a waste of money
A must view for Sophia Loren fans. Even though I am not a Sophia Loren fan, I thoroughly enjoyed her perfomance in these 3 different short stories about 3 totally different women. Anyone born before 1940 should enjoy them as well
Anger management fails... I watched Anger Management on the plane. Since there is nothing else to watch, and the flight is more than ten hours, you usually watch whatever is on T.V. I thought that this movie as a whole was pretty bad, though there are some funny parts. There is some offensive language. Overall, it's a bad movie and is not worth watching.
Does anything happen in this movie?. So this movie is made of 2 stories.  The first one is quick and involves Takeshi Kaneshiro and Brigitte Lin.  Both have their stories and I actually found Kaneshiro more interesting.  So this thing ends and the movie should have also.  It should have been a 30 minute movie.  So for the next hour or so we get to watch Tony Leung Chiu Wai sit around his apartment in his nothing but a white tank top and his briefs.  Wow, what a movie.  The only positive to the second story is the girl who listens to the same song all day.  She was fun to watch but I still wish I wouldn't have seen this dumb movie.
Not worth $107. I purchased my version of El Hazard from a zShop for 19 bucks and I am SO glad that I did.That said, the first series is worth watching for two main reasons: overt lesbianism and Jinnai. The former is self-explanatory while the latter (Jinnai) is without a doubt the best character in the series (despite the fact that he is the antagonist). You can't say that any of the characters are very deep or well developed, but throughout the first series Jennai is by far the most satisfyingly fleshed-out character, as well as the most ammusing and true to his nature. This superiority is all the more appearant when he is contrasted with story's main character who is shallowly developed and in no way engaging.And this is what makes the second series (all four dismal episodes) so tragic: they nerfed Jinnai. He could never have been called a genius in the first series, but he was decidedly intelligent, cool, pragmatic, supremely self-confident and an effective leader (even though he was also manic and delusional). In El Hazard II, as if in response to the world recoiling at the sight of a humorous though competent villain, they have turned Jinnai into a slapstick-idiot persuing his increasingly nebulous ambition with foolish abandon.I suggest purchasing El Hazard through...alternate means,... watching the first series and discarding the second. Let's face it: even lesbian humor gets old when the writing sucks and the characters are empty
Pretty to look at but... I was not thrilled with this work.  Here's why:  The movie jumps about in non-logical fashion that distracts from the flow.  It is beautifully filmed with great costumes, colors, imagery but the acting is so bland, almost weak!  Christ, I wanted to jump in there and show them how to be passionate! The sex scenes were boring.  Maybe i should make films!  This is frustrating!!It had it's moments so, 2 stars.  Wish someone would make a movie about 'Narcissus and Goldmund' or 'Cloister and the Hearth'.  Now That would be Passionate! (unless Amblin or Touchstone did it).
Missing episodes. This series is being sold with missing episodes, like many others here in Unbox. Do they think their customers are so dumb? Would you buy a DVD series with a missing DVD? What sense does this make? What a disappointment this service is..
UnBox video not yet working. Will not play once video was downloaded. I get the error message:  "can not play file, please try again later. error# 0x80040273" I made the exlusive give me call me back feature but the UnBox department was already closed, I was told the UnBox Saturday and Sunday 6-5 hours. I have to say I am impressed with the Call back feature. I downloaded the Unbox Beta now and am recieving email assistance to try to resolve the problem. Thanks Amazon UnBox! I will Update again - Feb. 10,200
Exciting concept, dud follow-thru. The concept was a dream for monster fans -- combine Werewolves, Frankenstein (Shuler Hensley), Jeckel/Hyde, and Dracula, with Bram Stoker's vampire-chaser Van Helsing, adapting Van Helsing into a young man, with Hugh Jackman to play him.  Then feature lots and lots and lots of Dracula's Brides screaming through the air against green-screen.  And miss out on many possible expositional scenes.  One of the few movies I've wondered when it would mercifully end, and I'm a Hugh Jackman fan.  My son and I kept saying,  "But why didn't they . . .?" -- show, not tell, and my daughter-in-law shrugging,  "It was what it was."  What it was was a mess.  When the TV "Making Of" feature was more exciting than the film, Houston, we have a problem.  Read the book instead
The Brat Pack and those enormous granny panties. This was the movie that gave us The Brat Pack, a staple of a certain 80s cultural set.  The term Brat Pack was derived from an article writen by a journalist out one night with most of the men starring in St. Elmo's Fire on a boozy night of partying.  Since then the gals in the movie as well as a few others who weren't in the movie (Anthony Michael Hall, for example) suffered a bit of a ripple effect.  Here we will see all of them at their prime and at their peak of heart throb success on every teenage girl's bedroom wall.Out of all the dramedies of the John Hughes movies, this was the one I liked the least.  Maybe it was the fact that all the characters were so vain and self centered.  Maybe it was the fact that it was all so idealized seeing all of them trying to adjust to their lives after graduating college.  It was trying to be the next generation "Graduate" movie, and I didn't relate when my time came.  Maybe it had to do with the fact that I have been let down by many people and didn't have that network of friends in similar situations, and the isolation I felt during that first year adjusting to the outside world having left the nest of academia.  I guess I was just a little more bitter.  Plus, as my life was surrounded by work and little else, I didn't have all the dramas going on they did.That was kind of sad, the one scene where Rob Lowe goes back to his old frat house and they tell him they need someone like him to couch their team.  It proves you really can't go home again and there are some clinging to the past.  Not to mention embarrassing with that one gal who has managed to hold onto her virginity for so long and in one of the attempts to releive her of it Rob Lowe finds those enormous granny panties.This caputed more of a time in fashion and music than it did a mindset.  It's not a bad story, but the vain and self centered antics of the main characters left me cold.
Whiny Slackers Poke Reality With Stick - Reality Bites Back. Reality Bites seemed fresh when it was first released, giving voice to a generation - with the unfortunately derogative soubriquet of "X" - that was overeducated, underemployed, plagued by the flashy, trashy commercialism of MTV, and stunningly superficial in its wholehearted embrace of pop culture and rejection of serious moral or philosophical discourse it might have stumbled across in college.It was a good start because transitioning from the idyllic and unreal world of college to the crass, cruel arena of materialism can be tough, providing limitless opportunities for challenge and personal growth - the very stuff of real movies.  Instead we have a swan dive into a Pizza Hut commercial held together by a plot so shop-worn it would have been considered exhausted in 1930.Winona Ryder is winning as Lelaina, but one can only imagine the SATs of football players at a college where she is valedictorian.  Her "documentary" is appallingly narcissistic, reflecting the characteristic Gen X notion that - "if it's about me, it's art, and it's important."  Ethan Hawke does an excellent job as Troy, the very archetype of self-satisfied, supercilious entitlement.  We are expected to root for him, but it's hard to refrain from hoping he gets hit by a bus.Stiller, who directed - a talented fellow almost impossible to look at - plays Michael, the "anti-Troy."  Smooth, successful, and very much plugged into the contemporary franchising of Gen X culture - if culture is the right word - he's an executive at an MTV-ish corporation.  That he improves Lelaina's preposterous "documentary," rather than destroying its alleged artistic integrity, is the film's dirty little secret.Viewers surprised by who wins Lelaina's hand will also be stunned to learn that professional wrestling is fixed and Liberace was gay.  Indeed, when you strip away the thin veneer of pop culture references this is really a very traditional movie.  Janeane Garofalo is outstanding as always, and John Mahoney shines as the TV morning chat show host who looks sweet and avuncular on camera but is in fact, a bastard.  His performance says more about the likelihood of finding anything even remotely resembling reality in film - or on TV - than the rest of this film put together.In fact, reality is great, this picture would have benefited from some
Not too bad, but not too good. I actually had this on my shelf for 2 or 3 years. I tried to watch it a time or 2 and just could not get past the first 10 or 15 minutes. I was finally in the mood to watch it the other night. Let me say I am a big fan of Ashley Judd and I have loved every movie I have seen her in. She did a great job, as always, just poor script writing. It leaves a lot of questions unanswered, such as how he always manages to keep one step ahead of her in order to place cameras in her hotel rooms, etc. This fellow was so obsessed and in the end what was the point? I may have to watch it again in a few more years just to see if there is something I missed...
I have not yet received this DVD. I can't review an item you haven't sent me yet
0 stars!!!. STU-pid... this is stupid and, broing the ending is soooo set up for megalodon 2, EEEEEEEEEEHHHH!!!  don't really remember it. but i know it was stupid.  say no more
Not worth $107. I purchased my version of El Hazard from a zShop for 19 bucks and I am SO glad that I did.That said, the first series is worth watching for two main reasons: overt lesbianism and Jinnai. The former is self-explanatory while the latter (Jinnai) is without a doubt the best character in the series (despite the fact that he is the antagonist). You can't say that any of the characters are very deep or well developed, but throughout the first series Jennai is by far the most satisfyingly fleshed-out character, as well as the most ammusing and true to his nature. This superiority is all the more appearant when he is contrasted with story's main character who is shallowly developed and in no way engaging.And this is what makes the second series (all four dismal episodes) so tragic: they nerfed Jinnai. He could never have been called a genius in the first series, but he was decidedly intelligent, cool, pragmatic, supremely self-confident and an effective leader (even though he was also manic and delusional). In El Hazard II, as if in response to the world recoiling at the sight of a humorous though competent villain, they have turned Jinnai into a slapstick-idiot persuing his increasingly nebulous ambition with foolish abandon.I suggest purchasing El Hazard through...alternate means,... watching the first series and discarding the second. Let's face it: even lesbian humor gets old when the writing sucks and the characters are empty
Dismayingly bad. It's not just that If lucy Fell is a bad film. 90% of what comes out of Hollywood is uninspired, formulaic dross just like it, and usually you can just shrug it off and forget about it. What makes this movie memorably, remarkably bad is writer/director/star Eric Schaeffer's nauseatingly immense sense of self-regard, which arises from every frame like the stench of yesterday's roadkill. The mere fact that the photogenically-challenged Mr. Schaeffer should have the likes of Elle MacPherson tell him he's "cute" speaks volumes
"Well, I love you, you potato head.". You'd think with a cast including Cary Grant, Ginger Rogers, Marilyn Monroe and a chimpanzee all directed by the great Howard Hawks you'd have a side-splitter and a half, but you'd be wrong cause this snoozer barely even squeezed a chuckle out of me.Cary Grant is a scientist working on a youth formula.  Funny premise but it takes over 20 minutes before the chimpanzee mixes up some real youth formula and Grant accidentally takes it.  The results are humorous, but the effects wear off too soon then Ginger Rogers drinks some and her take on the youth trip is just lame and even depressing.  Finally at the end they both take it with unfunny results.This movie was a great disappointment to me.  Change the script, replace Grant with Fred MacMurray and replace Rogers with either Vera Miles or Katharine Hepburn and you'd have something
Where was the War?. This is a film about two soldiers captured during the Chechen war.  Normally the Chechen rebels don't take prisoners but one of the men is hoping to trade the soldiers for his son who is being held by the Russians.  As time passes the younger of the two soldiers, Ivan, begins to feel for the rebels and to wish he could live among them.  The soldiers are told to write to their families and have them ask the commander to trade them for the rebel's son.  Ivan's mother tries but ultimately fails in her attempt.  Eventually the rebels get tired to waiting and kill the older soldier.  Ivan gets free and runs for the hills ending the movie with his escape
Cant watch. I downloaded this program and it was garbled and video as if played in slow motion.  This is the first of two downloads that didn't play.  I know it was not my computer because I did download three that played ok
worst Bond movie?. Apologies to those of you who seem to actually like this film, but when I re-watched it recently after not having seen it in ten years or so, I found it to be . . . well, nearly unwatchable.What's so bad about it?  Well, how shall I begin . . .(1)  Sean Connery is a dud.  There can be very little doubt that Connery is THE James Bond, but here, he seems like he's just going through the motions.  To be fair, he had no decent material to play.  The only positives in the performance are the small little touches he puts in to show that he is playing an aging 007; he seems suitably worn-out at various points, and that adds a tiny layer of believability to the character that has never been there before.  But these are grace notes; by and large, Connery is stiff as a board here.(2)  The action scenes are uninspiring.  I'm not the biggest fan of the Roger Moore Bond films, but even the worst of them have terrific action scenes.  Here, the action is strictly second-rate.(3)  Kim Basinger and Barbara Carrera, though great to look at, give terrible performances.(4)  There is literally no reason to see this in favor of "Thunderball," of which it is a remake; the original remains one of the all-time great screen entertainments, and this remake makes ZERO improvements.  In fact, the plot merely becomes muddled.(5)  There are a series of awful performances in supporting roles.  Rowan Atkinson's comic scenes, though brief, are painfully unfunny, not to mention out of place.  The actor playing the "new" M is odious; and whoever it is playing Q isn't very good, either.(6)  The music is bad.  The title song is boring, and the score by Michel Legrand frequently sounds as if it came from a Bugs Bunny cartoon.  I couldn't care less that the James Bond theme is missing; it's not what isn't there that's bad, it's what IS there.All in all, I'd have to say that -- unless we're counting the 1967 version of "Casino Royale" -- this is THE worst of the James Bond movies.  It's worth seeing if you've never seen it before . . . but that's about it, in my opinion
Poor support. This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet
Moon River....this movie is all wet!. Overacted. Boring. Horrible movie. The only likable character was Cat.
Widely acknowledged classic, I hated it. The movie is widely considered a classic for Hong Kong action movies.   Leslie Cheung is a fantastic actor, and I enjoyed Bridgitte Lin very much in Chungking Express.  So, even though I don't normally enjoy action movies and certainly not kung fu movies, I still decided to watch this movie.  I was extremely disappointed.  The cinematography is boring and poorly done.  The plot is juvenile.  It is the type of movie that would appeal to teenage boys.  I hated the movie.  However, I fully understand that many, many people love the movie and that it is one of the most important HK movies ever made.
Bad misfire. I've never read the Balzac novel this movie is based upon, but if Balzac wrote a coherent story, it didn't make it to the screen this time around.  The settings and costumes are glorious, leading one to expect somewhat high-brow entertainment, perhaps on the order of Merchant/Ivory.  Not to be.  A sophomoric joke repeatedly cropping up in the film is Elizabeth Shue's naked backside.  Huh?  Wouldn't the Gendarmes come running, in 1846 Paris?  Sacre Bleu!None of these people are very nice, but they don't deserve the mischief Cousin Bette inflicts upon them.  And what is Jenny Cadine's motivation for letting herself be used in Bette's schemes.  Nothing makes sense, and the whole movie was just bad misfire.  Avoid if possible
Good Movie - Horrible Recording. Artisan has released a horrible recording of a very good, sophisticated comedy that questions the values of marriage.  The DVD I got from the start had poor sound quality, faded color and was actually out of focus.  To add to this this disc started skipping, freezing and even getting the vocals out of sequence with the picture.  Don't waste your money on this release.  Wait for a better release
Superficial. Whatever happened to the glory days of French cinema like Truffaut, Godard etc, now replaced by unimaginative "realists" of the type represented in this movie. From the cardboard cutout characters to the inane "plot" this is a film that only teenage girls of 17 and a half could empathize with. This film doesn't tell you anything you haven't seen before in the "coming of age" category...oh, the confusion, the tears, the lousy sex, the intolerant parents etc etc. The only redeeming feature is the actresses who do a brave job with the atrocious screenplay
The Beginning of Disappointment. As a big fan of Ralph, I was looking forward to The End of the Affair.  Maybe my expectations were too high, but this movie is dreadful.  Ralph is a brilliant actor, but not even his flawless acting can't compensate for the nonsensical plot and the horrific casting of Julianne Moore.  What happened to Moore?  It is NOT hard to learn a British accent.  From the sounds of it, Moore didn't even try.  She sounds so American she fails to convince anyone she has an ounce of English in her.  And if that weren't bad enough, the plot is as unconvincing as Moore's accent.  She's an adulteress, but miraculously heals a young boy's facial disfigurement and brings Ralph back from the dead. Even the priest admires her--adultery and all! Her husband does not know the meaning of jealously and lets Ralph live in the house even though he knows of the affair.  Still amidst the unbelievable, the plot is so predicatable.  She coughs a few times here and there.  So we know (before anyone in the movie figures it out) that she's dying.  We also know why she &quot;ends&quot; the affair long before its &quot;revealed&quot; to Ralph. And by the way, what was with all the nudity?  Totally unnecessary and vulgar
Not Happy. I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?
Missing episodes. This series is being sold with missing episodes, like many others here in Unbox. Do they think their customers are so dumb? Would you buy a DVD series with a missing DVD? What sense does this make? What a disappointment this service is..
Controversy, not quality. It was probably brave to make any sort of a film out of Rudi van Danzig's book. Doubtless the controversial part of the subject matter of this film, an 11/12 year old boy part-willingly seduced by a 19 year-old soldier, was the reason that it was awarded the Best Film and Audience Prize at Turin in 1993. It cannot have been for any artistic merit or general craft competence. When Jeroen and his mother emerge from their flat we are expected to believe that this is Amsterdam after more than 4 years of Nazi occupation and deprivation. The flats and street are in immaculately good condition. The children being packed off to Friesland so that rest of their families shan't starve are pictures of good health. Was the budget for this film so pathetically low that the producers could not drive around The Netherlands coastline to find a village for the arrival of the Canadian liberators where there weren't bollards on the footpaths to stop people parking cars there? Doubtless McDonald's was just around the corner. I laughed. I thought of Monty Python.As to the main topic of the film, the relationship between the soldier and the boy, do not expect this to remain totally from the child's perspective as it is in the book; there are trite lines of self-explanation from the soldier. The book quite believably develops the relationship between the child and the man, the film doesn't. Since the film is only 92 minutes long perhaps the answer is a censor's sharp scissors, not an example of the film-makers' overall artistic failure. Or perhaps they just hadn't got enough money for enough scenes.The small, redeeeming part of the film is the depiction of the devoutly Protestant people of this ultra-provincial part of The Netherlands; I believed this representation. In this the film shares it's small success with another poor film set in an extreme end of a maritime country, which relies on sex to get people to watch it, "Breaking The Waves".Do not expect this film to bear more than a passing resemblance to van Dantzig's book. Do not expect to see a work of art. Don't waste your money on this DVD; instead, if you haven't done so already, buy the book
Great Acting but unbelievable story line. This movie has such wonderful reviews from both professional critics and Amazon customers that I was expecting great things. While I agree the acting (especially the girls playing Christy and Ariel) is excellent the story is just too implausible and I got that impression from the minute we see the family crossing from Canada to the US (yes they are Irish but for some reason they have to sneak in to the US from Canada). Anyway why on earth would an apparently intelligent couple enter the US with their two kids illegally, without jobs or much money to settle in the most expensive city in the country?  I know the dad is an actor but couldn't he have settled the family in one of the less expensive boroughs and taken the subway in to Manhattan? The mom is a teacher but can't find a job but no wonder if they are in the country illegally. Yet there is money for private school, fixing up the dump of an apartment, an expensive camcorder, betting the rent money on an ET doll etc.  I can't imagine any parents moving in to an apartment building known as the "drug house" with two young girls and then letting the girls wander about as they please.  Mind you the parents are a couple supposedly almost crippled by the guilt they feel over a third child - a son - that has recently died.  I kept expecting someone to call Social Services.   And the medical situations with both Frankie and the mom and new baby are not well thought out or researched. The symbolism between Mateo, the new baby and Frankie is very heavy handed. Though the film is told through the oldest daughter's eyes  because of several scenes and elements the movie is not suited at all to children.  And there are also several scenes that are really not connected with the oldest daughter at all.   Maybe if I had taken it more as a fable I would have "gotten" this movie more but I was expecting a straight forward drama and was disappointed.
Star Trek:  City on the Edge of Forever. My favorite show of the Trek series but there's no way I'd buy another individual program from Amazon.  It will ONLY play on their downloaded player ...won't burn to DVD so can't play it on my television.  Don't bother buying this ...just go for the Trek collection on DVD
Not bad...once. When I watched this movie, I have to say, I thought it was pretty pointless.  Napolean Dynamite is, too, but it's funny.  This isn't quite up to Dynamite standards, I'm afraid.  It's not as squeaky clean as good ol' Napolean, either.  Don't buy it.  If you must see it, rent it
I was'nt that impressed... The story line was fair, but the T&A not so hot... 2 star
Don't bother with this garbage. I wanted to see Natalie Portman in what I thought was a real acting role.The only other movies I've seen her in was Leon the Professional (which I thought she was superb in), and Phantom Movie.I fail to see how she was nominated for best supporting actress in this movie.Maybe it was a weak year in female actors?She did a fine job, but I do not believe it was worthy of being nominated.Now, onto the movie.This is basically Seinfeld with big name stars.A pointless movie, that was so slow and no plot...I was sleeping through half the movie, and I lost interest after the introduction of Natalie's ("Alice").Jude Law did the best job in this wretched film.  He pulled off the "loser character, and failed author mentality."I don't get this movie, or why it was even made, but, I am not into similar movies.  This movie, supposedly about people who lost love, or was in love...no. I don't think so.  There was no love in this movie.  It was lust, pure teen-age hormones running rampant.  All it lacked were true teenagers.   The chemistry lacked between all of the characters, except between the characters and I did not believe in them.  Other than that... For a brief moment, I did believe in Natalie's Alice and Jude's Dan.Oh well.I guess I don't understand this movie at all, but I also didn't care about them. The characters were despicable and annoying (like Seinfeld).Oh yes, there were many wasted scenes.  Such as, the photo shoots scenes. Who cares?  Why bother showing that?   As funny as the internet "chatting" scene between Dan (Jude Law) and Larry (Clive Owen), it was almost as meaningless.  Certainly, it was far too long.The producer, director and scriptwriter should be knocked over the head with such a bad movie.  I don't blame any of the actors at all, they tried their best in their limited functions in this garbage.That said, Natalie Portman needs to use her talents and beauty in better roles.
Leaving Las Vegas. Elezabeth Shue is always good, but Cage was pathatic.  Story line droned on and on with a big flop at the end
Weird. This movie is very weird and it makes you really dizzy. It shows you the end first and then shows you the events that lead up to it. Not a movie for children at all
Big, brash and boring. The movie "Extreme Ops" which opened to lukewarm reviews and even more lukewarm box office really should carry a government health warning with it. It is so mind numbingly incoherent and lackluster that one can feel your brain cells being depleted one by one after each comic strip moment.Let me take that back because to equate comic strips with this piece of drivel is a disservice to comic strips. This movie has no plot and no characterization. The point appears to be to display some "amazing" stunt work but the effect is spoiled by an over usage of truly obvious computer generated effect work that would not look out of place on your home play station.The plot, and I use the term loosely, concerns a group of commercial filmmakers who travel the world in attempts to catch stunts on film. They have been hired by a Japanese businessman to catch shots of a skier racing ahead of an avalanche (the reason why is never really given) so this ragtag group heads for Austria. Why they made the decision to film the shot in the Alps instead of the perfectly good Rocky Mountains is similarly never explained, except that it allows them to come into contact with a sneering Serbian war criminal fresh from faking his own death.Understandably the sneering villain is none to happy to be sharing his mountain hideaway with an obnoxious group of teenagers. He, like the theater audience, seems to find them just as annoying as we do, but whereas we have the liberty of tuning them out or, even more sensibly, walking out in the middle of the movie, he takes a more homicidal approach and decides to do away with them.I usually try to find some good points in a movie I review so it is somewhat balanced, however it is hard with this flick to find something positive to say, I guess one could point out that the girls are good looking and the scenery is equally pretty - does that count?Do yourself a favor and give this a miss. I would also recommend that you pass it by when you see it on DVD shelves. There is absolutely no redeeming feature to this dull, dumb movie
Same Thing. The Dane Cook episode is the same one that it on his "Harmful If Swallowed" c.d. The c.d. also has the uncensored version of this routine that is over 1 hour long. The one star rating is not based on the content. It is based upon Amazon not sharing this fact with customers
DVD PUT IT ON DVD. I DONT WONT TO DOWNLOAD IT I WONT IT ALL ON DVD THIS IS WASTE MONE
Disappointed. The plot of the story was ruined by the immorality and language.   This could have been a beautiful story if sexual immorality and profane language had been eliminated.   It is possible to have something beautiful and clean where when you finish you feel that you have experienced something encouraging and uplifting.   Dying Young and the plot of sickness and someone caring is beautiful.  Falling in love is beautiful but it is degraded by stooping to immorality.   I threw it in the trash as I would not share it with those that I love
Spalding, where are you??. The recent disappearance of Spalding Gray has made me realize what I don't like about this film: its narcissism.  It's Gray's defining characteristic.  After a while, despite Jonathan Demme's fabulous direction (he makes the  best of a limited repertoire) it just gets boring
Same Thing. The Dane Cook episode is the same one that it on his "Harmful If Swallowed" c.d. The c.d. also has the uncensored version of this routine that is over 1 hour long. The one star rating is not based on the content. It is based upon Amazon not sharing this fact with customers
I know it is a VERY BAD MOVIE. Before clicking the link on this page for this film I knew that someone would say VERY BAD MOVIE, OR VERY BAD FILM, it is awful, but me and my friend use to laugh when we'd mention the title of this film and at the end when he's spinning around in a wheelchair. How can some of the best actors be in such a film, great cast, bad script, bad movie, it's stupid, and very violent, there are parts that are funny though like when Daniel Stern says "Have you done this before"? when he knew what to do with the body. Yes it is awful, it really is. The darkest "comedy" ever, they went way too far. It's almost as sick as the movie FREEWAY another movie with great actors in such a terrible film. Atrocious films.
Why the Charge. Curious as to why Amazon would charge for this content when CBS offers it for free on the official Survivor Website.  Yeah, at the CBS site you have sit through 4 commercials, but it is worth it to not have to download any extra programs
disapointed. i was verry disapointed to see this movie because i wanted to see the  real movie and not a musical movie.i'm still looking for the real real movie but still can't find it
Almost unwatchable sci-fi turkey. This blatently derivative (hat tip to Ridley Scott's Alien, with a hint of Stanley Donen's Saturn 3 thrown in) movie should surely win the award for the most irritatingly gratuitous over-use of strobe lighting ever. This makes it extremely uncomfortable to watch and is, presumably, employed to detract from the lack of any genuine thrills. Throw in a ridiculously precocious ship's computer and a downright silly robot, and this adds up to one helluva big turkey in space. James Spader and Angela Bassett do their best to make something out of an inadequate script and plot, but this is unremittingly dreadful and dull.  The &quot;happy ever after&quot; finale will probably make you cringe in its corniness. Supernova's only redeeming factor is that it is very short
The President's Analyst. My husband and I are both James Coburn fans but we found this movie to be unwatchable.  The story line is boring in that you just keep seeing him getting called in the middle of the night and then leaving the President's room.  We watched this once and will not waste the time on watching it again
DVD PUT IT ON DVD. I DONT WONT TO DOWNLOAD IT I WONT IT ALL ON DVD THIS IS WASTE MONE
How much did they spend on this garbage? Worst  Levinson film I've seen since  "Envy". I actually wish they had given us director commentary on this disc because I would have listened to a little of it just to see what Barry Levinson was thimking and I would cross my fingers and hope he would blame the whole thing on a really bad drug trip. Take a look at the man's filmography and tell me if you think this absolute disgrace belongs there. Worse, he wasn't alone, SOMEONE ELSE liked the idea enough to co-write it. Everyone else can blame a large paycheck, but Levinson actually came up with the idea. This is one of the most beautiful terrible films I ever seen, if they took one tenth of the imagination they put into the set and toy designs and invested it into the screenplay they might have had a movie
Sterile, derivative and plastic... ...just like Hollywood and just like the music industry which, I guess, is the point.John Travolta, playing on his character from Get Shorty (and, to a lesser degree, like his character in Pulp Fiction and Swordfish) is Mr. Cool.  This time he's trying to make it big in the music biz.  He discovers a new talent (artist Christina Milian) and works his way through an assortment of characters that are more types and cliches than real characters.A brand name cast and yet no one makes any more than a dent on the personality radar.  The dialogue seems forced, funnier on the script than on the screen and most scenes feel posed and sterile.  Most of the actors appeared as bored as many celebrities are outside of their media personae.  Aside from a few interesting moments, only one speech toward the end made by Cedric the Entertainer redeemed the film.It's like a big commercial (which, I suppose, is any Hollywood film).  Certain musicians get shameless plugs (Steven Tyler and Aerosmith, included in the film), various movies get shameless plugs (including, in a not so disguised fashion, Get Shorty), certain Hollywood landmarks (e.g. the Mann Chinese Theater) are plopped into the film like a tourist video and even the L.A. Lakers and the Staples Center get a plug.It's an attempt to play on the irony of making a film about making a film or, in this case, making a musician.  So we watch Travolta as Mr. Cool navigating the landscape of the music industry to give Christina Milian her sudden and instantaneous rise to the top of the charts.  The ending is so horribly cheesy I felt as if I was watching American Idol.Watchable, but barely.The Player covered this terrain so much better.
WARNING: Wrong Episode!. This item is supposedly titled "UFOs: The First Encounters." It is, however, an episode about reincarnation. It is incorrectly labeled. DO NOT PURCHASE unless you are looking for an episode on reincarnation
dv that doesnt work. the dvd didn't work and returning it couldn't be more awkward so just cut my losses not happy in the slightes
Best movie with no conclusion I've ever seen. OK, I'm a SciFi fan.  I read the SciFi reviews and thought this was really a movie for me, and it really was good right up to the end.  Just one problem, they forgot to write the end.  What happened?  Did they run out of money?  Did the writer write himself into a corner?  There was no climax, conclusion, or resolution.  You can argue till you are blue in the face about "pan & scan."  I prefer movies with an ending.  If you are looking for a great unfinished story, this one is for you
A bad movie with some redeaming qualities. Ok so Claud was never a great actor and this was not his best work, Yes the "martial arts" are weak at best, but I still own this movie and watch it just to see Raul Julia go over the top.Why do they still call me a warlord? And mad? All I want to do is to create the perfect genetic soldier. Not for power, not for evil, but for good. Carlos Blanka will be the first of thousands. They will march out of my laboratory and crush every adversary, every creed, every nation! Until the world is in the loving grip of the Pax Bisonica. And peace will reign and all humanity will bow to me in humble gratitude.
Tootsie. To begin with the movie Tootsie is classified as a genre of romance and comic.This movie is produced in New York. The protagonist is Michael Dorsey and he is the most important character in the film.The situation of this movie is of a man that is a talent actor but for reasons of money he decides to dress like a woman.For the reason that he cannot continue woring in the job he has and that his manager tell him nobody would hire him because he is unemployed  by that time. So there is where Dorothy appears and he starts working as a women is a soap opera in televison where he becames so famous. He gets the job here but he did it without having the intention of hurting anyone and also anyone in the place knew that he was a man dresses like a woman.In addition he falls in love with one of the woman that works with him in the soap opera. Thre is only one friend that knows what he is doing. He has one problem and is that his bestfriend falls in love with him but he didn't treat her well for the reason that he is in love with the other woman.The characters of this movie are really good actors evryone seems to knoe what they are doing.THe way the character acts in the movie is ok and the decision the man takes to wear  women's clothin instead of try to find a job in the way he is seems to me very intelligent. Because he could only accept that he was unemployed but no he decides to do something so that he could work. The stes in the movie are really well done and I like the part where the father of the woman that acts in the ospa opera gives a ring to dorothy without knowing thta she was a man.The lightnoing is was ok in every scene you could see everything ok and well iluminated. The costumes the actors used where a little diffrerent form he ones we use right now but eventhough they were not the same they look ok.Furthermore th emusic they put inspires the movie to look more interesting, there were not that much music but it was ok. This movie could be reall in life because  sometimes when people dont have jobs or they got fire they do everything they can to have a job.I will really recommend this movie to my audience because itis interesting to see how his man do all that work with enthusiam and it really leave us a message of life.
Survivor Rip Off. I have bought 2 seasons of Survivor on unbox and both of them are not complete. Very dissapointing. Guatemala  episode 11 is from a completely different season and it is missing the last 2 episodes and the reunion show. Just leaves you hanging. Exile Island is missing the final episode it just goes from the competition between Danielle and Cirie for a spot in the final 3 to the live reunion show
Off the Formula But Still Disappointing. The Rebel-With-A-Heart-of-Gold-Who-Learns-The-Meaning-Of-Love scenario is put aside for a kind of soft spoof of spy pictures, which were very popular in the movies and on TV at that time. The &quot;European&quot; setting got  Elvis off the beach and away from the resorts but the script and direction  were basic, to say the least, and the music was uninspired and badly mixed  on record. The movie does have one of Presley's best set of opening  productiom numbers: &quot;Long Legged Girl..&quot; and others are rousing  tunes delivered with that Presley panache often missing from his late-'60s  efforts. But about 20 minutes into the picture even the most ardent fan  reaches for a magazine. An interesting sidelight is that his co-star was a  true &quot;discovery&quot; - an English teenager making her screen debut  with Elvis Presley! She handles the light-hearted assignment very well  indeed - even the &quot;Old MacDonald&quot; sequence which usually is  reprised on documentaries as a typically ludicrous excuse for a soundtrack  album cut
Never Again. I never received this product and will not order from you again. When there is a problem, you are not easy to reach
*Yawn*. I bought this DVD because it features Alan Rickman. I also purchased it because of someone else's Amazon review (They sounded like they really knew what they were talking about). I am glad I bought it used, because if it were new, I would feel that I'd been cheated.The movie was about as suspenseful as waiting in the doctor's office. There was no sense of suspense, and I was about as thrilled and chilled as a lukewarm cup of tea (Mind you, I'm NOT the type who requires non-stop action and special effects to be happy).The dialogue throughout was tedious and trite; the scriptwriter should be on the unemployment line, as well as the director and the editor.The plot was, in some respects, totally illogical, and at other times nonsensical. Even previous scenes don't tie in neatly enough at the end. The plot is entirely unconvincing and implausible. The choices the characters make - whether restless, bored, frustrated - don't tie in the the normal patterns of logic and suck all realism away from the film (Like a greedy, unwashed vampire).The movie features a wealthy, bored couple. I was also bored. But I'm not wealthy.However! All the actors did their best within the limitations of this film. Polly Walker was very convincing as a sensitive, but hypercritical wife. In fact, I'd say she provided the best performance, and her character was the most three-dimensional and human. They should have provided more time to make the audience more sympathetic to her character.Norman Reedus was fairly genuine as the young man, although he seemed more creepy and psychotic than attractive. He failed to grab my empathy. Which makes the plot of the movie more implausible ... that a jaded, wealthy couple would have allowed him into their environment.Alan Rickman did his usual subtle work, but it was so subtle that I thought they might have not let him have his morning coffee before filming. His attempt at an American accent did not fly too well. Later in the movie, however, he becomes much more interesting.The end lacked passion and was not surprising at all; it was entirely predictable.For Rickmanistas, yes, you get to see Alan naked. So, just fast forward to the end of the movie and you will be happy.I have always admired Alan Rickman - I'm a big fan - but he would have been better in a more skillfully scripted & directed film.So, I give it two stars. *Yawn
Bad Device. I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service
A TRUE LOSS OF FAITH. Faith Hathaway had just graduated High School and was one week away from going into the army.  She was full of hope and life.  Robert Willie( the man this movie was based on), along with his accomplice raped and murdered her.  She was raped, stabbed 17 times, and raped after she died.   The director of this movie denied requests made by Faith's mother, and gave all the attention to the only person who deserved to die.  Where was the mercy for Faith?  Where was the compassion for Faith?  Where were the people protesting for Faith's life?  Finally where was the story about the mercy which was denied to Faith?  What about her suffering and that of her family?  Barely a foot note in this movie.  Ohh and Sister Prejean has been discovered to lie when it suits her case.
another crappy camp experience. It wasnt all that bad. It had its moments. Brad Renfro (Bully), Dominique Swain (Face/Off), Keram Malicki-Sanchez (tv's Buffy The Vampire Slayer), Emily Bergl (The Rage: Carrie 2), Justin Long (Jeepers Creepers), James King (Bulletproof Monk) and Jordan Bridges (Mona Lisa Smile, son of Jeff Bridges) star as camp counslers who have, well a lot of problems. Peter Stormare (Eight Millimeter) is the camp nazi and he doesnt want anything to go wrong in his camp. Emotions, relationships and other crazy shtick happens along the way. James King (former model) looks good dipping in that lake..hmm. Renfro and Swain are so wrong for each other, they should be a couple in real life. Bergl is hot to the bone. Bridges is a bastard. Long is a hoot as a nerdy/geek type of characer and Sanchez is nicely cast as a kid who is not afraid to show his homosexuality to the others. Stomare is just weird, plain weird and the kids are brats. So if you liked Heathers, because Daniel Waters wrote it, then this is the movie for yo
"Bondage Scene" NOT COMPLETE!. I just got my copy of the DVD R-Rated version and yes the best parts of the bondage scene are missing. Why those edit happy bozos would remove the lower body scenes showing the actresses powerful legs around her captor and leave the breasts showing is beyond me. Since this scene is most appealing in the way the Original version first displayed it in 85, to take it out in my opinion degrades the movie entirely. I was completely dissapointed in this version of the movie. If anyone saw the unrated 1985 Vhs version you would know what I mean. Lana was the movie. Why remove it????? I have [not a] clue!!!   Unsatisfied customer
Wow-- it's impressive how much of a mess this is. The Weight of Water (Kathryn Bigelow, 2000)This movie should have been a big production-- an adaptation of an Anita Shreve novel directed by Near Dark's Kathryn Bigelow, starring a handful of big-name actors. So why does it seem like a Lifetime Original Movie(TM) on steroids?Jean Janes (Shadow of the Vampire's Catherine McCormack) is obsessed with a pair of murders that occurred on the Isles of Shoals in 1873, when Louis Wagner (Rome's Ciaran Hinds) was convicted of the murders of two women and executed. Jean isn't sure they got the right person. She and her poet husband Thomas (Sean Penn) set off for the islands on a boat with Thomas' brother Rich (Josh Lucas, recently of Poseidon) and Rich's new girlfriend Adaline (Elizabeth Hurley, who went from this right on to film Bedazzled). The interpersonal relationships on the boat cause tensions to flare, as everyone seems to want pretty much everyone else, and the situation on the boat brings Jean to a possible revelation of an alternative theory of the crime.It's an interesting premise, and from everything I've heard it's carried off quite successfully in the book, which I haven't read. But oh, it doesn't work well at all in the film. The links between the two stories are shown only by the way the two stories are intercut; no work at all was done on trying to parallel the two in any structural way. Most of the actors are wasted here; even the vastly talented McCormack seems only a shadow of her usual irrepressible self, while Sarah Polley, whose story takes place over in the nineteenth century time frame, seems as if she's worn down by a lot more than inimical primitive island life. About the only actor who's really effective here is Hinds, who plays his role to the hilt.It's not the worst movie I've seen in the past month, but it's pretty close. *
Movie won't start. This movie will not start without giong to the scene starter.  Grandchildren cannot start the movi
This version is a very bad "remake" of a very good film. Greetings to one and all.  Just wanted you to know that if you are looking for a pretty good film called "The Desperate Hours," this is NOT the one you want to watch. You want to watch the 1955 version with Humphrey Bogart and Fredric March. This is the 1990 "remake" with Mickey Rourke and Anthony Hopkins. The original is a taunt drama in which a man discovers that his home has been invaded and his family taken hostage by a trio of gangster escaped from prison and focuses on his desperate attempts to save their lives. This remake is exercise in terror in which the sadistic violence of the criminals becomes the driving force of the story and the goal is to see how far they will go before they are finally stopped. On paper you would have thought Anthony Hopkins could do a marvelous job in the role of the father, but the script pretty much makes that impossible. Turning the bad guy into a major league psychotic just destroys the psychological chess game that made the original so compelling. Rourke is simply the wrong choice for the role, always coming across as a sick punk rather than a criminal menace, but then few actors are going to be able to play against Hopkins, even when he is in low gear. I cannot believe anybody would watch this film twice; I only watched it because I was interested to see how they updated the original, the ending of which I just watched again on television. Of course the ending would be more violent, but it was the elegance of the ending of the original, as the hero saves his family with an unloaded gun, that made it stand out. This one is just a splatter flick dressed up a bit to fool you. Go check out the original because like Rourke's character, you do not want this in your house anywhere near your family
ORIGINAL IS BETTER~!. If you want UNCUT ORIGINAL version, ALWAYS look for ORIGINAL LICENSED Production. NOT US Release. Its a foreign film, it should not be US version to begin with~! HELLO!!!?? Why settle for LESS with US Version where they edit and cut so many excellent scenes especially with Jackie's Fighting Scenes. And US Release ruins the speed and sound as well. I have been collecting Jackie Chan's movies both HK and US Release Version for quite some time now. I found HK Version to be MUCH MORE in enjoyable, and HIGHER in Quality. American Market always like to "Americanize" and "Control". Regional Code Regulation thing is one of the example to CONTROL the Market. Why not let everyone enjoy the same HK Original Release move the same way ENTIRE WORLD enjoys it ?? No one makes Hollywood American movies to "French version" or "Chinese Version" ~! This what Americans are doing~! Well, enjoy the cheap "American version" then~! LO
Not happy. This is only a portion of this episode.  It cuts off in the middle of a sentence
Just a bit too much. Barry Longyear's story is perfect. This movie could have been but what was that bull at the end with the whips and factory slaves and that stuff? They should have ended the movie as the story ended and not added that last bit. That totally ruined the movie for me. The novella and its sequel at least give humanity the benefit of a doubt; the war is over and there is an uneasy peace and humanity, if love doesn't prevail, at least strives to be better. In the movie, they made humans brutal savages in the way they treated the Dracs. Did we learn NOTHING from the USA's foray into slavery and brutality? IT seemed that a violent ending was gratuitously grafted onto the movie to make it more palatable to the 13-18 year old testosterone crown, thereby destroying what could have been as perfect a film as the novella was perfect. But, when has Hollywood ever gotten it right? They usually find some way to shoot themselves in the foot.
"We'll Make a Bumpia Out of Columbia". RKO filed for bankruptcy in the mid-1930's and was on the verge of finally getting back on their feet financially by 1940. I suspect that someone from their cost accounting group wandered into the studio commissary in 1939 and found it full of under-contract actors and production staff goofing off and eating studio food. They rounded up this group, stuffed the whole bunch onto an unused sound stage (with a leftover southwestern set) and got them singing and dancing to songs from a Rogers and Hart Broadway show (which they had an option on but had deemed unworthy of feature film treatment).The result was released as "Too Many Girls" (1940), financially practical because with almost everything already paid for (insert fixed cost here), the additional expense of actually producing something boiled down to a little electricity and some black and white film stock.No good reason to track this one down, it's pretty witless as a comedy-with the miscasting making for funnier moments than anything else in the film. Everyone except Ann Miller is too old to be playing college students and they try to pass Hal Le Roy (one of Hollywood's most effeminate actors) off as a college football All-American. I generally like this kind of stuff and will sit through anything to watch Ann Miller; so if it totally turned me off it is unlikely to appeal to most viewers.Mostly it is notable for what happened off camera as Lucy and Desi made their first connection.Some of the musical numbers by Rodgers and Hart were bearable; "Heroes in the Fall" and "Pottawatomie". Trudy Erwin dubs Lucy's only song. Francis Langford does most of the other numbers.Mildly wild heiress Connie Casey (Lucille Ball) returns from finishing school in Europe with an unusual request to attend her father's alma mater in New Mexico-Pottawatomie College. "You mean a lot to me, Pottawatomie. You hit the spot of me, Pottawatomie. I love Pottawatomie with all my anatomy. So every tot of me, that is begot of me, will go to Pot, Pot, Pottawatomie".Lucy was almost 30 at the time and even with "extreme" soft focus and minimal close-ups can't remotely pass for 18.Her father suspects that she has a boyfriend at the school and hires four Ivy League football stars to monitor the behavior of the new freshman. The four eventually end up playing for the school's hapless football team, which in a matter of a few days has changed its schedule to include games with big time programs like Nebraska, Columbia and Tennessee. There is a grand celebration at which the student body sings the following less-than-immortal lyrics: "You're a ham-better scram-Notre Dame, We'll make Williams wail, Army-you too Navy, Boo Hoo to Purdue, Georgia Tech day you'll dread-you're a wreck, Look at Brown turn blue, We'll make a bumpia out of Columbia, In a quota Minnesota's got to go, You'll see U of D, We'll have all the alphabet to shout out." (reviewers note: the U of D is the University of Detroit which was once a football power).The scale of this thing is ultimately its undoing as Broadway ensembles of 15 are replaced with a cast of hundreds (remember all those people sitting in the RKO commissary drawing paychecks for doing nothing). On risqu Broadway the girls who are still virgins wear beanies; in the film they wear them to signify that they have never been kissed (it is amusing to watch these aging and jaded RKO starlets trying to pass for ultra-chaste teens).There is a corny and unconvincing romance between Lucy and Richard Carlson; whose brand of wooden acting would eventually work to his advantage in 1950's science fiction films like "It Came From Outer Space".Then again, what do I know? I'm only a child
I disagree with J. McCormack...it is horrible. The movie is frustrating and a big disappointment. And, what is the point of everything being so white?  Is there some deep meaning here or something?  This movie is exasperating
Edited Version. This version is eleven minutes shorter than the orginal version based on the information printed on the DVD and listed in the IMDb.  I saw this film a long time ago and was looking forward to seeing it again, but was amazed at how much they had cut out of the movie.  The DVD packaging does not state that it is an edited version nor does the information provided by Amazon.  They made it a totaly different movie with the editing that was done.  I do not recommend this version to anyone.  The orginal movie deserves better than this chop job
I've been cheated by Amazon. It really sucks, tried to download but it's not able to be viewed in pc's outsided the united states. Crikey.I'll have to wait for reruns to watch it on the telly.Whatta shame amazon dot com. Let's send a CSI to yer headquarters
Missing episodes. This series is being sold with missing episodes, like many others here in Unbox. Do they think their customers are so dumb? Would you buy a DVD series with a missing DVD? What sense does this make? What a disappointment this service is..
snowboarding mixed with bullets and action dont mix. this movie started out good but then got all mushy with the action and the gunfire. good snowboarding stunts, and the cast is great, Sawa looks a little scruffy looking. like I said, with the snowboarding and action, dont mix well and it gets muddled when the badguys come alon
What's up with that?. I wish I had read the other reviews first.  Though the quality of the episode and the video are top notch, the episode cuts off after 22 minutes.  Obviously, I already know the ending of "The Black Death", but I still wanted to see the full show
Really, really bad movie... one of the worst movies i've seen. Man, there's no way to describe this movie.Slow, boring, unidimensional, bad plot, really bad acting...Really low-budget (in a bad way)I'm not gonna get my time or my money back. I bought it based on the reviews, and they were really off... Even if you enjoy the gothic ambience, believe me, it's really bad.You've been warned
Survivor Rip Off. I have bought 2 seasons of Survivor on unbox and both of them are not complete. Very dissapointing. Guatemala  episode 11 is from a completely different season and it is missing the last 2 episodes and the reunion show. Just leaves you hanging. Exile Island is missing the final episode it just goes from the competition between Danielle and Cirie for a spot in the final 3 to the live reunion show
Dont get "Fiji" final week ... Dont dwnld " Survivor, "Thunderstorms & Sacrifice" ". Its my fault for not reading the whole thing. you would think that the last episode would be the finale , but NO, its just a 10 minute recap going to the finale 4. I didnt even get a full 45 minute episode. No finale. I got rippped off. $1.99 dwnld not well spent. Dont bother dwnldng any episode of fiji if you dont know the ending. Because they dont have that episode, not even the reunion show
Save Your Money..... This film is just awful.  The plot seems to suggest that if your husband abused you, you're entitled to rob a stage and pistol whip any man who abuses women, and if you caused an accident that crippled your brother, you are also entitled to steal money to give your brother what he wants.  Linda Florentino plays an abused wife who becomes a gun toting stage robber with a very sarcastic mouth, bad dialog, and a silly looking outfit, and she is the heroine.  Craig Sheffer steals money, sleeps with whores, wears a silly looking hat covering a silly haircut, and he is our hero.  Sam Elliott looks like he'd rather be somewhere else, and he should have been.  All in all, a very poor western
Confusing, too many characters, difficult to follow story line. Simply put: the movie is boring.  Clich upon clich is confirmed and story lines never come together. It seems as if the director was unsure whether to make a movie or a documentary. The main plot is very thin (a CIA agent is ordered to kill an oil prince, gets caught and then warns the prince (why?)) and therefore some elements were added to make the movie more interesting. So, a kid dies, which results in the "natural" response of the father: freely advising the person indirectly responsible for his son's death. The lawyer has a drunk "friend" and keeps him around, why, no one knows. Some kids become suicide terrorists and blow up a ship.All in all, this is one of the worst movies I have seen in quite a while. I was neither entertained nor intellectually challenged. I neither laughed nor cried, I did not gain an understanding nor was I compelled to learn more or take up a cause. It meant nothing to me, which in my eyes is the worst one can say about a movie.Save your money, save your time, choose another movie.
Great for the Zen Vision. At first I didn't realize that you have to use Amazon's software to load onto the Zen.  Once I figured that out (actually my husband figured that out) the show played perfectly and it was very easy to do.  I wasn't able to edit the stars.  If I could I would give this 5 stars.  If you have tried some other sites for the Zen, they are much more difficult to use. Amazon's Unbox is great for the Zen
Some Of The Worst Acting I've Seen In My Entire Life!. When the lead character acts like she's sleepwalking through the entire film, that's distracting! When just about anyone from my high school's drama class could do a much better job while brushing their teeth, then it's time to open up the wallet, and hire better talent.Once you get past the special affects, all which use cheesy models, this godforsaken movie is boring as sin, or, should I say mud!Beside being preposterous, for example, the meteroid, or whatever, ONLY hits a dam in its first strike, this pitiful film is also delusional! Remember the scene where the head of FEMA risks his life to save someone who is obviously in danger of being wiped out by fire. As Hurricane Katrinia proves, there is no such thing as a bureaucratic, administrator hero! Instead, this movie comes off as a piece of not-so-subtle Federal government propaganda not worthy of a moment of your time
What about the missing episodes. Why should one buy this series? What about the missing episodes? Are they going to be added later, or this is it? I cannot believe this. Would you buy a bicycle with a missing wheel? Or a keyboard without the C and R keys? I'd like Amazon to explain its customers what it plans to do..
Boring... I know that this film is supposed to be a masterpiece, but I fail to see how anyone can interpret this film that way.  I was surprised to see Jeff Bridges is such a boring film.  I found that this film wandered too much in the beginning.  I watched the first hour and noted that there was hardly any character or plot development!  I found that the movie never really amounted to anything.  I believe that this movie is not even worth renting!  If someone can explain to me how they could interpret this movie as an excellent one, please feel free to e-mail me with an explaination, otherwise, my feelings towards this movie will stay the same. Addy : joekerrthejoker@hotmail.co
Wonderful,, exhilarating "psychoanalytic" comedy. Peter Sellers as well as Peter O'Toole and all the beautiful women: Capucine, Romy Schneider, etc, make ot his movie an extraordinary satire of the 60's. Was really that world that mad? Of course! You couldn't stand life without a psychonalist. Thus, the film reflects precisey that. The lack of self-confidence, the incapacity of accepting the values of that decade, till -happy ending, of course- O'Toole and Schneider get married and lived happily everafter. And everybody has surpassed their personal crises. Good for the movie. The humour is just wonderful. I recommend it most enthusiasticall
Star Trek:  City on the Edge of Forever. My favorite show of the Trek series but there's no way I'd buy another individual program from Amazon.  It will ONLY play on their downloaded player ...won't burn to DVD so can't play it on my television.  Don't bother buying this ...just go for the Trek collection on DVD
Insert pun with word "con" here... "Con Express" has lots of action in it, which is great because this hides the poor writing and uninteresting characters. Unfortunately, the action isn't enough, and in between stunt pieces and shoot-outs, the audience is tempted to doze off. City Heat Productions isn't really known for producing films of the highest quality, so usually I go easy on them. If this were a big-budget company producing this, I'd be inclined to pan it entirely. But I wasn't expecting much and got a little more than I bargained for. The action is, for the most part, pretty good but nothing competitive with your usual dumb action movie. Flanery and Vosloo are perfectly casted, but everyone else seems to stiff to add any more flow to the movie. Vosloo especially appears to be enjoying himself as an over-the-top bad guy hijacking a train containing deadly chemicals. The film moves fast and contains shades of better movies like Under Siege 2, Con Air, Spy Game, and Speed. If you liked those, you probably won't mind this one too much. Just go easy on it
Nice idea but too slow to be enjoyable. I wonder if bad subtitles ruined the film but it was SO PAINFULLY SLOW I found it impossible to sit through. I wonder if it picked up but I couldn't tolerate it. It's also unbelievable past the normal suspension of disbelief. OK there's one guy with deep thoughts but everyone else has deep thoughts and/or is a maniac? Can't anyone have a blank mind like Homer Simpson
Did not work. The ones that are posted twice do not work. If they are posted once, you can try to download it, but it might not work. The video only worked for about a minute. Shame, since I really like this show and I wanted Amazon Unbox to be cool. The one cent CSI works, go download tha
Firefly: Excellent.  But buy it on DVD, not "Unbox"!. Read the Unbox terms of use CAREFULLY before choosing this route over a regular DVD purchase.  It is not your usual set of "blah blah" legal jargon.For example, 3c:"Removal of Software. If you uninstall or otherwise remove the Software, your ability to view all Digital Content you have downloaded to the Authorized Device will immediately and automatically terminate and we reserve the right to delete all Digital Content from that Authorized Device without notice to you."If you ever remove the Unbox software, Amazon may revoke your ability to view the Firefly episodes you paid for and may even delete them from your machine!Amazon, I've ordered literally thousands of dollars of stuff through you and always had a great experience; why did you let Unbox create these anti-customer terms of use??
It was....well you'd have to see it to believe me. This movie was a lot of things. It was funny (not funny haha, but funny that's retarded), it was silly, and it was amusing. One of the things, however, it was not, was good. My personal favorite part was when the children were break dancing with the glowing orb. Now this is a movie with substance. To begin the tale to which this movie is about, is to well, dig deep into one's imagination. (Or a psycho's.) You see there is this orpanage with these kids and they live during the future when there is no water on the surface of the planet. However, I'm not really sure of all the facts because my brain tends to weed out the useless info. Anyways, they find an orb, dance with it and try to escape for some reason. (Again, info has vanished....) Anyways, they run into and indian tribe, small cities, some people that live underground, etc. What I'm trying to say, is that this is definately a B movie. So unless you want to watch a bad movie with friends to laugh at, don't bother. Lesson learned from Solarbabies: If you find a glowing orb, be nice to it. It could help you save the world and teach you to break dance
Night Life song Replaced. The most memorable part of this film was the dance scene to "Night Life" which would repeat through the movie.  This version credits the song, but it was replaced with some lame disco music. I am writing MGM to complain and demand a refund.  Even the trailer has the right music playing all through it.Demand the original
TERRIBLE..TERRIBLE BORING MOVIE!. I am a lover of Japanese movies. I even purchased a masterpiece (Sadakan No. 8) for $50 for a VHS. I have a huge collection of Japanese jems.  So I know what I'm talking about. Heck I'm even Japanese myself :-)But let me tell you--MABOROSI must mean MAJOR BORING..This movie can be condensed easily into 30 minutes and probably be still too boring. Yumiko is traumatized as a kid as grandma says she wants to go away and die...please stop you are too young to die..but grandma leaves anyway and Yumiko dreams about this repeatedly. Yumiko has a hubby and kid and hubby commits suicide. She mops throughout the movie from start to finish. She wears nothing but black and rarely smiles and sustains a flat affect. A totally unrealistic movie; in real life, Yumiko would have to worry about getting a job and pay bills rather than worrying about her psychological traumas because she has a kid to take care of. (her husband was some kind of laborer.)THE MOVIE IS DREADFULLY BORING. BORING. BORING. BORING. It goes into trivial daily life and irrelevant conversations and becomes the whole of the movie with very little plot. It goes on and on and on making you sleepy sleepy sleepy...Masterpiece--HOW ON EARTH????? It's another example how winning an international film prize does not necessarily mean it is good.Now if you have problems with insomnia or need a sleep remedy-please by all means purchase this. It's hard to follow only because it puts you to sleep sooo well! I'm not exaggerating.If you decide to purchase this BORING movie, and believe the hype of the critics as it is highly overrated, well, I warned you.Thank you
Michael Moore : Propaganda Stooge of the UAW. Michael Moore filmed this propaganda,partially financed by the United Auto Workers, to distract attention from the real reason GM was forced to shutter plants - the Japanese auto invasion, made possible by  GM's unhealthy cost structure. The  company was burdened with exorbitant UAW wages, something union friendly Michael Moore does his best to conceal. So Roger Smith becomesthe reason for the plant closings. Years of losses at GM have shown Moore's twisted arguments to be exactly what they were then - phoney  UAW sponsored lies to  shift attention away from theprimary role played by the UAW in the death spiral of the automakers. Moore and others pretend GM management had dropped the ball, but GM lost tens of thousands of engineers and salaried staff, let go long before any unionized line workers felt any pain. ALL of GM's problems are the result of the lack of profits resulting from the UAW albatross - slow redesign cycles, lack of money for research, you name it.  Moore will never mention how the UAW has screwed the consumers for the past 70 years andhow now that consumers have a choice, they find the better value in Asian autos. Nobody wants to pay a UAW worker to bolt on a fender while making more than their family doctor. The UAW has fixed labor prices for long enough. Enough is enough and Mooreis shown to be the stooge of the unions with this preposterous piece of slanted fiction he laughingly calls a "documentary."
Amazon.com likes to take my money. this is another story that I don't know if I like it or not because Amazon.com never sent it too me.  this has happened about 4/5 times.  While usually I have no problem getting movies, sometimes I do.  sending them e-mails doesn't seem to work.  If they didn't have the best prices for movies, I'd leave
Midly entertainitng, but a bit off. Parts of this story are entertaining, but parts of it tended to bother me.  What really bothered me was that Harriet did some mean things to people in her class, but her nanny never told her that what she did was wrong.  She seemed to tell Harriet to pretend to be sorry, even if she wasn't sorry.  That attitude is what really bothers me about the movie and the book
What a disappointment!. After seeing the first Resident Evil movie and liking it, I was expecting a whole lot more from this film, which I had been anticipating as soon as I found out they were going to make a sequel. Unfortunately, RE Apocalypse doesn't have any of the things that made the first one good! Resident Evil was first and foremost a horror movie, with zombies and other creatures and a bit of a sci-fi touch, a lot of story going on and a great addition to the mythos of the game, with a plot that tied in neatly and nicely provided more fictional background for the RE world. The make-up and special effects were top-notch, and all of the actors, including the ones with minor roles, did a fantastic job.RE Apocalypse accomplishes none of these things. If you're expecting a horror movie, what you get is a weird combination of the Kung-Fu and action genres. There's no character development, the plot is shallow and even Mila dropped the ball with her acting in this one.I found the movie to be extremely boring and run-of-the-mill, and was also sad to see what they did to a franchise that could have been great if they'd improved upon the first movie's many strengths and taken out just some of its weaknesses.In short, this movie was a complete waste of time and has thoroughly discouraged me from seeing the third one, which is set to be released next year. Somebody would literally have to pay me to see it!
MacGyver on stupid pills. As mentioned in another review, stolen scenes from Runaway Train. Not just clips, but entire scenes. Also the plane crash scene from Cliffhanger. Still worth $3 - $4 for a DVD just for the other action
"Wild Orchid " please more like "Withered Orchid". After Two Moon Junction and 91/2 Weeks I expected a lot when I watched Wild Orchid last night. Unfortunately I was extremely disappointed. I don't mean to imply the movie is totally awful or the worst movie ever made. It's not. But the movie had nothing unique about it at all and lacked a certain something. The expression "When you got it you got it" holds true to movies and "Wild Orchid" didn't have it.It's not Mickey Rourke or Carre Otis fault. Their both attractive people who seemed to try hard with the material on hand. But the material just wasn't interesting. It lacked subtlety. The worst part of the film is the horrid, trite dialogue; 'I'm afraid if I touch you you'll disappear', 'If you want me, come and hold me right now'; you've *got* to be kidding me!! Zalman King should learn to quit while he's ahead (take a look at the Red Shoe Diaries, for example: the same story recycled multiple times, shamelessly using David Duchovney to draw viewers because it wouldn't attract a single one without him (or, at least none out of high school and not desperately looking for some late-night nudity...)This film is the same, it uses 9 1/2 Weeks, and Mickey Rourke, to draw viewers even though it can't stand on its own feet because it's so unoriginal and poorly written...never mind the acting (what was Bruce Greenwood *thinking*???)Wild Orchid held neither the fascinating complexities and characters of "91/2 Weeks" or the dreamlike imagery and compelling mystery of "Two Moon Junction." It was just sex. It held none of the sensuality of the above mentioned. It's too bad because there was a lot of potential there. It was very much a letdown, in this case what you see is ultimately exactly what you'll get. Just don't expect anything more then that, again I wish this movie had been made differently, the main word that comes to mind when viewing wild orchid is "typical".
Star Trek:  City on the Edge of Forever. My favorite show of the Trek series but there's no way I'd buy another individual program from Amazon.  It will ONLY play on their downloaded player ...won't burn to DVD so can't play it on my television.  Don't bother buying this ...just go for the Trek collection on DVD
Poor support. This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet
If only the movie would have followed the book.... This movie was awful. That's all I can say about it. It killed the book, which happens to be one of my favorites. When I got this movie after reading the book, I excitedly stuck it in my VCR (yes, VCR-- no affordable DVD Players at the time), I was expecting so much more than what I received. I know movies have to cut out a lot from the books to fit them into 2-hours, but I've never before seen a movie cut out the main hero! Now, that's just ridiculous! If I were the author, David Baldacci, I would be furious that my story had been so badly butchered. Clint Eastwood had to be the star, so he twisted the whole plot around to make Luther Whitney the hero, when in the book Luther Whitney is gunned down half-way though. In the movie, the book's hero Jack Graham is totally non-existent.My advice to you if you're looking to buy a good movie: look someplace else. Read the book. *sigh* If only the movie would've followed the book a little more closely... It might have been a blockbuster hit. Too bad.
Valentine  (2001). Director:  Jamie BlanksCast:  Denise Richards, David Broeanaz, Marley Shelton, Jessica Capshaw, Jessica Cauffiel, Katherine Heigl, Hedy Burress, Fulvio Cecere.Running Time:  96 minutesRated R for strong horror violence, some sexuality and language."Valentine", the over-slasherized version of the excellent Tom Savage suspense novel, starts with a pre-teen valentine disco set in 1988. A bespectacled young boy heads on the dance floor looking for a young female to share a dance with. First he approaches Shelly (later played by Katherine Heigl) who embarrassingly rebuffs him. His charm doesn't seem to work with Lilly (Jessica Cauffer), Paige (Denise Richards) or Kate (Marley Shelton) either; they all send him packing quite arrogantly. His luck changes when Dorothy (Jessica Capshaw) actually acknowledges him and the twosome leave hand in hand. They are later caught kissing under a bench by a gang of bullies. In order to save her own self from persecution, Dorothy accuses the youngsters of attacking her and so the gang decides to take their own revenge. They cover him in red gooey stuff ("Carrie" anyone?), strip him, and chase him onto the dance floor where they proceed to beat him up.  Fast forward ten years and the girls are now women; no one is sure what happened to Jeremy (the bullied brat from earlier) as he disappeared after that dance. It's close to Valentine's Day (of course) and they each receive a card signed with a poetic threat to their lives. They soon realize to take them seriously when Shelly is found with her throat sliced. Before long a mysterious masked madman stalks each of them leaving Kate and her boyfriend Adam (David Boreanaz) to work out that she's next on the psycho's list.The acting is standard horror fare. Denise Richards once again shows us her amazing and wide-range acting talents: Those two large things attached to the front side of her body that we like to call "breasts." David Boreanaz gives a fair performance, but definitely shouldn't give up his day job on the WB's "Angel." Newcomer Marley Shelton can't do much with her underwritten role, and she comes off as extremely annoying and whiny for the most part. The rest of the acting is close to pitiful. Another problem with Valentine is that the characters are all so self indulgent and morally extracted that it's almost impossibility for them to win over the audience. In the beginning they're shown as mockers to any child that's unfortunate enough to be less pretty than their egotistical selves and actually possess a brain. This discrimination continues throughout the movie as they brush off the men who are trying to woo them out on a date, simply because they're not up to their high standards. How can anyone want such pompously arrogant characters to survive? In a typical slasher movie, the `final girl' is usually the shy reclusive type that the audience feels sympathetic towards, like Laurie Strode. These characters have no such power, leading you to believe that the world would be a better place without them anyway.  Director Jamie Banks ("Urban Legend") has proved that he has the potential to become a fair filmmaker; however this is his first feature failure. It's a shame that he couldn't have made more of the talented cast and competent budget, but in the end, Valentine just feels empty. A couple of talented cast members are not really enough to warrant the many obnoxious ones. Cupid certainly missed when he fired the arrow of fortune at this heart.  This one's destined to escape our memories in the not-too-distant future
John Travolta and Samuel L. Jackson, again... So the first thing you need to know about this movie is that it sucks. It really does. I'm not sure who their military consultant was, but if Samuel L. has Specialist pins on his collars, you don't call him Sargeant. Women aren't allowed in the Rangers (Nunez), not my rules ladies, Colonel Styles looks a little young to be a colonel (even for the Army), the Army doesn't issue tiger stripe BDU's (Mueller), the list goes on and on. This may not seem that important, but if you're gonna make a movie about the Army, you could at least get some very BASIC (soory, could't resist) things correct.Yes, it's true that there are many twists and turns in this 'plot', but all that really means, at least in this case, is that they can multiply a weak and thin screenplay. Hey, if we tell the same story a couple different ways, it makes the story really interesting, right? Not so much. Oh, and that scene where "Specialist" West is standing on top of that shack with his pancho blowing like a villains cape? Wow, who decided that was a good idea? I don't want to ruin the ending for you, because there's no point in even seeing this movie, and anyone with enough brain cells to operate the remote will figure out the 'finale' long before it makes its belated arrival. By the way, how do you follow someone in an Army Humvee w/out them knowing? Seriously. Please spend these 90 or minutes talking with your kid's, reading a book, excercising, writing a review... I dunno, something worthy of your precious time. You've been warned.By the way, Connie Nielsen looks hot w/ short red hair
Very boring. The plot to this movie or so called sequal is horrible.  I rented this movie expecting something good and I end up falling asleep.  I actually had to watch it several times just to find out what really happened.  Don't even buy it, it is a waist of your money
What about the missing episodes. Why should one buy this series? What about the missing episodes? Are they going to be added later, or this is it? I cannot believe this. Would you buy a bicycle with a missing wheel? Or a keyboard without the C and R keys? I'd like Amazon to explain its customers what it plans to do..
NO story. Good cinematography. Okay music. I watched this movie after hearing how highly rated it was. VERY disappointing. Musical score over shots around Russia, or Europe. I couldn't tell since there was no story, no words (even subtitles). Just a guy with a movie camera recording everyday people in their daily lives.The music was NOT good, certainly not great. Even movies like The Third Man (1949) had amazing music. Not here.So you have video and music, with no plot. No words, even silent era subtitles like Chaplin-NOTHING. If the music and video can't keep you interested... Skip this.There are great films from this era. This is not one of them.Walt D in L
Worst movie EVER!!. I purchased this movie based upon the reviews and recommendations from others on Amazon.com who ( I assumed ) had watched it and liked it.  Not knowing the titles or directors of good erotica, I based my decision on those comments.  I have to say, and I'm usually NOT one to go off griping about things that don't deliver on their "advertised" qualities, but this was by far and without a doubt the WORST movie of ANY category I have ever seen.  I considered selling it on e-bay just to recover some of the cost, but I refuse to subject any poor unsuspecting man (or woman) to this garbage.  If you're looking for something to set the --mood-- this movie will NOT do it
Beware of Unbox!!!. Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for
Rent before you buy. There are not many movies I have switched off after the first 30 minutes, but this is one of them, and I recommend you rent this one first before you buy or else you might have a nasty surprise
Poor support. This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet
Wild Orchaid. This movie was NOT good at all. Other than it has beautiful people with real nice bodies,everything else is a waste of money and time
Corny movie. I admit that I'm a die-hard Johnny Depp fan, but this wasn't anywhere near one of his best.  He IS adorable in the movie, but the plot is extremely corny, and I found myself rolling my eyes more than laughing out loud.  Guys will enjoy this movie for the hundreds of bikini-sporting girls, but not much else.  Although there are a few remotely funny parts, it is mostly because of how dorky this movie is.  But then again, it was worth it to watch Johnny
no teeth to this one. Maybe I was just expecting something like Jaws but I didn't think this movie that great. I watched it twice now only because I kept falling asleep the first time. The script is very weak and thus so is the story, the  acting is flat. Most of the shark sequences are in my opinion taken from  existing documentaries (I have seen photographs of at least one scene), you  can tell that they are cut into the movie and the parts that where done for  the movie are very poorly done. Don't waste your money, if you want to  watch it, rent it, don't buy it
Like, Almost Totally Gross!. Although Valley Girl came out when I was a teenager, it somehow eluded me until now. I bought it because of the favorable reviews, and of course, for the sheer nostalgia. I won't say it's a BAD movie, but I would compare it directly to The Last American Virgin in terms of screenplay, story and acting. Unlike The Last American Virgin, however, this film has an awful sountrack, and it didn't really end in a notable way.From a filmmaking standpoint, this seems amateurish. Apparently this is where director Martha Coolidge cut her teeth, because she went on to direct the remarkably good college film, Real Genius, just two years later.The big problem with this film is shallowness. We never learn much about any of the characters, so it's not easy to care about them. I still can't figure out why the lead characters were attracted to each other, since the only way they ever describe each other is "hot". They never engage in deep conversations or share secrets with each other. There's no depth to the relationship at all.Another problem is that all the high school students in this film appear to be about 18-22 years old, while the sexy mother of one teenage girl appears to be under 30 years old herself. A whole subplot that revolves around the mother (Beth, played by Lee Purcell) is unsatisfactorily resolved about half-way throught the film, then never mentioned again. Even so, I like her temptations a lot more than Stifler's Mom in American Pie!Lisa Foreman's lead character, Julie, behaves less like a "Valley Girl" of the 1980's than she does an ordinary middle class teenager living in Overland Park, Kansas. If you're familiar with Moon Unit Zappa's song, "Valley Girl", you'll find almost none of that kind of language in this film. Nicolaus Cage's character, Randy, is likeable enough, but he looks more like a member of Jefferson Starship than a "punk" (his almost mullet-like hair is blown upward on top--that's it!). Unfortunately, for an "odd couple" story like this to work, you need to emphasize the extreme difference between the characters. But these characters could have easily been neighbors from childhood. They don't seem at all from the other side of the tracks.The obligatory montage scene fails because it continues for the entire length of the song, "I'll Melt With You". A montage is meant to compress time, and dragging it out for an entire song defeats that purpose. They should have faded it out after 45-60 seconds for more effect.The most entertaining characters in the film, by far, are Julie's parents--a couple of former hippies who were obviously the prototype for Berke Lander's parents in the hilarious 2001 teen film, "Get Over It".The soundtrack, too, is terribly inferior to The Last American Virgin, and doesn't represent the early 1980's well at all. Only the aforementioned "I'll Melt With You" stands out as a great song. Meanwhile, a tune that repeats the question "Johnny Are You Queer?" seems oddly out of place at a preppy high school prom.From a nostalgia standpoint, I didn't feel like I was watching an 80's movie at all. In fact, the most pleasant nostalgia in the film was seeing ashtrays on every table (even though the characters didn't smoke), which reminded me for the first time in years that California was once part of a free country, and wasn't always ruled by neurotics. Frankly, I was surprised that the Orwellian thought-police hadn't airbrushed all those ashtrays out of the film. Today, every surface in California is littered with a fear-mongering Proposition 65 warning stickers instead. I'm so grateful I was a teenager in the 1980's, rather than today!Overall, this film fails on too many counts to recommend it, but I wouldn't blame you for checking it out. It's good enough fun for 99 minutes. The Special Edition DVD adds quite a few features that make the DVD worthwhile, if you can get it cheap!
A Disappointment...Ugh...Not recommended. For those of you interested in seeing a delicate and sensitive portrayal of a S/M relationship, I would highly suggest the Japanese film, "Moonlight Whispers" over "Maitresse." That film is a gentle coming-of-age film with male sub/fem dom theme, while "Maitresse" is a somewhat confused film about an ex-con who stumbles into a dungeon and a (highly unlikely) vanilla relationship with a dominitrix.The ex-con cannot deal with "her career" eventually and threatens her to quit, etc. (At some point, you get the idea that the director himself really doesn't understand where the Domina is coming from.)What started out as an interesting film with a provacative opening soon falls apart about halfway through. The writer/director seems to lose the narrative thread of the film and things degenerate with the ex-con wanting to buy the dominitrix out from her protection (or pimp, for want of a better word). Then, we watch as the ex-con -- in a totally unrelated and gratuitous foray -- goes to a slaughterhouse, where a real horse is shown killed onscreen, strung up and stabbed and drained of blood as it kicks helplessly (this image will upset you for weeks, believe me! [I feel like it's my duty to WARN YOU!]). And the film gets even worse from there and finally ends up with a ridiculous car accident and the two main characters laughing like idiots. Totally stupid (like the writer/director suddenly ran out of ideas).Believe me, I really WANTED to like this movie. I ignored the negative reviews, because there are so few "real" films on this subject. But I was sorely disappointed and depressed by it.If you need to see this film, rent it. It's definitely a "one view" film at best; and it will be a film that will leave you angry (because the horse scene) and vaguely disgusted -- and generally bummed out. Too bad."Moonlight Whispers" is a much better, respectful treatment of S/M, a film with real characters and nuance -- one that seeks to explore real psychological (and sexual orientation) questions, while also being a beautiful film to watch. That film deserves to be seen -- and a wider audience!
Bad audio track. The performances included are good, BUT one CAN NOT HEAR THE MUSIC that the performers are skating to.  The music is at a very low volume with some female talking very loudly over it telling that they just did a &quot;triple something&quot;.  That amateur commentary was not necessary and is very distrubing.  The audio &quot;engineer&quot; (if you can call him that) and the producer of this video should go back to high school and enroll in freshman audio-visual
See this movie at lest once. ...to see just how bad it is. Unlike it's predecessor Heavy Metal 2k has one single 90 minute story arch talking place in the far future, using both hand drawn animation and very bad CGI, bad even for 2000. The basic plot is that a miner named Tyler (Michael Ironsides) stumbles across a green glowing crystal that is a literal key to the fountain of youth. The only draw back is that the moment he touches it Tyler goes completely bonkers and starts killing a lot of people.The "Key" draws Tyler to a settlement called Eden, full of people who haves traces of the life giving compound in them, giving them a healthy good looking looks, Tyler probtly kills half of the population and kidnaps the rest, a lone survivor of the raid Julie (Julie Strian) begins a blind quest of revenge.Everything that could be bad in any given movie is bad in HM2K, the dialog is terrible, both written and performed, the camera work is terrible, there's no back story to speak of, tere are loop holes that even a baby can see, not even a connection to the first firm with the Loc-Nar, which the key is suppose to be a shard from, except that it's green. Also there are not special features on this DVD!!!!!I don't mind the violence or the nudity, in fact I want to see more of that in western animation, but this movie is just as forgettable as any other movie that Julie Strian stars in.
Not what I expected. This is not the version of Pirates shown on Great Performances. It is a video of the actual stage performance in Central Park. The video quality, sound, and stage settings do not compare to the Great Performances version, which was superb. Very disappointing
Seagal Saves the Day without Doing Many Actions -- So Boring. When I saw so-so actioner 'Belly of the Beast,' I thought Steven Seagal was well on the way to his 'comeback,' finally realizing that authentic-looking martial arts actions are what gave him the stardom, which is however fading away very fast.  Now I saw this film, and know I was terribly wrong.  His next film 'Out of Reach' is a huge letdown, probably the final nail in the coffin.Don't get me wrong, I really like his films made in the 90s, like 'Under Siege' action-packed escapism entertainment.  In 'Out of Reach' Steven Seagal plays one Billy Ray Lancing, an ex-agent living in the wilds of Canada, where he finds injured animals and bring them to health.  Yet another embironmentally conscious hero from Seagal, but ... doesn't he see that these social messages have nothing to do with making good action films?Add to that, Billy Ray exchanges letters with a little girl Irena living in an orphanage in Poland.  When it is reported that she is missing, and a nasty businee of 'human traffic' is suspected, he travels there incognito, secures a help from the local policewoman (while he has no ID), speaks a bit of French, and hits a PC keyboard like a pro, better than a Polish technichian, to restore a secretly recorded image.  We meet a hissable baddie (Matt Schultz), but anyway we are sure Seagal will win, because he has taught the little girl how to decode the 'cyphers' (and check out how she uses it, a scene which makes unexpectedly hilarious 'you-gotta-be-kiddin' 0moment).So, how about the fact-moving kicking and chopping, once Seagal's trademark?  No, these thrilling martial arts actions are gone forever in this new film.  You just don't have actions in 'Out of Reach.'  As I counted them, well, in the first 40 minutes of 'Out Of Reach' you can see only two action set-pieces: in one, Seagal's hero Billy breaks a few arms and legs of the unkind government agents (about 30 seconds), and much later Billy smashes the glass of hotel bathroom and drops an assassin onto a parked car (another 30 seconds).  That's it, that's all.There are more actions to come, obligatory shoot-outs and sword fights, but not enough to call 'Out of Reach' an action film.  The pace is terribly tedious, the images (when at night) are too dark, and worst of all, not only Seagal but slmost all the Polish cast sleepwalk in the pedestrian story.  Little girl looks bored while she is supposed to be in danger.Finally, about director Po-Chih Leong (fairly good in Jude Law's brooding thriller with a vampire theme 'The Immortal') who is the least likely choice in Seagal's entire filmography to succeed in staging exciting actions, and the results turned out as we feared.  The slow-paced story is sleep-inducing, and what little action bits in the film are amateurish at best, with poorly-constructed shots in which fast editing attempts to conceal Seagal is no longer moving his bodies like he used to do.
There's a reason why the director was assassinated. I'm a firm believer in freedom of speech, but honestly this movie was disgusting without any redeeming qualities. The product description listed above is completely misleading. It's basically a movie in which the abusers abuse and degrade their victims, and then at the end they slowly torture them to death. Pretty much the worst movie I have ever seen
Beware! Close-out-goods/Amazon are DVD Pirates. I just want to let potential marketplace buyers of SALO that the seller: closeoutgoods and other Amazon marketplace sellers are selling pirated (bootlegged) editions of this movie and other Criterion DVDs. If Amazon were legitimate, they would ban these marketplace sellers from their website. Every potential buyer should report these crooks to the FBI and Criterion
The ship sank. This was one of MGM's worst musicals. It's amazing because it had a lot going for it the casting of three beautiful talented women: Ann Miller, Debbie Reynolds, and Jane Powell. The script isn't too good. Vic Damone and Tony Martin have too much of the same persona. I think the movie would have been balanced with Dean Martin cast. There is one scene that sticks out and it's a weird one with Jane dancing with a penguin
This is Uncut? Your kidding me!?. This sure sounded like a hot movie when i read the overview. A young woman curious about sex and trying to get herself off. Boy,i sure was surprised at what this really is. A super softcore B-movie with terrible acting and almost no sex!!! You want nudity? Sorry. But this movie does have worms,thats right, worms! In one of the "Sex scenes" a guy puts live worms into the womans private area. Yeah,it's that bad. Stay far away from this one
Not happy. This is only a portion of this episode.  It cuts off in the middle of a sentence
Don't be fooled. I have watched this movie along with many other Jet Li films. To be very honest with you this movie is one that you can keep out of your collection. I was so caught up in the title that I really was expecting much more from the film. But I was very disappointed to say the least. The movie takes place in the early eighties. When Gangs dressed in leather with chains, carrying spray paint and break danced occasionally. This was not the type of movie that I was expecting Jet Li to be in. If you want some real action packed Jet Li pick up the Contract Killer which will give you alot more for your money TRUST ME you want be disappointed
Great for the Zen Vision. At first I didn't realize that you have to use Amazon's software to load onto the Zen.  Once I figured that out (actually my husband figured that out) the show played perfectly and it was very easy to do.  I wasn't able to edit the stars.  If I could I would give this 5 stars.  If you have tried some other sites for the Zen, they are much more difficult to use. Amazon's Unbox is great for the Zen
no *'s. "Hey lets put Hugh Grant on the cover and maybe people will buy it." Well I didnt buy it for Hugh however, I did buy it because Fangoria holds it up pretty high. My curiosity got the best of me and, I wanted to know why they liked it so much. I still wanna know! The movie was plain boring! The script introduces one annoying character after the next. Its a huge mess, with bogus effects and, a major lack of suspense or terror! I wanted to find something good I may be able to say about this movie but, the only thing that comes to mind is that atleast it ends. Obviously there are those that get it and those that dont.. I am proud to say... I dont.
Did not receive it. The supplier {digital eyes} told it was available any more & they where going to tell Amazon  to give me cridit for the above item,but I have not heard anything from you ;can we resolve this matter ASAP,Thank You ,To
"Virginal" Encounters might be a better title  [:-(. All the promos made me think that this would be a really great Sci-Fi story with beautiful babes all over the place.  Well, there WERE some beautiful babes but the anticipated provocative poses by sexy ladies, never materialized.  Has the art of "posing" been lost by modern girls?  Maybe all the good directors have retired or died!  What a pity...Why, I couldn't even muster a stiff upper lip as I played this DVD through to the end.In spite of my being a certifiable "dirty old man". [:-)
Better the 2nd time around with judicious use of the FF. I came to this film with the attitude of enjoying a bit of ridiculous 'camp'.  Emma Thompson and Alan Rickman sporting Nawlins accents?  I couldn't pass that up.  Well, even with the right attitude coming in, it was at times painful.  Emma's dialect coach should have been shot; Alan did better, at least he sounded like he was aiming at a southern accent, but he tends to drawl a bit anyhow so maybe it was easier for him.  However, Emma and Alan are only supporting characters.  The main characters are not terrible or anything, but really not that compelling.Oh, the plot.  The film does have a good plot, and it could have been interesting, but nonetheless I found it a bit plodding.  And as others, have noted, the editting is so weak it's comical.  Oh actually there is a quite memorable scene: the cunnilingus scene in a meat locker.  Wow, that was...um...unusual.Well, Emma and Alan fans will no doubt watch it, but save it for a slow mid-week night.  Actually, any Emma fans with a sense of humor should definitely watch this at some point.  Emma is obviously having a good time, and seeing her dangle a cigarette while tailing on roller blades is something else.  It just you might not want to choose this as a film to watch with friends, unless you want to expose the depths to which you will descend to watch Emma or Alan on the screen.Addendum: Alan plays a good character here.  It's a nice lite break if you've been working through his films where he often plays morally ambiguous (or not so ambiguous) characters in films that explore difficult themes
UnBox video not yet working. Will not play once video was downloaded. I get the error message:  "can not play file, please try again later. error# 0x80040273" I made the exlusive give me call me back feature but the UnBox department was already closed, I was told the UnBox Saturday and Sunday 6-5 hours. I have to say I am impressed with the Call back feature. I downloaded the Unbox Beta now and am recieving email assistance to try to resolve the problem. Thanks Amazon UnBox! I will Update again - Feb. 10,200
Wonderful program, but flawed files... Okay, so to catch up on this exciting new series, I decided to try this revolutionary downloading program - Amazon Unbox!  I selected the first 10 episodes and hit Purchase.  Minutes later, I was watching the first episode, it came quickly, sounded great, and looked wonderful... however the second one was missing a few minutes at the end.  Forgiveable, until... whole episodes starting arriving incomplete or had missing video, making it incredibly frustrating and disappointing.But, this IS a good concept... unfortunately, Amazon has yet to verify all their own files for both audio and picture quality!  So, until the issue is fixed and paying customers recieve completed files or refunds... DO NOT try and download Season 1, Episodes 2, 4, 5, 6, and 7!!!  1, 3, 8, 9, and 10 were the only ones that were 100% complete for me
Super-awful. It gets two stars for the unintentional comedy. Other than that, it's one of the worst of the ultra-cheesy, predictable, low-budget horror movies from the early nineties. The FX are funny at first, but then they just go on and on and on and the sucking takes over from the comedy. The acting is uniformly terrible, and one has to image that the typically enjoyable Barrymore is just glad to have this ridiculous part of her career well behind her
You've got to be kidding. This movie is basically about 12 yr. old boys crying with each other.  When does that ever happen?  The dialogue is completely unbelievable considering the age of these kids.  What 12 yr. old worries about "..never getting out of this small town."?I guess if your childhood consisted of sitting around and crying with your friends, then you might enjoy this movie in some lame nostalgic sense.  I have a feeling Oprah would like this movie.
Movie great, DVD substandard. The sound on this DVD is absolutely horrible.  The dialogue is at a much lower volume than the music and sound effects, making it impossible to view without constantly tinkering.  I also have the VHS, on which the sound is perfect, so I can still watch this wonderful movie.  But I would sure like to get my money back for the DVD
Great Routines, Too Fast Moves. This video has some very effective routines, but the moves are performed much too fast for safe form.  Because they are done so fast, injuries can incur.  She starts out slowly but quickly go into, what she calls, super sets.  I have several videos, and that is definitely not the proper way to super set.  Normally, you could modify the moves by performing them slower, but, because they are time crunch workouts (about 10 minutes each segment), you really don't have the time to do that.  Definitely, not one of her better videos.  The routines are easy, but because of the improper form used, not recommended for the beginner, as it could do my damage then good.  If you are a Denise Austin fan (even though her voice is a bit annoying and this is not one of her better videos, she's still a great instructor), try one of her Hit The Spot segments.
Two Stars For The Score Only. Bernard Hermman's score is magnificent.  This was a major let down for me considering it was directed by Truffaut.  Lacked any real suspense and edge.  Boring camera work for the most part.  Some nice editing touches here and there but overall pretty lackluster.  The acting was fine...I guess.  It was just a pointless story I felt that really didn't go anywhere.  And what was with that crummy ending
Disappointed. I bought the DVD hoping to see one skit -- the funniest one my family had ever seen on SNL. We had it recorded on VHS many MANY years ago and somehow lost it. But we would sit and laugh until we cried watching the skit where Phil played the drill sargeant who came up with nicknames for his new recruits -- "Smiling Laughing Joking Around Man" ... "Man Who Reminds Me Of My Doggie" ... "Hair Head!"  I thought for SURE that THE funniest skit in all of SNL history would be on there, but no...it was just a 20 second clip. I was SO disappointed!!And it was quite surprising to see some of the skits they chose to show in their entirety...They just weren't funny.On a positive note, there was a serious song and dance number at the very end of the DVD that was so sweet, it brought me to tears. And the bonus featuring Phil's audition was quite interesting. But overall, I don't recommend it.
waste of money. Dont purchase episode 5 of season 2, it's 7 minutes long and you dont get any of the Charlie Murphy Prince story.  WTF!!!  Can someone fix this and refund or offer the entire episode for re-download!!!
Nothing wrong with movie, but DVD fails. This has always been a favorite film of mine.  The story is old-fashioned yet fun and the cast is divine.  Despite having the VHS, I wanted more and ordered the DVD.Beware!  This DVD claims on its packaging to have Closed Captioning, but it does NOT!!  No subtitles in any language,  no line 21 captioning.Nor does it have anything else.  "Interactive Menus" means scene selections.  This plain vanilla release doesn't even have a trailer. This film and cast deserves better and I see no reason Lion's Gate reissued this DVD with nothing added.Since I bought it online, I can't return it and neither Lion's Gate nor Artisan will take it back despite the error in labeling and false advertising which is not the fault of the people I bought it from
Like, Almost Totally Gross!. Although Valley Girl came out when I was a teenager, it somehow eluded me until now. I bought it because of the favorable reviews, and of course, for the sheer nostalgia. I won't say it's a BAD movie, but I would compare it directly to The Last American Virgin in terms of screenplay, story and acting. Unlike The Last American Virgin, however, this film has an awful sountrack, and it didn't really end in a notable way.From a filmmaking standpoint, this seems amateurish. Apparently this is where director Martha Coolidge cut her teeth, because she went on to direct the remarkably good college film, Real Genius, just two years later.The big problem with this film is shallowness. We never learn much about any of the characters, so it's not easy to care about them. I still can't figure out why the lead characters were attracted to each other, since the only way they ever describe each other is "hot". They never engage in deep conversations or share secrets with each other. There's no depth to the relationship at all.Another problem is that all the high school students in this film appear to be about 18-22 years old, while the sexy mother of one teenage girl appears to be under 30 years old herself. A whole subplot that revolves around the mother (Beth, played by Lee Purcell) is unsatisfactorily resolved about half-way throught the film, then never mentioned again. Even so, I like her temptations a lot more than Stifler's Mom in American Pie!Lisa Foreman's lead character, Julie, behaves less like a "Valley Girl" of the 1980's than she does an ordinary middle class teenager living in Overland Park, Kansas. If you're familiar with Moon Unit Zappa's song, "Valley Girl", you'll find almost none of that kind of language in this film. Nicolaus Cage's character, Randy, is likeable enough, but he looks more like a member of Jefferson Starship than a "punk" (his almost mullet-like hair is blown upward on top--that's it!). Unfortunately, for an "odd couple" story like this to work, you need to emphasize the extreme difference between the characters. But these characters could have easily been neighbors from childhood. They don't seem at all from the other side of the tracks.The obligatory montage scene fails because it continues for the entire length of the song, "I'll Melt With You". A montage is meant to compress time, and dragging it out for an entire song defeats that purpose. They should have faded it out after 45-60 seconds for more effect.The most entertaining characters in the film, by far, are Julie's parents--a couple of former hippies who were obviously the prototype for Berke Lander's parents in the hilarious 2001 teen film, "Get Over It".The soundtrack, too, is terribly inferior to The Last American Virgin, and doesn't represent the early 1980's well at all. Only the aforementioned "I'll Melt With You" stands out as a great song. Meanwhile, a tune that repeats the question "Johnny Are You Queer?" seems oddly out of place at a preppy high school prom.From a nostalgia standpoint, I didn't feel like I was watching an 80's movie at all. In fact, the most pleasant nostalgia in the film was seeing ashtrays on every table (even though the characters didn't smoke), which reminded me for the first time in years that California was once part of a free country, and wasn't always ruled by neurotics. Frankly, I was surprised that the Orwellian thought-police hadn't airbrushed all those ashtrays out of the film. Today, every surface in California is littered with a fear-mongering Proposition 65 warning stickers instead. I'm so grateful I was a teenager in the 1980's, rather than today!Overall, this film fails on too many counts to recommend it, but I wouldn't blame you for checking it out. It's good enough fun for 99 minutes. The Special Edition DVD adds quite a few features that make the DVD worthwhile, if you can get it cheap!
don't be &quot;con&quot; vinced into watching this. To be honest with you I thought the movie was really bad. the acting was ok but the only good part about the movie was that ricky (Rodney Eastman) was in the movie. (for about 5 mins) but i would not suggest renting this movie and waisting 4 dollars
Should have been made in America. This film was very confusing and boring.  The dark tone of the scenery was depressing - hard to follow, I really think this should have been either colorful for an audience of children or more graphic for an adult audience.  It's almost like the director wasen't sure which audience he wanted to please and doing so didn't please either one.  Skip it
Robin Hood it's not. I spent most of the time in fast forward, and don't think that I missed any of the plot. I gave it a 2 because it was not so bad that I turned it off. A good movie to put on in the backround, if you are not going to pay it much attention
The king of sleeze-Jing Wong forgets that he had Jet Li starring in this movie. Jing Wong truly sinks to a new low with this movie.  Jet has one oustanding action sequence but other than that, he just isn't used.Jacky Cheung is the star of this movie and plays an actor who absolutely never uses stunt doubles.  It became apparent within 5 minutes that this movie was made to make fun of Jackie Chan.  Of course it didn't have to be so obvious but Jing Wong just keeps driving it into your head that he does his own stunts.  So if you are familiar with Jing then you know this isn't going to be a tribute to Jackie.  Oh no, it is a punch to the throat through the movie screen.  Jet Li plays Cheung's bodyguard and ends up doing the a stunt for him.  After setting up his stupid Jackie Chan character, Jing tries to do a remake of Die Hard.  Remember how you never knew what Bruce Willis was going to do and it was always surprising?  Well Jing makes about the worst movie possible from here on.  Instead of being clever, he makes Jet just keep storming in on the hostages and then flee.  At one point he takes a helicopter up and starts shooting right into the buiding at the main bad guy with all of the hostages standing around.  After the helicopter crashes into the side of the building it doesn't blow up, it just destroys everything on that floor.  So other than one outstanding action sequence between Jet Li and Ben Lam(guy with sunglasses), this movie is a complete waste of time.  Even Billy Chow couldn't save this one.  Of course it would help if Wong Jing was smart enough to capitalize on the success of Billy Chow and Jet Li in 'Fist of Legend', but instead we don't get to see them fight and get to look at Billy Chow in a thong.  Yeah, that it just what I am looking for.The Universal Laser and Video company version is OK but the imbedded subtitles are sometimes hard to read.  There is a version of this released by Dimension Video(grrrr)that has been retitled Meltdown and has been shortened by 10 minutes and also has gotten a horrible new soundtrack including English dubbing and rap music replacing what was in the original.  Doesn't matter which one you get because the Chinese version isn't really any better since it is not a good movie to begin with.
This is supposed to be a comedy, but where's the proof?. This isn't funny. It isn't well directed or scripted. Perhaps it could have been great, if it had had a decent scriptwriter or director, but it didn't, so it turned out mediocre at best. Unfortunately, I believed all the hype on this website and bought a copy of this for my boyfriend and I to watch. I told my boyfriend that according to most of the reviews I'd read, this was going to be a brilliant, hilarious cult classic. But now that we've watched it, he and I both know better. We know it's dreadful, and I can only imagine all the nice things I'm going to have to do for him to make up for my expecting him to sit through this tedious monstrosity. The only highlight for us was a spirited argument he and I got into halfway through the movie about where we'd seen one of the actors in the movie before. I'm pleased to say I won the argument. That was pretty much the only highlight of the movie for me.In my opinion this is not a 'hilarious cult classic' as others so often describe it. I don't know how drunk I'd have to be to agree with that assessment of the movie, or to find it even a little bit funny, but I suspect I would have to get smashed enough that I'd need a stomach pump afterwards.If you want to see a genuinly hilarious cult sci-fi classic, pick up a copy of Flash Gordon. That has great actors, great sets, wonderfully campy scripts, brilliant humour, and a soundtrack by Queen. Furthermore, it has stood the test of time and is still great today, unlike 'The Ice Pirates', which has dated REALLY badly.Better yet, get hold of some 'Red Dwarf' dvds...seriously, Red Dwarf is sci fi humour at its BEST! It's so good, it will spoil you for other sci fi comedies
CAN'T FIND A GOOD SLEEPING PILL? THAN BUY THIS MOVIE!. Yes, I must admit that I was fooled by the "One of the most notorious, most debated, most banned films of the 'video nasty' era." line on this back of this movie case.  I was lucky because I found this at a Best Buy for $10.99.  It should be $2.99 for as bad as it is.  I've been let down by these Italian Horror Films one too many times.  If you want good, gore filled, Italian Horror stick with Lucio Fulci or Dario Argento.  Once you get past the bad dubbing and acting they're berrible.  Oh, by the way, unless you are fluent in Italian this second disk is almost worthless-there is no opportunity to even have English subtitles.  The only thing good about the second disk is the nudity and strong sexual content and that looks alright in any language
The Snake Man Cometh..... Okay, the rating above is not going to be liked but I have to be truthful.The only good thing going for this movie was the return of "Snake Plissken".This film's plot was essentially a rehash of the original "Escape From New York"...A bit more special effects (which in fact, did not make this a better movie)...When I go to a sequel I expect to get what I paid for a totally new adventure with the same character / characters.Kurt Russell's character is older and even more in the know of what the rewards are before he is offered them.Obviously the movie doesn't really know where it's going as it takes two scenes (15 minutes of the film) (1st scene - President, Commandant, and Lackey give Snake the mission) (2nd scene - Commandant and Lackey brief Snake before he leaves for the mission)  to explan to the audience what's the basic conflict.I guess either Carpenter or Russell are just getting too old to take a GREAT leap and recount either an earlier Snake Plissken adventure or an adventure well worth telling..I also wish to comment that this disc has no special features besides a movie trailer..."Carpenter....Russell! " Please don't tell me "money" caused you to revisit a "cult figure"!Some redeeming qualities are the acting performances of  Cliff Robertson, Stacy Keach, Steve Buscemi, and Pam Grier.  Robertson, Keach, and Grier may be old but they can sure make you believe in their characters!Sorry, Snake...."I don't love L.A."The-Big-Green-Pointy-Eared-One!
Not Widescreen. I didn't even open this copy of Gothic.  As soon as I realized it wasn't letterboxed I immediately returned it.  I've seen the movie before - I love Ken Russell, but I wont' watch it if isn't in letterbox
Not as bad as I expected, but not great either. WARNING: MOVIE SPOILER BELOW!!!I confess that my primary reason for buying a copy of this film, is grounded in recent history. I was around in the early 80s, when L. Ron Hubbard and his Scientologists were going full-bore with the logistics of making the book into a movie (the hero depicted on the original edition of the paperback looked like Chuck Norris, or so I thought), when all of a sudden Hubbard died, and the whole project apparently fell apart. Back then, I was close to 20 years old and I was curious about whatever it was that these Scientologists were turned on to that was supposed to help improve a person's quality of life... then I read about Larry Wollersheim's 1985 lawsuit. You can figure the rest out for yourself.Anyhow, oh, yeah, the movie... the storyline is your basic alien invasion number, i.e., the Invaders arrived to make life miserable for the poor humans (in this film, the aliens look a lot like the Klingons from Star Trek), until your typical dashing young male hero organizes a band of his fellow humans to rise up and tell the Invaders to get off of our planet. Pretty simple and straightforward, but hey, there are other films MUCH worse than Battlefield Earth, and they've taught me that if you have good enough special effects, even the lamest sci-fi storylines can work!The thing that stood out about this film, though, was its reliance on everyday talk and contemporary cliches for much of its dialogue, and as a result, it came across as rather corny... a film to be recommended for its comedy value, rather than for things like epic space battle scenes. Also, the "bad guy" aliens use some sort of psychic power to interfere with the minds of their human subjects, in order to keep them from organizing revolts... I must say, trying to depict mind-manipulation effects on film does pretty much the same thing to the movie as varnish stripper does when applied to a CD---it turns it into a confusing, incomprehensible mess! A couple of times, the picture would break up into a concentric blur, and I'd wonder what the heck was supposed to be going on.How the makers of this film ever talked a great studio like Warner to help them film it, is something which will forever remain a mystery to me. I remember just before this picture opened, a group of Scientologists were trying to hype it: "oh, watch---this film is going to be bigger than Star Wars and Gone With the Wind combined!" You can guess what happened when those staggeringly huge box office numbers never materialized... can you say "oops"
Lame. Two problems.First problem.  Let's say you're the typical kidnapper-rapist-killer.  For fun and out of postmodern boredom, you kidnap two girls off the street in New York City.  What are the odds that your randomly-chosen getaway and killing spot is going to be exactly where one of the girls lives, 60 or 70 miles away?  One in ten million?  Twenty million?Second problem.  The movie, even with a run time of an otherwise-short 84 minutes, doesn't have enough action or development to fill the void.  In short, it's boring, and in several scenes where Craven seems more interested in the bucolic Wechester County scenery than moving the plot along, I found myself reaching for the fast-forward
Spend a couple hours of your life with 7 vile people. Of all the hateful self-centered characters and idiotic plot lines in this movie, the one I found most offensive was the one involving Emilio Estevez/Andie MacDowell.  Isn't stalking hilarious?  And isn't Kirby the cutest obsessed stalker you've ever seen?  I bet stalking victims everywhere wish their stalker was a lovable as little Kirby.I also loved at the end when Ally Sheedy tells Andrew McCarthy and Judd Nelson that she just wants them "all to be friends".  To which they both reply the classic cinema line, "Ehhhh... ok."  Wow.  Now that's drama.
waste of money. Dont purchase episode 5 of season 2, it's 7 minutes long and you dont get any of the Charlie Murphy Prince story.  WTF!!!  Can someone fix this and refund or offer the entire episode for re-download!!!
The Family With No Manners. Everett Stone (Dermot Mulroney, as wooden as usual) brings his girlfriend, played by Sarah Jessica Parker, home for Christmas to meet his family.  He wants to ask for the family stone (which his mother promised him) to ask her to marry him.  Diane Keaton (his mom)keeps referring to it as a wedding ring, but it's clearly an engagement ring. In any case, everyone in his family (except his brother Ben) is extremely hateful towards her, causing her to call her sister (Claire Danes) for moral support and move into a hotel for the duration.The whole thing about the bedrooms is silly. Why can't the two brothers share?  Why can't the two girls share? Why is the gay deaf son with a hearing man? That's not likely.  Half the time the family uses sign language, the other half, he's somehow expected to read lips when someone is not even facing him.[...]a waste of two hours
The worst film of all time ?. Artie may well be a baby gorilla, but the film sucks
Becomes Old Very Fast!. The first five minutes of the dvd was interesting; however, after that I found that I was forcing myself to watch it without a great deal of enjoyment
Annie Hall's ugly sibling. A long time ago, the local art house theater where I lived used to run "Manhattan" in tandem with "Annie Hall".  At first I thought Woody Allen used the idea of a man in his forties sleeping with a high school student as a way to be tasteless and funny.  I thought he was using it to contrast it with the tasteful camerawork and the tasteful Gershwin orchestrations, but then I realized I was in denial and it pointed to a deeper, much more disturbing aspect of Woody Allen, as everyone knows.  The cinematography is excellent and the Gershwin tunes are great, but you have to wade through a fair amount of misogyny while watching this movie.  The main argument seems to be that adult women are either bitchy, man eating lesbians (the Meryl Streep character) or neurotic yet scathing and bitchy (that word again) intellectuals (Diane Keaton) and are driving adult men into the arms of unthreatening 17 year olds like Tracy-Mariel Hemingway.  I also think there's a problem since the Woody Allen character criticizes "Yale" for his ethical lapses but Woody Allen-Isaac never asks himself questions about his own behavior.  Meryl Streep's character did the right thing when before the movie starts, she leaves Isaac.  Woody Allen-Isaac is out of touch with reality.  I really wanted to like "Manhattan" and I overlooked a lot.  But it's glaringly obvious what this movie's subtext is saying. Isaac wants everyone in the movie to change, except himself
Wonderful program, but flawed files... Okay, so to catch up on this exciting new series, I decided to try this revolutionary downloading program - Amazon Unbox!  I selected the first 10 episodes and hit Purchase.  Minutes later, I was watching the first episode, it came quickly, sounded great, and looked wonderful... however the second one was missing a few minutes at the end.  Forgiveable, until... whole episodes starting arriving incomplete or had missing video, making it incredibly frustrating and disappointing.But, this IS a good concept... unfortunately, Amazon has yet to verify all their own files for both audio and picture quality!  So, until the issue is fixed and paying customers recieve completed files or refunds... DO NOT try and download Season 1, Episodes 2, 4, 5, 6, and 7!!!  1, 3, 8, 9, and 10 were the only ones that were 100% complete for me
Almost, but not quite. As a fan of the Coen brothers I was very disappointed by this film because it was almost good.  The snappy and perfectly timed dialogue they usually have never quite materializes here.  The wonderful characters you would expect to find here are mostly hollow and not quite original or sharp.   Add to this the fact that the original is a classic and in no way needed to be remade and it's a swing and a miss.This movie seems less like a Coen brothers movie than it does a movie made by fans of theirs that were stealing from them in uninspired ways
Woody's Worst?. My wife and I are great Woody Allen fans.  While we have most of his movies, this is one we missed.  Based on the high Amazon ratings, we ordered it.  What a dog of a movie!  Michael J. Fox, Dom DeLuise and the girl playing Woody's daughter stink.  Their combined horrible acting brings down the movie.  Casting Fox in this role is beyond comprehension!  His "acting" was pathedtic.  He couldn't stand still for even a few seconds in a scene.  Woody should have burned all copies since this leaves a bad taste for his other great films.  Save your money on this one.  Clearly it is Woody's Worst!  I never trust those five star ratings again
ITS OFFICIAL - BRAD PITT  CANNOT ACT. Ive read reviews for this piece of schlock calling it a "  cult classic" ( isnt that  what they always call crappy movies that only stoned college kids can watch? )  or "underated" (theres a reason  it was underated -IT SUCKS). Brad Pitts performance was laughable. Watch any episode of Gunsmoke and tell me Early Gracewasnt a bad impersonation of Festus from start to finish. And that guy from the X Files ,David sumthin or other, mumbles in this annoying monotone throughout the whole film. This guy adds about as much to the movie as those ads for the concession stand.And Juliet Lewis playing a  yet another brain dead bimbo. Who woulda saw THAT one coming??? The only reason I gave this one 2 stars is its so bad it just kept me on the edge of my seat. I think its called " morbid fascination", like when you stop to gawk at a really bad traffic accident - it repulses you but you just cant turn away. If you want my advice ( and you probably dont) take the money you were gonna spend on this movie and go buy a Gunsmoke DVD. That way you get Festus AND you get to watch Matt Dillon beat the h*** outta somebody
A TRUE LOSS OF FAITH. Faith Hathaway had just graduated High School and was one week away from going into the army.  She was full of hope and life.  Robert Willie( the man this movie was based on), along with his accomplice raped and murdered her.  She was raped, stabbed 17 times, and raped after she died.   The director of this movie denied requests made by Faith's mother, and gave all the attention to the only person who deserved to die.  Where was the mercy for Faith?  Where was the compassion for Faith?  Where were the people protesting for Faith's life?  Finally where was the story about the mercy which was denied to Faith?  What about her suffering and that of her family?  Barely a foot note in this movie.  Ohh and Sister Prejean has been discovered to lie when it suits her case.
Same Thing. The Dane Cook episode is the same one that it on his "Harmful If Swallowed" c.d. The c.d. also has the uncensored version of this routine that is over 1 hour long. The one star rating is not based on the content. It is based upon Amazon not sharing this fact with customers
Good for a frisbee. Don't waste your time with this, folks. This movie is BAD BAD BAD! Horrible acting, stupid story (Prince directed it himself, hey, he can't be good at everything) and outrageously ridiculous dialogue. But a few of the songs aren't bad (Mountains, Girls and Boys, Sometimes it Snows in April) and that's why I'm even giving it ONE star. This is a really dumb tale about Prince and Morris Day's valet Jerome Benton going to France where the former is a gigolo who falls in love. The one thing good I can say about this slop for the hogs is that it's better than the laxative-on-film "Graffiti Bridge."But if you want a very expensive frisbee or if you need a target for skeet-shooting, then go for it
Waste of time. I got this film because I'm from Detroit where this takes place. It's a pretty typical revenge flick. Four brothers want to find their adoptive mother's killer. Usual smartass remarks, guys talking BS, fights, shootouts, blah, blah, blah. I guess these kind of movies will always be made and when made well they can be fun to watch. This script was mediocre at best. Give me a Clint Eastwood or Bruce Willis film any day over this tripe.
Wake up!!!. I agree, where is the DVD? $200 for a soon to be obsolete format?? Get real!!!! This is an excellent mini-series on the worse medium
did they read the book??. while not one of his best novels, tommyknockers was much better than this waste of time! jimmy smits does his best,but the underwritten screenplay does him and this movie about dead aliens and the thought control they have over a small new england town is just not worth the trouble!! SKIP IT!!!!
"It was so boring, that I could scream!". This line, spoken by Julie Christie to Dirk Bogarde in "Darling" just about sums up my feelings towards this movie. Although I am halfway done with this movie I think this is one of the most boring films I have ever seen and I am stopping this movie when it gets to the scene where Christie looks at herself in the mirror as she removes her clothing. I am done with this movie (believe it or not) and it only got worse: Christie's character Diana Scott marries an Italian man who hello, is old enough to be father! And oh yes, he's an aging prince (in what had to be a ripoff of what happened to Grace Kelly and what would happen to Jacqueline Kennedy and the announcer in the newsreel that calls her "Princess Diana" almost made me laugh). That nearly made me grab a gun and shoot my TV (a la Elvis Presley) considering that this is the same setup that occurs in "Georgy Girl" and that is spoiled British girl living in Swinging England marries older man (Three words: Anna Nicole Smith). Also, I would like to know what are these reviewers smoking in saying that Christie deserved the Oscar for Best Actress? She didn't at all because it should (and I mean SHOULD) of gone to Julie Andrews for "The Sound of Music" (my pick for the best movie of the 1960's) because not only did she overtake her performance of "Mary Poppins," for which she won the Oscar, she pulverized every performance by a female that year including Christie. And there's a problem with the Academy: They can't seem to pull the trigger in giving back-to-back Oscars to the same person.I'm not alone in this arugment: In Danny Perry's book "Alternate Oscars" he picks Andrews for Best Actress of 1965 and states that the reason why the AMPAS gave the Oscar to Christie was not because it was 'The British Invasion,' but they saw it as a way to give an Oscar to Christie's other film "Doctor Zhivago" which was T.S.O.M.'s rival and added to the fact that "Zhivago" had no acting nominations. There's another Oscar problem: They don't know when to be hip.Also, does it seem like Dirk Bogarde and Lawrence Harvey were the two worst actors in film history? Because it seems to me that every movie that I have seen with them are bad; weather it was this movie, or "The Manchurian Candidate" with Harvey, or "Modesty Blaise" with Bogarde.In conclusion, I think some moviegoers should change their mind about buying this movie because this has to be the worst performance ever to win an Oscar. Or as what Bogarde said to Christie: (a fitting way to close this review since that I end where it begins) "I don't take taxis that are filled with whores!
Warning Incomplete Episode!!!. The episodes in this series have an average running time of 50 minutes. This one happens to be only 18 minutes. This mean sthat the file abruptly stops right in the middle. Even though it only cost me $2 I still got jipped.  Let's hope Amazon can iron out these kinds of problems before they get this service farther underway. Be careful enough to sheck the running times to be sure they seem accurate before you buy them
0.5 STARS:  Babies don't scare me. Babies don't scare me except when I have to change a dirty diaper.  The storyline of "It's Alive" simply did not interest me and I found myself bored, bored and bored.  I don't think this storyline works very well and as a result I think the movie is largely ineffective as a horror movie.  If you want to make this into some kind of a politically motivated flick as a reviewer mentioned above, that is fine, but that's the only way anyone would be able to read any interest into this plot because the actual movie itself for entertainment purposes is sadly inept
Only clips not the entire show. Only clips not the entire show.  Like watching an overvie
Same Thing. The Dane Cook episode is the same one that it on his "Harmful If Swallowed" c.d. The c.d. also has the uncensored version of this routine that is over 1 hour long. The one star rating is not based on the content. It is based upon Amazon not sharing this fact with customers
DVD PUT IT ON DVD. I DONT WONT TO DOWNLOAD IT I WONT IT ALL ON DVD THIS IS WASTE MONE
Cant watch. I downloaded this program and it was garbled and video as if played in slow motion.  This is the first of two downloads that didn't play.  I know it was not my computer because I did download three that played ok
Poor support. This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet
TRUTH. this film was funded by the centeral intelligence agency in the 1950s and was maipulated to suit the need of a capitalistic propoganda machin
Nothing Golden About This One. This film is based on a concept that has potential - a mathematical key to the interconnectedness of all things - but it doesn't deliver.  Clearly, the writer wants us to believe that there is one elusive key to the intriguing patterns all around us, but he pretty much drops the ball right there.  Usually with this sort of plot, you are at least given the illusion that *someone* knows the answer and what's more has some clue about what to do with it as well.  There's no such suspension of disbelief in this one, nor even an attempt at such.Adding injury (if you count eye strain) to insult, the whole thing is shot in grainy B&W with annoying MTV-style jump cuts.  In the awards for Obnoxious Splash Films of the Year, this one takes the cake, but not the Pi
A great B-Movie. Many have seen this movie on TV many times. For a B-movie it is great fun and interesting to watch. No extras on the DVD. I wish they did add something from behind the scenes, etc
This is Horrible. I love the Avatar and I was so thrilled that amazon allows people to download it except the only problem is I've been trying for the past days and darn it all, it's not working!!! It's not as if I'm downloading it for free. I am willing to pay and yet it just wouldn't go through!!! I think it's better to just buy the dvds...I think it's absolutely horrible to tease customers like that..
I Don't See Why People Like This. I'm sorry, but I really don't! It's a style called Celtic Drama, which means it's a combination of stories w/o words and traditional Irish Dancing.I've never been a Michael Flatley person.Parts of this are traditional Irish dancing, but other's aren't anywhere near it! There are also long songs, sort of like a choir piece. I don't like those at all.If you want to see traditional Irish dancing, this is not your movie
Warning Incomplete Episode!!!. The episodes in this series have an average running time of 50 minutes. This one happens to be only 18 minutes. This mean sthat the file abruptly stops right in the middle. Even though it only cost me $2 I still got jipped.  Let's hope Amazon can iron out these kinds of problems before they get this service farther underway. Be careful enough to sheck the running times to be sure they seem accurate before you buy them
Great for the Zen Vision. At first I didn't realize that you have to use Amazon's software to load onto the Zen.  Once I figured that out (actually my husband figured that out) the show played perfectly and it was very easy to do.  I wasn't able to edit the stars.  If I could I would give this 5 stars.  If you have tried some other sites for the Zen, they are much more difficult to use. Amazon's Unbox is great for the Zen
Poor support. This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet
Interesting. When I saw the first &quot;It's Alive&quot; movie in the theatre when I was 17, it scared me so bad I couldn't sleep alone for 3 nights. Funny, when I saw it the other night, I could not figure out what scared me. It is such a funny movie. The cinematography is extremely bad, but I guess it was good for 1976 or whenever it first came out. This movie is not as good as the first and I'm going to watch the third tonight. I'm expecting it to be equally bad
Indeed, Reality Bites. If this is the generation I am supposed to belong to, I want to disown it.  Ben Stiller's directorial debut centers on four friends recently graduated from collage, and are now trying to find their way in the world.  The movies messege is that we are a lost generation, but that is not are parent's fault (where this movie tries to lay the blame).  The kids in this movie are just lazy, more or less.  And they spend their free time trying to make meaning out of their lives.  Indeed, Troy (Ethan Hawke) even tries to ratinalize stealing a candy bar by saying society ows him.  Winona Ryder plays waify Lelina, who makes a documentry out of recorded footage she has of her friends.  One day she meets Michael (Ben Stiller) who is their age but has made a good career out of the TV industry.  Ethan hates him for his honest approach to life, and so the battle for Lelina's love begins.  I really wasn't too impressed with this movie, it just made it seem like my peers are just wallowing in self pity for the sake of being the cool, tortured artist; when they should get off the couch and go get a job
Primarily focused on puppy socialization. This video did not live up to my expectations.  I have a five-year-old Chihuahua who is somewhat afraid of people and lunges and bites when strangers get too close.The description of the video promised a simple behavior modification program to help deal with his aggression.  Instead, Ian Dunbar simply says that behavior like this in old dogs is very difficult deal with, and focuses on puppy socialization in the video.Well, that's great if I had a puppy, but I adopted an older dog, and I need help now.I don't recommend this video for owners of older dogs with biting problems.  If you have a puppy, it might be somewhat helpful, but there are better books
This is where it all started...it should have ended here, too... This is a terrible, terrible film.  It's incredibly boring, lame, tedious, filled with bad acting, bad direction, etc., etc..  I know it was very popular at the time, but it still is really awful.  I had a difficult time sitting through the whole thing, and it was rather sleep inducing.  I wanted to see at least one of the Friday the 13th films, so I watched this one.  Many of the murders were ripped off from Mario Bava's superior Twitch of the Death Nerve (aka Bay of Blood), so the film wasn't even that original.  As we know, there were roughly around 1000 sequels, 500 TV shows, Jason dolls, Jason's official murder tools, Jason's hockey mask, etc., etc..  The film was one of the biggest hits of 1980, the year Hollywood started to decline.  Coincidence?  Who knows?  I just know I wasted 90 minutes of my time...
A well acted snooze fest with juvenile politics. This is billed as a thriller but there are hardly any thrills.  It would have benefitted from some judicious cutting to make it a little leaner.  The shaky camera work detracts from some decent scenery.The politics of the film contain no subtlety or shades of gray; I can almost see a couple of college sophomores hitting the bong and sitting down to hash out the script:Bong-hitting liberal student who has no clue about the real world #1:  ...and then she discovers the evil corporation has been testing...BHLSWHNCATRW #2: (Interrupts)  "Evil Corporation"?  Why are you being redundant?The only plus for my wife and I was the acting, which was great.  Fiennes was especially good, underplaying his character in the early parts of the film, resulting in a character with depth and nuance.  I only wish the rest of the film was worthy of the performances contained within it
Movies like this make you ask, WAS THIS SEQUEL REALLY NECCESSARY. The original Jungle Book was inventive, whitty, uplifting and charming.  The characters had depth and a beauty that in its time was unique and wonderful.  The original Disney Jungle Book story was told with great feeling that was a source of fun and inspiration to me growing up as an autistic child.  I can honestly say the original Disney Jungle Book movie was the only movie I loved that also touched my heart.Jungle Book 2 is is just a very badly executed attempt at recreating the awesomeness of the The original Disney Jungle Book.  Jungle Book 2 fails in all attempts to recreate any of the magic of the original Disney Jungle Book.  Jungle Book 2 is endlessly bland overall filled with nothing at all to justify wasting a moment of your life watching.  You will be better and more deeply entertained for hours watching newly poured cement dry compared to watching a moment of Jungle Book 2.  Don't Waste your time wacthing this garbage it is not worth anyones time or money.  It gets one star only because the amazon system does not allow me to post zero stars or better still stars in negative numbers
Silly disappointing kid movie. Colorado's San Juan Mountains from Durango to Silverton to Ouray is myfavorite place to vacation in the USA.  So when I saw the preview ofDurango Kids on another DVD, I decided to rent it on Netflix.  It isone of those movies where villains are cartoonish, and the kids, whilecute, outsmart all the stupid adults.  The first 30 minutes showed somenice locations in and around Durango, including the steam train (that'swhy I purchased a used copy) but then it goes into time travel to saveOuray from becoming a ghost town and the movie becomes a stupid bore,intended for young and undemanding children.  Don't bother unless youlove Durango as much as I do
Movie is fine - download quality - very poor. This quality of this movie download is awful - small screen -big screen - just gawdawful.  It suffers from false contouring during the darker scenes which make up most of the picture.Not a good online rental at all.Movie was probably fine as movies such as this go -R
Ah. I spent to much to rent this. I was expecting this movie to be great considering this was the guy from Brotherhood of the Wolf. What a disappointment. I fast forward through alot but still couldn't bring myself to finish watching it. The plot is slow and the actions sequences look like a TV shows
Not as good as I remember. When I was 18 watching topless woman was all I needed to Like a sex comedy.Now 30 years later this movie didn't hold up so well.The comedy is not that funny as well
waste of money. Dont purchase episode 5 of season 2, it's 7 minutes long and you dont get any of the Charlie Murphy Prince story.  WTF!!!  Can someone fix this and refund or offer the entire episode for re-download!!!
Terrible. Acting plot and everything is so bad that it made me cry... Dragonheart was breathtaking this is......B.S.. worst acting and story i ever saw in a movi
warning. Not in a long time have i had such a dislike for a movie as i do with Freeway. I am a fan of dark comedies so i thought i might check this movie out, it has reese witherspoon after all, how bad could it be? Well, really bad. First of all on a good note, reese witherspoon is good enough in the movie, although her character isn't all that likeable nor do you empathize with her all that much. But Reese does a good job with what shes given.My main beef with the movie is that i would not call it a dark comedy. It's more like a comedy that also wants to be dark, graphic and serious, or a dark graphic serious movie that wants to be funny. The result is that it's a movie that doesnt know what it is or what it's trying to do. Both the funny parts and the serious parts are horribly mixed together in a way that it feels like two different movies fighting for the screen.But hey, if you find being shot in the neck, or stiff lifeless grandmas with their throats slit and a horrified expression on their face to be funny, you just might like this movie
Not Jet's worse, but man was that bad. Now obviously the new rap music and great american voices they put on make it as bad as possible.  But then again, the movie certainly is no gem in it's original language version, that is for sure.The whole movie had above average action sequences, but the story was unbearable.  Not the story itself, but the execution of it is the worst possible.  It goes from sickening moments to almost little kid parts between Jet and teh girl.  Just freaking horrible.So the dvd is full screened, music is stupid, voice dubbing is almost as bad as the "jet li collection" movies, but you will get a few good points one or two good laughs, and a decent finale.
Bad Device. I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service
A poor man's "Dick". I'm sorry, but this movie is clearly nothing more than and overdramaticized and historically inaccurate retelling of the story much more riotiously and enjoyably portrayed in the film "Dick." "Dick" is funny, this is not. I'm sorry, but Dustin Hoffman simply does not have the acting chops to stand up to someone like Kirsten Dunst (or that level of indefatigable cuteness).Just go rent "Dick" instead. You'll thank me, yourself, and those fine ladies who saved our country
Movies like this make you ask, WAS THIS SEQUEL REALLY NECCESSARY. The original Jungle Book was inventive, whitty, uplifting and charming.  The characters had depth and a beauty that in its time was unique and wonderful.  The original Disney Jungle Book story was told with great feeling that was a source of fun and inspiration to me growing up as an autistic child.  I can honestly say the original Disney Jungle Book movie was the only movie I loved that also touched my heart.Jungle Book 2 is is just a very badly executed attempt at recreating the awesomeness of the The original Disney Jungle Book.  Jungle Book 2 fails in all attempts to recreate any of the magic of the original Disney Jungle Book.  Jungle Book 2 is endlessly bland overall filled with nothing at all to justify wasting a moment of your life watching.  You will be better and more deeply entertained for hours watching newly poured cement dry compared to watching a moment of Jungle Book 2.  Don't Waste your time wacthing this garbage it is not worth anyones time or money.  It gets one star only because the amazon system does not allow me to post zero stars or better still stars in negative numbers
could not be viewed!. i downloaded it and i couldn't view the video paste the intro. then i RE-downloaded it thinking that maybe it was a corrupt file, but it again it only had sound and not video. this one is a waste of money
SAMUEL JACKSON, A PHARMACOLOGICAL GENIUS. YEAH! SURE!. TALKING ABOUT A MISSCAST. SAMUEL JACKSON CAN PORTRAY A HITMAN, A PIMP OR A THIEF, BUT A PHARMACOLOGICAL GENIUS, YEAH, RIGHT
Survivor Rip Off. I have bought 2 seasons of Survivor on unbox and both of them are not complete. Very dissapointing. Guatemala  episode 11 is from a completely different season and it is missing the last 2 episodes and the reunion show. Just leaves you hanging. Exile Island is missing the final episode it just goes from the competition between Danielle and Cirie for a spot in the final 3 to the live reunion show
The Last Picture Show Meets Von Ryan's Express. Unless you are seriously into coming of age movies you can skip this one.  Critics love this film because it conforms to the modern liberal message that you should have sex with basically anyone.  The attempt to make the protagonist Milos into a tragic hero as a resistance fighter fails because it is obviously unimportant addition to the main story, which is that a young man should have sex early and have sex often
Americo-trash. This is the dumbest, most predictable, horrible waste of time i've ever ever seen.  This movie tried very very hard to be funny and simply wasn't.  It took a pretty good idea and butchered it by cliche jokes and feel good high school humor that's supposed to encourage all of us angsty youngings to go to europe, drink, and copulate with any random gorgious blonde that happens to walk past us.  After watching this movie I felt incredible stupid and regret being apart of a culture that could make such main stream trash.  my only hope is that our european friends didn't seen this for it would most certainly cause an international incident
Anti-Southern Propaganda. This movies rates right up there with "Schindler's List" . . . in terms of unapologetic propaganda.  Fortunately, Ted Turner showed some remorse for this hatchet job by making "Gettysburg," and the even better "Gods and Generals."If you want to see a real, accurate depiction of the War For Southern Independence (aka, The Civil War), watch "Gods and Generals" or "Gone With The Wind," and stay away from movie garbage like "Andersonville."Also watch for the extended version DVD of "Gods and Generals" coming for the Christmas season of 2005.
Great for the Zen Vision. At first I didn't realize that you have to use Amazon's software to load onto the Zen.  Once I figured that out (actually my husband figured that out) the show played perfectly and it was very easy to do.  I wasn't able to edit the stars.  If I could I would give this 5 stars.  If you have tried some other sites for the Zen, they are much more difficult to use. Amazon's Unbox is great for the Zen
Uncle Buck with John Candy. This movie was not entertaining at all, bad script, etc
Bad Device. I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service
Aims low and hits its target. This straight-to-video's modest budget is attested to by the fact that while most of the action is supposed to take place at a large state prison, this prison only seems to house about 12 inmates. The plot is that old but reliable one about a man posing as a prisoner so he can go "undercover" and solve a crime. The crime in this case is not especially interesting and it's resolved in much too pat a fashion. However, leading man Tommy Lee Thomas looks good with his shirt off, (though he seems too small to be throwing his weight around), and there's a torture scene, (modeled on the one in "Lethal Weapon"), in which he's hanged by his wrists and zapped with electric shocks. Mr. Thomas' performance may not be of Oscar caliber but he does know how to yell.
The creator of M*A*S*H wrote this?. I was surprised to see Larry Gelbart wrote the screenplay of this unfunny movie.  I can recall very few laughs in this film.  The premise of the film is to highlight the greed of the 1980's, but the lesson is quite dated in the era of Enron and WorldCom.  The greed here is apparent and at least honest and upfront, in contrast to the dishonesty and deception of some of the greed of the late 1990's.  As for the message, I certainly don't think the shareholders of RJR Reynolds minded being courted so well.  If I were a shareholder of a slumping company I'd be mighty grateful to live in a society where people have the freedom to pay whatever crazy price they want for my stock!  James Garner is wonderful in this show, and the movie does a nice job of laying out the business concepts in terms your grandmother can understand.  I do have to confess, however, to dozing a bit in the middle of this movie, so perhaps I missed the funny parts
Why the Charge. Curious as to why Amazon would charge for this content when CBS offers it for free on the official Survivor Website.  Yeah, at the CBS site you have sit through 4 commercials, but it is worth it to not have to download any extra programs
Has Some Redeeming Points But... Giving you a brief rundown where I stand, I thought Part 1 was pretty good; part 2 had some interesting things about it; I didn't much like Part 3; part 4 started to pick up the pace again; part 5 was surprisingly good; I think Part 6 was arguably the best; I didn't like part 7. This 8th chapter was a little better than part 7, but that is not saying much. The story begins with Jason being brought back to life with the help of electricity. (This reuses the technique from Part 6, but it doesn't bring back the same impact.) Jason claims his 1st 2 victims and then makes his way to a boat full of teenagers heading towards New York. Here, the story starts to lose credibility. At least Part 6 made sense when he headed back to Crystal Lake: "Jason will return to the area that's familiar to him. No matter what you call it, it's still Camp Crystal Lake to him." (So, in this 8th chapter, why does Jason go out of his way to board a ship heading for New York?) I know some people thought it was interesting to see Jason aboard a ship, and that it added something to see Jason's potential victims trapped on a ship. I admit this is a valid defense for the movie, but my question is: "Why did Jason go out of his way to board this ship in the first place?" Moving on, one of Jason's possible victims is a fairly well developed character (Rennie) who has a tragic past with water, and has hallucinations of Jason. Alright, I admit this is one interesting thing. Rennie's uncle Charles is not exactly the nicest person. (But unlike Dr. Cruise from Part 7, at least Charles has some redeeming features. At times, his concern for Rennie seems genuine; when Sean's father is killed, Charles takes a moment to offer a bit of sympathy; and at times, he is concerned over the safety of others.) Another interesting character is Sean (the son of the captain). He wants to please his father, but feels he will be unable to become the captain that his father is. However, becoming the captain his father wants him to may be the only way to save at least a few of the people on the ship. Alright. Another redeeming feature. Moving on, there is the typical high body count, but 5 people manage to escape to New York City. Unfortunately, they run into 2 thugs who rob them and run off with Rennie. (Another redeeming moment for Charles is at least he shows discretion in trying to rescue Rennie.) Naturally, it isn't long before Jason arrives in New York City. Another problem I have with this movie is: "Why does Jason go out of his way to hunt down these 5 people in a whole city?" At least the previous movies made sense. Early in Part 2 we learn that Jason will take revenge on anyone who enters his territory again. And in Parts 2, 3, 4, 6, and even 7, at least Jason was staying in his own domain attacking anyone who happened to be there. To be sure, in Part 6, Jason did attack some people away from the camp grounds, but at least he was on his way back to the area that was familiar to him. Moving on, there was one other element I had to admit was somewhat redeeming. We all know Jason is a brutal killer, but in one scene he is portrayed as almost heroic when he unwittingly saves Rennie from the two thugs that kidnapped her and were trying to rape her. (Interesting twist I admit.) I'll admit it was comical when 2 of the last 5 people screamed for help because they were being chased by a murderer, and a waitress could only say: "Welcome to New York." And of course, in a typical Friday the 13th fashion, 2 people manage to survive the massacre and come out alive. I'll admit this isn't the worst Friday the 13th. (That honor is shared between Parts 3 and 7.) I'll conclude by saying that this 8th chapter does have some redeeming moments, and you may find it to be an interesting twist. But you have to be willing to swallow some things that aren't consistent with the rest of the series. If you're willing to do this, then you will probably will enjoy it more than I did.
Survivor Rip Off. I have bought 2 seasons of Survivor on unbox and both of them are not complete. Very dissapointing. Guatemala  episode 11 is from a completely different season and it is missing the last 2 episodes and the reunion show. Just leaves you hanging. Exile Island is missing the final episode it just goes from the competition between Danielle and Cirie for a spot in the final 3 to the live reunion show
Didn't Really Do It For Me. I just rented this movie this weekend because so many people had been telling me that it was great.  But I felt kind of let down after watching it.  It starts of well by giving the characters a brief introduction, but we really don't get to know any of them that well, except maybe Kurt Russell, so who really cares who dies?  There's no real build up to the huge wave hitting the ship; everything is fine, then the captain tells everyone to be quiet and listen, Richard Dreyfuss looks outside, and the wave hits; it's not all that intense.Then the rest of the movie is the main characters trying to find a way to get outside the ship.  But it gets kind of repetetive and boring, because they just go from one room to another.  It's like they get into one room, someone says "Here, this is the only way out."  Someone else says that maybe there's another way, but the other person says there isn't, then the water's coming, so they have to get out of that room quickly.  When they make their way into the next room, it's the same thing over and over again.When they finally get off of the ship, they get into a raft and the entire ship goes down right after they get off.  Then a guy shoots a flare, helicopters come, and the movie's over.So basically, this movie gets boring and repetetive and you just keep asking yourself when it will be over.  This is one movie I know I won't be buying
The Product has not reached me yet. This is bring to your notice that the product that i have orderd has not reached me yet. I request you to do the needful.Thanking youPrince Georg
WARNING: Wrong Episode!. This item is supposedly titled "UFOs: The First Encounters." It is, however, an episode about reincarnation. It is incorrectly labeled. DO NOT PURCHASE unless you are looking for an episode on reincarnation
Couldn't watch the whole thing. The best parts of this film were the minute-long landscape shots, free of dialog and narrative.  At those points you could almost forget the absolute dullness of every character and plot aspect.Contrary to the gushing of the majority, this is not even a love story so much as it is a celebration of selfishness and treating others poorly.  Don't let the WWII period piece propaganda fool you on this.  Granted, I turned it off after 1.5 hours out of sheer dread and boredom, so maybe this flaming sack of doo redeemed itself in the last hour.
If all you want is yoga positions this video is for you... I was disappointed in this video.  I was looking forward to doing a routine with my 5+ year old and trying to start her on self-regulatory techniques.  The video merely did a well-paced run through of various poses, but gave no structure or routine to follow.  Most disappointing
Defective Recording. This recording is simply DEFECTIVE.It opens with a disclamer about the quality of the recording, and boy, they are not kidding!This is not a simple case of VHS quality on a DVD.  Instead the video quality is comporable to the first live broadcast from the 1969 moon landing.  And the audio quality is in the same league as early cheap casette recorders, complete with pitch shifts..It is clear that abosoltely no attempt was made to clean up or remaster this recording.  Even the title credits suffer from from jitter distortion and there is time base noise at the bottom of each frame.Some example frames at VienneseBall dot org slash PiratesThis is particularly criminal because it was such a superb cast and inspired live performance.I am immediately returning this to Amazon.  This recording should never have been released
An empty Sci-Fi thriller. This is one of those movies where you're just waiting for something to happen but never does. It just meanders along and relies on its special fx, which are quite good, to give the movie any substance at all. A couple of good performances by the cast without being outstanding, but there was only so much they could do with a shallow script. They look lost and wanting to give more but are restricted. There are better, a lot better sci-fi movies out there than this one. Special features aren't very interesting either
Survivor Rip Off. I have bought 2 seasons of Survivor on unbox and both of them are not complete. Very dissapointing. Guatemala  episode 11 is from a completely different season and it is missing the last 2 episodes and the reunion show. Just leaves you hanging. Exile Island is missing the final episode it just goes from the competition between Danielle and Cirie for a spot in the final 3 to the live reunion show
AMAZON SUCKS. I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!
Hollow. Terrible.  One Good Line Quoted Here. The characters are not appealing and the story is not interesting. An effort to watch. Make-up, dyed hair, costumes poorly done. One man's eyebrows, the suitor's, are altered like a woman's! No scenery or homes of interest, except a glance at the sailing ships in the harbor. Not a pleasant pace, without humor, without intrigue. A lesbian undertone in one scene.The only positive thing I can think of is this good line of Jane Austen, quoted. Fanny sums up in one sentence, why she will not marry him. Women who have spent hours within romance in uncertainty, will wish to sum up their certainty with Ms. Austen's line: "His sole interest is in being loved, not in loving". This line is an exception to a lifeless script.There, now you do not need to endure the painful movie. Here are two lines re-written by me: For the woman dealing with a trifling man: "No man suffers pains of love on the stage." For dealing with the infatuated man: "You have wounded yourself, but not with love."This movie should be re-made by someone sharing the ideals of Jane Austen. There is plenty to be mined from the novel to create a pleasant film, humorous, with singing, with interest. A movie can take the best of the book, in the spirit of the book, which this movie did not carry, and make a movie better than the book. This movie is bad any which way.Well-made period romance films are: "Pride & Prejudice 2005, 1996, & 1940", "Wives & Daughters", "North & South". Fairly made is "Under the Greenwood Tree". I rated "Persuasion" at 2-stars for the wooden acting; however "Persuasion" is 5-stars compared to this "Mansfield Park". "Persuasion" has attractive scenery, costumes, beautiful singing, and an uplifting plot; though of interest only to women, preferably who have already read the book.
"Is this rotten or is it all terribly brave?". The Adventures of Sherlock Holmes' Smarter Brother isn't Mycroft but the `forgotten' third brother Sigerson (actually the assumed name Holmes used in The Adventure of the Empty House), and there's a lot to forget about this failed attempt to do for the Holmes family what Gene Wilder did for the Frohnkensteens. Without a collaborator on the screenplay and taking the directorial reins himself, as well as the starring role, there's far more unfettered self-indulgence here than wit. There's thankfully a little less pointless hysteria from Wilder than usual, although this is sadly more than compensated for by excessive yelping from Leo McKern and tedious showboating from Dom De Luise (now there's a surprise). Indeed, this may well be the only film in which chronic overactor Aubrey Morris gives the most restrained performance. There's also an excess of messy eating and childish humor to contend with, not to mention the unforgivable waste of Marty Feldman's unique talents in a dull sidekick role. There is one funny sequence in a ballroom and a couple of moments where the ideas are good enough to survive the sledgehammer execution, but when Albert Finney, in a one-shot cameo in the film's Night at the Operatic finale, turns to the camera to ask "Is this rotten or is it all terribly brave?", it's not difficult to come up with an answer.As with The World's Greatest Lover, Fox's DVD offers a decent 1.85:1 widescreen transfer as well as a fullscreen version, with optional original mono or remastered stereo mixes. Aside from the theatrical trailer and trailers for three other Wilder films (Young Frankenstein, The World's Greatest Lover and Silver Streak) the only extra is an audio commentary by Wilder that is so sparing and uninformative that you'll wonder if you clicked the wrong button on your menu!
My copy a dud. Having first seen this film at university twenty years ago I was really looking forward to watching this scary but masterful political propaganda film once again but my copy was a dud. About 70 minutes into the film it started to get the wobblies. The images became broken up and pixelated and then the image froze altogether whilst the sound continued. Then the sound froze. I had to keep fast forwarding to get through the glitches. QA could not have been to rigorous. The digital reproduction on the DVD is poor at this point and this continues throughout the whole of the SS review.I'll be asking for my money back.
I've been cheated by Amazon. It really sucks, tried to download but it's not able to be viewed in pc's outsided the united states. Crikey.I'll have to wait for reruns to watch it on the telly.Whatta shame amazon dot com. Let's send a CSI to yer headquarters
Don't Waste Your Money!. The best scene in the movie, the "I love the nightlife" disco scene has been edited and the music replaced with some lame tripe. It is painful to watch. They are completely out of step with the music and the song is really awful. Imagine the Godfather with the restaurant scene (where Michael gets the guys who hit his dad) edited out! It ruins the entire movie. Wait for it on cable and tape or Tivo it!
Befuddled. I am completely befuddled that anyone with any love for the book could enjoy this movie. It is merely a monument to Hollywood's stunning inability to read or to understand the simplest moral tale. In Dumas's book the Count learns that he cannot play God--dispensing punishments to the evil and rewards to the good--because of the complex ways in which the wheat and the tares are intertwined in this earthly life. He abandons his project of perfectly just revenge and accepts a new love as a gift from a mysteriously merciful God.Hollywood gives us instead: Triumphant Revenge.
attack of the (totally fake and unconvincing) sharks. how many modern day jaws rip-offs do there need to be. Well! Okay this film i would rank lower than 2 stars if it wasn't for the fat that i liked sharks and i want to be a marine biologist. The other reason was i think Casper Van Dien is good actor with a good career ahead of him. But this movie stunk. In no ways does it compare to jaws nor even Deep Blue Sea. I hated almost every moment of it. If you want to see a good shark movie rent or buy Deep Blue Sea. Or better yet just stick to jaws its still the best after all these years. Don't be fooled this is a waste of time and effort. This film needs some coupe de grace some spice but it gets none. ...
BORING!!!. I liked the first two spy kids movies pretty well. The first one was well done and the acting great. The second one, was maybe a bit less than the first but still entertaining. This movie, however, was incredibly lame and absolutely boring.My brother went to see it with my mom in theaters, and for some reason they came back saying it was soooo good. When it came out on DVD I watched it with my brother. Only twenty minutes into it I was wishing I could leave. All the "Amazing" 3-D, Computer animated sequences were giving me terriblel headaches and I no reason whatsoever to watch this drivel.As a previous reviewer said, the spy kids series lost its charm after the second installment. In this movie they were trying to go out with a bang, but fell miles short of the finish line. The acting seemed stale and unemotional. The humor was lame and not even funny. And the whole things seemed like a weird dream the director thought might make a decent movie.Overall, it seems to me that this was just one mega test for the even worse flop "The Adventures of Sharkboy and Lavagirl". I have no appreciation for this director any more and unless he gives us something good fast, I probably won't be watching anymore of his films any time soon
Average at best. hard to Believe that Sidney Poitier went from Directing a Classic Comedy like "Stir Crazy" to this Music Video not ready for MTV type of Film.very 80's Campy&it was Corny then as it is now
I've been cheated by Amazon. It really sucks, tried to download but it's not able to be viewed in pc's outsided the united states. Crikey.I'll have to wait for reruns to watch it on the telly.Whatta shame amazon dot com. Let's send a CSI to yer headquarters
Stupid softcore DVD. Don't buy this disc unless you are a real Jackie Lovell fan. The best thing in this DVD is Lovell's dance at the end
Same Thing. The Dane Cook episode is the same one that it on his "Harmful If Swallowed" c.d. The c.d. also has the uncensored version of this routine that is over 1 hour long. The one star rating is not based on the content. It is based upon Amazon not sharing this fact with customers
Why the Charge. Curious as to why Amazon would charge for this content when CBS offers it for free on the official Survivor Website.  Yeah, at the CBS site you have sit through 4 commercials, but it is worth it to not have to download any extra programs
assigning blame to the supernatural. The author basically believes that Satan rules the world with the help of evil angels and demons.  He bases this a bit on scripture, but just as much on the fact that it's the best answer he can think of for why, if there is a good God, bad things happen to good people, or good people do bad things. He's fixated on the question of blame (can't blame God because God is good, can't blame the good Christian because that would be unChristian, ergo we should blame Satan). If you're inclined to blame tragedy and sin on Satan and his minions, this is the book for you.  Otherwise, you probably won't make it through the first 50 pages.That said, the author is a good writer and has a lot of powerful anecdotes to illustrate his point.  And his advice is, essentially, to be aware of your own circumstances, desires, and surroundings, and think about the consequences of your choices in light of your faith, which is good (if obvious) advice for anyone.
Beware of Unbox!!!. Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for
Ratner is a lousy film maker.... This man is like Michael Bay.  Using high speed action sequences and terrible casting and script writing, the fact that Chris Tucker appears in this and almost every movie that the man makes signals a trend to do these as not so much movies as they are music video comedys only it's patheic and not funny, and that is also why the man who is now making X-Men 3 will cause that movie franchise to die a quick death at the movies.  The man is a joke
What a bad movie!. I wouldn't recommend this movie, unless you have nothing else to do for the night and want to watch it alone. Due to a high content of bad words, screaming and violence, it's kind of embarrassing watching it with someone else. Some people really enjoyed it, and that's not me, and that's not the other two people I know who watched it. Some violent parts are a bit hard to believe, but I guess that's what the story is about. This movie is a bit of a hollywood-style suspense, with rather cheesy college scenes that are common to comedies.There's one good idea in this movie and that's how life develops as it goes along, and one action or inaction changes how life plays out. But this is no where near original, even the Simpsons had an episode like that.So, this movie is definitely not on my best movies list.
UnBox video not yet working. Will not play once video was downloaded. I get the error message:  "can not play file, please try again later. error# 0x80040273" I made the exlusive give me call me back feature but the UnBox department was already closed, I was told the UnBox Saturday and Sunday 6-5 hours. I have to say I am impressed with the Call back feature. I downloaded the Unbox Beta now and am recieving email assistance to try to resolve the problem. Thanks Amazon UnBox! I will Update again - Feb. 10,200
the cat in the hat. The Cat in the HatBy Dr. SeussBy Shawn Hinz,This book is about a talking cat and two kids. Two kid's parents are gone for the day. The furry talking cat just comes in to there house and takes over the kid's house.Sally and her brother try to talk the cat out of making the house a mess all of the things he is going to do. The cat is trying to entertain the two kids inside the house because it is raining. The cat is tall and is wearing a tall hat with stripes on it and is walking on his two feet.At the kids house the cat messes  everything up in the house while the kid's mother is gone.The more trick's the cat pulls the more the house is messed up. They did not trust the cat because he just walked through the door and takes over. But the cat has two friends and they help the cat mess up the house.People should not just let any buddy walk in there house. You need to trust people when they come in your house when your parents are not home. The mom of the two kids did not find out that the cat was in the house.The two kid's house was really messed up. The kids where thinking that to never let the cat in the house when there mom is not home or ever again. The mother of the two kids never found out that the cat was at the house and that the cat messed up the house.
This is Horrible. I love the Avatar and I was so thrilled that amazon allows people to download it except the only problem is I've been trying for the past days and darn it all, it's not working!!! It's not as if I'm downloading it for free. I am willing to pay and yet it just wouldn't go through!!! I think it's better to just buy the dvds...I think it's absolutely horrible to tease customers like that..
Why did they bother..... I am a Van Damme fan and still hold out for the day when he makes a return to the big screen. I bought this recently and now wish I hadn't. Unfortunatly with this entry it seems Van Damme has decided to self-destruct what remains of his career. I hope he made this during his drug addiction years, if not, then I think he has received one to many kicks to the head and should consult a doctor. Very predictable throughout which by no means is a bad thing if only the film was enjoyable and didn't treat its audience as if they were 10 year olds. Logic seems to have been thrown out the window along with the two page script. Rent this before parting with your hard earned cash if only to see the fight scene in the lapdancing club! Van Damme has shown some glimmer of hope with Desert Heat and Replicant but I think the good old days of Kickboxer, Timecop, Universal Soldier and Sudden Death are long over
2.5 stars. Alright. So I had intended to see this movie upon its release way back and just really never got to it. A week or so ago it was playing on Oprah's Oxygen network and I was very happy that I would finally be able to see it. Overall, it was alright. So then it was on again the next day and I couldn't stomach watching it again.It may be called Brown Sugar, but the plot moves slower than molasses. It is way too predictable and sweet, with very little substance. It wasn't even all too interseting the first time around and I couldn't stand seeing it a second time. There's a reason why these movies are on TV, people. No need to purchase the DVD. As soon as I saw it once, I had gotten my dose and wanted no more
This movie ruined my life. Bad Moon begins in some South American country where Michael Pare and his girlfriend are attacked by a werewolf. The movie stumbles quickly into the perspective of Thor, a wonderfully loyal german shepherd owned by Mariel Hemingway (Whom I tend to think is kind of scary looking with her weird cheekbones and her sunken eyes) and her son (the little boy who played Dennis the Menace). Michael Pare, who is Mariel's brother, soon comes into the picture, struggling to come to grips with the attack and his living a life as a werewolf. At first, you feel pity for his character...I mean, the guy witnessed his lover attacked and eaten by a monster and is now himself living the life of the beast...but, you soon feel nothing but disgust and hatred towards the man when he decides to have a mental battle with Thor. The movie was scary and tense in parts and the gore factor was high , but I had such a hard time with some scenes in the film. I was VERY disturbed by the scene where Michael Pare's character entices Thor to bite him, therefore getting Thor hauled off by Animal control people in a truly heartwrenching scene that still to this day makes me sick. The movie is good in some aspects, The directing is good and you truly fear for the people in the situations they are in. The Creature effects are excellent and I much rather prefer costume/physical makeup werewolves over the newer, Van Helsing type Werewolf that CGI designs have come up with. There is NOTHING worse than a computer animated werewolf, just watch the movie CURSED to see what I mean. This movie, to me, is all about watching a poor territorial dog who wants to protect his owners, get pushed around. The CGI in this movie was awful just because it was 1996 and CGI was pretty much new to movies at that time, so the transformation scene in the end was a crapfest. The hero of the movie, Thor, is what I am giving this movie 2 stars for, because the dog really does pull through for the viewer and make them care. You kind of watch the movie only for the dog. You want the dog to live and get through it-and almost could care less about the family by the end of the film. Overall, the movie was scary and the werewolf was pretty good compared to some of the crap that has been out there in the past, but the dog getting knocked around and tortured throughout the movie was enough to ruin my life forever. At least the ending was somewhat happy....I was somewhat confused by the dream she had-but it seems to end with everything alright. Oh well, the movie was decent but could have been longer and could have had less traumatic incidents involving the dog
Bad Movie. Do not, do not purchase this movie.  I just finished seeing it for the first time recently, and I can say hands down that this was far and away the worst movie that Steven Seagal has ever made.  Although I am not a prude, the language was disgusting with Mother F***** this and Mother F****** that every 10 seconds.  The plot went nowhere and it was filled with  unnecessary violence.  Most of his old movies went somewhere, but this one was one violence, bad language filled scene after scene after scene.  If you liked the old Steven Seagal movies, you won't like this one
Did I ever tell you about the time I invented snowboarding?. Out Cold tries hard to capture the tween audiences without fully using the infamous "raunch" button to be successful.  It tries hard to give the audience a graceful combination of physical humor, sexual slap-stick, classic Hollywood references, and X-treme sport clips, but in the end it face plants hard into the cinematic pavement.  While I will not be generous to this film, I will begin this review by mentioning how proud I am of Out Cold.  Again, this was nowhere near a good film, but as a person that watches films on a consistent basis, I saw Out Cold as a film that tried really hard to be humorous, original, and creative, but just failed miserably.  One must give credit to those films that fail while trying, because so many films today just, honestly, fail to try.  Unoriginality seems to be a common theme among these tween films, as big boobs, beer drinking, and clich characters invade the screen more often than humorous dialogue that invades your mind and into modern culture.  Out Cold aims towards a general audience that I despise.  That audience is one that will pay top dollar for stupid humor that demonstrates no talent and a considerable lack of creativity.  Why do we, as audience members, do that?  Is it that difficult for us to laugh at intelligent humor?  While Out Cold did not begin the trend in Hollywood, it did contribute to it, and thus continuing films like Date Movie, American Wedding, and Dude, Where's My Car to plague our theaters.I think I have spoken enough about my personal belief on why this film was a wart on the back of Hollywood, so let's look at actual reasons why this film tried and failed.  I have to get this first one out in the open.  Why, painfully I ask this question, did the filmmakers see the quality in combining tween humor, snowboarding, and Casablanca together in one film?  The first two matched, but the last was just pure rubbish.  Outside of an adult audience, not many children or teens would catch the classic Hollywood film reference, thus completely ruining the remains of a dying film genre.  Now, when the audience of Out Cold actually connect Casablanca to Out Cold, they will say lines like "This movie is just like Out Cold".  This makes me so angry.  If parents would raise their children correctly in film most will say, "Out Cold took quite a bit from Casablanca", instead of the other way around.  Casablanca needs to come first.  With that said, our biggest pitfall to this film was the characters.  Were there any?  Great question!  I didn't see any.  Instead, I saw actors reacting to certain situations.  There were no definitions to anyone.  Sure, one could argue that there were some "characters" with Pig Pen and Inga, but when I see these moments, I see clichs, not characters.  Anyone can play a druggie, stoner, big-breasted woman, town idiot, and so forth, but it is how that actor chooses to redefine that overused character that really sets a film apart from the rest.  Nothing of the sort happened here.  Jason London was horrid as the title character, and his supposed girlfriend was as bland as Illinois.  Jason's friends were obnoxiously unexciting and Lee Majors walked on set, said his lines, and walked off.  Again, there was nothing of value.  Nobody went beyond the lines on their script, which ultimately hurt the overall viewing experience of this film.If I were to pick one element that kept this film from completely drowning would be the use of David Koechner, of whom I cannot help but laugh at whenever he opens his mouth.  He is the prime example of what I was hoping the direction would be for these filmmakers.  He was a unique character for Bull Mountain and thus created some of the better lines for the film, if only the rest of the cast would have taken his lead.  Yet, I do not blame the cast for it all, the filmmakers (the Malloy brothers) had to make the underlying decision to either make another tween film, or sharpen the humor and aim towards a smarter audience.  As you may or may not have noticed, they went with the latter.  The entire "King of the Mountain" bit was horrendous, not because of the storyline element, but the fact that everyone's beer was flying, nobody recognized anyone, and only the characters we were familiar with were winners.  Just disrespectful to the rest of those that inhabits Bull Mountain.  The funniest bit that I think the Malloys were able to pull off were the brotherly pranks pulled when one was too drunk.  The first one with the polar bear was not funny (rather juvenile), but the one with the car continues to put a smile on my face.  It was this type of humor that I was expecting the entire film, but overall continued to keep falling short.Overall, Out Cold felt like your last pick to be your date for prom.  Sure, there were some elements that were decent enough to smile at, but most of the time you were embarrassed to be seen with her in public.  I am tired of this tween genre of film, and while I know that due to an increasing decline in intelligence in our theaters we will only continue to see more of this type of movie, I am still tired of it.  It is as if most directors are just using the "cut & paste" feature on their editing machines bringing us the same jokes that have been told once with success, but over time, they just become boring.  Again, I will say that of most of the films in this genre, Out Cold did try a bit harder to be beyond the mold, but in the end it was nothing spectacular.  I don't think I could muster the strength to watch it again.Grade: ** out of ****
Nope. I was not into this movie at all.  My mother recommended it to me but it was lame all the way through.  A middle-aged man decides he wants to do something different with his life, so he takes a dance class.  Ofcourse there's a fine dance instructor, a crush is pursued, a wife gets jealous, hires a detective, and *gasp* his crush is found out.  The movie was too predictable and it just wasn't for me.  Not a bad movie, just not my cup of tea.  Richard Gere was cute as usual, which was the only thing that made me watch it to the end, besides wanting to know what a correct quick step looked like since "So You Think You Can Dance" never had contestants who mastered it
Bad Device. I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service
order not received. i ordered THIRD MAN ON THE MOUNTAIN DVD.....before i ordered this DVD.....was sometime in January 2007 and i paid for top speed delivery.....i received the other DVD in my order but not THIRD MAN ON THE MOUNTAIN DVD.....nothing yet....can u look into where it is please......i have emailed before but have not received any response...and wont order again from AMAZON\thank youGlenda Papa
Almost Good. I can respect director Adam Marcus for trying to pull away from the series and do something different, but we already had the BS Ft13th movie: Part V.  Jason wasn't the killer.  Technically, Jason is the killer in this movie, but it's not really.  You'll see what I mean when you see the movie, and it is worth a see, but by the 7th or 8th movie, they were movies for the fans.  They stopped making them to be innovative by the 5th movie and were just making them to make money and entertain the audience.  Adam Marcus wanted to be innovative with Jason Goes to Hell, and it doesn't work.  Not for fans or an average audience.  There's nothing interesting about seeing random people who act like Jason walking around and killing people, not to mention WITHOUT the trademark machete.  They could've at least given these people a little personality with the machete, but whoever called that one thought they were doing the series a favor.  The introduction of Jason having a sibling, niece, and now a great niece (I think?) by the 9th movie in the series is a little too late, sorry.  We would've had to know about these people by at least the 3rd or 4th movie to make us care about their struggle.  Another thing:  Jason as a snake/demon creature crawling around the floor?  Hmm... I wasn't under the impression that Jason was really evil in the first place.  Let me explain:  Jason has been made out to be mentally/physically disabled.  If Ginny in Part 2 was able to convince him that she was his mother by wearing her sweater, than Jason isn't evil at all, he just loves his mom and kills all the victims because he believes that they're responsible.  So, Jason as a wierd little hell creature doesn't necessarily work when bringing it into the context of the other movies.  The design of Jason's actual appearances in the movie doesn't make sense either.  What happened between part 8 and 9 to get his mask somehow buried and melded into his face?  Why does he look fat?  Where did his hair come from?  At least Part 8 had some respect for the look and personality of Jason, while it might not have been the best in the series it was at least satisfying to see him the way we know him, and not make drastic changes which don't even benefit his appearance.  Adam Marcus, I can respect you for trying to make your own movie, and yeah, it's definately yours.  Don't try and make your own movie the 9th movie in a series of movies that are about the fans, and don't BS the fans with your idea of an improvement of the series.I'd say, fans should see this movie just to see it.  It's worth the view and the surprise cameo at the end.  *wink*
Wonderful program, but flawed files... Okay, so to catch up on this exciting new series, I decided to try this revolutionary downloading program - Amazon Unbox!  I selected the first 10 episodes and hit Purchase.  Minutes later, I was watching the first episode, it came quickly, sounded great, and looked wonderful... however the second one was missing a few minutes at the end.  Forgiveable, until... whole episodes starting arriving incomplete or had missing video, making it incredibly frustrating and disappointing.But, this IS a good concept... unfortunately, Amazon has yet to verify all their own files for both audio and picture quality!  So, until the issue is fixed and paying customers recieve completed files or refunds... DO NOT try and download Season 1, Episodes 2, 4, 5, 6, and 7!!!  1, 3, 8, 9, and 10 were the only ones that were 100% complete for me
Don't even bother watching this movie. This movie is not at all for a hard core horror movie fan.There was was way too much waiting around for something to happen butnothin ever did...
Avoid this drivel at all costs. if amazon allowed zero stars, this would get it. absolutely awful.
Cant watch. I downloaded this program and it was garbled and video as if played in slow motion.  This is the first of two downloads that didn't play.  I know it was not my computer because I did download three that played ok
Agent Dread!. This movie is so bad, it barely deserves mention. However, I am a big DL fan, and I am writing this in the hope that Dolph will not abandon his fans---he may be making movies like this just for the $$, but, I believe, he is also doing irreparable damage to his career
AMAZON SUCKS. I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!
Avoid this bootleg. This DVD is a poor quality bootleg. The real U.S. title of this film is "Master Killer", but the original title is "36th Chamber of Shaolin". A company called Celestial owns the worldwide copyright on ALL Shaw Brothers movies. Their digitally remastered DVD has been available for a couple of years, and puts this bootleg to shame. That catch is that you must purchase it from a Hong Kong based web site. Amazon is not allowed to sell it, so they have listed this bootleg. Find a Hong Kong based web site and purchase the official DVD
Unclever and Unfunny. Now, I am a tough critic. So, if you're a tough critic, read up. Don't watch this movie. Unfortunately, Robin Williams is not Jon Stewert. While Williams is funny in many roles, he is not funny as a political satire. The entire movie hinges on his humor, which unfortunately falls flat taking the rest of the movie with it. Do yourself a favor and take the time you would have taken to watch this movie and watch 4 episodes The Daily Show instead - you'll laugh and think more
Infested, or a sharp stick in the eye? Take the stick. Infested (Josh Olson, 2002)It's really kind of impressive that a movie this bad doesn't get shelved somewhere along the line. And yet here it is, in all its painfully cheesy glory, on my screen, daring me to turn it off. I almost gave in to the temptation, but I kept watching. For you, dear reader, so I can give you a full account of the true horror to be found here-- the ninety minutes of your life that you will never be able to get back if you rent this movie and sit down to watch it.The story, what there is of it: A number of friends show up at the estate of one of their high-school buddies, who's killed himself. There's all the post-funeral bonding stuff, and everything's looking remarkably Big Chill when things go horribly, horribly wrong thanks to vicious, genetically-altered flies that possess humans and turn them into soulless murderers. Yes, you got that right.As usual, the only reason to watch a movie like this is the cheesecake factor. Any Jo Johnson plays the dead guy's girlfriend (well, ex, I guess), and there is an obligatory scene where she shows a whole lot of skin. It is not, however, an out-and-out nude scene. Sorry, guys. There is also the gorgeous Lisa Ann Hadley (General Hospital/Port Charles), who's really starting to look like Kate Hodge. (This is a good thing. A very good thing.)You're certainly not watching for the special effects, (amateur even by microbudget-indie standards), the acting (atrocious), the script (even worse), the direction (competent at best), the cinematography (ditto), the soundtrack (cheesy early eighties pop that should have faded into obscurity years ago), or, really, anything else. So it's gotta be the cheesecake. And that's all well and good, but you can do that on fast-forward. I strongly suggest that route. At least you'll waste less time on this. (half
Corny, clunky, a deserved turkey of the early 90s. The Rocketeer is the cinematic version of all the faux-Deco buildings that have been erected in recent years around Los Angeles, particularly the Miracle Mile area. It's wafer-thin nostalgia masks a chintzy story that can't stand on its own two feet.The plotting of The Rocketeer is sound enough for adolescent fare. Unfortunately, the characters are totally uninspired and the dialogue atrocious. Worse still is the execution of the material. Every actor is miscast and thoroughly lacking in charisma. Bill Campbell -- ever hear of him anymore? He overacts every single scene. Timothy Dalton? Hammy. Jennifer Connelly is the only one to come out unscathed.The direction is beyond weak. When The Rocketeer appears at the nightclub it is so poorly staged, so cloyingly "goofy" that it extinguishes the promise of anything remotely thrilling from happening. Add to this foul mixture a horrendous James Horner score... you get the idea. Still, some nice set design and an effective animated film-within-a-film make for a couple high points.
Dont get "Fiji" final week ... Dont dwnld " Survivor, "Thunderstorms & Sacrifice" ". Its my fault for not reading the whole thing. you would think that the last episode would be the finale , but NO, its just a 10 minute recap going to the finale 4. I didnt even get a full 45 minute episode. No finale. I got rippped off. $1.99 dwnld not well spent. Dont bother dwnldng any episode of fiji if you dont know the ending. Because they dont have that episode, not even the reunion show
kind of aimless. I found this movie somewhat entertaining, although the intertwining stories were a mixed bag of annoying and fun. Unfortunately the fact that the stories each receive only limited attention, and the story changes from one focus to another storyline entirely just as things start to seem interesting, makes this film a bit frayed and taxing to the patience. Nevertheless, the film is about a whole host of young people, dressed up and heading for a party (ostensibly Martha Plimpton's party), but they never quite make it there. Plimpton, someone I never really cared for, is actually rather funny in this role, and in fact hilarious when she misses her own party (and her idol, Elvis Costello). Christina Ricci and Gaby Hoffman are both quite funny; Courtney Love, Paul Rudd and Janeane Garofalo are also quite a trio. Overall this is light comedy; nothing special but still worth the effort.
You'll Never Get Rich. This is not one of Fred's better efforts,  the dancing is so so and Rita Hayworth is among his poorest dance partners.  Lacks the glamor and sex appeal of the Astaire/Rogers films.  In spite of these shortcomings the film is worth watching
Not happy. This is only a portion of this episode.  It cuts off in the middle of a sentence
A lot of green light and not much else. Rule number one if you're making a Stephen King movie, especially if it's a TV movie; make it scary or don't make it at all!  THE TOMMYKNOCKERS fails to do this miserably!  For most of the film, you're watching a lot of green light and a lot of silly inventions.  Granted, that's all in the book, but it written chillingly by King in a way only he can do it.  There are some exciting alien moments at the end, but by then it's too late.  You've just spent three hours watching a bad knock off of an X-FILES episode.On the plus side, I had no problem watching the infamous Traci Lords act like like a total slut!  Bless her
the name says it all. this movie is one of the 3 ~worst~ movies I've ever seen.these 98 minutes seemed more like 6 hours.and for chrissake - he's NOT an american
The most overrated foreign movie of all time. I saw this on TCM years ago and i thought what is all the fuss about. I do not like how it glorifies that leaving your wife and kid is swell. The men look more like lady's then the men in this movie that are after her. Also this movie is so long and boring. Don't get me wrong i like foreign films even the ones that are slow like wild strawberries, umberto d and such but this one did nothing for me. Another thing his wife is alot more actrative then the woman he desires. You can tell i did not mention character names well i forgotten them i only seen this moive me once and that was enough. A other thing i need to mentin why is that criterion charges so much for there dvds other dvds are restored as well and they are cheaper and most of chiterion dvds do not even have a whole lot of bonus features
What about the missing episodes. Why should one buy this series? What about the missing episodes? Are they going to be added later, or this is it? I cannot believe this. Would you buy a bicycle with a missing wheel? Or a keyboard without the C and R keys? I'd like Amazon to explain its customers what it plans to do..
This is Horrible. I love the Avatar and I was so thrilled that amazon allows people to download it except the only problem is I've been trying for the past days and darn it all, it's not working!!! It's not as if I'm downloading it for free. I am willing to pay and yet it just wouldn't go through!!! I think it's better to just buy the dvds...I think it's absolutely horrible to tease customers like that..
Cult classic...please, a waste of my childhood. i actually saw this movie when i was 7 and it freaked me out abit, but i mean the brother was basically a blob with a face and the story was as bad as the acting. The ending was garbage and it had nothing to offer in todays world.Dont even rent this, i dont even know why you are considering the film.I only give it a 2 star rating because t managed to scare a seven year old and i havent forgot how dumb the film was since.
Too many unanswered questions... I don't have a lot to say about this movie except that it is not your typical mob drama and the family tragedy spewed on some major depression. This movie was not what I expected and the storyline had too many holes in it
Poor Quality. I'm not going to waste a bunch of my time or yours giving a personally oppinionated review of the movie plot. It's redundant and unnecessary, and whether someone likes the story or not is irrelavent. Only you can form an opinion of whether you like it or not by watching it yourself. Double that with the fact that most movies hardly ever line up with the book that's based on and well...My gripe is the transition from putting the movie in it's original format onto DVD was bad. The soundtrack is about 1/2 to 1 second off from the video part of film, therefore the voices don't sync up with the lip movement.
Dont get "Fiji" final week ... Dont dwnld " Survivor, "Thunderstorms & Sacrifice" ". Its my fault for not reading the whole thing. you would think that the last episode would be the finale , but NO, its just a 10 minute recap going to the finale 4. I didnt even get a full 45 minute episode. No finale. I got rippped off. $1.99 dwnld not well spent. Dont bother dwnldng any episode of fiji if you dont know the ending. Because they dont have that episode, not even the reunion show
What's The Worth In It?. My 14 month old son loves the Baby Einstein series.  They've been the only movies to hold his attention.  The sounds and music get his attention, the shapes and colors hold it.That said, this movie never got or held his attention.  There are no interesting sounds or music.  The voices are very monotone.  While I understand the intention of this video, if you don't catch the attention of the child, what's the worth in it?  The pictures on the screen do not corrolate well with what is being said.  I also believe that there is value in learning not only foreign languages, but foreign cultures.  If I knew what was being said when nursery rhymes or poems are recited, I could repeat them in english as an additional learning tool.  All around, this move was disappointing
Highly offensive. I couldn't stomach this movie for long. I kept waiting, hoping for some redeeming quality to emerge but the language, nudity, and explicit sexual content was too much for me so I turned it off and never saw the entire film. If there was any poignant, brilliant story with any depth, it was buried in filth and raunch. I would not recommend film this to anyone. Nicholas Cage or not, it was disgusting.
Not funny. Yeah, those folks in the 50's sure were paranoid and gullible. Ha ha. How anyone could possibly think that the subject of nuclear holocaust and the fear thereof could be milked for a few laughs is pathetic. But even if this film was entirely based on a fictional threat the vast majority of its fitful stabs at humor require a deeper state of inebriation than I would care to endure
JASON TAKES MANHATTAN....,THEY SHOULD'VE JUST CALLED IT FRIDAY THE 13th: TITANIC. This has got to be the most S*~^est Movie ever. It completeley ruined the Friday the 13th Series!Jason did not have Hair and was deformed as a ChildHe was on a Boat for most of the Movie, and appeared in New York at the End!Why the Hell did Jason turn back into a Boy at the End, when he Melted in the Toxic WasteJason's Face is just F$"#ing Stupid at the End. I mean Seriously. He looks like Zippy from F$"#ing Rainbow. Why did they even make it?
A Dissapointment. If you are looking for a production that captures the magic of the original MET production of Amahl and the Night Visitors, stay away from this one, you will be sorely dissapointed and embarassed if you are showing it to others
What's up with that?. I wish I had read the other reviews first.  Though the quality of the episode and the video are top notch, the episode cuts off after 22 minutes.  Obviously, I already know the ending of "The Black Death", but I still wanted to see the full show
Survivor Rip Off. I have bought 2 seasons of Survivor on unbox and both of them are not complete. Very dissapointing. Guatemala  episode 11 is from a completely different season and it is missing the last 2 episodes and the reunion show. Just leaves you hanging. Exile Island is missing the final episode it just goes from the competition between Danielle and Cirie for a spot in the final 3 to the live reunion show
I HATED THIS FILM this film!. After reading all of the reviews, I was so excited to view a great film.  However, after about an hour of waiting for something plausible to happen, it just drifted . . . and drifted . . . and meandered . . . and, oh here's a scene:  she says "No" to the main character advances, and he ignores her initial rejection . . . and then it meanders more into something so absurd that I started to laugh.C'mon, people!  To all of you 4- and 5-star people, just because a film involves beautiful settings and artsy characters, that does NOT constitute a story!!I'm sorry, maybe it's me, but message to the character Claudia in the movie:  If some cad starts coming onto you while he's simultaneously searching for his fiancee (and your friend) who may very well have drowned, then get a 1000 miles away from this scum . . . and to all viewers watching this exercise in self-indulgence and boredom, get a 1000 miles away from this farce of a film.I am an enormous fan of stylish, artistic films, but just like those paintings at fancy museums that are being portrayed as elite art but instead are just simple circles and triangles on a blank canvas, this film is NOT art.  It's just boring, boring, boring, uninteresting.  I could not care about these characters any less, other than poor Anna who disappeared from that island . . . . actually, now that I think about it, Anna was the only smart one there!  She jumped off that island as quickly as she could so as get out of this ostentatious, boring, pompous, self-indulgent, uneventful, dreadful, meandering, dumb film!Way to go, Anna!  You're the only one with any sense.  Even if you did drown, trust me, that is a better fate than having to survive this DULL film.So, in case you didn't get my point, let me spell it out once again:  I HATED this film so completely!  I would rather watch water trickling from my sink.  At least that has a story!!Aaaargh -- I want my 2 hours back!  I gave up 2 precious hours of my life to watch this pathetic film
Lame. Two problems.First problem.  Let's say you're the typical kidnapper-rapist-killer.  For fun and out of postmodern boredom, you kidnap two girls off the street in New York City.  What are the odds that your randomly-chosen getaway and killing spot is going to be exactly where one of the girls lives, 60 or 70 miles away?  One in ten million?  Twenty million?Second problem.  The movie, even with a run time of an otherwise-short 84 minutes, doesn't have enough action or development to fill the void.  In short, it's boring, and in several scenes where Craven seems more interested in the bucolic Wechester County scenery than moving the plot along, I found myself reaching for the fast-forward
PAN & SCAN MARGINALIZES THE PRESENTATION. Unfortunately, the image is cropped to full screen.  Ironically, the trailer included on the disc is in 16X9
disconnected film couldn't even get through the whole film. I must have watched a different film than the below reviewers.  I couldn't even get to the end it seemed so disconnected.  When you have to read the jacket cover to figure out what is going on...something is really wrong.Maybe you have to be a professor to understand this movie but I found it worthless
A FEW LAUGHS HERE AND THERE. PRIVATE RESORT is the kind of movie that was geared towards young adult audiences in the mid-80s when sexual awareness and exposition were the hot ticket in theatres.  However, I'm sure this film is one that Johnny Depp, Hector Elizondo and Rob Morrow aren't proud to have on their resume.The movie's plot is slim, and neither Morrow or Depp have any screen presence in this early stage of their careers.  Elizondo tries gamely and pulls off a few laughs, but he's not at his best either.  Most of the film's laughs come from Leslie Hope as a slightly off kilter cosmic bimbo; Dody Goodman as a dotty old lady who knows karate and Tony Azito as a bumbling hotel security guard.  There's lots of slapstick, some of it works, most of it doesn't.  You can do better, folks
a sorry movie. I wrote a huge review for this and don't know where it is but let me give you the short version.  They don't continue the story, that is until the end of the movie.  AND THAT WAS THE PART TRHAT RUINED THE MOVIE FOR ME. The movie is about this kid from the wudang sword school and he is going to get married.  Enter the Bride.  She of course doesn't want anybody to be happy so...The story is not really worth going over, it is just injected and there are no real emotions.  Except of course for an ending that really PO'ed me.  The only reason this movie gets a 2 stars and almost gets a 3 is for Christy Chung.  Not only is she one of the most beautiful women on earth, she is a great actress.  So I know of 2 movies now that are only worth watching for her, this and Red Wolf.  It may be because the people she works with are so terrible, but to tell the truth, Christy Chung actually made me pop this dvd in for a second time.  Not a big deal since it was only like a 77 minute long movie.
dark shadows 1991. i give this a 1 star because its on vhs tape .until theres a restored dvd copy . i will have to copy my tapes to dvd that i have picture not the best better then nothing .the price on the tapes you have gett real iam not paying that price unless its on dvd . better tell dan curtis to get on the stick and give good dvd copy of it to u
Not the best. To be quite honest, although there was a stunning cast, the plot was gory. It was sweet and had it's element of romance, but it was too morbid for me to enjoy. If you are watching for Drew Barrymore, don't bother. she only  appears halfway through the movie and then only sporadically afterwards.  Dean Cain on the other hand looks mighty fine, if you're after a gay man.  It's not the type of movie you want your children to watch. Trust me
Has not aged well. Q (Larry Cohen, 1982)I have very fond memories of seeing this as a teen, and rented it for the purpose of giving it another look though older eyes. Unfortunately, to say Q hasn't aged well is being quite kind.Quetzalcoatl, the title character, is a very large bird/serpent who's flying around New York eating people who find themselves in high places. At least, he might be Quetzalcoatl (an Aztec god). Or he might just be a big mutant. No one knows. More to the point, no one seems to be overly surprised that there is a large flying serpent picking off New Yorkers. The cops assigned to the case, Shepard (David Carradine) and Powell (Richard Roundtree), certainly take things in stride. The Commissioner (Malachy McCourt, Frank's brother) is the only one who expresses any sort of normal reaction to the events-- disbelief.While the big bird and the cops are the meat of the story, its actual core is Jimmy Quinn (a young Michael Moriarty), a small-time crook who's run afoul of some tough characters through no real fault of his own. Jimmy's odd relationship with the monster could have turned this into a wonderful psychological thriller, and there are glimmers of that sort of thing, but the script never follows through. Q has more the feel of a quickie monster flick-- none of the storylines is explored much beyond the surface, the special effects are alarmingly (and hysterically) low-budget, and the characters, were they to stand still, could often substitute for props.But, hey, it's got a big flying lizard. That's something. *
Stupidity. I've never given one star to any type of produce before, but the stupidity of this DVD and its fans are shocking.So revealing!  So true!  If you didn't know fast food was unhealthy, give me a break.  If you think this is realistic, give me a break."Supersize Me" is a piece of propaganda meant to turn people away from eating McDonalds food.  The film documents Morgan Spurlock embarking on a perilous quest to eat three meals of McDonalds per day.  This diet has rules too.  Whenever he is asked if he wants a meal to be Super-Sized, he must do it.  He also much try each item on the menu at least once.  He is only allowed to consume items that are in fact on the menu.  The thing is though, if he is really trying to make a valid point, why does he order the Double Quarter Pounder with Cheese meal twice within the first seven days?  This is questionable, because not only is this the most fatty item on the menu, it also made him vomit the first time that he ate it all.  The thing is though, millions of people (some skinner than Spurlock) have this meal and do not throw up.  Why him?  His wife is a vegan chef and he is used to having no meat in his diet.  So why would he choose the biggest item on the menu TWICE in the first week?  There are many, many other items that he couldn't possibly been able to cover.  Not only that, he almost gets no exercise during the month of this experiment, saying that the average American gets little exercise.  His laziness seems to be an exaggeration.  There is some merit to the movie, showing people how unhealthy McDonalds is, but everyone knows that.  They just don't care.  For Spurlock to in any way (even the subtlest of ways) to support the idiots who sue the fast food chains because they became obese, is ludicrous.It should be mentioned that Wendy's regular hamburger is a quarter pounder, while McDonalds regular burger is 1/10th of a pound.  Also, Wendy's goes up to a triple quarter pounder, something McDonalds has never done.  Burger King introduced the triple cheese burger and QUADROUPLE cheese burger, something McDonalds has never done.  It seems that McDonalds is picked as a scapegoat because it is the most popular.  This movie may have been more credible if it examined the dangers of fast food as a whole, but just to go up against the one corporation is stupid.  If the movie didn't suggest that the corporation doesn't care about it's customers, I wouldn't have a problem, but it does.  Too much of anything, especially food, is bad for someone.  If anyone needed a movie to tell them that fast food is unhealthy, they clearly are seeing the world through a filter.1/1
Love in the Afternoon. Pleasant movie but nothing special, a very ordinary story. Audrey Hepburn's charisma is what puts some life to the movie. Some subtle humour though
Waste of time. I got this film because I'm from Detroit where this takes place. It's a pretty typical revenge flick. Four brothers want to find their adoptive mother's killer. Usual smartass remarks, guys talking BS, fights, shootouts, blah, blah, blah. I guess these kind of movies will always be made and when made well they can be fun to watch. This script was mediocre at best. Give me a Clint Eastwood or Bruce Willis film any day over this tripe.
Why the Charge. Curious as to why Amazon would charge for this content when CBS offers it for free on the official Survivor Website.  Yeah, at the CBS site you have sit through 4 commercials, but it is worth it to not have to download any extra programs
A bit plodding, but funny series of reversals. A woman who lives in an apartment in NYC and can't cook and doesn't have a baby must fool the owner of her magazine into thinking she really is the character she writes about. (She writes a very popular domestic advice column.) She succeeds, until a Navy hero wins the opportunity to spend Christmas with her in her house in Connecticut, enjoying her homemaking skills and meeting her baby. Problem is, she doesn't have any of those things. She borrows the house (from a man who wants to marry her), she borrows the cooking skills of a sweet grandfatherly chef who secretly cooks for her at the house, and she even borrows a baby. The unmaking beings when she tells the Navy man her child is a boy, and when he volunteers to give it a bath he discovers it's really a girl. Then the mother of the baby takes it back, and the baby is replaced by a baby who looks nothing like the first one. Then the woman is falling in love with the Navy man (and he with her) while the man from whom she's borrowed the house still believes she's going to marry him, and keeps bringing a minister to the house for a quickie wedding.It's a delightful movie. Very funny, and rich in both plot and character development.  Unfortunately, what probably makes it not a classic by today's standards, it is a bit plodding.  It does not move at the same pace as, for example, the movie Casablanca, with which it shares some of the same supporting actors
Worst movie I've ever seen. I would have given this film 0 stars if possible.  This film was long, boring, and painful to watch.  If you like Jane Austen films or other BBC period films, do not be deceived by this one; it is nothing like those types of films
I've been cheated by Amazon. It really sucks, tried to download but it's not able to be viewed in pc's outsided the united states. Crikey.I'll have to wait for reruns to watch it on the telly.Whatta shame amazon dot com. Let's send a CSI to yer headquarters
Missleading and Incorrect. This movie is entirely fictional and is NOT based on true events. First of all, the great 'Saviors' family was killed by muslims, and so he chooses to go killing some muslims in a completely different country. That in in itself shows that the director hates muslims and limits all muslims to being 'bad'. The other thing is the way that he portraied Bosnian-Muslims; main causes/killers of the war, which is a complete lie. The serbs goal was to eliminate the whole Bosnian-Muslim population and create a dominant ethinc group; the serbs ofcourse. Also he forgot to mention the attack on Srebrenica where serbs killed over 8000 civillians in just one day...I just have to asume that the director LOATHES all muslims as he completely LIED.
0% Historically accurate. This movie is completely, totally, and sjamefully innacurate to what really happened. I'm from EL Salvador and as a boy, a bomb exploded on my face, got caught in the middle of 2 gunfights and went to bed wondering If i would make it through the night. As my fellow Salvadorean said, this movie makes the guerrillas loo like they were good people and our army as cruel, reckless and "bad". First of all, I witnessed a bus being hijacked by guerrillas and all the kids taken out to be recruited. Through my experience I can say that the guerrillas AND the military did horrible things but this movie truly doenst show how the war was really like. Also I believe they try to make us look like a 1600's town. People on horse wagons and all the people are "mexican-like". I know that to most of you this will come in as a surprize but people from El Salvador as well as Honduras, Nicaragua, Costa Rica, etc don't look like Mexicans! It makes me upset that we are stereotyped as mexicans. Well, overall, this is a historically innacurate, bad movi
Crapfest. Quite possibly one of the worst movies of all time. Clive Owen is really cool, but not in this movie. Angelina Jolie's polital agenda totally fueled this film. What a waste of time
Same Thing. The Dane Cook episode is the same one that it on his "Harmful If Swallowed" c.d. The c.d. also has the uncensored version of this routine that is over 1 hour long. The one star rating is not based on the content. It is based upon Amazon not sharing this fact with customers
DVD PUT IT ON DVD. I DONT WONT TO DOWNLOAD IT I WONT IT ALL ON DVD THIS IS WASTE MONE
Dissapointing... Im a big Halloween movies fan....while i thought this one would good and unique, it was anything but that.First of all, its very dissapointing to see that the continuation of H2O was simply Michael Myers not actually dying, rather fleeing away through some bushes dressed as a paramedic.And then Jamie Lee Curtis being eliminated without a follow up at the beginning of the movie paves the way for what is one of the worst horror films ive seen lately.The concept of having some people in Michael's house is not terribly bad, but the fact that they made it so to today's standards of "horror films" just discredited the whole movie. So many characters with pointless roles, this whole rapper celebrity trying to fist fight Michael Myers, its just too many elements that don't help.I don't recommend it at all. If you are a Halloween fan, you will be highly dissapointed by this one
read the book instead. This movie,   the story of a shocking long-ago murder entwined with the story of a modern woman who is investigating it,  is only worth watching to see the scenes leading up to the past crime.   The modern day portion of the movie is very tedious.    Elizabeth Hurley's and Sean Penn's characters are laughable caricatures.    Anita Shreve's writings never disappoint,   read the book instead.
Bad Device. I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service
Star Trek:  City on the Edge of Forever. My favorite show of the Trek series but there's no way I'd buy another individual program from Amazon.  It will ONLY play on their downloaded player ...won't burn to DVD so can't play it on my television.  Don't bother buying this ...just go for the Trek collection on DVD
AMAZON SUCKS. I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!
hmm. This movie is for liberals what the Left Behind book series is for Christian conservatives, it portrays reality how they want to see it. Its like they wanted to make a good story but tried too hard to cram as much PC political propaganda in as possible and ended up ruining it. Entertaining in some parts but pretty dumb overall IMO
to the writer of the review entitled "an especially prescient film". The many toubled, undemocratic areas of Africa don't have leaders that have sworn to stop at nothing until the United States is destroyed.  Whether or not he actually had the capability to do so, the leader of Iraq did so swear and he did lead the world to believe that he had such capability.  But thanks for commenting.As for the film, I know it won a couple Oscars and all, but I just didn't like it.  I thought the editing was poor, that the scenes were long and often unnecessary.  Although the story was good, a modern director would have put it together a lot better
Poor support. This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet
Bad Device. I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service
0 stars if able. This film is a mockery of the aviation field. A very small percentage of the phraseology is correct, even the plot itself is severely flawed. First off, being an air traffic controller, I know first hand that you can't go and work at some facility you haven't worked at for a while, until you get evaluated to make sure you can work safely. Second of all, you can't move from your position(sector if you will) and start working at another while leaving the previous position unmonitored. If you are using this movie to learn about air traffic, then please do not apply for a job. The movies will not teach you about the job. It takes anywhere between 2-4 years to get rated at an ATC center. You can't just come in and take a position. When a movie comes out that is realistic to air traffic, I will put my stamp of approval on it
Survivor Rip Off. I have bought 2 seasons of Survivor on unbox and both of them are not complete. Very dissapointing. Guatemala  episode 11 is from a completely different season and it is missing the last 2 episodes and the reunion show. Just leaves you hanging. Exile Island is missing the final episode it just goes from the competition between Danielle and Cirie for a spot in the final 3 to the live reunion show
Dont get "Fiji" final week ... Dont dwnld " Survivor, "Thunderstorms & Sacrifice" ". Its my fault for not reading the whole thing. you would think that the last episode would be the finale , but NO, its just a 10 minute recap going to the finale 4. I didnt even get a full 45 minute episode. No finale. I got rippped off. $1.99 dwnld not well spent. Dont bother dwnldng any episode of fiji if you dont know the ending. Because they dont have that episode, not even the reunion show
Aims low and hits its target. This straight-to-video's modest budget is attested to by the fact that while most of the action is supposed to take place at a large state prison, this prison only seems to house about 12 inmates. The plot is that old but reliable one about a man posing as a prisoner so he can go "undercover" and solve a crime. The crime in this case is not especially interesting and it's resolved in much too pat a fashion. However, leading man Tommy Lee Thomas looks good with his shirt off, (though he seems too small to be throwing his weight around), and there's a torture scene, (modeled on the one in "Lethal Weapon"), in which he's hanged by his wrists and zapped with electric shocks. Mr. Thomas' performance may not be of Oscar caliber but he does know how to yell.
Not what I hoped for. I'm a big fan of Colin Firth and I was disappointed of this movie, I felt sleep, wish I never do on an average good movie, I do not recommended if you've seen Bridget Jones diaries, not even close..
Not Happy. I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?
messed with the original VHS release, made it worse. Loren Michels ruins most things he touches.  they left out the "Hot Tub" sketch, where eddie play's as the late, great James Brown.  it may be one of THE most funny sketches in the history of television!!!!  I could see that thing 100 times and i would still laugh as hard as the first time seeing it! i stand buy the greatness of that sketch, SNL was riding the Eddie Murphy thing all the way to the bank ( the show would most likley been canceled, in my opinion, the show was unwatchable without him an piscapo teamed up).then to make this thing worse is that the VHS version had zero Gumby sketches in it ( still great without it thought). i see they have a Gumby sketch in the dvd version, i think "oh, cool, a Gumby dammit segment", but it ends up being one of the lamest one's around.  what, they didn't want to pay piscapo the royalties for showing the one where Gumby goes on Letterman (Piscapo as letterman)?do everyone a favor and don't purchase this watered down version....Delirious just came out. get that instead. that is GARUNTEED to make u laugh! this dvd....meeeeh!
Dissapointed. Ella Enchanted has been my favorite book for years and when I heard that they were going to make it into a movie, I was estatic. I marked the movie release date on my calander, got my tickets in advance, and waited on pins and needles on the way to the theater.The movie was a huge dissapointment. While I wasn't expecting the movie to be just like the book, I certainly wasn't expecting that. While the movie itself was funny and an overall good movie, I hated it because it was absolutley nothing like the book. The only common thread I found were the names of the characters and the fact that Ella was cursed from birth.I suggest that you go and read the book if you enjoyed the movie, it is far better with an increadible story line and an ending that still brings me to tears, despite the fact that I've read it over 100 times
Pretty stupid and obnoxious. Almost unbelievably bad, except I saw the remake of 'Shaft,' which should have been a forewarning.  This is like a comic book for filmgoers.  No, not a graphic novel adapted to the screen.  More like a comic book for kids, that you'd be embarassed to own at any age.  Doubly offensive is the high quality soul music that is on the soundtrack, a travesty to the nth degree.
Bad Device. I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service
Cult classic...please, a waste of my childhood. i actually saw this movie when i was 7 and it freaked me out abit, but i mean the brother was basically a blob with a face and the story was as bad as the acting. The ending was garbage and it had nothing to offer in todays world.Dont even rent this, i dont even know why you are considering the film.I only give it a 2 star rating because t managed to scare a seven year old and i havent forgot how dumb the film was since.
Batman - The Movie Review. But this for my kids and it was the most boring movie I have ever watched.The shows are more entertaining to watch then the movie
Amazon Extremely Slow To Deliver. Item purchased Jan 30th 2007 and as of March 8th it still has not been shipped
Survivor Rip Off. I have bought 2 seasons of Survivor on unbox and both of them are not complete. Very dissapointing. Guatemala  episode 11 is from a completely different season and it is missing the last 2 episodes and the reunion show. Just leaves you hanging. Exile Island is missing the final episode it just goes from the competition between Danielle and Cirie for a spot in the final 3 to the live reunion show
Couldn't get past the animation. Not entertaining. The animation is creepy. I don't get it
worst one. This one is perhaps the worst one I've seen of the Jason series. I couldn't even sit though it all.
POINTLESS. Eric Maibus and Scott Bairstow have become fine young actors, and even their adequate performances cannot save this dismal, pointless, lurid and sadistic movie.  Dee Wallace Stone should be ashamed for participating.  Maibus plays the hypnotic leader of a teenage devil cult, with no conscience, morals, or regard for anyone but himself; Bairstow plays the usual &quot;misunderstood&quot; teen who looks to the group for acceptance.  The script is laden with offensive four letter words in every other sentence; enough is enough.  If this is the way teens talk, then steer me clear, folks.  There is no heart or soul in this movie, and no reason to rent or buy.  NO STARS.  C'MON AMAZON, WHEN YOU GONNA GIVE US THE 0 STARS OPTIONS??
I've been cheated by Amazon. It really sucks, tried to download but it's not able to be viewed in pc's outsided the united states. Crikey.I'll have to wait for reruns to watch it on the telly.Whatta shame amazon dot com. Let's send a CSI to yer headquarters
an exercise in film making; not a film; 2/10. Roman Polanski, whom I'm none too big a fan, is quoted as saying "People like Truffaut, Lelouch and Godard are like little kids playing at being revolutionaries."  And I think that quote sums up Shoot the Piano Player fairly well, it's an exercise in film, using new ideas & concepts, such as the scene where we don't follow Charlie but instead follow the woman leaving the apartment room, but in the end is a vapid, hollow piece of art; like a Norman Rockwell painting, or the work of Andy Warhol.Upon initial release the film was torn apart by the general public & critics alike, but now some 50 years later it's considered a landmark film, one of the most, if not the, most important of the French new wave, a movement cited as being the biggest influence on the American cinema of the late 60's and early 70's.  But, simply because it was influential doesn't necessarily stamp it's place as flawless.Everything about the film is fantastic; the acting, the music, the cinematography, and yes, the radical ideas Truffaut used are inspiring, but it's not enough to save a film that is utterly meaningless.The thing about the French New Wave's effect of American cinema is that American film makers took their ideas & added a layer of depth to them; they were more than just "oh, let's try this weird shot, it'll  be experimental"The movement, on numerous occasions, has been compared to jazz, which I can understand but don't agree with; with jazz, yes there's a free flowing improvisation, but there's something there than just pretty pictures & ideas that would be considered absurd by the standard audience's mind.A fantastic example of a scenario where the influence was greater than the original is John Cassavettes, whose Killing of a Chinese Bookie has the feel of a French New Wave film, but is also a fantastic work of art
Snore. Don't let the cover fool you, this film isn't half as fun as you may hope it is. Maybe it's my own fault, but I was expecting something more like "Groove", or at least something interesting to watch. And it's not for my lack of knowledge of the bands, I often listen to Joy Division/New Order/Happy Mondays, and more from that scene. However, this seemed much more like the story of Tony Wilson and The Factory, than it did about the music, and almost came-off as a documentary. I almost stopped watching it out of boredom, but saw it through anyway. Now I wouldn't call this bad, it had it's good parts, just not many.
Movie is great, but Unbox is uncooked. Movie got 2/3 through and just quit. No problem, this is Windows right? Just reboot and start where you left off. Only for whatever reason I can't restart this movie from anywhere but the beginning. I'm not going to watch this moving over from the beginning just to see if it fails in the same place again. Only a couple bucks, but definitely not worth it
Imperfect by a Mile. This is a godawful movie, a waste of several million bucks by Universal and whoever else was responsible.  They could have paid my salary for my entire career for what it cost them to make this moronic notion to capitalize on what some executive must have decided was the "sexy" health club craze of the 80s. Actors doing calisthenics in tights do not a feature film make.  Lucas or Spielberg or a mailroom clerk could have told them so.
Did It Backwards-Ordered Diva-Read Reviews-Canceled order. Will someone PLEASE produce a DVD/VHS re-make of DIVA with the excellent sound quality deserving of this film!? I was so excited to finally find this movie, but quickly realized after reading reviews from fellow fans, that it would be a disappointment and waste of my money to purchase it. I hope the word gets back to whoever reproduced this movie and they'll re-issue a quality DVD and/or video soon
"A Promise is a Promise". It Could Happen to You was a bit of a disappointment, considering the makeup of the cast: Nicolas Cage, Bridget Fonda, and Rosie Perez among others.The movie brings to the screen the story of a policeman who after winning 4 million dollars on the NY state lotto, decides to share half of it with a waitress he met the previous day.The acting is surprisingly (!) below average, the dialogues are way below average, while the plot is not bad at all.Nicolas Cage's character is too naive and too slow, and that was just sad/pitiful!Bridget Fonda was unexpectedly plain and bland.Rosie Perez's character was overly exaggerated to the point that it got tiring AND annoying very early on.As for Wendell Pierce and Stanley Tucci this film does not seem to be their thing; they don't seem to belong.  Subsequently, they are not convincing in their roles at all.Finally, somebody shoot the "Narrator," PLEASE!Though the potential for a great movie was definitely there it fails to take off.  A shame really...  No masterpiece here.If Nicolas Cage is what you had in mind, check out the AMAZING movies City of Angels and/or The Family Man.
John Travolta and Samuel L. Jackson, again... So the first thing you need to know about this movie is that it sucks. It really does. I'm not sure who their military consultant was, but if Samuel L. has Specialist pins on his collars, you don't call him Sargeant. Women aren't allowed in the Rangers (Nunez), not my rules ladies, Colonel Styles looks a little young to be a colonel (even for the Army), the Army doesn't issue tiger stripe BDU's (Mueller), the list goes on and on. This may not seem that important, but if you're gonna make a movie about the Army, you could at least get some very BASIC (soory, could't resist) things correct.Yes, it's true that there are many twists and turns in this 'plot', but all that really means, at least in this case, is that they can multiply a weak and thin screenplay. Hey, if we tell the same story a couple different ways, it makes the story really interesting, right? Not so much. Oh, and that scene where "Specialist" West is standing on top of that shack with his pancho blowing like a villains cape? Wow, who decided that was a good idea? I don't want to ruin the ending for you, because there's no point in even seeing this movie, and anyone with enough brain cells to operate the remote will figure out the 'finale' long before it makes its belated arrival. By the way, how do you follow someone in an Army Humvee w/out them knowing? Seriously. Please spend these 90 or minutes talking with your kid's, reading a book, excercising, writing a review... I dunno, something worthy of your precious time. You've been warned.By the way, Connie Nielsen looks hot w/ short red hair
Survivor Rip Off. I have bought 2 seasons of Survivor on unbox and both of them are not complete. Very dissapointing. Guatemala  episode 11 is from a completely different season and it is missing the last 2 episodes and the reunion show. Just leaves you hanging. Exile Island is missing the final episode it just goes from the competition between Danielle and Cirie for a spot in the final 3 to the live reunion show
0 STARS - it's like watching a recruitment video for the KKK (filled with errors). I counted ~15 factual errors (aka lies) during Michael Moore's opening speech.*I stopped shortly after.I'm not going to waste my time on such obviously factually-wrong fiction.  How stupid does Mr. Moore think we are?  I was *there* watching the election unfold, and what he reported is NOT what happened.* Example: He said FOX News pressured NBC, cbs, abc, and cnn to change their minds, and give Florida to Gore, and then Bush.  What a load of lies.  FOX news has no power over the other nets.  NBC, cbs, abc, cnn operate independently, and reached their decisions independently, without influence from Fox.* And furthermore, the other nets did NOT call for bush (as Moore falsely claimed).  They labeled Florida "undecided", and left it that way for several days.* Also, Moore claimed that a recount showed Gore won Florida.  FALSE.  A bipartisan committee counted the votes a few months later, and not only did Bush win, but the recount *increased* his lead from a few hundred to several thousand, because of conservative communities in western Florida.  (Many other non-biased groups found the same result.)This video reminds me of his Columbine documentary, where men's ties kept changing colors in the middle of their speeches (it's called creative editing).   Moore has no ethics.  Propagandist.As far as I'm concerned, he's no better than a KKK member.Same mental disorder & illogic.
Duvall superb not so for Convicts. As usual, Robert Duvall's acting was phenomenal - why I purchased the movie - BUT the movie itself was pointless and boring.  My husband and I fell asleep.....when we woke up Robert Duvall's character was dead!  Enough said
FINE HISTORIC RENDITION. Filmed in 1933, this movie is in black and white, and might be considered dull and slow-moving by today's standards.  An accurate chronology of the six wives of Henry VIII, the characters of the wives are rather  undeveloped, and the movie does not delve very deeply into the important  religious and political questions around which the marriages centered.  A  good introduction for those who are unfamiliar with the basic story, but  the serious scholar will want to conduct further research
French garbage. This review may sound pretentious and ignorant, but in truth I'm a big fan of British history, so bear with me!Even as a film itself, it's surreal, and I don't like the acting.  But as with any historical film that includes the British, they're made out to be the absolute bad guys!  Sure we were forging an empire within France (i.e. The Hundred Years War), but rapists and murdering pillagers!?  Never!Historically accurate, full of British sentiment, and down-right weird.  Avoid this film today, folks!
Cant watch. I downloaded this program and it was garbled and video as if played in slow motion.  This is the first of two downloads that didn't play.  I know it was not my computer because I did download three that played ok
Missing episodes. This series is being sold with missing episodes, like many others here in Unbox. Do they think their customers are so dumb? Would you buy a DVD series with a missing DVD? What sense does this make? What a disappointment this service is..
HORRIBLE!. I was forced to watch this movie for college.  It was the most vulgar, unnecessary piece of junk I have ever seen.  This is a perfect example of the demoralization of America
Bad movie. This has to be Dolph's suckiest movie.  I'm a huge fan, and I own a ton of his movies and watch a bunch more on a regular basis.  But do not buy this movie, save your money and buy one of Dolph's better movies like Army of one or Men of War.  Personally though I'm pumped for the release of masters of the Univers
Interesting But Terribly One-Sided. As a frequent visitor to the Himalayas and being closely in touch with both Tibetans (ordinary folks, not the tortured ones) and the Chinese, I find this documentary interesting but terribly one-sided. I have not met a single wealthy Tibetan in Nepal or India, who can swear to me that he will return to a freed Tibet, run by their government in exile.To be fair to the "experts", a lot of the evidence of Chinese violence against the Tibetans is real. I sincerely feel sorry for them and wish that they could somehow be compensated. However, the documentary gets emotive and it seems bent on presenting the situation in Tibet entirely from the viewpoint of the activists and other victims of Chinese aggression.While it is true that many Tibetans suffered and died during the invasion and subsequent crushing of riots that erupted from time to time, it is unfair to assume that the soldiers and police were the only ones responsible for the deaths and injuries. Were there no looters, vandals, infighting? If you had ever witnessed these riots, would you think that more people might have been hurt or killed had the soldiers not opened fire?It's also incredibly naive to assume that all Tibetans think the same. Even Dharamsala, the seat of the Tibetan government in exile is not without opposition, violence and even assasination. While I do think that most Tibetans are good Buddhists and nice people, the documentary seems to associate everything sinful with the Chinese and everything saintly with the Tibetans. This is something I find totally unacceptable.A few snapshots of Tibetan mobs welcoming the delegates from exile tell us nothing. The documentary seems only able to find Tibetans who are against Chinese rule. They paint the picture that nobody in Tibet is happy. This is patently untrue. But then, this sort of thing sells in America. You have to have a demon, you have to have a damsel in distress and you must have the hero (America in this case). Otherwise, it just won't sell. It's not about compassion at all.If you really want to be "illuminated", visit Tibet and Tibetan communities all over China and see things for yourself. That would be far more enlightening. Sadly, many journalists prefer to interview the wrong (right?) people in order to get a sensational story that will pay for the rent
Not nearly as good as Virtual Enounters 1!. The original film was about a girl checking out this erotic virtual reality machine, and it was hot!  This sequel is mostly about some guys and their adventures using the same basic machine.  My verdict: too many guys,  not enough babes
Beware of Unbox!!!. Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for
Good Story, B Movie. The story is set in late 1943 but is unbelievable due to bad costumes and worse acting. A decent plot exploring the relationship between man and his enemy may be enough to keep the watcher awake, but maybe not.
Not for DVD aficionados. I'm rather upset with the technical quality of this DVD.  Grindhouse rereleased this disc exactly as it was in 2000, without so much as a 16x9 animorphic upgrade.  This is certainly not worth the $20+ dollar price tag Amazon.com has right now
Power. I could not get interested in this movie. It was slow moving and BORING
Bummer highlight DVD.  But,  YES the gay man won!. Bummer!  This is only a 2-hour-15 minutes DVD of highlights from the first Survivor.  The nudity is nothing really.  A rear-end shot of one survivor and Richard sitting down "tucked under" and walking naked.  But no private parts seen here.  Having not seen all of the episodes of Survivor. I was hoping for a complete, unedited, uncensored version, with all episodes Collector's DVD set.  I guess it is not possible.  One special feature is the "Survivor: Inside the Phenomenon", a 20-minute documentary, which I found to be quite interesting, especially how fair the game is, the exhausting hard work Producer, Mark Burnett and the Art Department can do, and how they managed to surprise the Challenge Survivor Winner, Sean, with a surprise visit from his father on the yacht at such short notice.  How they got his father there at such short notice is remarkable
Befuddled. I am completely befuddled that anyone with any love for the book could enjoy this movie. It is merely a monument to Hollywood's stunning inability to read or to understand the simplest moral tale. In Dumas's book the Count learns that he cannot play God--dispensing punishments to the evil and rewards to the good--because of the complex ways in which the wheat and the tares are intertwined in this earthly life. He abandons his project of perfectly just revenge and accepts a new love as a gift from a mysteriously merciful God.Hollywood gives us instead: Triumphant Revenge.
a priest struggling with faith. This review is for the Criterion Collection DVD edition of the film."Diary of a Country Priest" with the French title of "Journal d'un cur de campagne" is one that I found to be boring despite my religious background. It took me four tries to finish the film without falling asleep.In this film a priest with health problems starts work at a church in rural France. Through his diary entries he reveals his crisis of faith and the way the villagers dislike him. He later befriends a priest in a neighboring village and learns that he has cancer.The film does have some nice scenery of norther France but that is about it.The special features on the DVD are a theatrical trailer, audio commentary by Peter Cowie, and the standard essay about the film in the liner notes.This film is recommend for those interested in the topic or for insomniacs
AMAZON SUCKS. I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!
compared to "The Nature of Narrative". "You saw nothing in Hiroshima. Nothing" is what he said. Hiroshima Mon Amour depicts the reality of the bombing of Hiroshima, which took place on August 6, 1945.  The story begins with two bodies against each other with multiple clips of the results of the bombing.  When I watched this movie for the first time, I realized this movie was far from a fairy tale.  Instead, this movie captured reality and could be described as the "fiction" aspect of history William Gass explains in "The Nature of Narrative".  Throughout the entire movie the main character, a woman from France explains the hardships she went through back at home.  It was disturbing for me to watch the movie as it went back in time where she was taunted for have been in love with a German soldier.  I felt it violated a person's right as to whom he/she may date.  It was also unbearable to watch the clips where it shows the end results after the bombing of Hiroshima.  The fact that this movie was made in 1959 the black and white picture made it difficult for me to read the subtitles.  Lastly, the one thing I must question about this movie is the fact that it was told in French.  I couldn't help but get frustrated that the movie started from an awkward stage of the overall story.  It seems as though it skipped the introduction and went straight into the rising of the climax.  I didn't like that they both speak of the war with no clear explanation as to what they're really talking about.  If a person who was completely oblivious about the history of Hiroshima were to watch this movie, he/she that's watching would have a hard time comprehending the overall point of the movie.
Lost Souls. "THE RULES OF ATTRACTION"Lost SoulsAmos Lassen and Cinema PrideThe Rules of Attraction" is a twisted story about sex, drugs, and college life. Three students at Camden College are involved in a love triangle. Sean Bateman, a womanizing drug dealer is love with Lauren, a virgin but who is more infatuated with her ex-boyfriend. Then there is Paul who is bisexual and used to date Lauren before he came out. Paul,However, is interested in Sean who he thinks is bisexual. Throw in a bunch of other characters and you have a mess. In fact everyone in this money is suffering from some kind of problem and each is only looking out for him or herself. We can tell right away that no good can come from these people and we are told so right in the beginning as the first scene of the movie is the end of the story and the rest of the movie tells us how we got to that point. In fact, a more apt name for this movie would be "Les Miserables" as that is what everyone turns out to be.In reality the film is a satire of those crazy teen movies like "American Pie" and "There's Something About Mary". If we look at the movie like this, it is ingenious. If, on the other hand, we look at it as just a movie, it bombs.The characters are not the kind of people that you would want to call friends but that does not mean they are not interesting. The problem with them is that we all know someone like them and they are realistic. Without the acting, this film does not move and the cast manages to succeed at that. For a young cast, the acting is good, better than what I had expected. His direction, however, is highly stylized and the tricks that Roger Avary employs just do not always work but by and large when I consider what he had to work with, his job is admirable.I think a lot of people were expecting a fluff movie with a young cast and what they got is a dark and realistic movie. It destroys some of the myths about drugs and college life and because of this, the movie has been deemed offensive by many. The treason for the offense is that many cannot understand that there are really this shallow who have no feeling.There seems to be no narrative focus, no beginning and no end and the focus is on a group of selfish ambiguous characters who traffic in rape, drugs, and homosexuality and general obsessions. We don't see smiling happy college kids. Rather we are given kids who have problems and they aren't pretty problems either. The characters are lost souls, pathetic people that we do not want to emulate. There is no resolution, there is no love.Everything seems to be overdone and excessive. The first time I watched the film I thought that my distrust in humanity had been validated and that perhaps I should consider becoming a loner. The characters are vile and horrible and not much more than amalgams of the worst that society has to offer. The only character that elicits sympathy dies right way. The satire on wasted youth never quite reaches its conclusion and comes off more as sour grapes.On the other hand, the movie can be classified as brilliant. It was true to the novel from which it was adapted and resented real characters even if we d not want to admit that people like this really exist. We are not supposed to like these people because they are too much into not being attached to anyone or to themselves. On first viewing I found the whole movie to be an appalling mess. On second viewing I eased up a bit and by the third viewing I was really into it. But then if it takes three viewings to appreciate a movie. I wonder if it is worth the effort. It is a challenging film. When sex means no more than a handshake, you want to question our value system. Likewise I am still questioning "The Rules of Attraction". Maybe one day I will shout its praises. Right now I am not in the mood for a fourth viewing.
Wonderful program, but flawed files... Okay, so to catch up on this exciting new series, I decided to try this revolutionary downloading program - Amazon Unbox!  I selected the first 10 episodes and hit Purchase.  Minutes later, I was watching the first episode, it came quickly, sounded great, and looked wonderful... however the second one was missing a few minutes at the end.  Forgiveable, until... whole episodes starting arriving incomplete or had missing video, making it incredibly frustrating and disappointing.But, this IS a good concept... unfortunately, Amazon has yet to verify all their own files for both audio and picture quality!  So, until the issue is fixed and paying customers recieve completed files or refunds... DO NOT try and download Season 1, Episodes 2, 4, 5, 6, and 7!!!  1, 3, 8, 9, and 10 were the only ones that were 100% complete for me
Total disappointment!!. Blech!  I really like all the young actors that were in this movie and expected it to be really funny and cute.  WRONG!  It was a bizarre combination of shock tactics trying to show how edgey they all were.  The only redeeming actor was Justin Long.  The rest of the movie was a waste of brain cells
very bad and poor. Sorry but i totaly disagree with all these positive reviews.I'm a fan of war classic films but this one is a mess.Nothing is moving,action is zero and filming is poor.we are very far away from dirty dozen,battle of the bulge,midway,enemy below etc....a total waste of time and money
Snoozalinga. I watched this dogg-o with some Japanese folks I know and let me tell ya all of thought it was the most boring, obvious, dated bore we'd laid eyes on in many a moon. And these guys are from a very wealthy, aristocratic, old Japanese family at the vanguard of Westernization in the 50s. STAY AWA
For Mamet fans only!. I couldn't get past the very stylized dialogue which seemed to coming from the same source although different actors were speaking.  The characters are cliches through and through and does anyone really speak the way the people do? Mamet appears to have never left Manhattan and has no clue to writing non urban roles or a script with enough nuance to delineate his characters perspective.  To be honest I didn't finish the entire film, but instead checked the TV Guide for reruns of Northern Exposure for the real thing
exit the freeway... This movie was loaned to Me, (Thank God I did'nt rent it) and is the biggest waste of a few hours of My life ever! The acting is so horrible it made Me cringe,and the cuts in the movie were done to where it seemed like it had been edited for tv.This is supposed to be a black comedy? It's NOT funny, and the so called violence in it made Me yawn, seriously, I've seen more gore on the Simpsons. There are so many things in the movie that are AMAZINGLY unbelievable, K. Sutherland walks for miles to a hospital with a bullet through His neck, head,and two in the back.R. Witherspoon overpowers Sutherland (For the second time) and strangles Him, pretty good for a 90 pound teenage girl huh?  But, I do think Everybody should watch this movie once so You can see what a movie should NOT be.(Besides, misery loves company
The worst of all Halloween films... Without the strong leading performances of Donald Pleasance or Jaime Lee Curtis (only in this for about 10 minutes) this makes it the worst Halloween film to date. Much has been said about Halloween 4-6. I loved Halloween 4 & 5 and 6 was just okay however Danielle Harris should have been in that one as well. The series picked up again with Halloween: H20 but took another fall with this cheap piece of trash that was just looking to make a quick buck. I would watch Halloween III which doesn't even have the Michael Myers character in it as long as it meant I wouldn't have to be subjected to this again. The actors (acting) were terrible, the plot and storyline was severely weak, and the entire film as a whole just seemed fake and pointless. It's really a shame when a franchise has to be ruined with something like this (I felt the same with Jason X which is set in space). Lame. I'm pretending this one never happened.
Not the book. The book was awesome. The Movie called eragon was a jumpy action flick that made little to no sense. Since when do elves not have pointy ears and when did dwarves get so tall? In no way does the movie follow the book. You will be wondering if the director read the book. The worst part is the beginning 200 pages smashed into 10 minutes. If the book didnt have an action scene in a chapter it was skipped. The worst part about the making of this movie is that its so terrible people who see it and havent read the book will think that the book must be just as bad. A weak adaptation of a brilliant young minds work
Stupid... Just another one of those low budget, stupid stoner movies. My buddy let me have it for a day, and I was pretty bored watching it. There were a few funny scenes, but for the most part a very crummy movie. Nothign Nothing like Cheech and Chong. Don't waste your money
The Book is Better. I watched this on Masterpiece Theater and was intrigued enough with the family story to buy the book.  The characters and the historical context are much better developed in the book and you don't have to listen to that extraordinarily whiny, droning music.
Please enter a title for your review. Dumbest moral teen movie ever. Your average Saved By The Bell episode plays out more believably. Was there any discretion in choosing writers at all? Proof that any idiot with an english degree can work in hollywood. I'm not taking this movie any more seriously than it took itself, it's just when it goes for making an actual point and is nothing but incoherent stupidity there's no fun to be had. There's one unconventional idea I can credit this film with, when John popularizes women's thong underwear with the boys at school after he gets tricked into wearing one and embarassed. The ending, I mean I saw it coming a mile away, the girl's going to end up liking John, I was interested to see how they'd pull it off though, and it seems like they just didn't at all. Apparently the girl was just as bad as John because she was manipulating him, and that makes everyone even. There wasn't much wrong with the basic plot outline beyond that, watching a teen/romantic comedy you accept that templates will be used, the detail just needed to be filled in by a competent writer who could give the plot points more context and add more comedy. With some minor script adjustments this movie could have gone from a 4/10 to an 8/10.
Quite possibly one of the worst movies ever made. The book made a huge impression on me 35 years ago. I fell in love with the story and was envious of Sam's year in the wilderness.Last night, I found the movie for sale at a local book/music/DVD store. I vaguely remembered that My Side of the Mountain had also been a movie way back when, but I had forgotten all about it. I bought the movie and my wife and I watched it.Ugh. This movie was a waste of time. It was poorly written, abysmally acted, and strayed so far from the book that it was virtually unrecognizable to anyone who read and loved the book.My wife and I got the impression that the movie was adapted by someone who doesn't like hunting or killing of animals. Reference after reference was made in the movie to guns and hunters being bad, killing animals being bad and even Frightful was killed by a hunter apparently out shooting for sport. So Sam never got his deerskin outfit (as he did in the book). Instead, he bought leather gloves and wore some kind of yellow rain slicker during the winter.At one point near the end, when Bando returned to visit, there were so many people in Sam's hollowed out tree that I could have sworn it was a magic tree, much like the magic tents in the latest Harry Potter movie. Small from the outside. But huge on the inside.What an awful movie. Even the cinematography was horrid. If I had to watch Frightful fly around for minutes on end one more time I might have shot her myself.Avoid this movie at all costs!But please, do, read the book. It's one of the best children's' novels ever published
the Plan 9 of cannibal films. If you must see a cannibal film stick to Cannibal Holocaust. the grindhouse release is well worth the money. However the grindhouse release of ferox is just awful. The picture quality is horrendous. The movie is lacking any redeemable quality. There are a few violent moments, but just a few. One of the absolute worst italian horror/exploitation films made. If Cannibal Holocaust is the citizen kane of cannibal films, then ferox is the plan 9.
Wanna Sleep?  Watch Robot Monster  by Phil Tucker!. My wife complains about falling asleep mid-way throughmy favorite TV Series 'Voyage to the Bottom of the Sea'.Either it was carb overload from 4 hotdogs for dinner, butRobot Monster by Phil Tucker had me stumbling and writhing in more pain in my couch than my 2 herniated discsjust to stay awake and at least get my money's worthsince it was a NetFlix rental.Its all true; the dialog was corny and special effects as valuable as the U.S. dollar after depreciation since 2000.The highlights were 'Does Ro-Man want a date with Alice?' andthe camera focusing on how to solder a radio set to communicatewith the leader of Ro-Man.But don't take my word.  Be like me and see for yourself justhow really bad this movie is.  You wonder if this movie was madeby idiots trying to pass for amateurs
Free to Be You and Me - As Long As You Are Like Me. I rented this on a whim and it brought back a lot of memories from my 1970s days in elementary school.  This video made its rounds in the public schools.  The songs are catchy and the film quality is good.But make no mistake, this is propaganda aimed at children.  I will not be showing it to my kids.Despite the freewheeling title, the message is that girls will find happiness only if they mimic boys.Case in point:  Atalanta, a princess, finds happiness when she competes with men in a footrace and when she rejects marriage so she can travel the world (on her father's horse).  She also designs and fabricates rocketships in her spare time.Juxtapose that story with another cartoon where a femine girl in a pink dress and curls is devoured by tigers when she follows the custom of "ladies first."  The tigers abide her request and throw her into a boiling cauldron.  The narrator advises us that the boiling girl makes a very tasty meal.Our "hosts", infant puppets voiced by Mel Brooks and Marlo Thomas, are revolting.  There should be a law against using Mel Brooks' voice for a baby.  Apparently, I repressed memories of these creatures, but seeing them again brought back the horror.  Needless to say, I fast forwarded through the disturbing puppetry.Overall, this DVD is fun for thirtysomethings but should be kept away from children
Star Trek:  City on the Edge of Forever. My favorite show of the Trek series but there's no way I'd buy another individual program from Amazon.  It will ONLY play on their downloaded player ...won't burn to DVD so can't play it on my television.  Don't bother buying this ...just go for the Trek collection on DVD
LET'S BORE JESSICA TO DEATH  (1871). THE FIRST HALFIf they had made movies back then, in 1871, it would move as slowly as this.Perhaps that date suits the film to perfection.The days of utter simplicity, with nearly nothing happening.Where maybe days are filled with yourself.Not distractions.After half an hour, all I could think was, if this was on TV, not only would everybody switch off, the sh** (show) would be axed.It may even beat so many foregin movies as THE SLOWEST MOVIE OF ALL TIME.But slow really means empty.THE OTHER HALF (OF ME)Yet I have since come to learn, by others' reviews, this is a movie which YOU must make, by the mood, or the feeling of dread others speak of. Or else you are left with the feeling of dead.I failed to do that, and without that, the film fails miserably I reckon. Perhaps because I am dead.So, therefore, I envy those creative creatures of subtle senses. Or whether it was because they were so simple, or easily pleased, which means more modest, more modern.So, as in real life, it's only the FEELING which makes anything real.MY FIRST (OR WORST?) HALFThe other part of me thought that, the film being a feature length, they think they can just not try for half an hour, an hour. Such is the problem with many filmakers, even today. When, being a torture, err feature, they should try much harder!!Therefore the atmosphere spoken of in these reviews can only be like saying there is smoke without fire. Virtually nothing happens, and what does makes little sense, as any unconcious creation.MY BETTER HALF OF THE SCHIZOPHRENICBut the acting of the lead lady is expressive and genuine, and not being stereotype; is pleasingly real. Weird as suits the role. As are the others natural, with no Hollywood posing. How often have I heard that story - good acting, bad film? Oh I'm sorry, I did it again.The only thing exciting is the title.THE WHOLEMy conclusion is: I DON'T KNOW WHICH IS MY BETTER HALF, AND WHICH IS MY WORST HALF . . . ?So, all things being unequal, I choose both. I stand and fall by both my views. (I guess that's why God gave us 2 eyes.)I was going to give it only one star* at first, but now I give it merely two**, knowing I'm still mean.I see this movie as perhaps the greatest measure of one's temperament.If you feel better than me, are supernaturally sensitive, or have the patience of a saint to me, add one, two, or three more stars respectively.I intend to watch it again, and then maybe I can give a before and after shot.Please feel free to reject me, write negative comments about me, or scare me. Or kill me.[The world's First Amazoning Interactive Review] That makes it fair
UnBox video not yet working. Will not play once video was downloaded. I get the error message:  "can not play file, please try again later. error# 0x80040273" I made the exlusive give me call me back feature but the UnBox department was already closed, I was told the UnBox Saturday and Sunday 6-5 hours. I have to say I am impressed with the Call back feature. I downloaded the Unbox Beta now and am recieving email assistance to try to resolve the problem. Thanks Amazon UnBox! I will Update again - Feb. 10,200
Mediocre is good?. I was very disappointed after reading all the glowing reviews for this movie and then watching your average "bad guys on the run" movie.  Gee, Billy Bob Thornton plays a crazy bad guy who shoots people and he doesn't like cops at all; he even uses bad language!  A friend was watching it with me and he thought I was watching the Lifetime channel. This movie just plodded along down cliche boulevard
just ok. i'v seen a multitude of documentaries, both low and high budget, and although i found the story interesting i felt this film was not up the hype it was given.  worth seeing, but not worth owning
Disappointing. I was expecting much more from this video. It did have kids doing poses, but it was hard to find the 13 year-old. Some of the circle games looked like they might  be fun.   I wanted to show  it to my third grade class, but I don't think it would hold their interest.  All in all I felt I was watching someone's home video of their family doing yoga
Defense of Jamie Gertz. I'm writing because I thought Fine's review was bad.I was interested in this movie because it has Jamie Gertz, who has proven to be a durable, dependable character actress.  Mr. Fine may or may not have talent but he is not spectacular.  Waspishness insults are passe and not becoming to a serious reviewer.  Ms. Gertz, by contrast, turns an abundance of personality to good account through her career.  I just don't know what "untalented" means in the context of this silly movie, but it was twenty years ago.  Is the insult intended to be forthe movie or for her whole career since?  kBad form and fuzzy thinking.I think the movie is an attempt to imitate features of Flashdance: upbeat background music, meaningless but interesting visuals, skill display, romance,  people with aspirations surviving at a humble level.  Jamie Gertz is the "face" girl
The Tommyknockers got ahold of this movie... ...and put their own little spin on it!Going to split this into 2 reviews, one based on it from the book, the other just based on the movie in general.  The book "The Tommyknockers" is set in the town of Haven, Maine, where strange thing's start to happen to the townspeople after Bobbie Anderson find's a large, mysterious object in the woods behind her farm.  Curious, she starts digging it up, and with each shovel full of removed dirt, open's up a terrifying and life-altering experience for all those involved.1)  The movie based on the Stephen King Novel:  2 starsI watched the movie after reading the book (my own personal rule) and though at time's felt like they were true to the book, was often left going "huh?" at the changes that were implemented.  Certain thing's are left out, while replaced by hollywood's cheap imagination.  The missing teeth as well as the batteries and inventions running off them never really hit home, and though the book had a multitude of characters who had important part's of the story, we see some simply vanish and never make it to the mini-series.  Perhaps the Tommyknockers got to them first! Since it was a miniseries and ran over 2 hours, there was no reason to chop and hack this thing up and replace it with alternate scenarios and a different ending.  I was disappointed to see how Hilly was found, as well as the fate of Gard and the ship, and Marge's ultimate destiny comes out differently as well.2)  The movie in general, without comparing it to the book: 3 starsMargie Helgenberger and Jimmy Smit's do a very good part cast as Bobbie and Gard.  The overall pace of the mini-series roll's along well, and the production and directing is okay.  The sound is good and set's the mysterious mood that the town of Haven is faced with.  Disappearing people, mysterious inventions run off batteries, and a mob like atmosphere are all displayed as we wait to see who the tommyknockers are, and what exactly they want with the townspeople of Haven.  An excellent cast overall considering the many various character's that had to be portrayed in the story
jamie lee curtis must have been offered a ton of money to come back to the series, at least i hope so. pretending that 3-6 never happened (don't we all wish that!) this flea bag starts with ms.curtis hiding out as the head mistress of a private school(with a false name what kind of back ground check did they use on her) and still living in fear of her brother michael. well as you can guess he's back and still a little pissed off that she became a star and he has had to do all these bad sequels.nothing new here and nothing worth seeing (but at least we do get to see jamie and her late mother janet (playing her "pyscho" role once again) act together for what would be the last time).just a waste of time but i hope it helped put ms. curtis's daughter in collage, as that is the only reason i can think of that would get her back into this mess
Survivor Rip Off. I have bought 2 seasons of Survivor on unbox and both of them are not complete. Very dissapointing. Guatemala  episode 11 is from a completely different season and it is missing the last 2 episodes and the reunion show. Just leaves you hanging. Exile Island is missing the final episode it just goes from the competition between Danielle and Cirie for a spot in the final 3 to the live reunion show
Hang me from my neck until I'm dead... If I ever:a) subject myself to this movie ever againorb) subject anyone else (including animals) to this movieForm a mob and follow through with my wish in the title of this review.Just one question that still haunts me...How does Travolta's career survive this debacle and Pepper's hits the tank?
Not my cup of tea. I bought this DVD based on reviews here on Amazon. I won't fault others for thier position, it's just a matter of personal taste. For me this was a big disapointment. The story leaves a lot to be desired. The character Walker (Lee Marvin) gets away with a lot of crimes he shouldn't have. The direction seemed to be a practice in doing something different, but it failed. I'm sorry I bought this DVD
I turned it off half way through. Michael Moore can be really funny at times, but most people should not take this goofball too seriously.  About half way through 'The Big One', I turned it off because I did not find it the least bit funny and I didn't know where Moore was going.  What is the point of putting in a pointless sequence where he is talking to the guitar player of Cheap Trick?  This is not one of his better films
Not bad...once. When I watched this movie, I have to say, I thought it was pretty pointless.  Napolean Dynamite is, too, but it's funny.  This isn't quite up to Dynamite standards, I'm afraid.  It's not as squeaky clean as good ol' Napolean, either.  Don't buy it.  If you must see it, rent it
Not Happy. I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?
BOOORIIIIIING!!!!!. I WANT THE TWO HOURS OF MY LIFE BACK!After all the talk about what a cult classic this film is! What a waste of time! Maybe this movie was a novelty to American moviegoers in 1973. That time is past (even then, the "robots attack people" concept was hardly new). Now this is just a boring B movie with bad acting and anticlimactic action. This film is only good for academic or nostalgic purposes. Unless you are doing a research paper on American Sci-fi cinema, or you are in your 40s and enjoyed this movie as a kid, or you just like boring anticlimactic B movies, AVOID THIS DULL PIECE OF DRIVEL.I FEEL CHEATED!
I've been cheated by Amazon. It really sucks, tried to download but it's not able to be viewed in pc's outsided the united states. Crikey.I'll have to wait for reruns to watch it on the telly.Whatta shame amazon dot com. Let's send a CSI to yer headquarters
As a lover of Van Gogh, I did not care for this movie. Jacques Dutronc was great, it was the directing and the portrayal of Van Gogh that I thought was inaccurate.  This movie is only based on the last 67 days of Van Gogh's life.  Perhaps, I would have enjoyed it more if we  could have watched how Van Gogh evolved.  What was he like during the ten  years before his death?  I'd like to see a movie that can depict more of  the essence of Van Gogh, and not only focus on &quot;the worst days of his  life&quot;.  There is a huge misconception in the world, of who Van Gogh  &quot;is&quot;, and this movie only feeds it.  Read &quot;Dear Theo&quot;:  Van Gogh's letters to his brother Theo.  The book is far much better than  this movie.  At least, we can get the truth through Van Gogh's eyes, not  Maurice Pialat's
Awful.............. but for Teri Hatcher. Teri Hatcher fans can perhaps get some value for money.  But for her, and her ample body on ample display, this movie is just not worth the time.  Terrible direction, awful story, miserable music!!
Alice in Wonderland... So I saw this one live action Alice in Wonderland movie and it sucked!!!! But I'm confused this isn't the same girl in that movie so this another live action movie, I think it is. I'm not sure if I want to risk boring myself with other crap... so will I watch this verison ever... who knows
Lazy Filmmaking. I was quite disappointed with this film.  The director used some non-actors to play some of the parts, and it shows.  Also, the editing and camera work is shoddy.  In one particular scene, you see Mouchette turning her body, which causes a coffee cup to move toward the edge of the table.  In the next shot, the cup falls to the floor.  The effect is very self-conscious and clumsy.  Finally, the actress playing the girl fails to convince us of her state of mind that occurs at the fim's end.  Perhaps other viewers may like it
A good ole Rebel, New Orleans. I will not watch the movie "Andersonville" until they make a movie called "Elmira"(the camp in Elmira, N.Y., the worst of the Union prison camps had 35% death rate)
The Big Sleep. Here we have what has to be one of the most mind bogglingly boring movies ever made! I couldn't believe what I was watching! Moreover,I am aghast that this film garnered some acclaim and that some reviewers on these pages even saw fit to award this dreck with an unbelievable four and five star rating. What is going on? Is it me or them that has totally lost the plot of what movies are supposed to be all about? Am I naive to think that movies should first and foremost entertain? Where oh where was the entertainment in this lame effort of a film with its unsteady shaky comera work,hamfisted confusing screenplay lacking energy and inventiveness and the cloying performance of modern cinema's most tedious and overratedsleep inducing actor Ralph Fiennes?How I long for the good old days when we had great movies with great actors from great writers and great directors and which achieved what they set out to do - entertain.Sadly with the emergence of such a travesty as "The Constant Gardener" it appears that we unfortunate "real" film lovers are in for a dismal viewing future.
Hollywood costume epic, drama over substance. This is another Hollywood costume epic. They spared no expense with the set and costumes, hired talented big name actors Rex Harrison, Liz Taylor and Richard Burton. Despite the resources committed to this film sadly the film was more stylistic than substantive.Harrison was terrific as Gaius Julius Caesar but he is only in the first half of the movie and Richard Burton does not come across as a great Mark Antony. His character is weak willed and he is harassed and henpecked by Cleopatra, Antony was passionate and reckless but henpecked?Although the film is titled Cleopatra, it focuses more on the historic events.  The film also reduces Cleopatra to the woman depicted in Octavian's propaganda rather than portraying the real multi-dimensional woman who was intelligent, a gifted political strategist, expert linguist, dynamic personality and who ironically was not a beauty.  They don't give you sense of what was so compelling about Cleopatra.   She is depicted as a combative shrew with both Caesar and Antony. I doubt constant conflict would have gotten far with either man. If you took away her looks would either man have been attracted to the personality portrayed here?  I would think not especially considering both their backgrounds as Roman military leaders and the weak position of Egypt compared to Rome.Given the limitations of their vision of Cleopatra Liz Taylor was perfect choice to cast as the selfish, beautiful, seductive and glamorous temptress; she really breathes life into this character and gives a great performance.   Although a portrayal of the real person would have been much more interesting you can't deny Taylor's appeal and she does a great job considering the limits of the material.  Although Taylor shines sadly we never get to know Cleopatra her depth managed to get lost in this oversexed Hollywood costume drama.This movie was lush eye-candy without a whole lot of substance; in fairness to this project it fits in with similar epics of the 50's and sixties - the style reminds me of DeMille films like The Ten Commandments. It did capture the public imagination because it launched the relationship of Taylor and Burton and ultimately despite its issues and because of their star power it turned a profit.The research, writing and the Directors vision should have each contributed to creating a great film instead it produced this mediocre costume drama.  The real shame is that in the hands of someone with a vision and a passion for the subject matter it could have been great.
Trite. The Fridays gang steals some diamonds.  Mike Epps is not Chris Tucker no matter how hard he tries to be.  His constant whinning is enough to ride my last nerve.  Plus, everything about the movie is just campy and just wholly unbelieveable that I don't know where to begin.  Whatever you do don't buy or rent this garbage-wait to catch it on TBS or something
Free to Be You and Me - As Long As You Are Like Me. I rented this on a whim and it brought back a lot of memories from my 1970s days in elementary school.  This video made its rounds in the public schools.  The songs are catchy and the film quality is good.But make no mistake, this is propaganda aimed at children.  I will not be showing it to my kids.Despite the freewheeling title, the message is that girls will find happiness only if they mimic boys.Case in point:  Atalanta, a princess, finds happiness when she competes with men in a footrace and when she rejects marriage so she can travel the world (on her father's horse).  She also designs and fabricates rocketships in her spare time.Juxtapose that story with another cartoon where a femine girl in a pink dress and curls is devoured by tigers when she follows the custom of "ladies first."  The tigers abide her request and throw her into a boiling cauldron.  The narrator advises us that the boiling girl makes a very tasty meal.Our "hosts", infant puppets voiced by Mel Brooks and Marlo Thomas, are revolting.  There should be a law against using Mel Brooks' voice for a baby.  Apparently, I repressed memories of these creatures, but seeing them again brought back the horror.  Needless to say, I fast forwarded through the disturbing puppetry.Overall, this DVD is fun for thirtysomethings but should be kept away from children
Buy the Rhino Version. This movie is my favorite movie. Ever. I feel terrible giving it two stars. But it gets 2 stars because I am comparing it to the Rhino version, which I also own. I also own the original VHS. I have watched this movie at least once a year since I was 8 except for about 6 years in middle school/HS. I can sit in class and watch it from memory in my head.BUY THE RHINO VERSION.If you can't find the Rhino version, this isn't half bad. Its just that that version is much better, and since I have been growing up with older copies, the new one's flaws, minor to the newcomer, are blinding to me. I also am physically unable to watch any of the "Special Edition" Star Wars because of those changes, if that gives a clue to my movie anality.BUY THE RHINO VERSION IF YOU CAN FIND IT.One complaint is that the VHS had this cool "glitter" effect in a couple of scenes involving energon and Unicron internals. It is present in the VHS, It came out wrong in the Rhino version, and was totally gone in the 20th. Thanks for deleting part of my childhood.In comparison to the Rhino version:The remaster is terrible. Mine seems to flicker and have strange artifacts. The colors are totally off. Hot Rod is basically magenta/pink instead of red and his orange is not orange like an orange, it is orange like a cheaply made basketball.Widescreen is fake. It is a cut fullscreen. I wish you weren't such a liar, Sony.Cover art: D-. No detail. Looks like whoever does the new show drew it in an afternoon or two. The matrix looks like a honeydew. It would have got an F but Prime is on there.Very few of the extras were worth it. I bought this for the remaster, hoping for some clean up and a restoration of the glitter effect, and they weren't there
This Sequel Is Not So Bad. It Is Only Unnecessary. What it this? Disney's original animated film `The Jungle Book' was made in 1967, and after almost 40 years they released a sequel `The Jungle Book 2.' What is the point of doing this anyway?To be fair, the sequel is not a horrible film. It has more colors (more light colors in the jungle) and comes with the original's exhilarating `Bare Necessities.' Who can dislike this song? And the introductory part using stick puppets is cleverly done, letting us into the world of the wild child Mowgli and his friends.But after that, about 10 minutes or so, the film suddenly starts to look not-so-ambitious attempt to re-tell the story of the original, which should have been ended 40 years ago. In this sequel Mowgli, who is fed up with the rules of the village, goes back to the jungle where his friend big bear Baloo is living and dancing to that charming song alone. Now Baloo is happy to meet the boy again for he is lonely and needs a partner to do the musical number.But we are not so happy. That is partly because their reunion virtually ignores the original film's conclusion, and partly because we know the same story has just begun again. The difference between the 1967 version and this one is that Shanti also steps into the jungle with a little boy Ranjan, but this slight difference means little to us because both of them are quite unmemorable.After all, the problem is not the fact that the story of `The Jungle Book 2' in fact retreads that of the original because few people would still remember the details of the film made 40 years ago. The real drawback is that in `JB2' nothing interesting happens except the last 10 minutes where the bad tiger tries to kill Mowgli. The film provides musical scenes (which are decent themselves), but they only stretch the thin story. Even though I love the song Bare Necessities, I don't want to listen to it three times in a short film that only runs 72 minutes.To me (I am living in Japan) the most shocking thing about the film is that like the so-so film `Return to Neverland' `The Jungle Book 2' was originally made for video, and then was chosen for theatrical release in USA and UK. That they can do such a thing is as unaccountable as the company's choice of the material for the sequel
Sour Note. No wonder they didn't produce any other live action productions of Dr. Seuss books until after his death.  This film gave me a headache.  The direction and pacing of the film is flat, the musical numbers were unmemorable and boring(inexplicably nominated for an Oscar!), the acting was wooden, the sets were garish and ugly.  At least this film is not the cynical merchandising vehicle that the two most recent screen adaptations of Dr. Seuss works were.  I think Dr. Seuss works best in small doses like the short animated TV shows that were made some thirty-odd years ago.  Do check out the "Gerald McBoing-Boing" cartoon thats included on the disc.  It contains more wit and imagination in a few minutes than "Dr. T" does in ninety minutes
Angela Bettis needs to be stopped!. After seeing this I wanted to snatch my eyeball out of the sockett it was so stupid. I thought Angela Bettis was through torturing us after her horrible remake of "Carrie", but I guess not. If you're lonely, buy a dog, or try keeping a boyfriend and not scaring him off, but, by no means, do you begin to start killing people off and sewing their body parts together to make you a friend. This chick was seriously messed up. At any rate, I see all the rave reviews, and I don't understand it, but I guess I don't share the morbid imaginations. Afterall, I wouldn't be surprised if this turns out to be a cult classic. I just didn't like it though
And you thought reading the book in high school was a killer. Just try sitting through this humdrum, humorless, dramaless lash-up. It is a far, far better thing to rent the 1935 Ronald Colman version. It is a far, better rest you will get while sleeping through this travesty. Masterpiece Theater got the Emperor's New Clothes instead of A Tale of Two Cities. Madame Defarge as a pin-up model, indeed. Switch her with Miss Pross and you've got it. Avoid this movie at all costs. 5 stars for putting your English class to sleep, teachers
Great movie, horrible DVD!. Buena Vista (the company that releases Disney films on DVD) chose to not release anamorphic DVDs when they first came to DVD, so none of these films are anamorphically enhanced. This means, if you have a widescreen television, you will have black bars on all four sides of the picture. Also, these discs are absolutely barebones, only featuring a Dolby 2.0 soundtrack and a 1.85:1 widescreen presentation. Where are the extras?! I don't know about you guys, but I am a Mighty Duck fan who is disappointed by the DVD release of this film
Poor support. This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet
I bought my DVD copy from Amazon. I love Sophia Loren as an actress however this DVD as 3 movies in one package is a very very very poor quality DVD. Colors are bad, picture is bad and the sound is even worse. don't waste your money. My DVD copy was bought from Amazon.this is my advic
WARNING: Wrong Episode!. This item is supposedly titled "UFOs: The First Encounters." It is, however, an episode about reincarnation. It is incorrectly labeled. DO NOT PURCHASE unless you are looking for an episode on reincarnation
"Why are you goggling at me?". The Soviet film "100 Days Before the Command" is the tale of the fate of a handful of raw young recruits who attempt to retain their humanity in a bleak, senseless, brutal militaristic culture. The film blends moments of brutality--a drunken officer returning at night and urinating on the face of a sleeping recruit, for example--with endless nude scenes. The director, Hussein Erkenov, states that the inclusion of nudity was a deliberate action aimed to show the recruits' vulnerability and innocence. Well, I can buy that, I suppose--the naked shower scenes, the sprawled, tangled half-naked bodies in the abandoned woodshed, and the prolonged soapy rub-downs etc do invoke a certain ethereal 'lost boys' quality (think Hylas and the Nymphs--but the nymphs are all male). However, after wrestling with the possibility that perhaps this film wasn't set in a basic training camp for recruits after all, but instead was perhaps a nudist colony, I was still left with a dull feature, sparse dialogue and quixotic editing. In Russian with English subtitles--displacedhuma
Shamefully BAD. This is the worst movie that was ever made. I'd rather move to Paris and hang out in cafes debating French politics than watch this movie again. It is so bad that it's not worth watching just out of a sense of morbid curiosity-- it is disappointing from every angle. In this case the word bad means world-class egregious waste of otherwise perfectly good blank film. I can't even force myself to describe the movie, it's not worth the effort. I don't like thinking about the movie as I write this. What I'm really concerned about are the people here who somehow found any kind of entertainment value from this movie. Are they nuts, or just the products of our modern, mindless universities? Someone needs to tell them it's time for their medicine and to stay off the Internet
Zero chemistry. Set against the backdrop of the Spanish Civil War, &quot;Talk of Angels&quot; could have been provocative and sweeping, but it settles for little more than standard-issue Governess Falls for The Rich Guy romance. Vincent Perez has a smoldering presence, but the beautiful Polly Walker is as flat on screen as a Fascist protest poster. The two have little chemistry. The result: a stilted and perfunctory outing. The only saving grace is the always wonderful Frances McDormand, whose hard-bitten, love-struck fellow governess offers a sad little bit of zest
Not as funny or creative or whimsical as the first two!. This Rugrats movie is the worst of the three. Obviously, it was made for promotion and cash more than anything. Nickelodeon didn't consider the plot in the process, so the movie suffers. The plot is complex, yet it still manages to be too simple to be taken seriously, and it has about fifty holes and sub-plots. The movie is too complex for even a 10-year-old to grasp. Since Rugrats is aimed for 3-9 year olds, they won't get it. The main promotions for the movie were the scratch and sniff sequence [also, Burger King promotion to go with that], and the fact that Spike would now talk. Hah! Spike talked in the episode of the series about Chuckie's dreams. Besides, smelling some disgusting card [that you can smell anytime, not during the movie] isn't fun. The burger smells more like spoiled milk. Anyway, the movie is fluffy and light and tries for a few forced laughs but it dosen't happen. Debbie's well-publicized line and the &quot;That is so wrong!&quot; line, and the Wedgie-dance, are among the stupidest things I have ever seen. Maybe an 8-year-old would disagree. Being 12, I found the humour pretty dumb. So you're aware, I love the series. This movie just wasn't creative at all, it was more of a Thornberry-type flick. And finally, it just isn't whimsical or special in any way. Not recommended for anything except a rental from the video store, if that
Not as good as the film. I am a great admirer of David Suchet's Poirot, but I found this production disappointing.  Despite being filmes in Egypt with breathtaking scenery, most of the touches of warmth and humour that make a Christie novel such a pleasure to read are missing from this production.  The three young people in the love triangle that is the basis for the mystery all seemed to me entirely lacklustre.The worst thing of all though, is that two of the most charming and interesting people in the book, Timothy Allerton and his delightful mother, have had their characters grotesquely distorted until they bear virtually no resemblance to their originals, and there is a quite gratuitous and disgusting implication of an incestuous relationship between them which is certainly not implied in any way in Agatha Christie's novel.  The girl who, in the book, Timothy Allerton loves, has had her character changed and subdued until she barely makes any impact on the story at all.All this makes this a very disappointing production.  The Ustinov film is better
Might of been funny then.... Back in 1966, when no one had done anything like this it was probably hysterical!  But any one episode of Mystery Science Theater 3000, no matter which one, is at least three times as funny as this.  At least in my opinion.  This movie has a few funny moments, but I am glad I saw this as a rental and not a purchase
Boring... I know that this film is supposed to be a masterpiece, but I fail to see how anyone can interpret this film that way.  I was surprised to see Jeff Bridges is such a boring film.  I found that this film wandered too much in the beginning.  I watched the first hour and noted that there was hardly any character or plot development!  I found that the movie never really amounted to anything.  I believe that this movie is not even worth renting!  If someone can explain to me how they could interpret this movie as an excellent one, please feel free to e-mail me with an explaination, otherwise, my feelings towards this movie will stay the same. Addy : joekerrthejoker@hotmail.co
The Last Great Fad Of The 20th Century... The crass commercialism of Pokemon is hardly the issue here. We've lived through He-Man, Thundercats, Transformers, Teenage Mutant Ninja Turtles, and The Mighty Morphin' Power Rangers, with no real scar left on children's entertainment. Pokemon enslaved children in the late nineties because it was a genuinely unique and novel idea. The video game was addictive, the character designs were interesting and the marketing gimmicks of seeing NEW characters were enticing... So what's the problem with Pokemon?Look at the industry when the previous fads hit the airwaves. Children's entertainment was all about milking toys and movies so much that each fad could survive only until the next hit movie or new toy was released. Pokemon wasn't like these previous crazes made to sell a bunch of toys until interest moves onto the next big thing. Pokemon was an institution. They created an entire world of escapism that ended up to be so powerful, not even the release of a film was able to effect its popularity. If you completed the video game, they hooked you onto the card game, and when interest on the card game waned, they released a sequel to the video game, which lead to a new set of cards... They had us working on a loop that would make George Lucas drool.By the time the older fans grew up and caught on, it was too late. The whole industry had taken Pokemon's lead and Japan/Anime-style saturated the market. Digimon, Card Captors, Loonatics Unleashed, Winx Club, and Yu-Gi-Oh are all the obnoxious off-spring to Pokemon that have ruined the fun associated with a craze and have left the soulless commercialism. As I said, Pokemon was a cool idea that just happened to inadvertently cause one of the biggest slumps in children's entertainment that'll take years to get out of.As for the film... It's just bad
jazzman. A very deplorable, highly offensive, insensitive, profane,and depressing piece of garbage.  The dialogue is jaw-dropping embarrassing and so horrible, you want to coveryour ears. Also, very pretentious and unrealistic.  Justwhat kind of people enjoy watching crap like this?  TheONLY positive thing I ever got from this film was thesoundtrack by Gato Barbieri, the great jazz saxophonist.I wanted to smack the s*** out of that wimp French boy-friend of Schneider's. Brando's not much of a man in thiseither. An artsy-fartsy work for the New York/LA filmschool crowd, I suppose.  Give me "Cool Hand Luke", thankyou.
crumb ripoff!. i started liking this movie, i thought the pinball metaphor and wild characters and lifes a cartoon shiz could have worked out, if it werent for the fact that bakshi is thinly disguising himself and his own frustration as being an unoriginal "underground" cartoonist who caught on to the scene too late...if you like the depressing, gritty, wild, fastpaced style of this movie, check out the original master ROBERT CRUMB, toward whom bakshi is obviously seething with jealousy and riding anxiously on the coattails of...this is crap in noncomformity, and dont say i "didnt get it", i just think hes being hugely self-indulgent and this whole thing is an homage gone awry, lacking the wit, psychedelia, and pornographic brillinace that crumb could create so effortlessly.
save your $, read the book. one of the last of the biblical epics, this was a bomb in its initial release, and deservedly so.  the movie doesnt know whether it is de mille or italian realism, and most of the sequences (adam & eve, tower of babel) are either laughable or langorous (george c scott & ava gardner as abraham & sarah).  yet stuck in the middle is a fine half hour sequence of the story of noah, with director john huston casting himself in the one strong sequence in the movie: replete with the right mix of humor and awe.  that half hour isnt enough to recommend buying or renting the dvd, but if you can catch it on tv some day, its worth a half hour of your life.
Large disappointment. Showgirl is mistakenly taken to Paris to perform for diplomatic relations, accompanied by Bolger. Wanna guess the ending? Everything from the songs to the plot are unconvincing and so very predictable. Not to be seen twice
The Horror!  The Horror!. Well, I had to succumb.  I was attracted to this alleged film by it's notoriety as possibly the worst film ever made and a few of my friends who told me it was not that bad.  My low expectations for it were not only met but were exceeded.  This film reaches new cinematic depths.  It's complete ineptitude lacks even the charm of "Plan 9 from Outer Space."  It's stabs at humor are beyond pathetic they're just desperate.  Tom Green has to rank as the most unappealing screen presence, ever!  I felt sorry momentarily for accomplished actors like Rip Torn and Julie Hagerty who signed onto this dross but, hey, they cashed the checks.  Watching a few minutes of this slop is painful.  Enduring the full length of the film is outright masochistic.  To get the stench of this swill out of my consciousness I'm going to have to watch an actual good movie, like "Showgirls"
Star Trek:  City on the Edge of Forever. My favorite show of the Trek series but there's no way I'd buy another individual program from Amazon.  It will ONLY play on their downloaded player ...won't burn to DVD so can't play it on my television.  Don't bother buying this ...just go for the Trek collection on DVD
Forget it. What this film has is an interesting premise and storyline but unfortunatley it becomes to silly and ridicoulos and the car chase scenes didn't help either. Bruce Willis plays the part of a psychologist that while on vacation visits a friend of his Bob Moore who is also a psychologist and is later murdered and the chief suspect is in his therapy group, Bob is determined to find the killer and is also helped by a detective. There is also a young atractive woman played by Jane March who gets involved with Bruce willis's character Dr. Bill Capa, the films only intresting thing is the therapy group itself which has some odd characters otherwise the film was a lame attempt of being a thriller. Now I'm not a big fan of Bruce Willis but I have seen much better films with him in it than this including Die hard trilogy, last man standing and the sixth sense
Not in the Holmes tradition ?. For Sherlock Holmes' fans following Basil and Jeremy, this flick fails ! Attempts to comic and spoof roles played by Rathbone and Brett doesn't work. This is a film that once seen probably not in line for a second viewing. Not worthy of a Wilder performance
Where's the passion?. Recently I read about the revival of "A Chorus Line" on Broadway. I've never seen the Broadway show or any other staging of it, so I thought the movie might give me a sneak peek.  Well, somewhat disappointed here.  I can only assume that the stage version, with its long-running reputation, must be better than this film.  It's not that the film is a total debacle, but it's only mildly pleasant -- and quickly forgettable.  Even songs which I had heard before, like "What I Did For Love", were reduced to barely a mention in the film.  The film seemed to lack any real point.  A bit of a yawner.
dvd purchase. the dvd came in a timely manner, packaged well and I have had no problems with the item. It seems to be in great condition
What's up with that?. I wish I had read the other reviews first.  Though the quality of the episode and the video are top notch, the episode cuts off after 22 minutes.  Obviously, I already know the ending of "The Black Death", but I still wanted to see the full show
Last Stand at Saber River. We never got to see the movie as both copies of this DVD that we ordered had problems and would not play on any DVD player we owned.  Amazon.com was very kind in crediting us for both bad copies and even gave us a coupon for a discount on a future purchase for our inconvenience.  (Great customer service!)  You might like to know that we found a copy of this movie at a local retailer and it would not work either.  Maybe it's a manufacturing defect.Thanks for asking.  It's nice to be able to voice an opinion.
Poor support. This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet
could not be viewed!. i downloaded it and i couldn't view the video paste the intro. then i RE-downloaded it thinking that maybe it was a corrupt file, but it again it only had sound and not video. this one is a waste of money
Not the Worst Movie Ever Made. First of all, this is NOT the worst movie ever made, nor even the worst movie ever made that was given a budget and some name stars. The worst movie ever made was "Autumn in New York", but that is a different review.No, this not a great movie, but it is very interesting. And for once, thank God, it doesn't end with everything tied up in a pretty Hollywood bow where everthing works out for everyone. It has a gritty sort of realism that transcends the walk through performances of the stars of the movie. And the scenery works well for the overall feel of the movie, bleak.More interestingly for me and others of my generation who grew up with the brat pack, this marked the end of these actors forays into trying to do the teenager thing. For Molly Ringwald, she didn't do anything of note again until "The Stand" six years later, and for Andrew McCarthy, well it could be argued that he still hasn't starred in anything of note again (although he probably made some money from "Weekend at Bernies" I & II).Anyway, probably better to rent than buy, I am only buying it to complete my 80's collection.
UnBox video not yet working. Will not play once video was downloaded. I get the error message:  "can not play file, please try again later. error# 0x80040273" I made the exlusive give me call me back feature but the UnBox department was already closed, I was told the UnBox Saturday and Sunday 6-5 hours. I have to say I am impressed with the Call back feature. I downloaded the Unbox Beta now and am recieving email assistance to try to resolve the problem. Thanks Amazon UnBox! I will Update again - Feb. 10,200
Strange Movie.... Very bizzare movie! Not for kids or anyone who is prudish!Can be an erotic movie if you choose to see through the bizzare nature of it
Imitation of Life by John M. Stahl. This is Lana Turner and full cast best film I have ever seen. This was my Father's most favorite film and am I desperately wanting it. Please help me find it. Thank
Just about what I expected, only more boring... I'm sorry, I love Gina Gershon and I was looking forward to watching this movie since I do like action films. But this is such a run of the mill martial arts flick. I wasn't even intrigued to watch the whole thing without hitting the fast forward button through most of the show.The basis of this movie - the main character is an expert martial artist who comes to town just as a rising of an Aryan militia becomes prominent nearby. It starts with them killing the black preacher everyone loves who promotes people to stop hate, and the white boys in the militia don't like that. *gasp, I never would have guessed*Main character kicks everyone's behind, gets the girl, acting is horrible and the plot could be pasted to any B flick action film.Your time could be better spent watching paint dry. Or if you're desperate for something like this then watch Universal Soldier, at least it was funny
2 1/2 stars !  this is not the worst gore film eva made but not as good as expected!. Lamberto Bava's "Demons 2" just doesn't quite live up to the classic status of the original. The quality of the gore really dropped a few notches compared to part 1 & lets just admit it now & get it out of the way !THE GORE IS PRETTY MUCH THE ONLY REASON TO WATCH THESE KIND OF CULT FILMS! "Demons 2" lacks the ripping & tearing of flesh & limb that made the original "Demons" such a fun classic & instead replaces it with alot of guewy & slimey stuff & a very stupid demon puppet! While not a complete waste of time it definately fell short of my gorey expectations,especially considering the two maestro's who held the reins (Argento & Bava!)
Monotone, mediocre instruction. The level of detail in the instuction varies widely; some asanas are almost painfully dissected, others seemingly glossed over. Also, instruction is delivered in a very serious-sounding monotone. I would recommend the Yoga Zone tapes over these
Embarassing performance by Szeryng... ...make no mistake, I'm a big fan of Szeryng...however, he had a reputation of occasionally having one or more cocktails before a performance...and in this video he appears to be lit up like a Christmas tree and the result is sloppy and demeaning
Yeah Right. Ok, so I am not a big vampire movie fan, so maybe that had something to do with the fact that I thought this movie sucked. But I am always open minded to all sorts of films, so I thought I would give this one a whirl. It started out with some potential, but within the first 20 minutes I knew it was going to be hopeless. I should have just turned the darned thing off. It was so unrealistic (ok, I know it's a vampire movie, so what did I expect) but I just didn't believe that the main character (Kerr) would have done the things he ended up doing thru out the movie. And then the girl (Izabella Miko) who had about 8 lines in the movie; that was just lame and pointless. She must have felt like such a loser telling people, yeah, I'm in this movie "The Forsaken", and I'm in it almost the entire time...but....ahhh....well just call me zombie girl. Anyways, I highly recommend a pass on this one, unless you are a complete vampire fanatic
UnBox video not yet working. Will not play once video was downloaded. I get the error message:  "can not play file, please try again later. error# 0x80040273" I made the exlusive give me call me back feature but the UnBox department was already closed, I was told the UnBox Saturday and Sunday 6-5 hours. I have to say I am impressed with the Call back feature. I downloaded the Unbox Beta now and am recieving email assistance to try to resolve the problem. Thanks Amazon UnBox! I will Update again - Feb. 10,200
Desperately depressing Dalton disaster. This is possibly the most miserable, gloomy film Timothy Dalton has ever made.  He plays the King of Piedmont, who develops an inexplicable passion for a rather tiresome French countess.  She, however, is devoted to her rather wet husband and wants nothing to do with the King, which shows from the beginning that she has deplorable taste.  However, her husband's family want her to give into the King because he is making everyone's lives a misery moping about, and when in the end she realises even her husband wants her to give in to him, she agrees to become the King's mistress.  She proceeds to revenge herself on her husband's family by having them banished to their family estate, but keeps her husband around to act as a lackey. Although the King is crazy about her, she still insists she doesn't love him, until in the end he loses his temper and gives her a black eye.  While I don't in the least blame him, I feeel it would have made a more interesting scene if he had walloped her on a different portion of her anatomy.  She persuades the King to get involved in a war with France, then gets ill with smallpox.  Even after he has risked his life nursing her through the disease, the ungrateful bitch still doesn't love him, what a cow.  Then she runs off with her wimpy husband, and the King is reduced to sniffing her underwear.  It all ends miserably for everyone, in the pouring rain (it never seems to stop raining in Piedmont).  I have no idea whether this preposterous film is based on true events, and if so how accurate it is, but the goings-on in Piedmont make the English monarchy look positively sane by comparison
Poor support. This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet
Sentimental and fake. Having enjoyed LOST IN TRANSLATION, I thought I might like this one, which seems to have some sort of cult reputation-- why I can't fathom. The entire plot is self-serving, shallow, and unrealistic. I guess it's supposed to depict the horror of repressive religious values, and while I don't condone those, the film lacks clear characters or any motivation. A lot of people have buttoned up parents who don't get it, and it doesn't mean they kill themselves-- because they were grounded!?Since the writer-director gerw up in Hollywood, she may not be aware that you can't keep your kid home from school without a very good reason-- social workers and what not come after you. So the entire premise is false.Romanticizing mass suicide by having a bunch of soft focus young blondes do it-- after which they supposedly ascend to erotic eternity in the imaginations of their boyish peers-- could actually encourage the act. It's not caring, not real, and not responsible.But I guess that wouldn't bother the rich, overfunded daughter of a Hollywood genius out to make a name for herself.
BOOORIIIIIING!!!!!. I WANT THE TWO HOURS OF MY LIFE BACK!After all the talk about what a cult classic this film is! What a waste of time! Maybe this movie was a novelty to American moviegoers in 1973. That time is past (even then, the "robots attack people" concept was hardly new). Now this is just a boring B movie with bad acting and anticlimactic action. This film is only good for academic or nostalgic purposes. Unless you are doing a research paper on American Sci-fi cinema, or you are in your 40s and enjoyed this movie as a kid, or you just like boring anticlimactic B movies, AVOID THIS DULL PIECE OF DRIVEL.I FEEL CHEATED!
Beneath the Glotz. The story, or rather the spirit beneath the schlocky presentation of SOLARBABIES is rather wonderful.  It must be veiwed in terms of its symbolism.  The kids are not following a glowing ball, they are following an ideal, a higher consciousness that we all possess if we can only find it.  The water represents a sacred nourishment that comes from the depths of the cosmos.  Most of us have forgotten how to access that nourishment, most of us have lost sight of that 'sphere of light'.  It's unfortunate that even the movie's director did not understand these meanings, nor did the producers nor the more famous, and over-paid of the two writers.  Consequently they all worked too hard to create another B-science fiction movie.  This movie could have been a classic
Beware of Unbox!!!. Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for
very disappointing. The movie is vulgar and not meant for children.  It is a typical Adam Sandler movie, with foul language and raunchy humor.  Not enjoyable at all.
Mansfield Park. Anyone basing their understanding of this Austen novel on this movie alone will be misled.  Perhaps the director or producer wanted to make the film "relevant" to today's "hip" audiences (which don't understand anything sophisticated).  While the film was helpful to me in establishing the characters prior to my reading the book itself, I found that the novel has none of the raciness or even some of the scenes that are found in this film.  As is often the case, viewers will find that "the book is much better than the movie."  The acting is fine, but what the actors are asked to act is not faithful to how the real story unfolds.
UnBox video not yet working. Will not play once video was downloaded. I get the error message:  "can not play file, please try again later. error# 0x80040273" I made the exlusive give me call me back feature but the UnBox department was already closed, I was told the UnBox Saturday and Sunday 6-5 hours. I have to say I am impressed with the Call back feature. I downloaded the Unbox Beta now and am recieving email assistance to try to resolve the problem. Thanks Amazon UnBox! I will Update again - Feb. 10,200
Same Thing. The Dane Cook episode is the same one that it on his "Harmful If Swallowed" c.d. The c.d. also has the uncensored version of this routine that is over 1 hour long. The one star rating is not based on the content. It is based upon Amazon not sharing this fact with customers
Low-Class, Low-Budget and Low on Titillation, a Pointless Women-in-Chains Howler Now on DVD. The title pretty much lets you know what you're getting. It's a grade-C howler but not as blatantly funny as I was hoping. Directed by exploitation film specialist Eddie Romero from a story that originally came from Jonathan Demme (long before directing "Silence of the Lambs" and "Philadelphia"), this low-budget 1972 action movie was obviously filmed in the Philippines but set in some anonymous third world country. Playing hooker and small-time drug dealer Lee Daniels, blaxploitation superstar Pam Grier plays the first half of the title role, while long-forgotten Margaret Markov is the other half, Karen Brent, an unlikely Patty Hearst-like political revolutionary looking to partner with her comrades to overthrow the oppressive local government. Naturally antagonistic toward each other, they are in a women's prison camp where they wear inexplicably bright yellow mini-skirts as uniforms. Run by a closeted warden and lecherous matron, the prison is just an excuse for a lengthy shower scene and some half-hearted cat-fighting as Lee and Karen are pitted against each other. Of course, they escape but shackled together a la "The Defiant Ones" and continue the cat-fighting until they attack a couple of nuns to steal their habits.Meanwhile, various groups of unsavory men are in pursuit - the loutish drug lord looking for Lee who stole $40K from him, the rather passive revolutionaries looking for Karen, and the incompetent police (who suffer the humiliation of exposing their privates to the drug lord). Needless to say, everything eventually comes to a head but not before gratuitous nudity by a number of Filipino women, a dog wears Karen's panties and some of the worst of 1970's men's fashion (one beer-bellied revolutionary wears a leather halter top with a straight face). There is a rather sad ending, but what's truly sad is how much of the potential black comedy is missed entirely in this hilariously preposterous exercise. Sadly, Grier is disappointing in this outing because her character is not allowed much to do beyond dealing with all the "jive", while Markov is an Amazonian blonde whom I am convinced is trying desperately to be credible. Since no one displays any talent for acting, the rest of the cast is not worth noting, except balding, bug-eyed Sid Haig, who uses his standard psycho persona as the drug lord. The 2003 DVD contains only the original trailer as an extra
I Can't Buy Into It. Amanda Pete is sexy and there was a bit of nudity, but otherwise this film did nothing for me. A bunch of guys who get together once a week and talk about their conquests? I can't even relate. And they're trying to convince me that women are just as ruthless in their hornyness? Yeah right! See it if you're a big fan of fart jokes, or whatever..
WHAT!!!!!!. I kept watching this hoping a plot would eventually come up. But it didnt .
Poor support. This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet
once again a king story is ruined on film. in the short story collection night shift, mr.king gave us some of his best short stories and spawned at least 6 movies that i know of(this mess,trucks( twice once by king as "maximam overdrive" and once as a t.v. movie),night surf,the boogyman(not the new one),graveyard shift,the mangler,and maybe more and not one has been done right! this one misses by a mile as it tells of the cult of kids who kill all the adults in a town and serve "he who walks behind the rows"more like "we steped in something behind the rows" and we steped in this flameing piece of junk!!! skip it!!!!!!
Dreadful. I recall this movie fondly--Unfortunately, the DVD quality is so poor, this cannot be watched.  Pity Amazon does not allow negative stars the their ratings.  Don't waste your time until someone cleans this up.  But it makes a nice coaster, though
Cheesy Sci-Fi flick only has *some* good things to offer, but its really silly... Josh Charles (S.W.A.T., Tv's Sports Night) finds out that he is the bearer of a key that can make you travel into different dimensions. Andrea Roth brings him to her friend, played by Rutger Hauer (The Hitcher, Sin City) who guides Charles and tells him that his father was a timedimensional warrior and that he could be too as well. On the evil end, baddie Stuart Wilson (No Escape, The Mask of Zorro) wants the key and the septer that goes along with it so he can fuse worlds together and be the ruler and what not and the trio must bring back the septer to the right place before evil hands get on it and the fate of the world is at risk. Interesting idea is squandered by sillyness and dumb dialouge and some pretty crummy acting, altough Charles saves this from being a total disaster. It's good to see Hauer not being a bad guy but he's wasted along with Wilson. AND, well, it was surprising to see Jack Black (School of Rock, King Kong) in this movie...one before he became famous. Black does his mannerisms and speech. Watch it once and then dimension jump the hell out of the room.
Basic Incompetence By Everyone Across The Board!. This movie should be shown to classrooms of aspiring screenwriters and directors as an example of how not to be sucked into the Hollywood junk machine. The screenwriter of this movie obviously had some ideas about a coherent story that he wanted to tell about moral relativity and corrupt military officials. This film's story structure is mostly influenced by the classic film Rashomon. Well, so what happened? How did this ungracious disaster of a movie make it to the big screen? The biggest culprits are easily the movie stars, John Travolta and Samuel L. Jackson, using their bloated star egos to force the screenwriter to rework his material into something they ultimately found more suitable to their star personas. Disgusting! Travolta was supposed to be a bad guy and Jackson was supposed to bite the bullet, but no way would the two Hollywood jerks allow that!SPOILER ALERT: Who in their right mind was surprised by the ending? I knew Sam Jackson was in on it from the get go and soon enough he would grace us with his presence. Lo and behold, his bald head emerges at the end of the movie wearing a white outfit like an angel of some sort. I hate this movie, it's an insult to the audience! John McTiernan, ( Predator, Die Hard ), the director of Basic should be ashamed of such a lackluster effort on his part. But what could he do when faced with the two morons who played the leads! A sad joke of a movie, avoid it unless you just love junk
I would have picked zero stars but it wasn't an option. First of all, the only reason I started watching this movie was because my roommate got it and we're both lovers of the Romantics. The only reason I kept watching this movie after the first 5 minutes was because I could already tell it was going to be completely and totally awful and would make for a few good laughs between the two of us.Beyond some very basic facts about the party of writers, this movie is not grounded anywhere in reality. The acting is way overdone and quickly becomes grating. There is no plot whatsoever to speak of and the movie lacks any sense of clear direction or purpose -- it is simply a collection of random, inexplicable, and nonsensical events filled with frenzied sexuality, animalism, and vaguely-defined hallucinations. While I'm sure the actual experience was not entirely tame and prudish, I find it hard to believe that this is anywhere close to being accurate. Even when it tries to delve into pseudo-philosophical discussion about the nature of love, fear, poetry etc., that you would expect to emerge among these great literary figures (which, strangely, does not happen often)it utterly fails to make any understandable conclusions or statements and their real views, beliefs, and visions become hysterical ravings rather than the passionate philosophies that they were.The film does not deal fully at all with Mary's creation of the Frankenstein story, nor do any of the other characters write ghost stories as Byron challenges them and as really took place. The idea that the story was born out of Mary's personal fears is an interesting one but this too spirals out of control and has almost nothing to do with Frankenstein.The premise behind this disaster of a movie is a good one and I think with the right script, actors, and director it could be an amazing exploration of authorship, literary exploration and exchange, and this fascinating group of writers. That is not, however, what this film is.P.S. If you do get seduced by the other reviews, pay particular attention to the scenes in the billiard room...I didn't know they had light bulbs in 1816!
Poor History and a screenplay over-dramatic. I'm glad someone knows enough about English History to recognize the pure fiction of this film.  But in addition to points made about historical inaccuracy, I also had to object to the ridiculous portrayal of Mary Tudor.  Over-zealous and fanatic (as was a common religious stance in those times - promoted by both sides of the Protestant/Catholic conflict), she was not insane as the film makes her in the opening scenes.  And throughout the film, there was this emphasis on milking the passions for all they are worth - no objectivity whatsoever.  I was sorely disappointed!If you want to get to know Elizabeth and the period in which she lived, I would recommend the superb BBC series, Elizabeth R with Glenda Jackson.  And if you want even further background, look to the BBC again in the Six Wives of Henry VIII with Keith Mitchell.  Tidbits can be gained as well from the movie Mary, Queen of Scots (although a few historical inaccuracies can be found in it - for example, Mary Stuart and Elizabeth never met, although it was Mary's great desire) and even another title, Anne of the Thousand Days.  Those two more theatrical representations fulfill the desire for the more dramatic while still coming closer to the history of the times.  This film just doesn't cut it
will carrie wind up with zhivago or stalin?  oops, i must be mixing up my stories ... an insufferable view of life among a claque of ruskie girlfriends from the late 50s to the late 70s. nothing more than "sex & the city" transplanted to moscow in the khruschev and brezhnev eras -- if thats your cup of borscht, more power to you
Not Happy. I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?
Dont get "Fiji" final week ... Dont dwnld " Survivor, "Thunderstorms & Sacrifice" ". Its my fault for not reading the whole thing. you would think that the last episode would be the finale , but NO, its just a 10 minute recap going to the finale 4. I didnt even get a full 45 minute episode. No finale. I got rippped off. $1.99 dwnld not well spent. Dont bother dwnldng any episode of fiji if you dont know the ending. Because they dont have that episode, not even the reunion show
a propaganda film gone wrong. This review is for the Criterion Collection DVD edition of the film.Barbet Schroeder's film, a "self-portrait" of the infamous Ugandan dictator Idi Amin, generated much controversey and even death threats. Idi Amin himself demanded that Schroeder remove particular scenes from the film under the threat of killing french citizens living in Uganda.The film is well written but almost appears sympathetic to Amin.The DVD only has an interview with director Barbet Schroeder for a special feature, although the liner notes contain a transcript of a letter Amin write requesting the deletion of particular scenes.This film has significance, but is not a good one
Beware of Unbox!!!. Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for
Poor Reproduction of Great Movies. This is an extremely disappointing copy of 3 great original movies.  Looks as if it was duplicated on poor dvd equipment from old, used VHS tapes.  No wonder it's hard to find out who made this.  I wouldn't want to take credit for it, either.  Hard to enjoy in this poor format. My delivery took place in February, 2006
Dont get "Fiji" final week ... Dont dwnld " Survivor, "Thunderstorms & Sacrifice" ". Its my fault for not reading the whole thing. you would think that the last episode would be the finale , but NO, its just a 10 minute recap going to the finale 4. I didnt even get a full 45 minute episode. No finale. I got rippped off. $1.99 dwnld not well spent. Dont bother dwnldng any episode of fiji if you dont know the ending. Because they dont have that episode, not even the reunion show
How much is that demon in the window.... Ohh no, please Mr. Corny demon-thing, don't hurt me!  This movie just seemed to really suck.  While it did scare me (mainly because the only thing scary about this movie was the monster's growl, then you see the  monster and feel better) it still stunk of usual smell of B-rated monster  flicks.  Watching such flicks is almost a hobby of mine, and I'd have to  say, in a triple threat match among this monster (whose name is forgotten  or not even mentioned), Rawhead Rex, and Grim (from the similarly named  film), I'd say Rawhead would go all the way, but going back to the movie,  It was pretty cheesey what with all the ho-hum acting, ho-hum story, and  ho-hum characters.  I advise you to stay away from this movie.  Just ignore  it and maybe it'll go away
Ok. But no charm. Lorna is pretty, and her suitor is devoted. The story holds your attention. For many that is enough. Some auspicious beginnings, without depth. So maybe 3-stars for some people. I give 2-stars, if I do not keep it to watch again in later years.I found the romance unfulfilling, and so the movie. Romance movies that I liked better are: "North & South", "Pride & Prejudice"-1940, & 1996 & 2006, "Wives and Daughters", and "A Walk to Remember". Adventure with romance: "The Scarlet Pimpernel".
Sad to see Laurel &amp; Hardy in decline. In this 1944 MGM comedy directed by Sam Taylor, Laurel &amp; Hardy are the chef and butler who foil a plot by enemy agents to poison the young exiled King Christopher (David Leland).  On the one hand &quot;Nothing But Trouble&quot; spends time developing the boy-king's growing love for the joys of common democracy, such as playing football.  Then we have the comic sequences in which Laurel &amp; Hardy wreck a dinner party, try to take a steak away from a hungry lion, and end up on the ledge of a skyscraper.  Clearly the boys are getting too old for this kind of stuff.  Not as bad as &quot;The Big Noise,&quot; but too close for comfort. Watching this one will only make you feel sad and not in a good way
A movie about nothing. I purchased this DVD with my eyes wide open, because I had been forwarned by reviewers I respect, and I still place Dylan's 1977 "Renaldo and Clara" near the top of my most pretentiuos doo doo list. But wait, that was almost 30 years ago and this movie stars Jeff Bridges AND John Goodman (the Dude abides), also Jessica Lange, Giovanni Ribisi, Val Kilmer, Bruce Dern, Mickey Rourke and was co-written and directed by Larry Charles of Seinfeld and Friends fame, so how bad could it be?Well I planned on watching it one night but after about 30 minutes became fatiqued and fell asleep. This went on for about 3 more nights until I finally finished the movie. The week before I had watched the uncut "Heaven's Gate" (nearly 4 hours), a deliberate slowly paced film, in one sitting, and yet "M and A" seemed so much longer. I also skipped watching the few deleted scenes (something I can't remember ever doing), and went straight for the "Making Of" and watched and listened to those involved talking about the great script and a movie I can't remember seeing.I realize now that deleted scenes would be overkill since the entire movie seems like it's just a bunch of strung together deleted scenes. This is not to say the movie is unwatchable, I had kept coming back to it night after night, in fact there are some very entertaining and surreal moments in the film, I just wish there had been more of them. For starters I would have liked to have seen more of Ribisi, for he was the most focused in his part (though it also seemed like he was in another movie), they could have beefed up the Christian Slater-Chris Penn bits or even made them the main characters and created a sort of Abbott and Costello Meet Jack Fate. Val Kilmer was great, but he disappeared too soon, and some of the songs Dylan did with his band were pretty good, but they could have given the young girl (Tinashe Kachingwe), who stole the show singing "The Times They Are A-Changin'", more of Dylan's songs to sing.The best part of the film for me was Jeff Bridges as a Dudesque reporter asking Dylan's Jack Fate lots of bizarre questions, in fact a short that just edited together all these bits would be enjoyable.I guess that's most of the good stuff, but on the other hand, I wish they had removed the entire subplot concerning his dying father (Richard Sarafian) Angela Bassett, and Mickey Rourke, and despite old man makeup, his father still looks younger than Bob (things must have been pretty bad in prison).Less of Lange and Goodman would have made it less irratating, and Luke Wilson and particularly Penelope Cruz should have ended up on the cuttingroom floor. I'm not sure what to make of Ed Harris in black-face except that I felt like he was a refugee from some old Fellini film.Bob Dylan acts like he sings which isn't so bad in a film where  many of the other actors are so over-the-top, and watching him is like looking at an abstract painting, it doesn't ever change but you keep looking at it to try and find some inner meaning.This is Larry Charles first film and judging by his TV work you would have expected it to be at least funny, but where "Seinfeld" was supposed to be a TV show about nothing but was actually about alot, this movie really is about nothing
Beware of Unbox!!!. Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for
Noooo! Make it stop!. It seems like a good idea... 'Las Vegas Hillbillys,' a kind of a 'Krush Groove' for the possum pie and moonshine set, starring Jayne Mansfield and Mamie van Doren.  Duelling blonde bombshells, right?  Ah, no.  Van Doren is looking sad and puffy in this film as a 'tough' but disinterested saloon singer, longing for better days when she was straining angora sweaters and scratching out the eyes of good girls everywhere.  Jayne Mansfield sports a series of tentlike grandma dresses of the sort later found adorning the fashionable Weezie Jefferson, reading from cue cards with a kind of breathy, clueless abandon which is probably quite fetching when she's not dressed in a potato sack.  One can imagine her on her rendezvous with destiny, thinking, 'Oh no, we're about to slide underneath that semi truck!  But at least I won't have to think about 'Las Vegas Hillbillys' anymore.'  Between the two of them, they don't get more then seven minutes' screen time.  This movie is ostensibly a musical, in the sense that there is music in it, consisting of fifteen- or twenty-minute blocks of bad lip-synching (in an 85-minute film) which do nothing to advance the plot, such as it is.  Watch for Bill Anderson's all-KGB-agent backup band. 'We are American high-fashion models.'  I gave this movie a whole two stars because they *can* sing, after all... give them a break.  Richard Kiel makes a surprise appearance as, can you guess? a thug.  He actually has dialogue in this film, of a sort, and in watching his performance you really get a sense that unenthusiastically bunny-hopping between cable cars in 'Moonraker' represented the pinnacle of his acting career.  The plot: Woody Weatherby contemplates stardom, inherits a debt-ridden saloon from his uncle, goes to Vegas, tries to run the place, has a twenty-minute nap.  In the last ten minutes Aunt Clem magically fixes everything and starts a cream pie fight.  Van Doren kisses Ferlin Husky, thereby completing her descent to the innermost circle of Hades.  The End.  There was supposedly a sequel to this, 'Hillbillys in a Haunted House,' but I frankly am afraid to watch it.  Be my guest
That breeze ain't an open window. Not that I know everything about crime - especially getting away with it - but A SHOCK TO THE SYSTEM made it look too easy. Performances by Michael Caine as a done-wrong-now-doin'-wrong angry executive and Will Patton as  the police detective who is wise to him make the film worth a look on  television.  But A SHOCK TO THE SYSTEM needed to close a few holes in its  story to make it worthy of your movie theater/home video payment
A good ole Rebel, New Orleans. I will not watch the movie "Andersonville" until they make a movie called "Elmira"(the camp in Elmira, N.Y., the worst of the Union prison camps had 35% death rate)
Movie is great, but Unbox is uncooked. Movie got 2/3 through and just quit. No problem, this is Windows right? Just reboot and start where you left off. Only for whatever reason I can't restart this movie from anywhere but the beginning. I'm not going to watch this moving over from the beginning just to see if it fails in the same place again. Only a couple bucks, but definitely not worth it
Better not shown. I imagine this movie might be funny if you're really into dog shows.  I'm not, so I couldn't tell you.  Mediocre at best.  "This is Spinal Tap" was better
Didn't Emanuelle used to involve mostly eroticism?. If you want erotica then this isn't the Emanuelle film for you.  Yes, there are a couple of so-so love scenes, but the one lesbian scene is pratically non-existent, and the obvious focus of this one is the blood and gore content.  I expected more erotic content, and instead got mostly gruesome scenes that I didn't particularly expect.  Remember that scene in &quot;Tarzan the Ape Man&quot; where a nude Bo Derek was tied up and bathed by native women?  That scene was erotic.  Nothing like that one this video
plot holes. The first half hour of this 90 minute movie is actually quite good.  In fact, it is enthralling and has an interesting twist in that we don't know the real fact behind whether a young woman was violated by her boyfriend while unconscious.  According to the rumor (the rumor being a school experiment conducted by three roommates) she was, however, but we the audience don't know that.  However, the young woman is quick to think she has been raped.  Why there is no attempt at a physical exam, is unexplained, especially since the young woman involved has the reputation of being a professional virgin, however it turns out she isn't, so that's why the movie lasts longer than 30 minutes.  Fortunately, we're not dealing with unwanted pregnancies, either, so this doesn't turn into a soap opera.  However, we do have the dreamboat "hero" who dreams up the rumor about her being raped, and who exhibits unlikeable traits throughout. But that's true of the three leads - the roommates are all unlikeable, being insufferably full of themselves.  The last half of the film, 'dreamboat' takes the turn as lead character, and it's his story we're following, whereas his female roommate had the first half of the film, and basically it's her introduction to the audience of all the characters. Turns out 'dreamboat' and the young woman victim have a history together; which means issues they have to work out, and everyone else (in a way, the entire student body and its faculty and local law enforcement) is sucked into their story and mutual thirst for truth, though the characters don't have the same truth in mind - it's about vengeance; not justice.  And vengeance when it's not the comic book variety, isn't fun for an audience, it's just distasteful.  In other words, the man and woman should have been shut up together in a room so they could have worked it out for themselves, and left the rest of us alone.  So from a brilliant first half-hour - and btw how does the roommate penniless art student have the dollars for all that tech equipment? - we degenerate into a constantly weaving pattern of lies and deceptions that seems more pointless than clever.  There is merely too much story, so it becomes ridiculous.  A basically good premise is ruined.  If you are a fan of any of the stars involved, it might be worth viewing, if only once, but the film as a whole will probably leave a vile taste in your mouth.  Perhaps that's the ultimate message on a film about the dangers of spreading GOSSIP, or in this case deliberate lies, is that what goes around comes around, and also it will leave you feeling sick to your stomach.  I almost recommend you watch the first 30-45 min then quit midway, but anyone will watch all the way thru at least once, just to be sure where this is headed
Survivor Rip Off. I have bought 2 seasons of Survivor on unbox and both of them are not complete. Very dissapointing. Guatemala  episode 11 is from a completely different season and it is missing the last 2 episodes and the reunion show. Just leaves you hanging. Exile Island is missing the final episode it just goes from the competition between Danielle and Cirie for a spot in the final 3 to the live reunion show
Please not another season of this!. Ok so I have always thought Courteney Cox should not be allowed on screen due to lack of acting talent and this show just proves it. It really is the most boring show Ive seen in a long time. If you thought she was bad in scream...and friends..dont watch this...there are other actors in this show who do redeem it somewhat but could never save it. Hopefully this show will be scraped
AMAZON SUCKS. I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!
Please not another season of this!. Ok so I have always thought Courteney Cox should not be allowed on screen due to lack of acting talent and this show just proves it. It really is the most boring show Ive seen in a long time. If you thought she was bad in scream...and friends..dont watch this...there are other actors in this show who do redeem it somewhat but could never save it. Hopefully this show will be scraped
Amazon.com likes to take my money. this is another story that I don't know if I like it or not because Amazon.com never sent it too me.  this has happened about 4/5 times.  While usually I have no problem getting movies, sometimes I do.  sending them e-mails doesn't seem to work.  If they didn't have the best prices for movies, I'd leave
Dont get "Fiji" final week ... Dont dwnld " Survivor, "Thunderstorms & Sacrifice" ". Its my fault for not reading the whole thing. you would think that the last episode would be the finale , but NO, its just a 10 minute recap going to the finale 4. I didnt even get a full 45 minute episode. No finale. I got rippped off. $1.99 dwnld not well spent. Dont bother dwnldng any episode of fiji if you dont know the ending. Because they dont have that episode, not even the reunion show
Great play, miscast Cyrano and a dull, flat English translation. "Cyrano" is one of the greatest verse plays ever written.Unfortunately Gerard Depardieu is no Cyrano.  He's a great, clumsy side of beef, not a shining flame encased in the middleweight body of Hercule Sevanien Cyrano de Bergerac.  With the best will in the world, his performance seldom achieves adequacy and never brilliance.The English translation was especially commissioned for this film.  It is undistinguished, prosy and dull.  It has little of the wit and less of the poetry of the old standard translation commissioned in the 1920s by the great American actor Walter Passmore.Get the Jose Ferrer version.  This one's a dog
Harriet is good, but the rest of the film...... I gotta give it to that little girl who plays Harriet in the movie. She did a great job. But, I found Rosie O'Donnell's performance really lacking. Which made the film a little boring to watch at times.
AMAZON SUCKS. I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!
Poor support. This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet
The Legend Exceeds The Reality. I have always been an avid fan of Westerns in general, and Charlton Heston in particular, but this is one of those movies where the legend surrounding it far exceeds the actual viewing, even allowing for its having been butchered by the studiosCharlton Heston of course, plays Major Dundee, a man with a very forceful character - resolute, determined, and even rebellious ("invading" Mexico and attacking the French army).  For such a man to later be found as a hopeless drunk wallowing in the gutters of Durango is thoroughly incomprehensible.The purpose of the "invasion" of Mexico is to capture or destroy the Apache Indian, Charriba, so one would expect the audience to watch the movie in anticipation of a great climax when the two sides finally meet.  When they do meet however, the action is over in less than a minute, and Charriba is simply shot by Michael Anderson Jnr.  So the climax is, in my view, an anti-climax.We are then presented with a new climax, when Dundee and his men have to defeat the French army in order to get back across the Rio Grande.  Although this encounter is a lot more exciting than the one with the Apaches, the overall effect, as far as I am concerned, is rather like the effect one gets when reading a murder mystery to discover that the murderer is somebody who only entered in the final pages (and the scene where a wounded Richard Harris single-handedly takes on the other half of the French army is so unexpected in view of what has gone on before, as to be virtually unbelieveable).With regard to the movie having been heavily cut by the studios, I would suggest that if any cuts had to be made, they should have cut the Durango scenes entirely, plus all of the scenes featuring Senta Berger.  Romance only slows down the action and adds nothing to the story, whilst too much romance leads to boredom.Finally, having watched the movie with the new score first, and then with the original score, I have to say that I preferred the original.The movie opens with Charriba saying to an upside down strung-up soldier, "Who are you going to send after me now?"  The original then has the opening title, "Major Dundee," accompanied by the Mitch Miller Sing Along Gang singing the Major Dundee March.  To me this is a much more stirring and rousing score than the new replacement, and sets the scene for what one hopes will be an exciting movie.By all means buy this dvd as a piece of movie history, and as part of either a Charlton Heston or Sam Peckinpah collection (even though Peckinpah disowned it), but for my money don't expect a Western anything like as great as the likes of The Big Country, The Magnificent Seven, or How The West Was Won.
Can't bring myself to say more. I love a good action movie.  Love them.  So what weent wrong?  Well, the effects were there, but it all seemed so detached.  We may have seen most of the action sequences you can do on a ship previously, or we may not.  Bottom line is this:  if you are going to have an action sequence, make it exciting.  Watching the DVD of this, I wasn't able to be drawn in sufficiently to keep me from checking my email.  At less than 100 minutes in length.A boring action movie is just plain wrong, and that's what Poseidon is.
Goodtimes Dvd = Bad Picture Quality. After reading a couple of other reviews about the &quot;quality&quot; of transfer on this dvd, I decided I wanted this in my collection. What I THOUGHT would be good or atleast a decent enough picture quiality, I WAS VERY DISSAPOINTED.THE QUALITY OF TRANSFER OF THE PICTURE IS HORRIBLE!!! A great movie a total real diaster flick in picture quality. Non anamorphic, deffintaly not remastered or digitally transfered. Picture tones are very, very bad, along with what little color that is desplayed. Almost a black &amp; white picture with most of the entire movie too dark to make out what is going on. Even with my brightness turn all the way up on my tv, it still was so dark it almost wasn't worth continue watching.The ONLY things positive on this dvd was the fact it was in widescreen and &quot;suppossedly&quot; in Dolby Digital EX. The beginning Dolby intoduction was deffinatly in Dolby and had good sound but the movie itself didn't distributeand Dolby sounds that I could make out on my theatre sound system. Sounded like mono to me.Thsi dvd reproduction stinks and I suggest those that are into quality dvd and getting you money worth saty away from this &quot;Goodtimes Video&quot; version untill it is put on dvd correctly. Why they botherd is beyond me. Because I wanted to have a copy of this movie in widescreen, I am taping it on to VHS for my collection and going to try and return it for something better tommorrow. I suppsoe I'll have to be content that I got the widscreen version on VHS for now untill they re-release it on dvd with better quality, or they show it on tv in widescreen which I highly doubt. Heck, even TAPING IT OFF TV YOU'D GET A BETTER PICTURE QUALITY THAN THIS DVD
Disappointing in more ways than as a remake. It's not just that this film is a bloated remake of a quick, clean, near-perfect minimalist thriller. It's not that much of the added material (particularly the internal affairs sub-plot) feels tacked-on and unnecessary. It's not even that Pacino's character is a toned-down shell of the dangerously off-kilter detective of the original, that one of the more complicated characters (Frya Selmer/Tanya Francke) has been reduced down to set dressing, or that the ending ruins the film's moral atmosphere. It's the fact that Nolan, a sublimely talented director, is unable to coax a believable performance from any of his leads. Pacino does the method-acting bit again, taking it over the top in every single scene; Hilary Swank plays a pale imitation of her better roles as the down-to-earth hometown girl; and Robin Williams--well, he's Robin Williams. The kids in this film, Katharine Isabelle and Jonathan Jackson, turn in fine performances that, while hardly career-makers (which they couldn't be, considering how far their roles have been pared down), are a refreshing change of pace from their adult contemporaries' mugging. See the film for their far-too-short performances, but make sure you rent it, and don't pay too much to do so
Terrible. I used to like this film back in the late 80s but after purchasing it, reading the book and watching it again I realized that there isn't much to say that is redeeming of this film. Sure it's low budget, but the story and characters are so cheesy and NOT in a good b movie way. I guess this film will still have it's fans but after reading the book (I dont normally compare books to films because its downright impossible to compare) I found the characters just not that likeable and the ending is very ridiculous. For a film to achieve cult status isn't too hard if its a b movie but whether its a good film or not is the real question. As for me I rate this low because I find it atrocious but for it's fans, the ones out there that REALLY love this film and call it a "classic" I must say I hope some day they remake the story with better actors, effects and plotting
Sickening. After seeing this film, I am pretty amazed they have been able to put what they did on to a dvd. I actually felt sickened by the images I saw and had to turn it off many times. Yes its an interesting documentary but can you imagine how the victims family felt knowing the images of their loved one being violently stabbed were being shown to people? Personally, I think you've got to have a strong stomach to watch it
Shameless Rip-Off. Shameless rip-off of "Jungle Taitei" ("Kimba the White Lion") by Tezuka.  Any anime lover can tell.  (Similarities in characters, scenes, and story lines are unbelievable.)  Disney's response?  "Never heard of Kimba."  Oh, purleese.  I'm kicking myself for paying Disney for this piece of swindle
Very boring. I've been wanting to see this movie and I finally did on LOGO. I'm just happy I waited untill It came on TV. I though it was going to be way better considering what reviewers everywhere said about it. The romance was slim to none. I thought the other guy on the cover was going to have a bigger role. Well, I won't say too much without destroying the movie for those who have not seen it. Anyway, I would much rather watch Beautiful Thing, Get Real, All Over the Guy & The Incredibly True Adventure of Two Girls In love
Ambrose Bierce is a Better Authority. I have rented this video for the sake of a trip down Memory Lane. Of course, fourteen years produce a great shift in gullibility. I hated this video for its teaching of American ideology in perhaps the least open manner imaginable. For example, in
Chairman William Shatner? Be Afraid! Be Very Afraid!!!. Between 1993 and 1999, a popular television show in Japan called "Iron Chef" ("Ryori no tetsujin") pitted its acclaimed one of its professional chefs against a challenging chef each week using a particular theme ingredient in all of the dishes made.  The show was hosted by the flamboyant Chairman Kaga (Takeshi Kaga) who opened each show, presented the challenger, unveiled the theme ingredient and gave a brief synopsis before the winning chef was declared. The show gained popularity in syndication in the U.S. on the Food Network using a mixture of dubbed English and subtitles.Due to the rising popularity of the show from cable subscribers, the UPN TV network decided to broadcast an American version of the show in 2001 that was produced by the Larry Thompson Organization and Lions Gate Television of Canada.  Unfortunately, these two companies failed to effectively reproduce the elements of the Japanese show that had made it so popular.  Instead, they created a poorly written & directed substitute that was akin to watching a WWF wrestling match, not a challenge between two professional chefs.The first mistake that the Larry Thompson Organization and Lions Gate Television made was in their selection of the new chairman for "Iron Chef USA".  Though I very much enjoy William Shatner in his roles as Captain Kirk in the original "Star Trek" TV series, T.J. Hooker in the show of the same name and his more recent role as an attorney in "Boston Legal", his attempt at being chairman of "Iron Chef USA" was far too farcical and clownish to be taken seriously in trying to replicate Takeshi Kaga's flamboyance from the original Japanese TV series.  Their next mistake was in the commentaries.  During each of the original Japanese "Iron Chef" shows, a group of commentators (which included a culinary expert) would explain what each chef was doing, as well as analyze the possible dish outcomes.  The "Iron Chef USA" commentators treated the two chefs as if they were athletes and would even send in an annoying "field reporter" (Sissy Biggers) to ask them stupid question while they were busily preparing their meals.  Their other major mistake was their selection of judges.  Most of the Japanese "Iron Chef" shows included an actual food critic as one of the judges, as well as Japanese actors, actresses & sports personalities, who were quite articulate in their critiques of the prepared meals; but the "Iron Chef USA" judges were inarticulate and inexperienced.Not surprisingly (and quite thankfully), only two episodes of "Iron Chef USA" starring William Shatner were ever produced and were entitled, "Iron Chef USA: Showdown in Las Vegas" and "Iron Chef USA: Holiday Showdown".  Each of these shows on the DVD I rate with a well-deserved 1 out of 5 stars for being poor mockeries of the much more entertaining original Japanese version.  In 2004, the Food Network's produced its own version entitled "Iron Chef America: Battle of the Masters" that included two of the beloved original Japanese Iron Chefs, Hiroyuki Sakai and Masaharu Morimoto, and was hosted by Takeshi Kaga's nephew, Mark Dacascos.  It was a far better show than the ill-fated 2001 "Iron Chef USA".  If you are considering purchase of the 2001 "Iron Chef USA" DVD, you do so at your own risk
You might need to watch this one twice. It starts out as one of those movies where there are a lot of unrelated characters that you think will connect in the end.  And about 2/3 through the entire story line breaks down into mass confusion
What what what???!!!. I have to wonder what world, what physical plane, what state of mind were the reviewers here who gave this a good review on? Or maybe they are Full Moon employees LOL...First of all, the movie, especially one of the earlier scenes, was identical to the 80's flick "The Unnamable", which is also and HP Lovecraft based flick. The castle freak itself looked like a bad halloween rubber suit. When he breaks out his cell, well this was just hilarious, it reminded me of the incredible hulk. Yes, Jeffrey Combs is in it. But his acting is cheesy as it can be. Hunt down The Unnamable instead, a much better movie
Poor Reproduction of Great Movies. This is an extremely disappointing copy of 3 great original movies.  Looks as if it was duplicated on poor dvd equipment from old, used VHS tapes.  No wonder it's hard to find out who made this.  I wouldn't want to take credit for it, either.  Hard to enjoy in this poor format. My delivery took place in February, 2006
worst Bond movie?. Apologies to those of you who seem to actually like this film, but when I re-watched it recently after not having seen it in ten years or so, I found it to be . . . well, nearly unwatchable.What's so bad about it?  Well, how shall I begin . . .(1)  Sean Connery is a dud.  There can be very little doubt that Connery is THE James Bond, but here, he seems like he's just going through the motions.  To be fair, he had no decent material to play.  The only positives in the performance are the small little touches he puts in to show that he is playing an aging 007; he seems suitably worn-out at various points, and that adds a tiny layer of believability to the character that has never been there before.  But these are grace notes; by and large, Connery is stiff as a board here.(2)  The action scenes are uninspiring.  I'm not the biggest fan of the Roger Moore Bond films, but even the worst of them have terrific action scenes.  Here, the action is strictly second-rate.(3)  Kim Basinger and Barbara Carrera, though great to look at, give terrible performances.(4)  There is literally no reason to see this in favor of "Thunderball," of which it is a remake; the original remains one of the all-time great screen entertainments, and this remake makes ZERO improvements.  In fact, the plot merely becomes muddled.(5)  There are a series of awful performances in supporting roles.  Rowan Atkinson's comic scenes, though brief, are painfully unfunny, not to mention out of place.  The actor playing the "new" M is odious; and whoever it is playing Q isn't very good, either.(6)  The music is bad.  The title song is boring, and the score by Michel Legrand frequently sounds as if it came from a Bugs Bunny cartoon.  I couldn't care less that the James Bond theme is missing; it's not what isn't there that's bad, it's what IS there.All in all, I'd have to say that -- unless we're counting the 1967 version of "Casino Royale" -- this is THE worst of the James Bond movies.  It's worth seeing if you've never seen it before . . . but that's about it, in my opinion
Anti-Southern Propaganda. This movies rates right up there with "Schindler's List" . . . in terms of unapologetic propaganda.  Fortunately, Ted Turner showed some remorse for this hatchet job by making "Gettysburg," and the even better "Gods and Generals."If you want to see a real, accurate depiction of the War For Southern Independence (aka, The Civil War), watch "Gods and Generals" or "Gone With The Wind," and stay away from movie garbage like "Andersonville."Also watch for the extended version DVD of "Gods and Generals" coming for the Christmas season of 2005.
Lean Pickin's. Beautifully photographed but over-produced historical women's picture on an epic scale. Yes, it has its fans but so do those dime-a-dozen bodice-ripper romance novels on supermarket racks. Still, gorgeous cinematography and a lusher-than-lush musical score can't disguise the fact that this David Lean misfire is an overblown snooze of elephantine proportions. A pallid Sarah Miles manages to suggest what Julie Christie might have done with this part, horribly miscast Robert Mitchum plays a flower-pressing milquetoast and a dazed-looking Christopher Jones is so bad his voice had to be dubbed. However, John Mills received richly-deserved Oscar for his portrayal of village idiot struck dumb by plot inanities he witnesses in mute silence. No wonder he's speechless
Dark comedy still needs to have comedy. I love a dark comedy more than the next person, and laugh at things that I probably really shouldn't.  So I thought this movie, hyped as a very dark comedy, would be right up my alley.  Sadly, apart from a few moments here and there, "Very Bad Things" simply fails as a comedy.  And it fails as a drama, because every single character is unlikeable and unsympathetic.  That's too bad, because the actors are fantastic and do their best with the material given to them.  I fault the script, which has problems at best, and the direction and editing, which give the movie a strangely languid character at inopportune times.  You could do worse, but this is strictly a rental at best.
Eh...I've Seen Worse. If you want a review of the plot itself, complete with spoilers, feel free to read the other reviews.My biggest beef with this movie is the fact that any suspension of disbelief is utterly killed, again and again, due to the fact that the script writers and director couldn't keep the story straight.There is a homage to Asimov with the shipboard computer telling one of the crew that it can not let a human come to harm. That would have been fabulous if it had actually been adhered to in any other part of the film. There are a handful of these screw ups that kills any chance of the story being credible.That said, it was a bit enjoyable. The cast did a fantastic job with what they were actually given. If the writers would have spent more time developing the characters than finding ways to get them naked, maybe I would have cared what happened to them.The dimensional jump effect was quite novel and was the one thing in this movie that made me say, "Oooh, cool".Good premise, good effects, good acting, but poor writing killed any chance at this being a good film
Disappointing!. What a disappointment.  Seeing Kline, Ronstadt and Smith on the cover, as well as in the description, I believed this was the movie version.  I should have read further through the reviews.  However, the misleading was not necessary. How many have you sold to unsuspecting innocents like me? Even so, I would have enjoyed this, had it been acceptable quality.  The quality is extremely poor, the remastering done very sloppily, the color washed out, and the camera angles leaving one quite distracted from the performance.  AND I paid $18.99, although I see it is being advertised for $17.99.  Thumbs down
Sour Note. No wonder they didn't produce any other live action productions of Dr. Seuss books until after his death.  This film gave me a headache.  The direction and pacing of the film is flat, the musical numbers were unmemorable and boring(inexplicably nominated for an Oscar!), the acting was wooden, the sets were garish and ugly.  At least this film is not the cynical merchandising vehicle that the two most recent screen adaptations of Dr. Seuss works were.  I think Dr. Seuss works best in small doses like the short animated TV shows that were made some thirty-odd years ago.  Do check out the "Gerald McBoing-Boing" cartoon thats included on the disc.  It contains more wit and imagination in a few minutes than "Dr. T" does in ninety minutes
WHY  AREN'T ZERO STARS AVAILABLE FOR RATING??????. Maybe I should have known better, but hokey and horrible do not have to be the same. This is a four dollar movie in any department store
Why the Charge. Curious as to why Amazon would charge for this content when CBS offers it for free on the official Survivor Website.  Yeah, at the CBS site you have sit through 4 commercials, but it is worth it to not have to download any extra programs
Jason Takes Your Money. As a general rule, any film with a large number of Roman numerals behind it is going to suck, and the eighth outing of the F-13 franchise, JASON TAKES MANHATTAN, obeys this rule to a fanatical degree. This movie is terrible, an utter embarrassment, and is noteworthy only as a study in corporate greed and marketing deception.By the fourth installment of the series, the ironically titled FINAL CHAPTER, this formulaic slasher franchise was as exhausted as an old, blood-soaked boot. Jason Voorhees had outlived his usefulness and it was time for his rotted a*s to hang up the gaolie mask and retire. But the movie industry is an industry first, and when THE FINAL CHAPTER turned unexpectedly into a cash cow the studio execs at Paramount continued to flog their exhausted serial killer into progidies of meaningless violence. THE FINAL CHAPTER was followed by three more absolutely asinine sequels, which saw Jason improve the Crystal Lake gene pool by slaughtering legions of pot-smoking teenage dimwits. By this time P-mount was beginning to get embarrassed by their deformed, kill-crazy stepchild, yet the lure of an easy payday drew them on.I still remember seeing the preview for this flick in a movie theater back in 1989. The audience ate it up. We actually believed that the producers had decided to tweak the exhausted series by loosing Jason in a place where he would probably feel right at home: the Big Apple. One could only imagine the bloody shennanigans Crystal Lake's least popular citizen could embark upon in New Yawk City! People were laughing out loud as they imagined him loose in the City of Lights. He could slay obnoxious Volcanoites! Teach rude cab drivers the errors of their ways! Annihilate the snotty salespeople at Tiffanys! Cut down on panhandlers! Convince grafitti artists to stay out of dark alleys! Run for mayor! We sixteen year olds LOVED the idea.There was just one problem. The gang at Paramount had no intention of delivering on their promise. The ad campaign, like the title of the movie, was a fraud, and the only thing that got "taken" in this film was the money of a lot of bloodthirsty teenage dupes.First of all, the first 60 minutes of this 90-odd minute movie are not set in Manhattan, but  in Crystal Lake and then on a ship called the Lazarus (get it?) which is conveying the usual cargo of teenage acting-skool dropout slasher fodder on a graduation cruise to New York. Jason, accidentally revived from the depths of the Lake by a jolt of electricity, stows on board the ship and proceeds to ch-ch-ch, ha-ha-ha his way through the doltish grads and the suspiciously small crew until the survivors are pursuaded to take a rowboat to Manhattan Island. Unfortunately "Manhattan Island", with the exception of a couple of second-unit establishing shots, is largely an unimaginative-looking soundstage on the Paramount lot populated by Central Casting New Yawkers, including the usual mixed-race mugger team and an Irish cop who says things like, "Well, ye seem loike foine peeple, so I'll not be arresting ye."There is not a single scary moment in the whole film, and there are not even any particularly interesting kills. Kane Hodder's plodding, rotting, thoroughly over-rated Jason looks almost bored, as if he signed onto the cruise by accident, and then got talked into doing his mass murder shtick by the ship's entertainment director. To make up for the lack of any kind of suspense, the writers threw in a lot of gratuitous pleading for mercy from the female characters, and added nice little moments like a ship's crewmember talking warmly about his baby son right before Jason runs a harpoon through his body. Classy stuff, but really, everything about the movie is stupid, from the crazy deckhand who mumbles prophetically that the voyage is doomed (shades of Crazy Ralph), to the annoyingly cute little dog who has more acting talent than most of the victims. Hell, the climax of the film features a chase through the New York sewers, which, we are told, flood with radioactive toxic waste every midnight. (Does Rudy Guilani know about this?)I realize having expectations for a Jason movie is silly, but even by the cellar-low standards of the franchise, this flick is a ripoff, a fraud, a dreadful fake, utterly stupid, appallingly bad, useless, terrible, and horrible. ZERO STARS.
What's up with that?. I wish I had read the other reviews first.  Though the quality of the episode and the video are top notch, the episode cuts off after 22 minutes.  Obviously, I already know the ending of "The Black Death", but I still wanted to see the full show
UnBox video not yet working. Will not play once video was downloaded. I get the error message:  "can not play file, please try again later. error# 0x80040273" I made the exlusive give me call me back feature but the UnBox department was already closed, I was told the UnBox Saturday and Sunday 6-5 hours. I have to say I am impressed with the Call back feature. I downloaded the Unbox Beta now and am recieving email assistance to try to resolve the problem. Thanks Amazon UnBox! I will Update again - Feb. 10,200
OOOOH rotoscope. Big deal. Who cares!!!. That part alone was not a redeeming factor for the film. I'm not going to even get into the fact that the actors performances were dull to say the least, or that the plot from beginning to end was lackluster. I actually wasted $3.99 renting this schlock on ON DEMAND. Boy, do I want my 4 bucks back. Basically, all this movie was about was five crackheads running around playing crackhead games. If I wanted to see that, I could have saved my money and walked around the corner. Furthermore, I could have got a camcorder and made a movie about a bunch of fiends sitting around the house babbling about nonsense for two hours!! Would have saved millions. To sum up, I would like to advise folks to please avoid this as if it was the Ebola virus!!
POOR QUALITY. THE SOUND IS BAD. I HAVE TRIED THIS DVD ON 2 DIFFERENT PLAYERS AND IT MADE NO DIFFERENCE
Better on VHS!!!. This is the WORST transfer to DVD I've ever seen!!! I think the VHS copy looks and sounds better, do NOT waste your money!!
Didn't work. I downloaded the player and this episode as part of a promotion that gave a free episode. Not only did I get charged, but when I cancelled the download to contact about the charge - I was told I had to finish downloading before they could refund. Once it finished downloading, it didn't play anyway. I gave up.
A Dissenting View. As the reviews below indicate, "Arthur" has a lot of fans -- when it was released in 1981 Vincent Canby of the New York Times found it a wonderful "screwball comedy" (although over time, Times readers, perhaps more discerning than Vincent, have only rated it 3 out of 5 stars) and Bravo listed it #10 on its list of Best Comedies (see below). I first saw Dudley Moore in "Foul Play," thought he was very funny. Based upon that, I bought "10" and "Arthur," as it turned out a downward trajectory.What I dislike about "Arthur" is Moore playing a loud, obnoxious drunk telling unfunny jokes, and Minelli playing a salt-of-the-earth working girl who loves Arthur for himself, not for his $750 million fortune. Even John Gielgud, who was great in "The Loved One" a much better comedy, can't resurrect this turkey.Okay, folks. Start casting your negative votes. In the meantime, here's the Bravo 100 Best Comedies list:100. Anchorman99. The Birdcage98. School of Rock97. Happy Gilmore96. Four Weddings and a Funeral95. Harold & Kumar Go to White Castle94. Waiting for Guffman93. The Aristocrats92. Father of the Bride91. Revenge of the Nerds90. Clueless89. Slapshot88. Team America87. The Kentucky Fried Movie86. Zoolander85. Dirty Rotten Scoundrels84. Silver Streak83. Sister Act82. Tootsie81. Half Baked80. Lost in America79. Three Amigos78. Bananas77. Flirting with Disaster76. Ghostbusters75. Dumb and Dumber74. Trading Places73. City Slickers72. Moonstruck71. Roxanne70. The Nutty Professor (Eddie Murphy)69. The Blues Brothers68. Broadcast News67. Kingpin66. Dazed and Confused65. Office Space64. This is Spinal Tap63. Manhattan62. The Pink Panther61. Election60. When Harry Met Sally59. Police Academy Series58. Private Benjamin57. Swingers56. Young Frankenstein55. Bull Durham54. Ferris Bueller's Day Off53. Dr. Strangelove52. Meet the Parents51. National Lampoon's Vacation50. The Princess Bride49. American Pie48. American Graffiti47. 9 to 546. The Incredibles45. Raising Arizona44. Sixteen Candles43. What About Bob?42. Harold and Maude41. Austin Powers40. Monty Python and the Holy Grail39. Mrs. Doubtfire38. Best In Show37. Dodgeball36. Good Morning Vietnam35. Beetlejuice34. Rushmore33. Clerks32. Groundhog Day31. The Big Lebowski30. The 40 Year Old Virgin29. Legally Blonde28. Annie Hall27. A Fish Called Wanda26. Wayne's World25. Meet the Fockers24. Bill & Ted's Excellent Adventure23. Big22. Beverly Hills Cop21. Shampoo20. The Jerk19. Wedding Crashers18. Stripes17. M*A*S*H16. Old School15. Fast Times At Ridgemont High14. Napoleon Dynamite13. Naked Gun Series12. The Producers11. Pee-Wee's Big Adventure10. Arthur9. Ace Ventura: Pet Detective8. Blazing Saddles7. The Wedding Singer6. Airplane5. South Park: Bigger, Longer, Uncut4. There's Something About Mary3. Shrek2. Caddyshack1. Animal HouseMy suggested additions: "The Loved One," "Leap of Faith," "Used Cars," "Eulogy" and "Drop Dead, Gorgeous."
Politically correct retelling ruins the message. Although it looks the same as the HG Wells story and the 1960 movie, this bastardization of the source material turns a frightening story about man's nature into a mildly fun sci-fi outing. Alexander's motivation for building the Time Machine is entirely different, and what he learns 80,000 years in the future could have been deduced by a more probing scientific mind (that is, if it was used to dealing with less than scientific cinematic time-travel paradoxes).So the first half of the movie wreaks havoc on the source material and pales in comparison with the fabulous creativity of the George Pal version. We don't even find out anything about what we are about to see!But things get worse is in the distant future. Although the writing tries to dance around the fact -- they have de-fanged the harsh reality of the Eloi and softened the horriffic underpinnings of their naivete. Instead of unknowing sheep, they are new-agey world-culture pluralists. The dichotomization of the human race really makes little sense. And there is no Rod Taylor running about castigating the apathy of his hosts.The only reason why I give the film two stars is because it is one of the only genuine sci-fi films in years, and I found some of the special FX (the moon) and Jeremy Irons, cheesy as they may have been, fun
WARNING: Wrong Episode!. This item is supposedly titled "UFOs: The First Encounters." It is, however, an episode about reincarnation. It is incorrectly labeled. DO NOT PURCHASE unless you are looking for an episode on reincarnation
THIS gets 4 Stars???. I read all the reviews where everyone said this movie was so hilarious. So I gambled and bought it. Man, this movie really stunk. I mean it's like it could have been funny, but none of the re-dubbing was very funny at all. I watched this movie with some good expectations, but as it droned on and on, it slowly became apparent to me that no laughs were coming. In fact, as I kept watching it I kept thinking to myself, "Geez, even I could dub funnier dialogue into the movie than THIS!"Don't get me wrong; dubbing over a corny Japanese spy movie definitely sounds like it would be very funny. It's an idea that has the potential to be VERY funny. It just wasn't done very well here. Don't expect many laughs from this movie. For most of the movie, no one is even talking at all! You're just watching a bad not-funny movie. But if that's what you like, then by all means, buy it.P.S. By the way, this movie has it's occasional sexually interesting scenes. But you don't ever get to see anything. They've edited-out anything that might have been worth seeing. So not only is it NOT funny, but where the original movie would have turned you on, you are denied that as well. A nitpick to be sure, but it didn't make me like this movie any better.P.S. #2. If you want to go watch something funny, watch "This is Spinal Tap." That movie is truly hilarious. It does not disappoint. It doesn't have anything to do with Woody Allen, but it will wash the bad taste out of your mouth that "What's Up Tiger Lily" is guaranteed to leave you with
Firefly: Excellent.  But buy it on DVD, not "Unbox"!. Read the Unbox terms of use CAREFULLY before choosing this route over a regular DVD purchase.  It is not your usual set of "blah blah" legal jargon.For example, 3c:"Removal of Software. If you uninstall or otherwise remove the Software, your ability to view all Digital Content you have downloaded to the Authorized Device will immediately and automatically terminate and we reserve the right to delete all Digital Content from that Authorized Device without notice to you."If you ever remove the Unbox software, Amazon may revoke your ability to view the Firefly episodes you paid for and may even delete them from your machine!Amazon, I've ordered literally thousands of dollars of stuff through you and always had a great experience; why did you let Unbox create these anti-customer terms of use??
UnBox video not yet working. Will not play once video was downloaded. I get the error message:  "can not play file, please try again later. error# 0x80040273" I made the exlusive give me call me back feature but the UnBox department was already closed, I was told the UnBox Saturday and Sunday 6-5 hours. I have to say I am impressed with the Call back feature. I downloaded the Unbox Beta now and am recieving email assistance to try to resolve the problem. Thanks Amazon UnBox! I will Update again - Feb. 10,200
HEY THIS MOVIE SUCKS!. More time could have been spent in Ney York City for this movie. Like with Friday The 13th Part Seven: The New Blood, all of the good gore scenes were cut out. But still, this is a terrible movie and I am willing to bet that not even gore will help it be better than part five
Same Thing. The Dane Cook episode is the same one that it on his "Harmful If Swallowed" c.d. The c.d. also has the uncensored version of this routine that is over 1 hour long. The one star rating is not based on the content. It is based upon Amazon not sharing this fact with customers
Unforgettable (Unfortunately). This movie survives in my memory for over 40 years as one of the most boring stupid excuses for a comedy ever made.  I use it as a benchmark to compare all other really bad comedies.  They are either worse than this one (rare) or better than this one. As an example: Buffalo '66 is worse.  If you watch both in the same day, you will surely die
Buyer Beware. I was duped into thinking this was a music performance video. It's nothing but a documentary about the '20s. As a documentary, it's great, but definately not for a music buff (musician), like me, who collects music videos
Not happy. This is only a portion of this episode.  It cuts off in the middle of a sentence
A Politically-Correct Melodrama: A Definite Stinker. Waste of money.  Waste of time.  Well-known cast.  Amateurish direction.  Plotless.  Politically correct to the point of being stupid.  The film's incessant attempts at humor fail.  Eric Roberts' character laughs-off his grave circumstance throughout most of the film.  He is self-important, Godless and emotionally false.  It's difficult to empathize with such an unrealisitic character.  The best performances in this film were given by Gregory Harrison and Lee Grant.  The best scene is Gregory Harrison and Eric Roberts' passionate farewell kiss.  Most authentic moment in the film: Lee Grant's reaction to her dying son being carried off.  Very difficult to watch through in one-sitting because it's so repetitive and vapid. You will wait and wait for something to happen and nothing ever does until the final moments.  If you choose to waste your time with this film, you'll be sorry you did
so-so. I never cared much for the soundtrack aside from a few tracks. this Film was wack the Acting,Directing. but the Story Line was cool. in fact if someone knew how to put this together with a stronger Cast this Film would have been interesting.this Film flip flopped Time Periods&it hurt it's cause.I will give Prince Props though for being a Black Film Director back at a time when it was really rare&truth be told in 2004 it ain't that much better on a whole
Interesting all-star British adaptation, but DVD transfer is unwatchable. This is a very interesting adaptation of Alice in Wonderland, featuring a plethora of major British actors from the time this movie was made. Note that today's younger audience, weened on an MTV diet of rapid cuts and incredible CGI, may find this slow. But if one can get beyond that, it's most definitely worth a watch.That said, this DVD transfer is basically UNWATCHABLE. It's not clear what source they used for the transfer, but there are TERRIBLE audio pitch problems throughout the movie, with wow and flutter horribly apparent. This is particularly problematic for a movie like this with a significant orchestral and vocal score. If you have any sense of pitch, you'll find yourself pulling your hair out listening to the off-key strings! The video quality is pretty horrible, as well--worse than standard cable. A real travesty
'Science' Fiction it's not.... The basic premise of this movie could be quite interesting - how does a man trained as a 'killing-machine' integrate back into society.  Yes, it's been done before but still holds promise.  The plot was adequate.The acting was believable - no complaints there.  I particularly enjoyed Sean Pertwee as 'Mace'.  And Jason Isaacs has long been a favorite actor.But what ruined the movie for me was the science.  I'm not a fanatic - I have no problems with FTL travel or spaceships 'banking' on turns or loud explosions in space in movies.  And I realize that movies are not 'real'.  But I've never seen more 'bad' science in any one movie.  My son and I watched this together and it turned into a contest seeing who could catch more bloopers.I could go on and on detailing the scientific and logic errors in this movie - but it would take me all night.  It spoiled the whole movie for me
Mediocre Mystery Movie !. Even though I own most of the "Poirot Offerings" starring David Suchet owing to my affinity for Agatha Christie's work,I still maintain that "Peter Ustinov" is by far more at home in "Poirot's" shoes as evident by his inimitable performences as the belgian eccentric/sleuth over the years.particularly in the "Death on the Nile"(1978).And having said that, the latest addition to A&E's Poirot caper of the same name featuring Suchet is unfortunately "Toothles and Meandering" at best.In short,If you already own the Original ( Ustinov )version,then don't even bother spending your hard-earned on this trite
Medicore at best. I really felt like I had to give some real insight to the people who are wondering whether they should watch this or not.You people writing the reviews are being waaay to generous to this movie.With how slow the movie started off you would think that the relationship between the two main characters would slowly and steadily build up-from a close friendship to a romantic relationship.The guys don't even display a close friendship at the beginning, how are they gonna jump from "a guy you see during soccer practice and around your building" to "hot and heavy can't live without each other love"?It's not believable, and doesn't make for a good coming of age love story that this movie tries to be.The movie just hits you with an abrupt and sudden love scene, and from there they are suddenly in love and everything.In fact,there is no indication that either character is gay until that scene.I mean it would have been nice if the movie showed that one guy was into his neighbor or checked him out from time to time, or even was interested in guys in general but as I said before the movie doesn't display any type of interest the guys may have in each other or just guys in general until the love scene.Don't get me wrong,I enjoyed the movie but the reviewers here aren't really giving an accurate representation of the movie and are HIGHLY overrating it.So if your in the mood for an ok gay teen movie by all means grab some popcorn sit back and enjoy.If you're looking for a masterpiece of cinema involving a gay relationship.Look somewhere else.This is not the movie
I've been cheated by Amazon. It really sucks, tried to download but it's not able to be viewed in pc's outsided the united states. Crikey.I'll have to wait for reruns to watch it on the telly.Whatta shame amazon dot com. Let's send a CSI to yer headquarters
Great movie, lousy DVD. While this is a great movie, this DVD reproduction does it severe injustice. The sound track is out of sync and the production quality of the DVD is marginal
OH...THE PAIN.  THE PAIN OF IT ALL... Mortal Kombat: Annihilation is one of those films that is so bad that it actually HURTS to watch it.From the nearly complete recast of almost all of the characters (odd, considering that in interviews after the first movie, all of them said they'd want/ be willing to come back for a sequel), to the horrible (even by 1997 standards) CG effects, to the cliched fight scenes (gee...two women in a mud pit.  I bet it took them all night to come up with that one), virtually everything that could have gone wrong with this movie DID go wrong with this movie.Loosely based on the story of the Mortal Kombat 3 video game (and set immediately after the first movie, which, while not great, looks like Citizen Kane compared to this stinkburger), the movie set about the lofty goal of depicting Shao Khan (played by Brian Thompson, the alien bounty hunter from The X-Files) and his army (shown in most scenes as a small band of extras.  Oooh...scary.) as they attempt to take over Earth by merging it with the alternate dimension known as Outworld.  This merging of realms will result in the destruction of humanity.With only a week to do anything about it, Lord Raiden (played by James Remar, replacing the, and I can't believe I'm saying this, much better Christopher Lambert in the role) once again enlists the help of Liu Kang (Robin Shou), Sonia Blade (Sandra Hess), and Princess Kitana (Talisa Soto), along with help from a select few other characters from the video games' crowded lineup, to prevent this from happening.The story in and of itself is not necessarily bad.  However, given the film's obviously low budget the weak screenplay, the loss of most of the excellent cast from the first film, and most jarringly, direction even more inept than that of Paul W.S. Anderson, it quickly becomes clear that they set their sights too high, only to have practically everything come crashing down.The only saving grace of this film is its killer soundtrack, featuring an updated version of the theme created for the first movie, as well as music by KMFDM, Megadeth, Rammstein, Juno Reactor, and others.If ever you're looking to punish yourself for something, then by all means watch this movie.  However, if you actually like yourself and want to remain on good terms with yourself, you will avoid this movie like the plague.  Believe me, you'll thank yourself later.
What shark??. I watched this movie, seeing that it was a "shark" movie. But where's the shark?? The plot is these people are hostages. The shark is just there so us shark fanatics have a reason to see this awful movie. But I was watching going, "okay, they're in the water, where is the shark???" Even JAWS 3, (which sucked) has more sharks. If you like hoatage movies, see this. (on second thought, don't...) But if you like sharks, see something else
Say no to dubs. Even though fans of HK cinema have as a whole come a long way since HK films were generally only seen in the states on Saturday afternoon television, some studios are still refusing to provide buyers with the option of seeing HK films in their original language with subtitles.  This film is available from Columbia Tristar only in a dubbed format, and for that reason I won't be getting the Region 1 release of this film
Travesty. An accessible story with all the elements of a Great American Novel was somehow transformed into a perverse, worst of the worst ABC Afterschool Specials. If you had not read the book, you would be unable to follow what was happening. Some of the worst directing and editing I have seen in a long time. The original Evil Dead, with all its flaws, is a better put together film than this one. This movie is flat-out painful to watch. You get no justifications whatsoever as to why the characters behave as they do. It all seems so random. Read the book. If you see this movie in a rental store, just move along, please, nothing to see here
Not my cup of tea. I bought this DVD based on reviews here on Amazon. I won't fault others for thier position, it's just a matter of personal taste. For me this was a big disapointment. The story leaves a lot to be desired. The character Walker (Lee Marvin) gets away with a lot of crimes he shouldn't have. The direction seemed to be a practice in doing something different, but it failed. I'm sorry I bought this DVD
Beware of Unbox!!!. Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for
Does not live up to the hype. It is not good as  a mainstream movie , it does not have a good plot , some scenes are not relevant .Even as a soft-porn movie, it does not do a good job. Try watching "I like to play games" , its a much better soft-porn movie.
What's up with that?. I wish I had read the other reviews first.  Though the quality of the episode and the video are top notch, the episode cuts off after 22 minutes.  Obviously, I already know the ending of "The Black Death", but I still wanted to see the full show
This movie ruined my life. Bad Moon begins in some South American country where Michael Pare and his girlfriend are attacked by a werewolf. The movie stumbles quickly into the perspective of Thor, a wonderfully loyal german shepherd owned by Mariel Hemingway (Whom I tend to think is kind of scary looking with her weird cheekbones and her sunken eyes) and her son (the little boy who played Dennis the Menace). Michael Pare, who is Mariel's brother, soon comes into the picture, struggling to come to grips with the attack and his living a life as a werewolf. At first, you feel pity for his character...I mean, the guy witnessed his lover attacked and eaten by a monster and is now himself living the life of the beast...but, you soon feel nothing but disgust and hatred towards the man when he decides to have a mental battle with Thor. The movie was scary and tense in parts and the gore factor was high , but I had such a hard time with some scenes in the film. I was VERY disturbed by the scene where Michael Pare's character entices Thor to bite him, therefore getting Thor hauled off by Animal control people in a truly heartwrenching scene that still to this day makes me sick. The movie is good in some aspects, The directing is good and you truly fear for the people in the situations they are in. The Creature effects are excellent and I much rather prefer costume/physical makeup werewolves over the newer, Van Helsing type Werewolf that CGI designs have come up with. There is NOTHING worse than a computer animated werewolf, just watch the movie CURSED to see what I mean. This movie, to me, is all about watching a poor territorial dog who wants to protect his owners, get pushed around. The CGI in this movie was awful just because it was 1996 and CGI was pretty much new to movies at that time, so the transformation scene in the end was a crapfest. The hero of the movie, Thor, is what I am giving this movie 2 stars for, because the dog really does pull through for the viewer and make them care. You kind of watch the movie only for the dog. You want the dog to live and get through it-and almost could care less about the family by the end of the film. Overall, the movie was scary and the werewolf was pretty good compared to some of the crap that has been out there in the past, but the dog getting knocked around and tortured throughout the movie was enough to ruin my life forever. At least the ending was somewhat happy....I was somewhat confused by the dream she had-but it seems to end with everything alright. Oh well, the movie was decent but could have been longer and could have had less traumatic incidents involving the dog
Cant watch. I downloaded this program and it was garbled and video as if played in slow motion.  This is the first of two downloads that didn't play.  I know it was not my computer because I did download three that played ok
Ponderous. Welcome to Bucharest where Zachary (David Gunn) the vampire killer has come to hunt the creatures that turned the woman he loved into a monster he had no choice but kill.  This time his objective is Ash (Jonathan Morris), a master vampire who maintains his tribe in the secret Bucharest underground while operating a very high toned nightclub as a lure for new 'blood.'What Zachary doesn't count on is his attraction for Sofia (Kirsten Cerre), a beautiful American pianist who has come to Bucharest to perform and who has become the object of Ash's desires.  Not only must Ash deal with Zachary's attempts to destroy his nest and reclaim Sofia, he has political problems among his own vampire servants.Welcome to a film where everyone speaks as if they used to have a Romanian accents and only saw the scripts a week ago.  The is a kind of heavy handed lack of emotionality about this film as vampires announce their intent to destroy each other with almost no inflection in their voices.While this is a pretty film to watch, with lots of midnight scenes of Bucharest, the moodiness of the cinematography and the score are not matched by the acting.  Obligatory scenes with fake blood and frontal nudity give the work a sense of awkwardness that Director Ted Nicolaou never quite manages to overcome
Wasting space on my DVD shelf... I was recommended this movie by a friend here at college, and because he spoke so highly of it, I thought I would just buy it instead of rent it. I definitely regret that decision. If you're thinking of buying it - rent it first. It was dull and obnoxious, not to mention weird. The only entertaining part of watching this film was making fun of it with my roommate (which is why I gave it 1 star instead of 0). However, if you're still interested, definitely rent it, you might enjoy it.
STYLE OVER SUBSTANCE. Director Steve Kloves manages to make Texas look both gorgeous and desolate.  Thomas Newman's score is haunting and evocative; Dennis Quaid, James Caan, Meg Ryan and Gwyneth Paltrow offer complex, fleshed out performances.  What destroys the film in my opinion is its listless pandering, its inability to focus on the truth of the issues and its ambiguous and unfulfilled ending.  FLESH AND BONE also pulls a big coincidence that manages to be both improbable and unbelievable.  Kloves "twist" is predictable from the moment Meg Ryan appears on the screen, and the inevitable confrontation between Quaid and Caan is also telegraphed a mile away.  In spite of its good performances and atmospheric direction, FLESH AND BONES is empty and pointless
Special Effects are Just Cheezy. I can see that whoever made this, put a lot of time and money into it trying to make this a big successful production, however, this fantasy film is best for ages 10 and under. Special effects, script lines, acting and story are significantly lacking what the blockbuster's have. Too bad.
Stealing Beauty. The movie could have been so much more with less caracter's. Liv Tyler is very good. Rachel Weisz is only in the movie for short stints but, memberable ones. The soundtract is better than the film.
&quot;Is theah a convick in that theah closet?&quot;. Strange stuff--Duvall rants, gibbers, and fires a shotgun into an empty closet. Haas watches, listens, and smiles a lot. The great James Earl Jones wanders in, scratches his beard and mutters to himself, and walks out again. If this sounds like your kind of thing, jump right in. But nobody's ever going to claim this is Horton Foote's finest hour
so-so. I never cared much for the soundtrack aside from a few tracks. this Film was wack the Acting,Directing. but the Story Line was cool. in fact if someone knew how to put this together with a stronger Cast this Film would have been interesting.this Film flip flopped Time Periods&it hurt it's cause.I will give Prince Props though for being a Black Film Director back at a time when it was really rare&truth be told in 2004 it ain't that much better on a whole
An Abomination!!. I am a big fan of this franchise however, I refuse to include this in the series! They should've put the title "National Lampoon's" before this.. it's the worse horror sequel I have ever seen and coming from me.. that is pretty bad because, I have seen them all. Leatherface has never been played so horribly! During the majority of the movie he looked like a phat bull dyke! Renee Zellweger hadn't finished her acting classes obviously.. she was terrible and, I wanted her to be hung up on a hook!! I heard she went cross country stopping at every video store she passed in an effort to buy and burn every rental copy she could get her hands on! The sad fact is, this will always be around to haunt both her and Matthew McConaughey.
AMAZON SUCKS. I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!
THE THIEF OF BAGDAD. This was awful. I'm sorry I spent a penny on this.
Good God. This movie is Bloodsport minus the entertaining parts. Better production value- much worse script. Much worse everything almost. So if you liked Bloodsport which even at its cheesiest was a classic entertaining martial arts flick and you wanted to see another version of it that sucks but has more scenery, well here you go! Enjoy
Extremely Annoying. If you like action flicks with absolutely no intelligence this movie will appeal to your deepest of hearts, but for those of you who prefer a plot and something that makes at least a little sense....skip it.A sports camera crew sets out to find the most daring of extreme sports heroes so that it can film an action movie in the Alps. They recruit a couple of crazy snow-boarders, helicopter pilots willing to outrun avalanches and then they toss in a pretty and dainty Olympic skier for good measure and some eye candy. The entire film consists of the frilly skier competing with the fearless snow boarders for attention and film time. They get thrown out of helicopters at high altitude without any oxygen and wearing barely any clothes but they never freeze...funny how that happens in movies! The real amazing feat is how they ski downhill in front of a major avalanche and can still talk to one another...have you ever heard how loud an avalanche is? Thank goodness for those sub-atomic hearing aids!! Eventually European terrorists enter the picture and a few automatic weapons (something has to encourage those slow moving avalanches). Well you know how it goes.The action is great and if you like skiing some of the stunts are literally unbelievable but other than that I wouldn't recommend this film to anyone with half a brain because you will just be frustrated with all of the impossibilities and missed reasons for people to die. I only watched it because I was forced into it by a couch potato with a remote.
Disgusting and pointless. "Listen, Bunuel. What are we going to do? The witch has quit. Says: too much nudity. Who does she think she is - Mother Theresa?""I am a little busy, JP (Quiet, babe! Can't you see? I am talking to my producer here!). Just get another broad for the role: anybody, only with a good front.""But, Maestro! We'd have to re-shoot half of the movie. Fernando is already talking of another engagement. In any event, with his rate if we use him again, it will be twenty years before we see any money from this flick. We might as well scrap the whole thing.""Don't worry, JP. We'll keep shooting as if nothing happened. That's what being Great Director all about. They are morons, or why you think anyone would pay cash to see such garbage. Most won't even notice that the face is different, and those who do, will find a good explanation for it. Subliminal, surreal, existential, women are alike - all that nonsense, you know. Relax and have a drink."
Disappointed. I bought the DVD based on all the positive reviews, and I think prospective buyers should be warned that not everyone finds this a 5-star movie.  My husband and I, who love old movies, hated it.  My teenagers just found it completely uninteresting.  It was apparently made about the time Alaska became a state, although it deals with an earlier time period, and the movie has not aged well.  The story was uninteresting, the direction was uneven, the comedy (mostly bar fights) felt forced and awkward.  Stewart Granger did not seem to know what he was doing or why his character was there.  Fabian's acting was unmemorable and we felt Capucine was miscast.  We got bored and spent half the movie pointing out to each other how little the sandy beaches and desert terrain looked anything like Alaska (it was obviously shot in southern California).  I gave it two stars because I was able to sit through the entire thing, but I spent most of it asking myself "why?  Why am I wasting my time like this?
UNWATCHABLE !. Save your money.  I gave up halfway through and shredded the DVD.  Amanda Peet was great in "Saving Silverman", but she should be mortified by this movie.  "Whipped" was probably written by two fifteen-year-olds on their junior high lunch break.  Absolutely abysmal
Is ''cringe-worthy'' a word?. I'm surprised by all the praise this movie gets here at Amazon and beyond. There really wasn't much here I liked. The soundtrack was the usual "pap" you'd expect from a family friendly movie, though the sets were nice. It seems this movie was just miscast. Mel just doesn't do comedy all that well, at least for a lead role. Jame Garner, the reason I bought this seems more like a bystander. And Jodie is Jodie and I never bought for a moment she was her character.Although the cast is a powerhouse (on paper), sadly the chemistry never really works and the jokes are just cornball. An example: There was a sequence when Bret asks his friends (who are standing behind him) to whistle to reveal themselves to some bandits he was confronting; which as it turns out they are unable to do. Instead Jodie and James, blow madly, just like the movie.This movie reminds me a HELL of a lot like ''The Three Amigo's''; on paper you would think it couldn't miss, but on film it's painful to watch
Poor support. This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet
Why the Charge. Curious as to why Amazon would charge for this content when CBS offers it for free on the official Survivor Website.  Yeah, at the CBS site you have sit through 4 commercials, but it is worth it to not have to download any extra programs
This is Horrible. I love the Avatar and I was so thrilled that amazon allows people to download it except the only problem is I've been trying for the past days and darn it all, it's not working!!! It's not as if I'm downloading it for free. I am willing to pay and yet it just wouldn't go through!!! I think it's better to just buy the dvds...I think it's absolutely horrible to tease customers like that..
Water-logged. Whew!  After reading other reviewer's remarks, I'm glad to see I was not the only one who thought this movie was crap.  The cinematography is great, and the look (art direction) is authentic.  I too had trouble following the double-storyline.  Just when I started to get interested in the modern-day story, the action cut back to the past.  I don't know if it was poor choices during the editing processes or what.  I have seen many other movies that use flashback and dual-timeline stories.  None of those were this boring.  By the time you get to discover the real truth behind the century-old murders, you really don't care anymore.  And I don't see how the climactic storm at sea resolves the modern-day storyline.In terms of casting, I have to agree with the other reviewers: why cast two British actress as the modern-day leads.  To me, the character of Jean should've been played with either an American actress (or at least a British or Australian actress with an American accent)instead of Catherine McCormick.  I also couldn't begin to identify with the character.  She seems so obsessed over this murder but completely inarticulate when discussing it (unless that's the point).  Sean Penn sits around and broods as her husband, a has-been poet.  Josh Lucas and Elizabeth Hurley (as Sean Penn's brother and the brother's girlfriend) really don't have much to do except add some eye candy (Josh for the ladies, and Elizabeth for the guys, and believe me, I kept wanting to see more of her in the bathing suit -- with and without the top).  Some say Josh Lucas's acting is a bit wooden and stiff in this role; I say he has nothing to work with: the character is just there to steer the boat and give Hurley backrubs.  He has no real personality quirks and Lucas works best when he plays someone who's a bit flawed (he is a rare case of a character actor who has leading-man good looks but bland roles don't suit him).  Sean Penn, on the other hand, looks like he's sleepwalking through half the movie.  His alcoholic poet seems more like he's stoned on Prozac; there's no passion, even when he quotes Dylan Thomas.  I think this was a miscasting; he's not sympathetic either.  (SPOILER ALERT: His character's fate during the storm is almost deserved; one cannot feel sympathy for him.)The story set in the last century is much more interesting but because of the cut-up flashbacks, one doesn't hold interest.  Sarah Polley is a good actress, but her moping around -- "Oh, I'm stuck in a loveless marriage, and I really want to sleep with my brother again," attitude gets old.  Yes, dear viewers, I gave away another spoiler: incest. The other actors that play in the murder mystery story (aside from Polley and the great Ciaran Hinds as the wrongly accused murderer) are all Scandinavian and I've never heard of any of them before.  They do a good job with the material they're given, but it's hard to connect with them as well.Perhaps this is one of those movies that you grow to like after repeated viewings.  Once was enough for me.  Perhaps you also need to read the original Anita Shreve novel before you watch it.  If so, I understand the movie is quite the literal adaptation.  This may be its biggest flaw: novels can be cinematic in their themes, imagery and their dialogue; they become water-logged when one tries to adapt the same style in telling two contrasting stories.  It also helps that when reading a novel with two story lines, it's much easier to go back and re-read parts of it, when the action gets confusing.
Menotti - Amahl and the Night Visitors. I purchsed this video a few years ago and was also very disappointed. I have nothing more to add to the other reviews posted here; just to agree that the sound was poor and the viewing quite fuzzy. I remember watching not only the first broadcast on NBC but several broadcasts years after that, with different casts. It was and still is my favorite Christmas story. I will certainly purchase the Schippers CD and hope to see another video or DVD in the future
Boring to watch. The actors spend too much time just staring at each other without speaking. The story is too unbelievable too. It was a waste of my money to buy it.
Nothing like the book. Although this movie is based loosely on the book, the hour and a half it runs for gives no time to explore all of the nuances of the book's extraordinary adventure.  I loved the book, which was well written and thought out, but the movie has basically butchered Christopher Paolini's great fantasy novel.To do a movie like this, the time frame needs to be similar to Lord of the Rings.  Another hour or so, and this could have been a good movie.  The only reason I gave this two stars is for the dragon and Jeremy Irons.Rent if you still want to see it, don't buy
UnBox video not yet working. Will not play once video was downloaded. I get the error message:  "can not play file, please try again later. error# 0x80040273" I made the exlusive give me call me back feature but the UnBox department was already closed, I was told the UnBox Saturday and Sunday 6-5 hours. I have to say I am impressed with the Call back feature. I downloaded the Unbox Beta now and am recieving email assistance to try to resolve the problem. Thanks Amazon UnBox! I will Update again - Feb. 10,200
I won't buy it... Someone just today told me I should see this film.What a disappointment to see these warnings of poor quality DVDs being produced by Fox Lorber.Oh well
Why the Charge. Curious as to why Amazon would charge for this content when CBS offers it for free on the official Survivor Website.  Yeah, at the CBS site you have sit through 4 commercials, but it is worth it to not have to download any extra programs
Irritating and unorigional. I don't remember seeing Isild Le Besco in any other films, but she does look a bit familiar.  If I have seen her elsewhere, it must have been in a role that she performed with much greater insight and finesse than Gwen from 'Girl's Can't Swim', or I definitely would remember.  I'm still not sure what the title actually means... something about young women struggling to find their way... blah blah blah... but, it actually wasn't a terrible film.  Nevertheless, Le Besco's performance is one of the most irritating I've seen in years.  I was reminded of Dorothy Parker's cutting remark when critiquing a Katherine Hepburn film: 'She runs the gamut of emotions from A to B.'Le Besco was either shown with an extremely obnoxous smile plastered on her face, or she was smacking her friends or family in a 'hissy fit of rage'.  These tantrums always ended with Gwen running off to the sea with all the grace of a three-legged moose.  What made LeBesco's performance stand out even more was the fact that everyone else's performances were nearly flawless.This film was recommended to me after purchasing 'L'Effrontee', a truly marvelous picture.  While watching the first 30 minutes of 'Girl's Can't Swim' I could see that I was not the only person who admired 'L'Effontee's' subtle brilliance.  Obviously the director and/or screenwriter of 'Girl's Cant' Swim' intended on building upon the other film's message, but as a lark, they subtracted all of its poignance and sensitivity.I give the film 2 out of 5 because, despite its flaws, it is still superior to the vast majority of 'toejam' that hollywood produces each year
BORING, TACKY. Watching this movie is about as much fun as having your wisdom teeth pulled. Boring and tacky even by horror standards, the only fun comes from seeing the psychic kids' future wicked stepfather being eaten by the monster that lives in his closet, hence the title. I've seen far worse, but those worse movies were more &quot;enjoyable&quot; than this. The following morning you probably won't remember having seen it. If only the monster had eaten this movie's negative, then we would all be spared
Warning Incomplete Episode!!!. The episodes in this series have an average running time of 50 minutes. This one happens to be only 18 minutes. This mean sthat the file abruptly stops right in the middle. Even though it only cost me $2 I still got jipped.  Let's hope Amazon can iron out these kinds of problems before they get this service farther underway. Be careful enough to sheck the running times to be sure they seem accurate before you buy them
KILL MEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEE!!!. KILL MEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEE!!!   THIS MOVIE IS THE WORST MOVIE OF ALL, ALL, ALL, TIME SINCE THE HISTORY OF THE UNIVERSE AND BEFORE THAT! IN THEATERS I WAS THE ONLY ONE WATCHING THAT MOVIE AND I FELT LIKE WALKING OUT!! I WANTED TO CRY  :( THE ACTORS STINK ALONG WITH THE PLOT AND 3-D EFFECTS!!!All I can say is BOOOOOOOOOO THIS MOVIE SUCKS
Dreary, hard to watch. Given high acclaims this film has collected over time, I was glad to pick up a VHS copy at my local library sale.  Began to watch it last night.  I was able to sit thru the part 1.  When the tape ended, I was actually glad. I felt a sense of acomplishment in finishing the part 1!  The movie is DREARY to the max.  People portrayed are irrational, lost, uncommunicative, and subject to random and cruel violence by soldiers and rulers.  In some way, this movie reminded me of the dreary winter (lasting 6 months!) I spent in Russia a couple of years ago...To me, the movie reflects the psychological breakdown that happened after the decades long terror policy of Soviet state (1920-1956).  For survivors, nothing made any sense anymore, except perhaps fear and evil, as people in this dreary film reflects.  People have been already destroyed in their souls.  They are psychologically shattered beyond repair and only occasional readings of the Bible verses give them any sense of permanence in their chaotic daily experience.Maybe that is the real meaning of this movie.  To really reflect what happened to people's psyche after Lenin and Stalin's UNLIMITED TERROR, they found a parallel in Mongol's devastation and oppression of medieval Russia.  In both cases, people were left shattered, helpless, irrational, withdrawn,  and autistic.
Star Trek:  City on the Edge of Forever. My favorite show of the Trek series but there's no way I'd buy another individual program from Amazon.  It will ONLY play on their downloaded player ...won't burn to DVD so can't play it on my television.  Don't bother buying this ...just go for the Trek collection on DVD
Brings back memories but ultimately it disappoints..... Yep, like many viewers I watched this when I was too young and was scared for like weeks on end and couldnt get the tall man image out of my head. Well, when this got re-released I just "had" to have it figuring it would bring back memories and really allow me to get into once again. Unfortunately because I am now older and hopefully a little wiser, the film ends up being a rather cheesey horror movie with a mix-mash plot and NO tension or scary moments whatsoever.Hey, I wasnt looking for a Dustin Hoffman like performance in a horror movie but geeez the acting was pretty rough and forced. The plot started off pretty cool but then began to not know what to do with itself and got almost silly towards the end. The mausoleum itself was eerie but the dwarf guys (Star Wars Jawas?) were pretty funny and the whole thing just didnt add up. As always in horror films a quick call to the police is all it would have taken to stop this Tall man, but no.... lets grab the trusty shotgun and take care of it ourselves...... c'mon.The scene with the plastic bug in the jacket made me laugh outloud and I rewound it just to get another laugh. The film makers had to know how silly this looked.... didnt they?  I hope that scene was supposed to be tongue-in-cheek or the film makers need to rethink their film careers. And of course, the thought process of the characters just didnt make any logical sense. I wont go into details, you'll see what I mean when you watch the movie.  Oh yeah, the mustard-covered fingers was also a classic laugh moment.The silver fyling ball is still cool as hell and that alone earned the movie an extra star rating from me. I do like Jody, he tries to do the right things for the most part and has that waaaay cool 'Cuda that he drives around.  Little Mike was just a young kid and you almost felt bad for him losing so many people he cared for.... it had to be tough.  However, that doesnt excuse the inherent silliness of the movie or the plot that just doesnt unfold correctly or logically.  Maybe I expected too much, maybe I've become an overly-critical movie watcher, but nontheless, I cant recommend this other than for a quick watch.  Rent it, dont buy it since it has really zero redeeming qualities or multiple-viewing value.This could have been soooooo much better with a the proper direction and a little more time put into the films flow. It was  a great concept for horror. Sci-Fi thrown in with mystical elements as well. Great starting point and it was refershingly different as opposed to the usual "10 kids go camping and get hacked by an ax murderer" [...] that you always see. Again though....it was NOT polished at all and just didnt work well enough.Sorry If I've burst the proverbial bubble of the movies fans. But, its a "cult" classic for a reason. Much like the Rocky-Horror Picture Show, the event is the real attraction for the fans...the movie itself is horrible and pointless but fans dont want to face that fact so they hide behind the "cult classic" label.  Hey, whatever.... :)By the way: The DVD quality is only average.  I expected a better transfer but on my plasma based Home theater, it was pretty grainy and not up to par with  what a re-release should be, IMO.[...
AMAZON SUCKS. I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!
What's up with that?. I wish I had read the other reviews first.  Though the quality of the episode and the video are top notch, the episode cuts off after 22 minutes.  Obviously, I already know the ending of "The Black Death", but I still wanted to see the full show
If you're looking for a fairy tale, this is the movie for you. Aside from some of the special effects, this is the worst movie I have ever seen.The story is basically an updated version of Pinnochio and it left me feeling cheated. I kept watching it becaue I expected so much more but it never, and I do mean never, delivered. I believe that I was supposed to feel pained over what the human race suffers but I just felt sad that I spent so much time with this movie
I've been cheated by Amazon. It really sucks, tried to download but it's not able to be viewed in pc's outsided the united states. Crikey.I'll have to wait for reruns to watch it on the telly.Whatta shame amazon dot com. Let's send a CSI to yer headquarters
Worst acting ever!. I turned this movie on one morning and was glued to it for 30 mins because I just knew it was a joke! WHM spoke as if he were on an infomercial, and the actress who played the student was no better.Knowing now that it was based on a play makes perfect sence. Plays hardly ever translate to good films! The acting in a play is just totally different, overly dramatic, not believable.Sorry, I hate to write a review based on 30 mins in the middle of a movie, but I purposely researched the title of this one so I could warn others off. No, actually, DO watch it! I want you to see for yourself how awful it is!and I like W.H. Macy
Dont get "Fiji" final week ... Dont dwnld " Survivor, "Thunderstorms & Sacrifice" ". Its my fault for not reading the whole thing. you would think that the last episode would be the finale , but NO, its just a 10 minute recap going to the finale 4. I didnt even get a full 45 minute episode. No finale. I got rippped off. $1.99 dwnld not well spent. Dont bother dwnldng any episode of fiji if you dont know the ending. Because they dont have that episode, not even the reunion show
Warning, Waste of Money. I'm trying to figure out what movie these other reviewers were watching. I wasted my money so you won't waste yours. It was so boring, I skipped through most of it and deleted it 1/2 way through
kultur shock. This is a total DVD disaster fom Kultur. I have tried two copies of this wonderful performance and both had a miserable soundtrack and opera is sound. Volume swells and fades throughout the performance destroying a terrific production. Would love to know what Placido Domingo thinks of it. Dr. Mirakle must have been the sound mixer
Really, really bad movie... one of the worst movies i've seen. Man, there's no way to describe this movie.Slow, boring, unidimensional, bad plot, really bad acting...Really low-budget (in a bad way)I'm not gonna get my time or my money back. I bought it based on the reviews, and they were really off... Even if you enjoy the gothic ambience, believe me, it's really bad.You've been warned
1.75 STARS: It's hard to give this movie any credit. After watching "Anthropophagus- The Grim Reaper", I came away with mixed feelings.  On the one hand, "Anthropohagus" had its moments (albeit quite few) where it was somewhat chilling.  The Anthropohagus, himself, was rather effectively creepy as a horror movie villain.  Some scenes did fairly well building up to a moment of horror, but the problem is that these effective moments of horror are few and far between.  Unfortunately, the majority of this movie is beset with horrible acting and a very cheaply made horror movie, and for some reason, it is just very difficult to get over this fact in "Anthropophagus" probably because these weaknesses are so glaring."Anthropophagus" may even have outdone itself with some of the gore scenes, so the gore-hound shouldn't be disappointed with this flick.  However, with that being said, "Anthropophagus" simply is not all that scary except for the few moments that deliver a scare or two to the audience, and even those moments are fairly pedestrian when compared to the classic horror movies we have come to know and love.  Ultimately, what you have in "Anthropophagus" is horrible acting, a poorly written screenplay, uneven and poorly developed plot and action, below average plot execution, just a couple of scary moments, some laughable scenes, a fairly decent amount of gore and an absolutely disgusting, deplorable and depraved scene of violence (fetus scene) that really crosses all boundaries of horror movies that I've ever seen and which really offers nothing as far as the merits of the movie are concerned and certainly offers nothing to cinematic horror.  If that kind of thing appeals to you, this could be right up your alley, but it doesn't do much for me.  I would rather find a really compelling storyline and a scary movie that delivers atmospheric tension, suspense and a scary story, and you simply do not get that in "Anthropophagus".  To answer a few questions that could be asked about this movie...did "Anthropophagus" bother me? No.  Did I think it was scary?  Certainly not, laughable at some points in the movie but not scary, and nor did I find it disturbing.  However, it can certainly be said that what else do you expect from a low-budget Italian-made horror flick? Touche!In my search for a great horror movie lost in the annals of cinematic horror like a needle in a haystack, what did I find in "Anthropophagus" but another shock and gore horror movie with horrible acting and a barely watchable storyline.  Indeed, it is very difficult to give this movie any credit.  A word of advice, if you have to try to make yourself like a horror movie even after repeated viewings (like I did with this one), it probably just sucks.  For all intents and purposes, that is the case with "Anthropophagus-The Grim Reaper".  Nevertheless, sadly, I've seen much, much worse.
Cruel Brittania. Britain, circa 1997.  Tony Blair is elected P.M.  Princess Di perishes.  And the Spice Girls are unleashed to an unsuspecting public.  This effort is an attempt to cash in on the phenomenon before a fickle populace turns their attention to the next best thing.  To be fair, the girls are not to blame for what a tedious flick this is.  Rather, they are appealing and prove to be the film's lone redeeming factor.  The fault lies in the script that tries to do for the Spice Girls what "A Hard Days' Night" did for the Beatles.  Whereas the Fab Four's film was full of wit and cogent commentary on Beatlemania this flick is unfunny and basically incoherent about what it's trying to say about the Spice craze.  I was reminded more of the Monkees' "Head" than I was of "A Hard Days' Night".  Lots of celeb cameos (Roger Moore, Elton John, et al) that amount to naught.  Oh, well.  On to "From Justin to Kelly"
Wayne and Hepburn Take "African Queen" Route. The unique screen chemistry between John Wayne and Katharine Hepburn barely elevates a Western rehash of "The African Queen." Without Wayne and Hepburn, this belated sequel to "True Grit" wouldn't pass muster as a made-for-TV movie. It's too bad Peter Bogdanovich didn't take up the Duke's offer to direct the project -- he might have improved upon Martha Hyer's routine script. This was Wayne's next-to-last Western, but he would end his career in a blaze of glory with "The Shootist" (1976)
Far and Away. Very disappointed because I can't watch it on my DVD player. I would have asked for a refund and returned it but don't know how to go about doing that on Amazon
Makes Plan 9 From Outer Space seem like Shakespeare. What a great cast!  I mean looking at this line up you just have to watch this movie, right?  After it starts it is so mesmerizingly awful that you still have to watch it, although you are shaking your head in disbelief!  Stunning!  You've never seen anything quite like it!  If you are a fan of the campy awful, you may see it as a masterpiece, if not you will still have a unique viewing experience.Proceed at your own risk!  Borrow or rent it before plunking down your hard earned cash to buy it.Did I mention the great cast?  So many of my favorites...even Goodman can't save this clunker
Great Movie - HORRIBLE DVD. The move is one of my favorite sci-fi films but this is the worst job of trasferring to DVD that I have seen. There are no special features and NO CHAPTER STOPS, this is as if they copied a video tape to a DVD. I could accecpt it being full frame but if I had known that it was this cheap a transfer I would not have purchased it
Rent it, don't buy it, and then fast forward. I consider myself fairly open when it comes to unique, or even delayed plot structure, except here. I must admit, the best parts of this movie were in the trailer. This movie made no sense, and the only possible reference to Babel was that you could understand no one. I fast forwarded through 1/2 of the 2.5 hour movie, and didn't miss a thing. If you must watch it, rent it and don't think it's worth keeping for an extra day based on the trailer, it won't be
Silly claptrap. Ridiculous, laughable! Written by a patriarchial mentality. If a man wants to know what a woman thinks or wants, then a man must ask a woman. No man understands women! The only woman who could be 'explained' by this nonsense is one who's been brainwashed by patriarchial idelolgy, and there are quite a few of that type in America (and in Saudi Arabia, and in Afghanistan, and ....).For a book that does explain women, to both women and men, see Simon de Beauvoir's 'The Second Sex'. Excellent text, I've read and reread it many times, with greeat benefit.
Like, Almost Totally Gross!. Although Valley Girl came out when I was a teenager, it somehow eluded me until now. I bought it because of the favorable reviews, and of course, for the sheer nostalgia. I won't say it's a BAD movie, but I would compare it directly to The Last American Virgin in terms of screenplay, story and acting. Unlike The Last American Virgin, however, this film has an awful sountrack, and it didn't really end in a notable way.From a filmmaking standpoint, this seems amateurish. Apparently this is where director Martha Coolidge cut her teeth, because she went on to direct the remarkably good college film, Real Genius, just two years later.The big problem with this film is shallowness. We never learn much about any of the characters, so it's not easy to care about them. I still can't figure out why the lead characters were attracted to each other, since the only way they ever describe each other is "hot". They never engage in deep conversations or share secrets with each other. There's no depth to the relationship at all.Another problem is that all the high school students in this film appear to be about 18-22 years old, while the sexy mother of one teenage girl appears to be under 30 years old herself. A whole subplot that revolves around the mother (Beth, played by Lee Purcell) is unsatisfactorily resolved about half-way throught the film, then never mentioned again. Even so, I like her temptations a lot more than Stifler's Mom in American Pie!Lisa Foreman's lead character, Julie, behaves less like a "Valley Girl" of the 1980's than she does an ordinary middle class teenager living in Overland Park, Kansas. If you're familiar with Moon Unit Zappa's song, "Valley Girl", you'll find almost none of that kind of language in this film. Nicolaus Cage's character, Randy, is likeable enough, but he looks more like a member of Jefferson Starship than a "punk" (his almost mullet-like hair is blown upward on top--that's it!). Unfortunately, for an "odd couple" story like this to work, you need to emphasize the extreme difference between the characters. But these characters could have easily been neighbors from childhood. They don't seem at all from the other side of the tracks.The obligatory montage scene fails because it continues for the entire length of the song, "I'll Melt With You". A montage is meant to compress time, and dragging it out for an entire song defeats that purpose. They should have faded it out after 45-60 seconds for more effect.The most entertaining characters in the film, by far, are Julie's parents--a couple of former hippies who were obviously the prototype for Berke Lander's parents in the hilarious 2001 teen film, "Get Over It".The soundtrack, too, is terribly inferior to The Last American Virgin, and doesn't represent the early 1980's well at all. Only the aforementioned "I'll Melt With You" stands out as a great song. Meanwhile, a tune that repeats the question "Johnny Are You Queer?" seems oddly out of place at a preppy high school prom.From a nostalgia standpoint, I didn't feel like I was watching an 80's movie at all. In fact, the most pleasant nostalgia in the film was seeing ashtrays on every table (even though the characters didn't smoke), which reminded me for the first time in years that California was once part of a free country, and wasn't always ruled by neurotics. Frankly, I was surprised that the Orwellian thought-police hadn't airbrushed all those ashtrays out of the film. Today, every surface in California is littered with a fear-mongering Proposition 65 warning stickers instead. I'm so grateful I was a teenager in the 1980's, rather than today!Overall, this film fails on too many counts to recommend it, but I wouldn't blame you for checking it out. It's good enough fun for 99 minutes. The Special Edition DVD adds quite a few features that make the DVD worthwhile, if you can get it cheap!
Assistant Night Manager of Illusions, maybe. It's always nice to watch Famke Janssen, of course, but I like it better when she's either a very smart X-Person or a Bond-busting sadist.  This movie really wanted to scare me but sheesh.  And the bad guy was like an evil version of Sgt. Carter from Gomer Pyle - totally implausible.  I think the problems start in these movies when horror writers direct them
Pipi Longstocking. Pipi LongstockingPippi Longstocking by Astrid Lindgren is an inspiring tale about a girl named Pipi. She has a horse and a monkey named Mr. Nelson. Next door are two very polite children named Tommy and Annika and they become friends. I like that I can relate to Annika in that she is always hesitant but after she gets started she doesn't want to stop Pipi's fother is a sea man and left her at the house with a	suitcase full of gold pieces. Pipi likes to go on adventures. One was when Pipi tricked two thieves into leaving her house with nothing This is just one example of the many heroic adventures in this exciting book. I like that it has a moral that is deep so you have fun reading it and you close the book with a smile
A BIG BOMB AND A STINKER FOR TOM CRUISE!. This movie is nearly 3 hours of hot air as bad as the movie The Hindenburg! If George C Scott saw this movie he would be rolling over in his grave! I yawned so much that I got a charley horse in my neck and nearly had a stroke from being bored to tears! Saddam Hussein should be strapped in a chair and be forced to watch this movie- maybe then would he confess of his atrocities that he committed! Stay as Far and Away from this movie as you can!
more like 2 and a half stars. Before I get started with my review i must say one thing. Im not just a mindless hater, trying to bash a fanatical fanbase of the legendary superman franchise. I liked the original movies, with the real superman christopher reeves and the real lex luthor gene hackman. with that being said here is why i really didn't like this movie.i felt it was too long and drawn out. Too much time was spent on Lousi lane crying and complaining about superman not saying goodbye before he left. she whined to her reporter friend, she whined to her husband, she whined to clark kent, she whined to her boss, and finally she whined to superman in another overly long melopdramitic flying scene. essentially making this movie a quasi chick flick/comic flick. and although the soundtrack was stunning at times, too much time was past just showing different scenery and background environments while letting the music play. yes atmoshere is great in movies but enough is enough.  basically im saying this movie was 90% melodrama and atmoshperic mumbo and 10% action.and although the action scenes where pretty cool, it is nothing we haven't seen before in a superman flick, or any other super hero flick.acting wise, i think the guy playing superman did a pretty good job, nothing compaired to reeves, but im not going to complain about that too much, he was servicable. and noone can complain about kevin spacey, he is just awesome, although i dont think he had the charisma that hackman has as lex. did not like louis lane. too whiney.story wise, this movie didnt really make much sense. it was way too out there. i mean yeah its a fantasy story and you have to use your imagination but i mean come on. lex luthor is going to basically destroy over half of the worlds population by creating the new continent and people are just going to go "yeah lets move there" and lex is going to make lots of money. not likely. i mean it would take years among years to make that crytallic and dark damp place to be somewhat livable. i dont think that lex would really be the type to want to put years of planning and prep to make this work. i mean most criminals want their power NOW, instant gratification. maybe im being overly harsh on a fantasy storyline, i just think they could have thought of something better, and more feasable.this movie was alright, it would have been helped a lot if they trimed about 30 minutes of melodrama away. and no i am not saying more action and less character development in movies, cause character developement is one of the most important aspects in the success of a truly great movie. however whiny crying does not constitute as strong character development in my book
What a let down/disappointment this film was!. Vanilla Sky is quite a disappointment considering the presence of Tom Cruise, Cameron Diaz, Kurt Russell, and Penelope Cruz, among others!The acting is pretty good (but nothing great), the plot is below average, while the dialogues/lines are way beyond "below average!"Tom Cruise and the rest of this AMAZING cast are given terrible lines and bad roles.  A shame, really...The dialogues-oh my- the dialogues are beyond words...As for the plot, school plays (and pre-school for that matter) have better storylines!  It is truly sad...It seems as though the writers/directors/producers decided to go artsy-fartsy on us, following in the dreaded footsteps of other such "films" as It's All About Love and the Russian Ark.So it's a weak plot, and a GREAT-but-wasted cast and setting, which when put together fail to take off.  No masterpiece here.
Not Happy. I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?
A rather boring movie/adaptation despite Vincent Price's brilliance. I simply thought that "The Fall of the House of Usher" was rather boring and I found myself dozing off.  I thought that "The Pit and the Pendulum" was a much better flick and a much more interesting adaptation.  In fact, I was quite disappointed with this adaptation of Edgar Allan Poe's brilliant short story "Fall of the House of Usher".  While the movie provides a grim atmosphere in accordance with the Poe's story, the movie drags and never really picks up enough steam to keep one's interest...however, I found the actual story written by Poe to be quite interesting and very entertaining...perhaps that is my problem with the movie as it is not nearly as good as the story itself.  This movie "The Fall of the House of Usher" could have been much better.  Notwithstanding the poor adaptation of Poe's classic story of despair, Vincent Price, as always, was terrific in his role...still, this is not enough to make this a good adaptation.  I recommend watching the clearly superior "The Pit and the Pendulum" instead of this flick
WHAT???????. This movie definitely had the potential to be gteat, the action scenes are pretty good.  But the love story in this movie seems like even the actors were dozing off during there own scenes.The final fight did't work for me either, and the very last scene I thought was pretty unnecessary.  Did anyone really remember Joey Wong was in this movie by the time that the end came.The commentary on the DVD was one of the better ones that I have heard from ric meyers
NO STARS movie!. A director who has no idea how to film dance sequences? An important song transmuted into God knows what? Mis-casting galore? A female star without one iota of chrisma? (If she stopped 3 shows cold they must have been high-school productions!) This is...or should have been...about the struggle to not only get a job on Broadway but to hang-on to that which is starting to fade. The all important role of Shiela seems little more than an after thought. Turned into a silly love story (which doesn't even play!) it is merely sad. Sad...and very, very BAD!!!(the one star rating is because I HAD to rate it!
Ambrose Bierce is a Better Authority. I have rented this video for the sake of a trip down Memory Lane. Of course, fourteen years produce a great shift in gullibility. I hated this video for its teaching of American ideology in perhaps the least open manner imaginable. For example, in
Sub-par issue of Excellent series. The Decalogue is one of several excellent TV series by European directors that puts US TV to shame. Like Bergman's "Scenes from a Marriage" & "Fanny & Alexander," von Trier's "The Kingdom," Fassbinder's "Berlin Alexanderplatz," Kusturica's "Underground," and Petersen's "Das Boot," The Decalogue was initially conceived as a series on television and eventually brought to US viewers' attention on the large screen via a limited art house run. Unlike these other series, Kieslowski's was conceived as ten separate stories that were only tied together by the fact that the stories all involved people in the same housing block (and characters from one episode may pop up in another).  The stories of The Dekalog are morality plays, but they are not re-enactments of The Ten Commandments, but rather inspired by them, and ultimately it is left to the viewer to decide the connection between the two.  Kieslowski & Piesiewicz wrote the ten screenplays and decided to do the 10 stories themselves (instead of contracting 10 of Poland's best up & coming director's to do each, as was initially planned), and instead hired a different cinematographer for each of the stories.  I won't comment on the content of the stories as many have already done so, and I feel that that would minimizes the impact of the experience of watching them, so I will comment on Kieslowski's style. Kieslowski has stated that his intent is to highlight personal consequences of a dramatic nature.  His films often tackle issues of political import, however he intentionally avoids making "issue films," but rather focuses on the personal consequences of those affected, as he feels that politics solves nothing & that films do not really change the political culture. His views on film stem from his experience as a director who stayed in Poland before, during & after the Solidarity movement. Initially he started as a documentary film maker, but as he saw that audiences were more interested in fiction and that documentary film-making has an impact on the lives of its subjects, he switched to his unique fictional style.This Facets 3-disc set of The Dekalog is apparently an improvement over the 2-disc version previously available, in that the picture quality is a little better, however it is still a far cry from what it could have been if Criterion had released this series. First, Facets has a mandatory ad for itself that automatically plays when you insert a disc & you have to let it play out before you can get to the menu. To add to that, you also have to watch another ad each and every time you select an episode to watch & after the end of each episode, very annoying. Then the picture quality isn't as good as it could be. Not only is there evidence of flaws in the film (scratches and blotches), but the film isn't a true digital copy of the original series, but rather a copy of someone's PAL tape of the broadcast, so the image is no better than watching a VHS tape.  The picture is also cropped from the original, especially on the bottom. The picture at times jitters, especially during the ending credits. The English subtitles are minimal, at times missing dialogue, and can not be turned off. There are some nice extra features, particularly a broadcast from Polish television of an interview of Kieslowski with a number of Polish journalists. However the quality of the picture of this is worse than on The Dekalog, and the entire dialogue is spoken over by people in English with no option to turn of the English dub & use subtitles instead. Apparently all of the other (imported) editions of The Dekalog are of better quality & offer more extras than this edition, which is inexcusable given the price
Star Trek:  City on the Edge of Forever. My favorite show of the Trek series but there's no way I'd buy another individual program from Amazon.  It will ONLY play on their downloaded player ...won't burn to DVD so can't play it on my television.  Don't bother buying this ...just go for the Trek collection on DVD
Dont get "Fiji" final week ... Dont dwnld " Survivor, "Thunderstorms & Sacrifice" ". Its my fault for not reading the whole thing. you would think that the last episode would be the finale , but NO, its just a 10 minute recap going to the finale 4. I didnt even get a full 45 minute episode. No finale. I got rippped off. $1.99 dwnld not well spent. Dont bother dwnldng any episode of fiji if you dont know the ending. Because they dont have that episode, not even the reunion show
NO JET LI DIDN'T!. I love Jet Li, I collect all his dvds but this movie really [stank]! Don't buy it even for the collection! Nobody will notice that you don't have it
Spend a couple hours of your life with 7 vile people. Of all the hateful self-centered characters and idiotic plot lines in this movie, the one I found most offensive was the one involving Emilio Estevez/Andie MacDowell.  Isn't stalking hilarious?  And isn't Kirby the cutest obsessed stalker you've ever seen?  I bet stalking victims everywhere wish their stalker was a lovable as little Kirby.I also loved at the end when Ally Sheedy tells Andrew McCarthy and Judd Nelson that she just wants them "all to be friends".  To which they both reply the classic cinema line, "Ehhhh... ok."  Wow.  Now that's drama.
I will never watch this again.... As a lover of many types of music, this movie sparked my interest....so I rented it.  I found myself thinking throughout the movie "I can't believe I'm actually watching this.  What a waste!"  Not only was the plot slow to the point of boring, but the film exalted lesbianism to the point that I (as a grown woman) actually fast-forwarded through a couple of scenes.  The small amount of goodness in the movie was not worth all of the disappointing twists and turns of the story.  Also, please carefully consider before allowing children to watch!! I will NEVER, under any circumstances watch this movie again. (I want the reader to know that I am in no way a movie critic.  I am writing this strictly as someone who wishes to steer others away from what I found to be a complete waste of an evening.
Beware of Unbox!!!. Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for
Why the Charge. Curious as to why Amazon would charge for this content when CBS offers it for free on the official Survivor Website.  Yeah, at the CBS site you have sit through 4 commercials, but it is worth it to not have to download any extra programs
read the book instead. This movie,   the story of a shocking long-ago murder entwined with the story of a modern woman who is investigating it,  is only worth watching to see the scenes leading up to the past crime.   The modern day portion of the movie is very tedious.    Elizabeth Hurley's and Sean Penn's characters are laughable caricatures.    Anita Shreve's writings never disappoint,   read the book instead.
DVD PUT IT ON DVD. I DONT WONT TO DOWNLOAD IT I WONT IT ALL ON DVD THIS IS WASTE MONE
Cheesy Sci-Fi flick only has *some* good things to offer, but its really silly... Josh Charles (S.W.A.T., Tv's Sports Night) finds out that he is the bearer of a key that can make you travel into different dimensions. Andrea Roth brings him to her friend, played by Rutger Hauer (The Hitcher, Sin City) who guides Charles and tells him that his father was a timedimensional warrior and that he could be too as well. On the evil end, baddie Stuart Wilson (No Escape, The Mask of Zorro) wants the key and the septer that goes along with it so he can fuse worlds together and be the ruler and what not and the trio must bring back the septer to the right place before evil hands get on it and the fate of the world is at risk. Interesting idea is squandered by sillyness and dumb dialouge and some pretty crummy acting, altough Charles saves this from being a total disaster. It's good to see Hauer not being a bad guy but he's wasted along with Wilson. AND, well, it was surprising to see Jack Black (School of Rock, King Kong) in this movie...one before he became famous. Black does his mannerisms and speech. Watch it once and then dimension jump the hell out of the room.
Tangled gets tangled in its own self......a big bore. Shawn Hatosy (The Faculty, Outside Providence) is in love with Rachael Leigh Cook (She's All That, Antitrust) but she doesnt love him, she only wants to be his friend, then enter Hatosy's friend, Jonathan Rhys-Meyers (Tv's Elvis, Velvet Goldmine) who becomes Cook's boyfriend and Hatosy becomes jealous from this....who hasnt gotten made when a friend seduces the girl you love....you know what, who cares really. Hatosy tells the story in flashback telling the story to cop Lorraine Bracco (The Sopranos, Medicine Man). This boring story has no likable characters and invokes really thin interest with me. Cook is really stale, Hatosy, as much as a good actor he is is rendered dull and Meyers plays another sleaze ball like in most of his thrillers. Worth a look and by god Im not looking again and towards the end you're like....WHY I DID I RENT THIS?!!. Also starring Estella Warren (Planet of the Apes remake).
0 STARS:  This movie sucks. "Sometimes They Come Back" is a terrible attempt at a horror movie.  I love Tim Matheson and I think he is a very good actor, but this movie is just incredibly lame.  The idea that these four little punks with leather jackets on are supposed to be scary as ghosts simply does nothing for me except make me thoroughly disappointed that I wasted my time watching this crap.  The is movie is a JOKE!!The scene this movie is based on is a sad scene for sure, but to base the whole movie on it is going to far with nothing.  Basically, this whole movie is much ado about nothing.I think the biggest joke and the most terrible thing about this movie are these little leather jacket wearing punks as ghosts are supposed to scare the viewer and it simply does not work!!  The premise behind this movie is flawed and lacking in substance from which a horror movie can be successfully derived."sometimes They Come Back" is entirely ineffective as a horror movie and evokes only laughter from a sophisticated horror movie fan.  The sequel is so bad, it is not worthy of a comment.  Some people call "Sometimes They Come Back" a good horror movie...I just call it rubbish
Survivor Rip Off. I have bought 2 seasons of Survivor on unbox and both of them are not complete. Very dissapointing. Guatemala  episode 11 is from a completely different season and it is missing the last 2 episodes and the reunion show. Just leaves you hanging. Exile Island is missing the final episode it just goes from the competition between Danielle and Cirie for a spot in the final 3 to the live reunion show
I can't believe people enjoy this movie. This movie is complete garbage. I actually like Robert Downey Jr as an actor but hated him in this movie. Please do yourself a favor and don't watch this trash
Just another boring '70s movie. First off, the name of the movie and the cover art are completely misleading - this has nothing to do with any sort of "Graveyard", and if they wanted to give you an idea of what you'll see inside, they would have put a grainy, washed out picture of a typical '70s housewife on the cover.  This is a really boring '70s detective drama about a rash of deaths in a small town.  Some FBI guy is called in to investigate.  As it turns out, there are some women who, via some genetic cross-breeding that gets only the vaguest of explanations, are now running around having sex with men until they die.  The FBI guy figures this out by making a gigantic leap in logic.  At the very end there are some sci-fi elements, but that's about it.  Oh yeah, there's also a lot of topless women in it - just about every female in the movie gets topless.  That's about the only good thing this movie has going for it.The picture quality is horrible, it looks like it was made from an old worn out video tape.  It also looks like whoever filmed it didn't know how to use a camera, as many of the outdoor scenes are completely washed out (the naked girl on the motorcycle looks like a white blob), and many of the indoor scenes are extremely dark.  The sound, advertised as Dolby 2.0, is simply mono.Overall, don't waste your time.  It's not "fun" or "cheesy", it's just a crummy '70s flick that is rather boring, and the DVD transfer is terrible.
Dont get "Fiji" final week ... Dont dwnld " Survivor, "Thunderstorms & Sacrifice" ". Its my fault for not reading the whole thing. you would think that the last episode would be the finale , but NO, its just a 10 minute recap going to the finale 4. I didnt even get a full 45 minute episode. No finale. I got rippped off. $1.99 dwnld not well spent. Dont bother dwnldng any episode of fiji if you dont know the ending. Because they dont have that episode, not even the reunion show
